 <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio In Xiaoyu Town of Fusheng City. At the end of Bluestone Street was a white-walled and dainty courtyard with a high gate. A plaque hung high above the main gate, with the words “Jiang Mansion” written on it. This was the mansion of the Jiang family, a wealthy family of Xiaoyu Town. Jiang Ping was leisurely lying on a bamboo rattan chair, humming a tune. The afternoon sun shone on his body, making him feel warm and comfortable. But just as he was about to fall asleep, he suddenly heard an anxious voice. “Patriarch, something serious has happened!” Jiang Ping woke with a start. Then, he saw the anxious butler panting as he came running in from outside the door. “Uncle Zhong, slow down. You’re not young anymore. Why are you still so impatient?” Jiang Ping casually said and pointed at the tea on the stone table. “Drink some water first.” The man called Chen Zhong was the butler of Jiang Ping’s residence. He was already over 50 years old, but that meant he was wise and experienced, and was a very capable assistant. He was usually very calm, and he was rarely as flustered as he was today. Needless to say, something bad must have happened. Chen Zhong’s face was flushed red, and he was out of breath. Clearly, he had been running too fast. He did not seem to have heard what Jiang Ping said, instead he said anxiously, “Patriarch, something bad has happened. Miss Wan’er has beaten someone up on Sanshi Street!” Jiang Ping immediately became nervous, and could not help but frown. He had three daughters, and among them, the eldest daughter was the naughtiest. She was a little girl, but she was more torturous than a boy. At the age of five or six, she often made Jiang Ping and other people worry. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “I’ll have to teach her a lesson when she’s back!” Jiang Ping snorted and said to Chen Zhong. “Go to the bank to withdraw some money and apologize to the other party.” When the old butler heard this, his face became somewhat hesitant. “Patriarch, I’m afraid this won’t do.” “What now?” “Miss Wan’er has beaten Li Xiaojiang, the Li family’s youngest son.” Jiang Ping was instantly stunned, and his brows knitted together. This Li family was an influential cultivation family in Xiaoyu Town. The family was powerful, and they didn’t lack anything, least of all money. They also owned a few spiritual fields that could be used to grow spiritual herbs. Although these damaged spiritual fields weren’t worth much, the status of the Li family was very high and they were different from ordinary families. Money alone would not be enough to appease them. ‘Sigh! Forget it,’ Jiang Ping thought. Jiang Ping’s brows slowly relaxed, and his tone became calm. “Since that’s the case, then just prepare more generous gifts.” “After all, they are all five or six-year-old children who don’t know how to behave.” “When you are at the Li family, be humble and courteous. I think they won’t make things too difficult for our Jiang family.” “You can go now.” After saying that, Jiang Ping waved his hand. The butler sighed lightly, nodded his head, and left. This Li family had been acting arrogantly and tyrannically in Xiaoyu Town lately. They might not give him face easily. If Patriarch didn’t show up personally, the Li family might not let them get away with it. But now that Jiang Ping had spoken, he could only do as he was told. Looking at his back as he left, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but fall into his memories. Three years ago, he accidentally transmigrated to this world. Then he became the head of a cultivation family in decline and even had three young daughters. This was a cultivation world where strength was the most important thing. In order to increase their strength, the cultivators fought and killed each other. In order to prevent the cruel battles from affecting his daughters’ growth, Jiang Ping and his family lived in seclusion in Xiaoyu Town near Fusheng City. However, cultivators existed even in the remote Xiaoyu Town. For example, Li Batian, the patriarch of the Li family, was a cultivator at the peak of the refinement realm. The realms of cultivators ranged from low to high, namely physical tempering, Qi refinement, core building, and origin core. As for the later realms, ordinary people had no way of knowing. Because even the strongest person in Fusheng City was only at the origin core realm, and even the number of core building cultivators was pitifully few. And in this remote town, even a physical tempering cultivator was a person that ordinary people would look up to. As for the patriarch of the Li family, he was even more extraordinary. He was considered a famous figure even in Fusheng City, not to mention in Xiaoyu Town. Therefore, the Li family was usually the dominant power of this Xiaoyu Town. How could ordinary people dare to offend them? Thinking of his eldest daughter, Jiang Ping felt a headache coming on again. This daughter of his was usually naughty and mischievous, but the worst thing was that she liked to beat people up. He had taught her earnestly, hoping that she could become a proper lady, but she just had to become a wild child instead. He didn’t know whether the Li family would accept the apology or not. The sun slowly set in the west, and the shadows gradually grew longer under the dimming sunlight. Jiang Ping lay on the bamboo chair, no longer as comfortable as before. “Patriarch, something bad has happened!” Another wave of anxious shouts came from outside the door. Chen Zhong’s voice could be heard before he appeared, as was his habit. Jiang Ping had just sat up when he saw Chen Zhong running in with a red face, panting heavily. A pile of exquisitely wrapped gift boxes was clutched in his hands. Needless to say, he must have been rejected and forced back by the Li family. Sure enough, Chen Zhong said with a dark face, “Patriarch, this Li family is too much.” “I went to apologize to them, but they didn’t even look at the gift. They didn’t even let me in and started scolding me.” “They said...;” Chen Zhong stammered and lowered his head, not daring to say anything more. Jiang Ping was stunned. He could already tell that the Li family had probably used some harsh words. Otherwise, his butler wouldn’t have been scared speechless. “What else did they say? You don’t have to hide it from me.” “They said that in Xiaoyu Town, no one dares to offend the Li family.” “They also said that if you don’t go personally and apologize, then our Jiang family will have to pay a heavy price.” Jiang Ping’s face instantly darkened when he heard this. This matter wouldn’t be resolved so easily. He sighed. This was yet another troublesome matter. At this moment, a little girl wearing a red dress walked in from outside. Behind her was another girl who was about 14 or 15 years old. The girl in the red dress was fair-skinned and looked extremely cute. “Today is a good day, and I’m thinking about...;” She hummed the tune her father taught her and bounced around like an innocent and lively child. There wasn’t the slightest bit of worry or regret in her expression. She didn’t even have the slightest idea that hitting someone was wrong! That’s right, the girl in the red dress was his eldest daughter, Jiang Wan’er. The older girl who entered with her was her personal maid. Jiang Ping’s face instantly darkened, and his voice was low. “Wan’er, come over here.” Jiang Wan’er, who had just entered, felt her heart thump. Her father rarely spoke to her in such a tone. What was going on today? The smile on Jiang Wan’er’s face quickly faded, and she ran toward Jiang Ping with small steps. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Wan’er ran towards Jiang Ping with small steps. Although she was usually fearless, she was afraid of her father when he was like this. Looking at her father’s serious face, her small hands suddenly twisted together, not knowing what to do. “Dad, why did you call me?” Jiang Ping’s face was dark as he asked in a deep voice, “Did you get into trouble again today?” Her body trembled and she quickly shook her head. “No, I was very obedient today. If you don’t believe me, you can ask Cai Rou.” Cai Rou was Jiang Wan’er’s personal maid. But Jiang Ping didn’t pay any attention to her. This little girl was playing tricks on him. He might accidentally fall into her trap. “What? Are you still not being honest? Do you mean that your Uncle Zhong has wronged you?” Jiang Ping’s tone became colder and colder. Seeing this, Jiang Wan’er was so anxious that she pulled the braids on her head. However, she still didn’t understand what kind of trouble she had caused. The butler and Cai Rou were also very anxious. “Dad, what kind of trouble have I caused?” Jiang Wan’er was so anxious that her eyes became watery. Jiang Ping couldn’t bear to see her in this manner. But his face didn’t change. “Well, I’ll give you a reminder.” “Did you beat up that Li Xiaojiang on Sanshi Street today?” Hearing the name Li Xiaojiang, Jiang Wan’er suddenly understood. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) It was that snotty guy who wasn’t as tall as her but walked with a swagger. And there were a few kids following behind him. Jiang Wan’er snorted and shook her head. “No, I didn’t hit him.” Hearing this answer, Jiang Ping’s face darkened. Judging from her expression just now, it was obvious that she had thought of something. However, she continued pretending to be confused. “You still don’t admit it, right?” “If you don’t admit it, I will be angry.” As he said this, Jiang Ping acted as if he was about to lose his temper. Jiang Wan’er was so scared that she quickly waved her small hands and said in a childish voice. “Dad, don’t be angry. I didn’t deny it.” “I really didn’t hit him. I only kicked him lightly.” Looking at her, Jiang Ping’s heart instantly softened. For a moment, he was also slightly convinced. “You really only kicked him lightly?” Jiang Ping’s tone suddenly became much gentler. Jiang Wan’er noticed the difference and nodded frantically. “Yes, yes. I really didn’t hit him!” But Jiang Ping was still a little suspicious. He turned his head and asked the butler, “Uncle Zhong, is what Wan’er said true?” Hearing this, Jiang Wan’er immediately winked at Chen Zhong. But how could Jiang Ping not see it? He coughed coldly, and Jiang Wan’er immediately stood at attention, not daring to play any more tricks. Chen Zhong squeezed out a bitter smile. “It was a kick, but Li Xiaojiang’s leg is broken.” Hmph! Jiang Ping snorted coldly. “Is this what you mean by a light kick?” “You broke his leg!” Jiang Wan’er raised her head, wanting to say something. But she didn’t know what else to say, so she could only lower her head again. Seeing that she didn’t answer, Jiang Ping’s anger subsided a little. “Tell me, why did you hit him?” Jiang Ping’s tone didn’t change at all. And when Jiang Wan’er heard this question, she immediately became angry. She said with an indignant look, “That guy is always bossing people around in town, bullying those poor kids.” “I couldn’t stand it anymore, so I gave him a kick. Let’s see if he still dares to bully others in the future.” “Hehe, Dad, do you think I did the right thing?” As she said that, Jiang Wan’er put on a cheeky smile. Then, she walked to Jiang Ping’s side and hooked her arm around his. A pair of big shining eyes blinked as if hinting at Jiang Ping, ‘Dad, praise me. Did I do a good job?’ After Jiang Ping listened to her narration, his face turned even darker. He flicked the girl’s forehead, causing Jiang Wan’er to quickly let go of his hand and cover her forehead in pain. Tears even appeared in her bright eyes. “Dad, what are you doing?!” Jiang Wan’er pouted and protested. Jiang Ping only snorted lightly. “You still have the nerve to say that you did the right thing after hitting someone?” “But it was a bad person!” Jiang Wan’er was very unconvinced. ‘It’s fine if Dad doesn’t want to praise me, but he even hurt my forehead. Is he my biological father?’ Jiang Wan’er thought. “Don’t you always say that we should have a kind heart? I only did it because I saw that Li Xiaojiang bullying others. Why are you blaming me instead?” Jiang Ping was stunned. This girl dared to talk back now. “If you can’t stand it, you can use other methods. Why do you have to hit people?” “I remember telling you that fighting is wrong, right?” “I–!” Jiang Wan’er immediately stuttered. The most frequent thing her father had told them was not to stir up trouble. However, before she could defend herself, Jiang Ping continued. “This time, you were lucky that nothing too serious happened to you.” “What would happen if one day you meet an opponent who you cannot defeat, and you get hurt?” “If that happens, it will break my heart!” “Then I’ll become stronger!” Jiang Wan’er pouted and didn’t think much of it. “Hmph, there’ll always be someone better than you. The stronger a person is, the more danger they will encounter!” Jiang Ping’s words continued to pour out. Jiang Wan’er saw that he had no intention of stopping and her big eyes rolled around. She quickly changed the topic. “Dad, the weather today is really good!” “Don’t interrupt me. I’m not done yet.” “Dad, you’ve been talking for so long. You must be thirsty!” “Let me pour you a cup of water.” After saying that, Jiang Wan’er walked and stood beside a stone table that was about her height. Then, she stepped on a stone bench and poured a cup of tea. She carefully brought it in front of Jiang Ping. “Dad, be careful, it’s hot!” Jiang Wan’er’s smiling eyes narrowed into crescent moons. This smile extinguished Jiang Ping’s anger. He sighed and reached out to take the tea. He had no choice. He had such an adorable daughter. He could not be ruthless even if he wanted to. Jiang Ping took a sip of the tea and instructed Chen Zhong. “Uncle Zhong, prepare the carriage and the generous gifts.” Jiang Wan’er’s body trembled. “Dad, where are you going?” “It’s not just me. You’re coming with me to apologize to the Li family.” Jiang Ping pointed at Jiang Wan’er’s small head. “No, I don’t want to!” Jiang Wan’er put her hands on her hips to protest. In the end, Jiang Ping pulled her into his arms. “You don’t have a choice!” “Hmph, Dad, you’re such a coward!” Jiang Wan’er struggled in her father’s arms for a while, but she really couldn’t break free. She could only turn her head away and grunt. Jiang Ping carried Jiang Wan’er out of the gate and into the carriage. There was no other way. If he didn’t hug her a little tighter, she might have broken free and run away. This girl was really a headache! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The Li family was one of the big families in Xiaoyu Town. Its estate was located at the end of one of the most prosperous streets in the town. Every part, from the gate to the courtyard to the mansion itself, was luxurious. It occupied a large area of prime land where every square inch was worth a fortune. One could see how deep its heritage was. Looking from afar, the Li family estate was extremely imposing, towering over the nearby buildings. The carriage of the Jiang family stopped in front of the gate of the Li family estate. Jiang Ping held Jiang Wan’er’s small hand and slowly walked down from the carriage. There were four guards standing in front of the Li family’s main gate. Each of them had a robust and imposing figure. “Please inform your patriarch that the Jiang family’s patriarch has brought his eldest daughter to pay a visit!” Chen Zhong went forward and said to the leader of the guards. The guards saw Chen Zhong leave earlier, and now he had returned with two rather conspicuous people standing behind him. One of them was a polite-looking and handsome young man who was dressed in a green robe. He was holding the hand of a little girl who was about five or six years old. She was fair-skinned and had braided hair. He immediately understood what was going on. The leader of the guards cast a sidelong glance at Jiang Ping and snorted coldly. “Just wait here!” Then, he turned around and entered the gate. The remaining three guards stood in front of the gate like three fierce gods, staring coldly at Jiang Ping and the others. Chen Zhong couldn’t help but frown. No matter what, there should still be etiquette. However, these guards really didn’t think much of the patriarch of the Jiang family. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Jiang Ping, on the other hand, was much calmer. He just stood there quietly. It was as if he didn’t notice the expressions of these people at all. This made Jiang Wan’er unhappy, and she grumbled with her small mouth. ‘Dad is really a coward! He doesn’t get angry when others stare at him in this manner!’ Jiang Wan’er thought. After a long time, the guard returned from the courtyard. He said coldly, “Patriarch Jiang, please.” Although he said ‘please’, he strode into the courtyard without any manners. Jiang Ping didn’t care. He held Jiang Wan’er’s hand and followed. The Li family’s courtyard occupied a large area, and the paths in the courtyard were complicated. They took many turns and finally came to a pond. There was a pavilion in the pond, and a figure was sitting in the pavilion. “Patriarch Jiang, please go ahead.” The leader of the guards signaled Jiang Ping to go to the pavilion. The one sitting in the pavilion was obviously the patriarch of the Li family, Li Batian. Jiang Ping nodded and walked slowly to the pavilion with Jiang Wan’er and Chen Zhong. As they walked closer to the pavilion, Chen Zhong’s heart was beating faster and faster. The person in the pavilion was a famous peak-stage refinement realm expert in Xiaoyu Town. Could today’s matter be easily resolved? While he was still pondering, the three of them had already entered the pavilion. He saw that the middle-aged man in front of him was dressed luxuriously. His gaze was cold, and his expression gloomy. He raised his eyelids slightly and glanced at Jiang Ping and the other two. He didn’t stand up. Instead, he drank a cup of tea and spoke slowly. “It seems Patriarch Jiang is quite free today. May I know why you’ve come to my Li Mansion?” Jiang Ping cupped his fists as a greeting. “Brother Li, I’ve come because my daughter injured your son this morning, and I feel quite uneasy about it.” “That’s why I prepared a small gift to apologize to your son.” After saying this, Jiang Ping glanced at Chen Zhong. Chen Zhong immediately placed the gift box in his hand on the stone table in front of Li Batian. “This is a small token of my remorse. I hope Brother Li doesn’t mind.” “Our two families live together in Xiaoyu Town. We should be on friendly terms.” “Brother Li, what do you think?” Jiang Ping maintained a faint smile and spoke in a calm tone. Li Batian glanced at the gift box with disdain and clapped once. He snorted coldly and said, “Xiaojiang is the treasure of our Li family, and your daughter broke his leg.” “Is this all you have? Only a beggar would be appeased with such a small gift!” He suddenly got angry, and Jiang Ping couldn’t help but be silent for a moment. “Then according to Brother Li, how should we resolve this matter?” “Hmph, that will depend on your sincerity.” Li Batian pushed the gift box on the table away from him, revealing a disdainful expression. “Our Li family doesn’t care about these things.” “Since you want to apologize, it should be based on what I want, not what you can give.” As soon as he finished speaking, Li Batian stared at Jiang Ping with an extremely aggressive gaze. Seeing this scene, Jiang Wan’er immediately became a little angry. Although she didn’t quite understand the conversation between the two of them, she still felt that her father was being bullied. ‘How dare you bully my father? I’ll teach you a lesson in the future!’ Of course, this was only what she thought in her heart. Although she was young, she wasn’t stupid. She definitely couldn’t defeat him now. Jiang Ping sighed helplessly. “Then what does Brother Li want?” These words were equivalent to giving in. Naturally, Li Batian was pleased. He stretched out a finger and said coldly. “Simple.” “If you want to resolve today’s matter, then bring me a spirit nurturing pill!” Jiang Ping immediately fell into deep thought when he heard this. This spirit nurturing pill was very valuable. It was a pill refined from the primordial lotus, the Yanbo grass, and the myriad vine. It contained a large amount of spiritual energy, which could help ordinary people relax their meridians and activate their true Qi. It had the miraculous effect of allowing a physical tempering cultivator to break through to the Qi refinement realm. In Xiaoyu Town, it was priceless! After pondering for a while, Jiang Ping finally made a decision. Sigh, forget it. It was better to have less trouble than more trouble. Moreover, it was indeed Wan’er’s fault. He had to let her know that if she did something wrong, she had to apologize to others. He hoped that she would not cause more trouble in the future. Looking at the silent Jiang Ping, Li Batian’s tone suddenly turned cold. “The patriarch of the Jiang family doesn’t agree?” “Are you unable to bring me one, or do you look down on our Li family?” The threat was self-evident. Jiang Ping sighed softly. “I wouldn’t dare. Since that’s the case, I’ll do as Brother Li says.” Jiang Ping asked for a piece of paper and pen, wrote a letter, and handed it to Chen Zhong. This spirit nurturing pill was quite valuable. If it wasn’t for the letter written by him, the butler wouldn’t have been able to get it. Chen Zhong took the letter and left quickly. The Jiang family and the Li family were actually not that far apart. In addition, he was in a hurry and didn’t dare to delay at all. He quickly returned with a box containing the spirit nurturing pill. Chen Zhong carefully handed the box to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping turned around and handed the box to Li Batian. Li Batian’s heart skipped a beat. His eyes flashed with excitement. He gently took the box and slowly opened it. He saw a round cyan-blue pill lying quietly in the box. It was also emitting a faintly discernible coolness. That’s right, it was the spirit nurturing pill! ‘With this spirit nurturing pill, our Li family would have another refinement realm expert!’ Li Batian thought. Li Batian was overjoyed, but he pretended as if nothing had happened. However, how could his change escape Jiang Ping’s gaze? Jiang Ping felt that the problem was resolved. Hence, he asked tentatively, “Brother Li, I’ve already given you the spirit nurturing pill. Then, this matter should be settled now, right?” Hearing this, Li Batian regained his senses and looked at Jiang Ping. He didn’t expect that Jiang Ping would hand over the spirit nurturing pill so easily. For a moment, in his eyes, Jiang Ping had become a fat sheep waiting to be slaughtered. He could not easily let go of this opportunity to squeeze him dry. ‘Let alone a spirit nurturing pill, even if I want more, you have to give it to me today!’ he thought to himself Therefore, he coughed and regained his cold expression. He said in a deep voice, “The spirit nurturing pill alone is not enough.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Li Batian stared at Jiang Ping coldly. He didn’t think Jiang Ping would dare to object. “Patriarch Jiang, if you want to get over this matter, one spirit nurturing pill is not enough.” “You must add something else!” “Otherwise, hmph!” His tone seemed unquestionable. Although he did not finish his sentence, the meaning behind it was self-evident. Chen Zhong’s heart sank when he heard this. ‘This person is taking things too far. The spirit nurturing pill is so precious, yet he felt that it wasn’t enough. He is clearly trying to take advantage of our Jiang family! Sigh, we do not have the strength to protect ourselves. It looks like our Jiang family is going to spend a lot of money today,’ Chen Zhong thought to himself. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but raise his eyebrows when he heard this. He didn’t expect that Li Batian’s appetite would be so big. He lowered his head and looked at Wan’er, who was holding his hand tightly. Then, he let out a sigh. He turned his head and said to Li Batian. “Brother Li, we can discuss anything, but let’s go somewhere else.” Li Batian was immediately delighted. Sure enough, Jiang Ping didn’t dare to object at all. But he still concealed it very well and didn’t reveal even a trace of his excitement. He just nodded indifferently. At the same time, his gaze paused on Jiang Wan’er. Then, he said, “Follow me.” Following that, he took the lead and walked out of the pavilion. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Jiang Ping turned his head and looked at Chen Zhong. “Uncle Zhong, wait here with Wan’er.” “Patriarch, why don’t we forget about it?” Chen Zhong was clearly uneasy. He had a worried expression on his face. However, Jiang Ping waved his hand gently and patted Wan’er’s head as he said softly. “Wan’er, be good and wait for me here. I will be back soon.” Wan’er didn’t know what her father wanted to do. But it was really comfortable to be patted by her father in this manner. Thus, Wan’er subconsciously nodded. Jiang Ping smiled when he saw this and comforted Chen Zhong. “Uncle Zhong, you can rest assured. Everything will be fine.” After saying that, he let go of Wan’er’s small hand and followed Li Batian. Chen Zhong felt uneasy. He still nodded perfunctorily, but his face was filled with worry as his gaze fell on Jiang Ping’s departing figure. ...; Li Batian brought Jiang Ping to a remote and quiet house, which was surrounded by bamboos. There were almost no servants or maids passing by. Looking at such an environment, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but feel happy. ‘Great, no one will know then,’ Jiang Ping thought. Jiang Ping followed Li Batian into the house and closed the door behind him. Li Batian turned around and sat down. He was about to ask Jiang Ping to sit down. But when he looked up, he found that Jiang Ping had already sat down. And he seemed like a different person. But he couldn’t tell exactly what was different. At this moment, Jiang Ping looked at Li Batian nonchalantly. He said indifferently, “Say it. If the spirit nurturing pills aren’t enough, what else do you want?” Li Batian was instantly stunned. Jiang Ping’s current attitude was completely different from when he was outside. He no longer appeared weak. Instead, he now had a dashing and casual attitude. But Li Batian soon composed himself. He shook his head gently and threw out all these doubts. Then he said flatly, “Patriarch Jiang, I’m not asking for too much.” “You know my son is talented and precious.” “Not only is he the treasure of our Li family, but he’s also a child that everyone is envious of even in Xiaoyu Town.” “Now...;” As he listened to Li Batian’s nagging, Jiang Ping could not help but snort. Although he rarely interacted with outsiders, he was not ignorant. The Li family’s youngest son, Li Xiaojiang, was a child that everyone despised in Xiaoyu Town! Li Batian was really shameless, lying through his teeth. Wan’er was still waiting for him, so he did not want to waste time with Li Batian. So, he simply waved his hand and interrupted him. “Just say it. What else do you want?” Li Batian was a little unhappy to be interrupted. He said coldly, “Since you’re so quick-witted, I’ll say it directly.” Li Batian paused and the corner of his mouth curled up. “I want a spirit transcendence pill!” Hearing this, Jiang Ping’s gaze immediately narrowed. How dare he ask for a spirit transcendence pill! This spirit transcendence pill was even more precious than the spirit nurturing pill. It was a pill that helped Qi refinement cultivators break through to the core building realm. Not to mention in Xiaoyu Town, even in Fusheng City, it was a treasure that people would fight over! He was obviously being greedy after he saw how quickly Jiang Ping agreed to his first request. Jiang Ping was silent for a moment, then his gaze suddenly turned sharp. “Brother Li, you really dare to ask for that? What if I don’t give it to you?” Looking at Jiang Ping’s expression, Li Batian didn’t care at all. People would get angry when they were cornered. However, he didn’t care at all about the anger of the weak. A dangerous light flashed in his eyes, and his voice was aloof and indifferent. “You try that!” As soon as he said that, Li Batian’s aura suddenly changed. A vast and majestic aura instantly poured out and pounced towards Jiang Ping. The furniture and decorations around Li Batian shook under the terrifying aura. Even the porcelain bottle on Jiang Ping’s right hand was on the verge of tipping over. This was the strength of the third level of the refinement realm that Li Batian was so proud of! He believed that such strength was enough to make the Jiang Ping bend the knee. Now that things had come to this, he had torn off his last facade. No longer holding back, he threatened, “You’re not giving it to me? Then don’t even think about walking out of this door today!” He snorted coldly and continued. “And your daughter outside has to pay the price too.” Jiang Ping’s eyes instantly widened, and icy rage flashed in his eyes. His daughter was the most invaluable treasure to him. Now, Li Batian actually dared to use Wan’er to threaten him. This completely infuriated him. His voice was like permafrost, making Li Batian’s hair stand on end. “You don’t want to accept a proper apology, and you even want to be greedy and ask for more?” “How dare you use my precious daughter to threaten me. You really don’t know what’s good for you.” In an instant, an extremely powerful aura surged out from Jiang Ping’s body like a surging waterfall. Crack! Crack! Crack! The sounds of shattering rang out one after another. Porcelain bottles, wooden tables, chairs, and jade adornments were shattered one after another. Li Batian was completely stunned. He stared blankly at the scene before him, but couldn’t say anything. In front of this fierce and surging aura, he was like a raft on the ocean. If he was not careful, he would be drowned by the monstrous waves and die. “No, this is impossible!” Li Batian screamed. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Li Batian couldn’t move. Jiang Ping’s imposing aura was like a huge mountain, pressing down on him with a loud rumble and making him unable to resist. He subconsciously licked his lips, only to discover that his mouth and tongue had long been dry. Drops of cold sweat trickled down his forehead. This formidable imposing manner was simply unheard of to him! It wasn’t that he had been living under a rock. He had seen many powerful ‘core building’ stage cultivators in Fusheng City. But even among those cultivators, no one’s aura could be compared to Jiang Ping’s. In an instant, a terrifying thought instantly filled his mind. Could it be that Jiang Ping was an origin core realm cultivator?! No, this was impossible! Li Batian’s eyes were unfocused and listless. There was a voice in his heart that had been struggling endlessly. How could Xiaoyu Town possibly hide an origin core realm expert?! It must be an illusion. Right, an illusion! Li Batian panted heavily. However, in the next moment, Jiang Ping’s body disappeared and reappeared right in front of Li Batian. Before Li Batian could react, Jiang Ping’s fair and slender right hand reached out like a ghost. Then, he caught Li Batian by the neck and lifted him up. Jiang Ping’s gaze was ice-cold. Li Batian only looked at him for a moment and felt shivers run down his spine. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) He quickly averted his gaze and avoided looking at him. Li Batian felt as if he was about to suffocate. His expression was extremely ferocious as he struggled against Jiang Ping’s grip. The veins on his forehead were popping out one by one. He tried his best to say something, but he was completely unable to do so. He could only make some squeaking sounds. Jiang Ping looked at his appearance and snorted coldly. Then, he waved his hand and threw Li Batian to the ground. “Cough Cough!” Li Batian covered his neck and coughed uncontrollably. Tears and snot flowed down his face. He looked extremely pathetic as he lay on the ground and panted heavily. The next moment, Jiang Ping squatted down in front of him. When Jiang Ping’s figure appeared in his eyes, Li Batian’s body shook uncontrollably. “Bang! Bang! Bang!” Without any hesitation, Li Batian crazily kowtowed. His mouth was still begging for mercy, “Please spare my life, Patriarch Jiang!” Li Batian’s face was mournful, and his voice was full of misery. “I was blind and failed to recognize you just now. I’ve offended you.” “Please be magnanimous, and just treat me like a fart in the wind!” Looking at his begging manner, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but shake his head. He exhaled lightly and retracted his aura. Li Batian felt the pressure on his body disappear in an instant. However, before he could relax for a moment, Jiang Ping’s calm voice sounded in his ear again. “I tried to speak nicely to you. I wanted to settle this matter peacefully with you, but you refused to accept it.” “You really wanted to extort me, didn’t you? You even dared to use my Wan’er to threaten me, right?” “No, no!” Li Batian was scared out of his wits by these words. “You’ve misunderstood. I didn’t mean that.” “Then what did you mean?” “I–” Bean-sized beads of sweat trickled down Li Batian’s forehead. Wasn’t that what he meant? But how could he say that? Of course, he could say that if he didn’t want to live anymore. “What did you mean? I’m eagerly waiting for your explanation, Patriarch Li.” Jiang Ping said calmly as if he was really waiting for his explanation. Hearing this, Li Batian’s body shuddered. He didn’t dare to make any more excuses. “Patriarch Jiang, I had made a mistake. Please forgive me this time!” “I apologize to you and I beg for your forgiveness!” “As for your daughter, I will also apologize to her!” After saying that, Li Batian kowtowed to Jiang Ping a few more times. “No, no, no.” Jiang Ping suddenly shook his head as he said that. Li Batian was immediately shocked. ‘Could it be that he still won’t let me off? My dear son, you got your dad into trouble! How could you provoke the daughter of a fiend? It’s all my fault. If I had known he had such strength, I wouldn’t have dared to blackmail him even if I had the courage,’ Li Batian thought. Li Batian was just about to slap himself across the face. Then he heard Jiang Ping say casually, “I almost forgot the most important matter.” “We came to your house today to apologize to you.” “You haven’t accepted my apology yet.” ‘What? You still want to apologize to me?’ Li Batian was stunned. What the hell was going on?! Seeing that Li Batian had no reaction, Jiang Ping frowned and said, “What, you don’t accept my apology?” Hearing Jiang Ping’s impatient tone, Li Batian’s body suddenly trembled. He trembled and nodded desperately. He said shakily, “I accept, I accept!” ‘How can I not accept?’ he thought. ‘I won’t survive that way.’ “Then do you still want the spirit transcendence pill?” “No, I don’t.” Li Batian nodded his head desperately. However, when he heard Jiang Ping’s question, he quickly shook his head. His neck was about to snap. When Jiang Ping saw him in this manner, he couldn’t help but chuckle. He put him down and said teasingly, “Wouldn’t it be better if you were like this earlier?” “Aren’t you just asking for it? It seems you have to suffer a little before you can speak properly.” At this moment, Li Batian’s entire body was weak, and he collapsed onto the ground. His heart was bitter. He was clearly feeling extremely uncomfortable, but he couldn’t cry out. Who would have thought that this well-mannered and soft-spoken guy was actually such a big deal! He acted like he was weak and easy to bully, but the truth was the opposite! Of course, he didn’t dare to say these words. “Alright, quickly pack up.” “When we go out later, don’t let my daughter see that something is wrong with you.” “Also, remember to smile and pretend that nothing happened.” As he spoke, Jiang Ping instantly returned to his previous look of a loving father. Li Batian was stunned. ‘Was there something wrong with me or was there something wrong with you? You clearly have such great strength, yet you don’t want to let your daughter know?’ Although those were his thoughts, he was very obedient and followed what he was told to do. After wiping off the blood, he wrapped a black cloth around his head. ...; The two returned to the pavilion with smiles on their faces. Jiang Ping’s smile was really bright, but Li Batian’s smile was even uglier than a frown. When Jiang Ping appeared, Jiang Wan’er immediately threw herself into his arms. “Dad, where have you been?” Wan’er’s baby voice made Jiang Ping feel delighted. He chuckled and said, “I went to reason with your Uncle Li.” “Your Uncle Li said that he has already forgiven you.” “Isn’t that right, Brother Li?” Jiang Ping turned his head to look at Li Batian. Jiang Wan’er followed her father’s gaze and looked at him. Li Batian immediately forced a bitter smile and nodded crazily. “Yes, I have forgiven you.” After saying that, he even stole a glance at Jiang Ping. Seeing him hugging Jiang Wan’er lovingly, Li Batian heaved a sigh of relief. “Yes!” Jiang Wan’er was overjoyed when she heard Li Batian’s affirmative answer. Her two small palms were clapping wildly in front of her chest, and her smiling eyes were narrowed into crescent moons. Gulp! Suddenly, a grumbling sound came from Jiang Wan’er’s stomach. Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment before he burst into laughter again. His finger gently hooked onto the tip of Jiang Wan’er’s nose. “Are you hungry?” “Dad is not allowed to laugh!” Jiang Wan’er’s pretty face turned red. She quickly reached out her small hand to close Jiang Ping’s mouth. “Okay, I am not laughing anymore. The sun is almost setting. I am already hungry.” “Let’s go home. I’ll cook something delicious for you.” “Yes!” Hearing this, Jiang Wan’er gestured enthusiastically. Then, Jiang Ping carried Jiang Wan’er and left the Li family without looking back. He kept saying, “Wan’er, you can’t hit people anymore in the future.” “This time, your Uncle Li was easy to talk to and didn’t make life difficult for you.” “Next time...;” Li Batian’s jaw dropped when he heard this. You had your hand on my neck. I couldn’t even speak, okay. Jiang Wan’er couldn’t stop her father’s nagging, so she could only nod in agreement. Her pair of big black eyes flashed with joy. Only Chen Zhong felt that something wasn’t right. Why did this Patriarch Li suddenly change his mind? <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio When they returned to the Jiang family, the sun had already set in the west. Jiang Wan’er had a casual look on her face as if nothing had happened. Holding Jiang Ping’s hand, she skipped into the Jiang Mansion. The butler, Chen Zhong, still could not understand. The patriarch and Li Batian had left for a short period of time. When they returned, Li Batian seemed to have completely changed his attitude. Of course, Jiang Ping didn’t say anything, and he wouldn’t ask. After being a personal butler for so many years, he knew better. Jiang Ping lay on the bamboo chair in the courtyard. Over the years, he had developed the habit of quietly watching the sunset. Wan’er was not nearly as relaxed as her father. Her energy seemed to be endless. Although she had been busy for an entire day and her stomach was rumbling, she was still dancing in the yard with a wooden sword. “Dad, do you think I’m good?” Wan’er’s laughter rang like a silver bell. Jiang Ping smacked his lips and put down his teacup. As he watched Wan’er dance without rhyme or pattern, he couldn’t help but laugh. Yet he said, “Awesome!” “You’re the best, this sword dance is excellent.” Jiang Ping really couldn’t think of any better words to describe it. After all, he couldn’t comment that she didn’t know how to use a sword, for that would hurt his daughter’s heart. Sigh. Looking at Wan’er, Jiang Ping felt worried. Today’s matter was settled. He wasn’t worried the Li family would come looking for trouble. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) But if he was just an ordinary person, he wouldn’t have known how to end this matter. This world was just so cruel. Moreover, it wasn’t just the human heart that was sinister. There were also vicious demons and beasts in the wild. If he had a choice, he would want to continue being ordinary. However, this was obviously impossible for his cultivation clan. He could only try his best to maintain this kind of peace by becoming stronger. Moreover, Wan’er was active and noisy by nature, and he couldn’t stay by her side all the time. According to her personality, it was inevitable that she would have come into conflict with others. Moreover, the world outside was so chaotic now. There were endless fighting and killings. Even if one did not cause trouble, trouble would come looking for you. Perhaps if he wasn’t careful...; ‘No, I have to give my three little girls the ability to protect themselves,’ Jiang Ping thought. A resolute light flashed across Jiang Ping’s eyes. He couldn’t bear to see his daughters suffer now. He definitely wouldn’t let his daughters suffer in the future! “It’s time for the three little girls to start cultivating.” Jiang Ping sighed softly and muttered. “Wow, Auntie and sisters are back!” Wan’er dropped the wooden sword in her hand and suddenly shouted. Only then did Jiang Ping come back to his senses. He looked in the direction of the voice and saw a graceful figure appear at the door. It was Li Sushang, the deputy butler of the Jiang Mansion. She was also the one who took care of the three girls of the Jiang family. Li Sushang was holding a little girl in each of her hands. The two little girls were about the same age as Jiang Wan’er. One of them was dressed in purple, and she looked calm and elegant. She had braided hair that hung over her chest. The other little girl was wearing a green dress that was similar to Jiang Ping’s. Just like Jiang Wan’er, she had two braided ponytails. Her face was rounder than the girl in purple and she looked more affectionate. However, these three girls were all beauties. When they grew up, they would definitely become peerless beauties that could overthrow a kingdom. “Dad!” The two girls’ eyes lit up when they saw Jiang Ping in the courtyard, and ran towards him with small steps. Wan’er also ran towards Jiang Ping when she saw this. She was the closest to Jiang Ping, so she pounced on Jiang Ping first. Li Sushang felt her heart ache when she felt her hands suddenly empty. ‘Hmph, these two little brats really can’t behave themselves. The moment they saw their father, they forgot all about me!’ Li Sushang thought. Despite her thoughts, she yelled after them, “Yan’er, Liu’er, slow down and don’t fall!” The two little girls were Jiang Ping’s second daughter and youngest daughter. The girl in purple was Jiang Yan’er, the second daughter. The girl in green was Jiang Liu’er, the youngest daughter. The two of them did not seem to hear her at all. Like two nimble kittens, they pounced on Jiang Ping in an instant. “Dad!” As they pounced into Jiang Ping’s arms, the two little girls said in a childish voice, “Hey, Dad is here!” Jiang Ping smiled like a loving father. Although the two girls were both slim and weak, he joked, “Yan’er, Liu’er, you’ve gained weight again. It hurts.” Hearing this, Yan’er and Liu’er were immediately unhappy. Although they were just five or six-year-old, they didn’t want to be called fat. Therefore, two pairs of resentful eyes instantly fell on Jiang Ping. “Dad!” They wanted to get angry, but when they spoke, they sounded pouty and cute, making Jiang Ping laugh out loud. “You only know how to bully people!” “You’re really too much!” The two girls pouted. When Jiang Wan’er saw this, she pushed the two of them with her small hands and muttered, “Dad already said that you’re too heavy.” “Hurry up and get down.” Her father’s embrace was originally her most comfortable nest. Now that there were two more people squeezing together with her, she was naturally not happy, even if those two were her dear younger sisters. But Yan’er and Liu’er had the same thoughts. They would not let Wan’er have her way. “Hmph, you’re the eldest sister, so you’re the heaviest! You should be the one to get down.” “That’s right, you get down.” The result was that none of the three girls were willing to get down from Jiang Ping’s embrace. They hung on his body like three koalas. Jiang Ping was also happy to see them fighting with one other, so he watched them quietly with a smile. After a long while, Li Sushang couldn’t stand it anymore. She went up and said, “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, come down quickly.” “You’re all hungry, right? It’s time to eat.” Jiang Ping gently placed his three daughters on the ground before standing up and saying with a smile, “Yes! I will cook something delicious for you today!” The three girls were initially unwilling to let go, but when they heard Jiang Ping’s words, their stomachs began to growl uncontrollably. “I want to eat sweet and sour pork tenderloin!” “I want to eat braised eggplant with fish!” “I want to eat chinese cabbage!” The three daughters raised their hands and spoke enthusiastically. “Alright, I will make all of them for you!” “You can play in this courtyard for now.” After saying this, Jiang Ping patted their heads and then walked towards the backyard. Before he left, he gave Li Sushang a look. Li Sushang understood and gave a few instructions to the maids who were looking after the three girls before quietly following him. ...; In the backyard of the Jiang Mansion. “Sushang, I think we should let Wan’er and the others start cultivating.” Jiang Ping, who was walking in front, suddenly said. Li Sushang, who was behind him, suddenly trembled. It took her a long time before she spoke slowly. “Patriarch, isn’t it a little too early?” “It’s not too early. Now is the time for them to grow up.” “The two of us can’t always protect them. We should at least give them some ability to protect themselves.” After hearing this, Li Sushang didn’t say anything else. Because she knew it was the truth. She didn’t want to see the three cute girls suffer. In a cultivation clan like theirs, cultivation was something that would happen sooner or later. And it was better to do it sooner than later. The earlier the cultivation started, the earlier one could feel at ease. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The breeze rustled the willows in the yard, and the moon shone through the foliage. In a quiet and luxurious room. The oil lamp on Jiang Ping’s table gradually dimmed as he sat on the bed and massaged his calves. He had gone to the Li mansion to “apologize” today. After returning home, he cooked for his three daughters, ate with them, and played with them for a while. After a long time, he finally coaxed them to sleep. Only now did he have time to spare. However, Jiang Ping wasn’t dissatisfied at all. Instead, when he thought of the three girls, he couldn’t help but smile. “Taking care of these three girls really isn’t easy.” “The more I shelter and pamper them, the more likely it is for something to happen to them in the future.” “I really have to let them start their cultivation as soon as possible,” Jiang Ping muttered to himself. Suddenly, the voice of a watchman came from outside the courtyard. “Be careful of candles at midnight.” Hearing this, Jiang Ping quivered. After midnight, it was considered the next day. With a thought, a virtual transparent panel immediately appeared in front of Jiang Ping. There were some words emitting blue light on the panel, but only Jiang Ping could see them. [Self-cultivation training system check-in] [You haven’t checked in today. Do you want to check-in?] Jiang Ping reached out his hand and pressed on the empty space. The words on the interface instantly refreshed. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) [Ding! Check-in successful.] [You have checked in continuously for thirty days. You will receive a large gift pack!] [Do you want to open it?] That’s right. Jiang Ping had his own personal system. After he transmigrated to this world, he was bound by this check-in system. Once a day, he would receive a very generous reward from the system. Moreover, for every thirty days he checked in consecutively, he would receive even more valuable items. In just a few years, he had accumulated a large number of heavenly and earthly treasures and magical techniques. If he revealed the rewards he received to the rest of the world, everyone would fight tooth and nail over them. But Jiang Ping did not like to cultivate, so these treasures were thrown into his storage space to collect dust. However, he could not delay the inevitable. Since he had decided to start guiding his daughters in cultivation, he had to prepare some good things for them first. After thinking carefully, he realized to his disappointment that although he had many treasures, none of them seemed to be suitable for the three girls. Jiang Ping sighed softly. ‘I hope the things in the large gift bag are suitable for them,’ he thought. Then, his finger tapped on the interface. The words on the interface refreshed once again. [Ding! Reward obtained: Vitality-fortifying pill, innate spiritual extract!] Then, Jiang Ping flipped his palms up. A round red-orange medicinal pill and a white bottle appeared in his hands respectively. Just as he was wondering what the two items did, the system interface refreshed once again. Two paragraphs describing each of the two items appeared on the system interface. [Vitality-fortifying pill: refined from Watercloud Essence, Year-bearing Grass, and the inner cores of demonic beasts. It cannot be consumed unless you have reached the origin core realm. It can help an origin core realm cultivator to take another step forward and breakthrough to the next realm.] [Innate spiritual extract: refined from Moon White Dew, Autumn Flowers, and dozens of other exotic herbs. The medicinal effect is mild and does not harm the human body. It can help the user cleanse the marrow, invigorate the meridians, and temper the physique. After using it, the physique will be strengthened several times, and cultivation speed will greatly increase.] After reading the long descriptions, Jiang Ping could not help but laugh out loud. This was exactly what he needed. He was just racking his brain about what to prepare for his three daughters. Hadn’t this gift pack just been delivered to him? What could possibly be more suitable for his three daughters than this innate spiritual extract? Although he decided to let the three girls start cultivating, he was also worried that they would get tired and suffer. He wasn’t so ruthless as to let that happen! This innate spiritual extract came at just the right time. Not only could it not hurt the three girls, but it also had the miraculous effect of cleansing the marrow. It was simply the most perfect choice! Jiang Ping could not help but pull the cork out of the bottle. In an instant, a faint green smoke floated out of the bottle. The entire room was filled with a refreshing fragrance. This fragrance was like a clear spring in the mountains, and also like the buds of spring. It was clear and full of vitality. As he inhaled, he felt as if he was at the top of a mountain, with a refreshing cool breeze against his face. “Good!” Jiang Ping instinctively shouted. As expected of a treasure produced by the system, it was indeed extraordinary. Jiang Ping quickly stuffed the stopper back in. He didn’t dare to be careless with such a good thing. After all, this was meant to be for his three precious daughters. He stored the innate spiritual extract safely into his storage space. This storage space was one of the rewards that the system had given him when he checked in. The space inside was the size of a small house. The storage space existed in its own dimension, so it was the safest place to put things. Jiang Ping put the spiritual liquid away and rummaged through the storage space a few more times. Finally, he picked up a scroll and laughed out loud. On the scroll were the words “Spiritual body tempering technique”. This spiritual body tempering technique was also one of the rewards from the system for checking in. And it was a high-level body tempering art. It could help a person who had just entered the tempering realm lay a solid foundation. Once the foundation was laid, it would be much easier for them to cultivate in the future. “Yes, there’s still some good stuff.” “This body tempering art can help the three girls lay a foundation!” At this moment, only things that could help his three daughters could be considered a treasure to him. As for the others...; After Jiang Ping finished browsing through the body tempering art, he started to size up this vitality-fortifying pill. Speaking of which, this vitality-fortifying pill was just right for him. He was now at the initial stage of the origin core realm. After taking this vitality-fortifying pill, he would be able to break through to the intermediate stage. He didn’t like to compete with others, but in this world, it was inevitable that there would be some aggressive people who would try to provoke him even if he left them alone. Just like Li Batian today. For the sake of the healthy growth of his three daughters, he had no choice but to raise his strength. Jiang Ping sighed, then directly opened his mouth and threw the pill in. When the pill entered his mouth, a trace of coolness instantly spread on the tip of his tongue. Before Jiang Ping could exclaim in surprise, he felt a huge change spreading through his body. As the pill entered his body, his limbs and bones all emitted a chill. The chill flowed through his meridians and gradually his entire body. Jiang Ping felt all the pores in his body open up. When he looked down, his body seemed to have become transparent. Golden rays of light overflowed from his body. He could even see that the empty and amorphous origin core in his body was slowly condensing into a solid form. The origin core realm was divided into three stages. The initial stage was ’empty core’, the intermediate stage was ‘true core’, and the last stage was ‘golden core’. He was originally only at the initial stage, which was the empty core. Now, this empty core was obviously taking shape into the true core! As the origin core gradually took shape, the aura emitted from Jiang Ping’s body was also quietly changing. From the outside, one could see that the entire house was emitting a strange golden light. It was as if the house was on fire. Fortunately, he lived in a remote area, so no one would notice. Jiang Ping let out a long breath. As he felt the changes in his body, he couldn’t help but smile. The intermediate stage of the origin core realm! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The next day. Jiang Ping got up early in the morning. Then, as usual, he pushed open the door to his three daughters’ shared room. Although the three girls often fought with one another, their relationship was very good, and they all slept together. But their sleeping posture was really not worth mentioning. It was a complete mess. Jiang Ping had told them many times. But every time he opened the door, it was still the same! After a long time, he stopped trying to correct them. The three girls felt a little annoyed to be woken up by their father early in the morning. “Stop it, Dad!” Yan’er grumbled and went back into bed. Liu’er was usually the most considerate. After opening her sleepy eyes, she sized up Jiang Ping, and without saying anything, she closed her eyes again. As for Wan’er, who was the most irritable, she didn’t even open her eyes. Instead, she opened her mouth. She directly bit down on the hand that was pushing her. Fortunately, Jiang Ping’s reaction was quick, so he wasn’t bitten by her. This made Jiang Ping very angry. Wan’er was the eldest daughter, but she was the most hot-tempered among the three. In the end, he spent a lot of effort to wake up the three little ones with the help of Li Sushang. ...; In the backyard. Although the three little ones were all dressed neatly, they looked listless. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “Dad, why are we up so early today?” Wan’er pouted and her cheeks were puffy. Yan’er and Liu’er also felt upset, but they were making a silent protest. However, Jiang Ping ignored them. “Ahem, I announce from today onwards, I will teach you how to cultivate!” “Cultivate?” When the three girls heard this, they were all confused. “Dad, what is cultivation?” Liu’er stuck her little finger into her mouth, her big eyes filled with confusion. “Cultivation is a very fun game.” Jiang Ping squatted down and pulled out Liu’er’s little finger. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, watch carefully.” Jiang Ping chuckled and stretched out his right hand toward a palm-sized rock not far away. Suddenly, his right hand contracted abruptly. A powerful suction force instantly rushed out. The rock flew over with a whoosh and was steadily grabbed by Jiang Ping’s. Jiang Ping suddenly clenched his hand, and the entire rock instantly turned into dust. Seeing this scene, the three girls instantly widened their eyes. Their mouths hung agape. Jiang Ping looked at their dazed expressions and was very pleased with himself. “This is the result of cultivating. How is it?” “Dad, I want to learn, I want to learn!” Wan’er was the first to react. She reached out and hopped around Jiang Ping. She was an active girl and was most curious about these strange games. Jiang Ping had won her over with just a casual move. Although Yan’er and Liu’er were not as excited as Wan’er, they looked at Jiang Ping earnestly. Their eyes flashed with anticipation. “Dad, we want to cultivate too!” “Yes, I want to be as powerful as you!” “Okay, then I will start teaching you cultivation now!” “Since today is your first day, I will teach you the spiritual body tempering technique.” Teaching them the spiritual body tempering technique was something that Jiang Ping had planned yesterday. After saying that, Jiang Ping demonstrated a set of fist techniques for the three girls to learn. He was in the intermediate stage of the origin core realm. When he demonstrated these techniques, his fists were strong and powerful, and he looked awe-inspiring. However, the three girls didn’t practice well, and they were all over the place. Jiang Ping had no choice but to point out their mistakes bit by bit. “Father, why is it called the body tempering art?” Wan’er was the most excited, and she had the most questions. Jiang Ping didn’t mind and answered her with a smile. “Because you have just started cultivating, and the first realm is the tempering realm.” “What about the second realm?” “The second realm is the refinement realm.” “Dad, what realm are you in then?” “This is a secret. You’ll find out in the future!” Speaking of this, Jiang Ping was a little proud. At least in front of his three daughters, he could be a little vain. “Dad?” “Yes?” “What’s a realm?” Jiang Ping was stunned and looked at the innocent eyes of the three girls. Well, it was a waste of his pride. The three girls didn’t even know what a realm was! Jiang Ping could only put on a straight face and scare the three girls, in order to get them to cultivate seriously. They didn’t dare to ask any more questions. After a long while, beads of sweat appeared on the foreheads of the three girls. Yan’er was a quiet person, and she was even lazier to move now. Her big black eyes rolled around as she came up with a plan. “Ah, Dad, I’ve gone mad!” Yan’er cried out and then conveniently fell to the ground. Jiang Ping, who had come to his senses, was speechless. ‘She hasn’t even gotten the hang of it yet, how could she have gone mad? How could she hide such a simple scheme from me? Does she think I’m stupid?’ Jiang Ping thought. Jiang Ping suddenly stretched out his two fingers and pretended to tap Yan’er’s body a few times. Then he said casually, “Alright Yan’er, I have healed you.” “Now, you can continue to cultivate.” After being tapped by Jiang Ping a few times, Yan’er felt that her body was not as tired as before. Jiang Ping had secretly injected some true Qi into her, which had helped her to recover some of her energy. Seeing that her plan had failed, Yan’er could only act cute and behaved coquettishly. She hugged Jiang Ping’s arm and shook it, even putting on a pitiful look. “Dad, I am tired!” “Cultivation is too difficult. Can you let me rest?” Looking at this girl’s innocent look, Jiang Ping could only let out a sigh. He had no choice. He couldn’t be harsh to his own daughter. Just as he was about to speak, Wan’er walked over. “Dad, I’ve learned it!” Before she finished speaking, she had already hugged Jiang Ping’s other arm. This girl’s mouth was almost curled up into the sky. Her big eyes blinked as if she was asking for praise. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but be stunned when he heard this. So fast? Did Wan’er learn something bad from Yan’er? Did she come here to trick her father? Jiang Ping stretched out his hand to grab Wan’er’s wrist with suspicion. A surge of true Qi followed the meridians and entered Wan’er’s body. The next moment, Jiang Ping’s eyes instantly widened. Because he realized that Wan’er had already started learning to cultivate before today! Oh my god! How long has it been? This girl really surprised him too much! It seemed like his guess was right. With Wan’er’s personality, she was the most suitable for cultivation. Of course, he didn’t expect Wan’er’s cultivation speed to be so fast. After thinking for a moment, Jiang Ping decided to give Wan’er the innate spiritual extract first. She was the eldest sister, and her cultivation speed was the fastest. There was nothing to argue about. “Wan’er is awesome!” Jiang Ping said with a smile and even gave her a thumbs up. Wan’er was instantly satisfied. Dad’s praise was the happiest thing for her. ‘No, I have to speed up my cultivation. I have to make Dad praise me more!’ Wan’er thought. “Wan’er, after cultivating for so long, you’re already sweating.” “Why don’t you go take a shower first?” “Okay, I will go now!” At this moment, Jiang Wan’er didn’t think about anything else. Whatever Jiang Ping said, she would do it. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping placed his hand into the bucket. The temperature was just right. Then, he poured the entire bottle of innate spiritual extract into it. It was strange. This innate spiritual extract was clearly a green liquid, but after pouring it into the water, it became transparent. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but gasp in surprise. “Wan’er, the water is ready, you...;” Before Jiang Ping could finish his sentence, Wan’er jumped directly into the water. The resulting splash instantly wet half of Jiang Ping’s clothes. “Ha-ha!” Looking at Jiang Ping’s soaked state, the three girls giggled. Jiang Ping wanted to get angry, but when he saw his three daughters laughing so happily, the anger in his stomach was gone in an instant. He could only laugh bitterly. Sigh, this was the helplessness of an old father. Yan’er and Liu’er’s progress was much slower compared to Wan’er’s. Jiang Ping also took advantage of this gap and began to teach the two girls earnestly. Of course, he quoted Wan’er as an example. “Yan’er, Liu’er, you have to learn from your elder sister.” “Look, your elder sister learned the body tempering art in an instant.” “You are all so smart. I believe that you will be able to learn it very quickly too.” After hearing Jiang Ping’s words, Liu’er clenched her fists. Then, she nodded her head heavily. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “Dad, I will definitely practice harder and won’t let you down.” “You’re indeed my obedient girl.” Jiang Ping couldn’t help but nod in admiration. Liu’er was the most obedient of the three girls. However, Yan’er gave a “tsk” and turned her head away. “I’m not going to follow her. She’s as red as a cooked lobster.” Jiang Ping was helpless. Yan’er had always been unimpressed Wan’er. Just as he was about to enlighten her, he suddenly realized that something was wrong with what Yan’er had said. He suddenly turned his head and saw Wan’er in the bathtub. Her entire body was red! A wisp of smoke was even coming out of her head. Jiang Ping stood up abruptly. He had never seen such change before. For a moment, he couldn’t help but panic. Of course, he trusted the system’s introduction of the innate spiritual extract. But this was his precious daughter after all. He definitely couldn’t let anything happen to Wan’er. Just as he was debating whether to stop the medicinal bath, a sudden change occurred. Wan’er’s aura was like a spring bamboo shoot that had just emerged from the ground. It suddenly began to rise. The water in the bathtub was also stirred up with ripples. Hiss! Looking at this scene, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but suck in a breath of cold air. No way, was she about to break through? Boom! Just as Jiang Ping was taken aback, a rumbling sound reverberated through the room. An invisible airwave instantly spread out from Wan’er. ‘The early stage of the tempering realm!’ Jiang Ping shouted in his mind. Wan’er really broke through so easily! The tempering realm was divided into two stages. The early stage refined the skin and flesh outside, and the later stage refined the muscles and bones. Wan’er’s performance was obviously the early stage of breaking through! From now on, her physique would be much stronger than before. However, what was even more unexpected to Jiang Ping was that after breaking through, Wan’er’s aura didn’t stop there. Some blood-red patterns slowly appeared on her body. These patterns were very strange. They did not follow the meridians or connect to the acupoints. Instead, they formed an extremely strange pattern. This pattern also gave off a faintly discernible ancient aura. Jiang Ping instantly felt as if he was in a million-year-old desert, desolate and boundless. The sorrowful aura from her body was like a monstrous wave. It instantly drowned even Jiang Ping, who was at the origin core realm. When Jiang Ping walked out from that ancient aura, he couldn’t help but feel fearful. A few words suddenly appeared in his mind. Ancient divine physique! He had once seen this type of physique in the historical records that the system had given him as a reward. According to the records, this kind of physique only appeared once every ten thousand years. It was extremely rare, but of course, it was also extremely terrifying. It could be said to be the top physique of the human race! A person with an ancient divine physique was a saint, whose body was immortal and indestructible. When one cultivated to the last stage, one punch could break the laws of physics, and one palm could sever karma. It was a power that terrified even gods and demons! Jiang Ping had never thought that his eldest daughter would have such a terrifying physique. For a moment, he was stunned. “What happened?” A shaky voice was heard. Then, Li Sushang’s graceful figure quietly appeared. She was already nearby, so she naturally felt Wan’er’s aura. As soon as she entered, her gaze fell on Wan’er. “Oh my god! What’s going on?” Seeing the strange patterns on Wan’er’s body, Li Sushang instantly turned pale with fright. She was about to carry Wan’er out of the bathtub. Fortunately, Jiang Ping was quick enough to stop her. “Don’t panic. She has a special physique.” “This is just a breakthrough. It’s nothing serious.” Hearing that, Li Sushang couldn’t help but stop. She looked at Jiang Ping suspiciously and then at Wan’er. Her eyes showed concern and worry. “It’s okay, don’t worry.” Jiang Ping comforted her casually. But he wasn’t sure himself. After all, she was his daughter. He couldn’t help but feel worried. At this moment, Wan’er’s closed eyes suddenly opened. A bright light flashed and disappeared in her big black eyes. The red lines on her body also slowly faded into nothingness. Wan’er had closed her eyes the entire time, so she had no idea what had happened. She only felt that her body seemed to be filled with an endless amount of energy. She could even carry her two younger sisters and run around Xiaoyu Town a few times! She couldn’t wait to tell her father the good news. When she looked up, she saw that her father and aunt were looking at her. She couldn’t help but feel happy. This feeling of being noticed was great! She wanted to stand up, but her crossed legs kicked the bathtub, causing it to explode! The water flowed out onto the floor. Wan’er just stared dumbfoundedly. She didn’t know what to do. “Sister, you broke the bathtub!” Yan’er, who was behind Jiang Ping, suddenly shouted. Wan’er was so scared that she quickly waved her hands to defend herself. “I didn’t. It wasn’t me. You’re talking nonsense!” “It was you. We all saw it.” Yan’er was still unwilling to let it go. Wan’er quickly looked at Jiang Ping and Li Sushang and found that they didn’t say anything. “Dad, it really wasn’t me. I didn’t use any strength!” Wan’er’s voice sounded like she was crying. Actually, she had misunderstood. She had thought that Jiang Ping did not speak because he was blaming her. However, Jiang Ping and Li Sushang didn’t speak because they were shocked. This bathtub was made of thousand-layer wood. The material was tough and hard to destroy. Not to mention human strength, even if a one-ton boulder were to fall, it might not be smashed. But now, Wan’er had destroyed it? How strong was Wan’er now? The corner of Jiang Ping’s mouth twitched. He had underestimated the power of the ancient divine physique. Sigh! Thinking of Wan’er’s character, Jiang Ping had a headache. When Wan’er was fooling around in the past, nothing serious would happen. As for Wan’er now...; God knows what kind of trouble she would cause. At this moment, Jiang Ping felt as if he had lifted a stone and smashed it against his own feet. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Li Sushang quickly put on a red dress for Wan’er and pinched her little face. “Wan’er, don’t cry. You’re so powerful!” Although she wasn’t scolded, Wan’er still felt that she was the one who broke the bathtub. “I really didn’t break it, Aunt Sushang!” Wan’er was fuming with anger and her big eyes were wide open. Li Sushang quickly smiled endearingly and said, “Alright, alright, it wasn’t you.” “You didn’t do it on purpose, right?” “Hmph, Aunt Sushang is really bad, I’ll ignore you!” ‘When she said I didn’t do it on purpose, doesn’t that still mean it’s me who broke it?’ Wan’er thought. Though Wan’er was young, she wasn’t an idiot! Seeing that Wan’er was about to make a ruckus again, Jiang Ping quickly went forward. “Alright, it really wasn’t you who broke it.” “It was this bathtub that broke itself. Isn’t that right, Wan’er?” “Yes, yes!” Wan’er nodded her little head wildly and hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh. She said softly, “Dad, you are so nice.” Then, she turned her head away in a fit of anger and didn’t look at Li Sushang. “I’ll ignore Aunt Sushang.” Looking at her cute expression, Li Sushang couldn’t help but burst into laughter. “Wan’er, can you bring your sisters out to play for a while?” “What about Dad?” “I still need to clean up this bad bathtub.” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “Okay!” Hearing this, Wan’er let go of Jiang Ping and agreed. Then, not caring whether her two sisters were willing or not, she pulled their little hands and ran out. The smile on her face was obvious because she felt that her strength had increased by a lot. Pulling her two sisters was as easy as pulling two kites. “Slow down, don’t hurt your sisters!” Jiang Ping shouted, but Wan’er had already disappeared. “What kind of physique does Wan’er have?” After the three girls left, Li Sushang returned to her usual temperament. “My daughter, of course, has a unique one-in-a-million physique.” Looking at the corners of Jiang Ping’s mouth curling up, Li Sushang snorted to herself. ‘How can he credit Miss Wan’er’s unique physique to himself?!’ Li Sushang thought. “Now that Wan’er and the other girls have started cultivating, I’ll have to trouble you to take care of them in the future. Wan’er has a tempestuous personality, don’t let anything happen to her.” “I know,” Li Sushang answered softly. “Mm, I’ll have to trouble you.” Jiang Ping reminded her and then walked out. Just as he reached the door, he turned around and asked again. “Any news from Madam?” Hearing this, Li Sushang’s body suddenly trembled. She shook her head gently and didn’t say anything. Sigh! Jiang Ping sighed and left. Li Sushang was left alone to clean up the broken bathtub. ...; Jiang Ping followed the noise and came to the backyard. He was stunned when he entered the backyard. He saw that the stone table in the backyard had turned into a pile of gravel. That was the place where he usually drank tea! His three daughters were not far away. Wan’er was looking smug as she held a tree that was thicker than her body. “Look, I can pull this tree out easily.” “Hmph, you’re bragging!” Yan’er placed her hands on her hips, a look of disbelief on her face. Liu’er also covered her mouth and giggled. “Big sister is embarrassed, her face is red.” Without a doubt, her two younger sisters thought that she was bragging. Wan’er was initially proud of herself, but now that her two younger sisters had said so, her fair face turned red. “I’m not bragging!” “Yes, you are! You’re bragging!” Yan’er did not give in to her eldest sister at all. “If I pull it out, you have to call me ‘big sister’!” “Sure, who’s afraid of who, hmph!” “Alright, you just wait and see.” “I’m not going to look.” After saying that, Yan’er quickly covered her eyes with her two small hands. Wan’er was so angry that she gritted her teeth. This sister of hers always wanted to go against her. She had refused to call her ‘big sister’ too. Today, she had to show off her skills in order to scare her. Wan’er suddenly let out a shout. When Jiang Ping saw that she was really going to make a move, he was immediately shocked. “Wan’er, wait!” Hearing his shout, the three girls immediately looked over. “Dad!” Yan’er and Liu’er directly pounced on him. But Wan’er stood rooted to the ground, and her whole body was trembling. ‘Well, it seems that I won’t be able to uproot the tree today. Dad, can’t you come a little later?’ Wan’er thought. Jiang Ping carried Liu’er with his left hand and held Yan’er with his right hand as he walked over to Wan’er. Wan’er had a headache. “Wan’er, what are you doing?” Jiang Ping deliberately put on a straight face. Wan’er hurriedly let go of the tree in her arms and hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh. She said coquettishly, “Why are you here, Dad?” “If I didn’t come, wouldn’t you have destroyed this perfectly fine tree?” “No, you’ve misunderstood me again!” Wan’er sobbed, covering her face with her small hands and pretending to feel wronged. “I would never destroy your tree.” “Then what about the stone table in the backyard? Didn’t you smash it?” “No!” “You’ve really learned how to lie...;” Seeing that Jiang Ping was about to lose his temper, Wan’er quickly explained. “I only patted it lightly, and the table broke. It has nothing to do with me.” Wan’er’s small hands twisted behind her back. Her small lips pouted pitifully. Liu’er suddenly whispered into Jiang Ping’s ear. “Dad, sister Wan’er isn’t lying to you.” Jiang Ping was stunned. ‘Could it be that Wan’er’s strength is really that terrifying? I have to warn her. Otherwise, god knows what kind of trouble she would cause,’ Jiang Ping thought. “Ahem, ahem.” Jiang Ping pretended to cough twice. “Okay, I believe that you didn’t do it on purpose.” “Really?” Children were so easy to fool. One sentence was enough to turn her mood from gloomy to sunny. “Of course it’s true. How could I not believe you?” Jiang Ping’s face was not red and his heart was not beating hard. Could fooling his own daughter be called fooling? This was called doting! “But Wan’er, you have to try your best to restrain your strength in the future.” “You are a girl. The most important thing for a girl is her image.” “You have to learn to be reserved and gentle. Just like your name, be a gentle and lovely person.” Wan’er’s big black eyes rolled around when she heard this It seemed that she didn’t take Jiang Ping’s words to heart at all. Jiang Ping continued speaking. “Look at you. You’re dirty all over, unlike your two sisters.” “You just took a shower. Now you have to change again, don’t you?” Wan’er immediately had an idea when she heard Jiang Ping mention her two sisters. “Dad, I’m a big sister, right?” Jiang Ping nodded subconsciously. “Yes, you...;” “As a sister, I have to protect my sisters, right?” “That’s true, but...;” “So I’m different from my sisters. I need to have strength. I want to protect my sisters and you!” Wan’er clenched her small fists and said with a determined look in her eyes. Hearing this, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but feel touched. She was indeed the eldest sister as she was so sensible. Jiang Ping was about to open his mouth to praise her, but Wan’er spoke again. “Whoever dares to bully any of you, I’ll beat them up.” He forcefully suppressed his praises. He almost suffered internal injuries from holding it in. Jiang Ping’s expression changed, and his expression was extremely serious. “No matter what, you can’t fight as and when you want.” “You also can’t bully people, understand?” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Xiaoyu Town had private schools. Not everyone could cultivate. Those who did not cultivate would choose to enter private schools to study, and they would walk the path of a layman. Although the three girls had already started cultivating, Jiang Ping did not want them to give up their studies. He was not hoping that they would achieve anything extraordinary. He just wanted them to study and understand the world. It was the day for them to go to school again. As usual, Jiang Ping went to the three girls’ room. It was still chaotic as usual. These three little girls were so rowdy in their dreams. Those who didn’t know would think that they had fought last night. Jiang Ping shook the three little girls for a while, and they all gradually woke up. “Father, what are we going to cultivate today?” Wan’er said in a daze. She had achieved something during yesterday’s cultivation, and it made her very excited. Last night, she was still thinking about how to cultivate the next morning. “Silly girl, you’re all muddled from sleep. You’re going to school today.” Jiang Ping smiled and shook his head. Hearing this, Wan’er suddenly quivered. The private school gave the students two days off every ten days. Two days ago, she beat Li Xiaojiang, and she spent yesterday cultivating. Today, it was time for her to go to school. Wan’er’s attitude immediately changed. She pouted and tried hard to open her blurry eyes. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) She hugged Jiang Ping and said coquettishly, “Dad, I don’t want to go to school, okay?” “No, how can you be so lazy?” Jiang Ping rejected her without even thinking. “I’m not being lazy! I just want to cultivate!” “Even if you want to cultivate, you still have to go to school.” “If you can’t even understand words, how can you cultivate in the future?” “But...;” Wan’er was still unwilling to let him go, so Jiang Ping quickly turned his head and said to Yan’er. “Yan’er, don’t you think Dad is right?” Yan’er glanced at Wan’er, who was looking dejected, and the corners of her mouth lifted slightly. “Dad is right. Studying is good.” Yan’er had a quiet personality. She had been tormented by Wan’er the whole day yesterday. She felt like she was about to fall apart. Now that Wan’er was defeated in this matter, she felt a little smug. Jiang Ping was very satisfied with Yan’er’s answer and nodded. Then, he looked at Liu’er and said with a smile, “Liu’er, what about you? Do you want to go to school?” “I’ll listen to you, Dad.” Liu’er was like a lazy cat as she hid in Jiang Ping’s arms. Among the three daughters, she was the most clingy. Of course, she was also the most obedient. She would do whatever Jiang Ping said. Wan’er had no choice but to obediently surrender since her two younger sisters were not on her side. She reluctantly put on her clothes and washed up with the help of the maids. Then, the three little girls bade farewell to Jiang Ping. They hopped out of the Jiang Mansion holding hands and headed to the private school. “Sigh, it’s going to be another quiet and boring day!” Jiang Ping stood at the gate and watched them disappear before he turned around and entered the mansion. ...; In the private school. An old teacher with white hair and turbid eyes stood at the front of a class of more than 30 children. “Although the brothers often quarrel at home, they stand together against outsiders when bullied,” he recited from a book. Although he was old, his voice was still full of energy. He had the air of a wise and experienced teacher. But although he was reading enthusiastically, his students didn’t seem to care too much. After all, they were all little brats. How could they calm down and listen to the lesson so obediently? Wan’er felt dizzy just listening to him, so she simply lay on the table and fell asleep. Liu’er’s expression was also somewhat spaced-out as if she hadn’t woken up yet. She was still here physically, but her mind had drifted to the ends of the earth. Only Yan’er was listening attentively. Her hand was holding a weasel-hair brush. She wrote rows of delicate and small words on her white rice paper. “Alright, let’s rest for fifteen minutes.” After the teacher finished speaking, he coughed. He glanced at the listless children below and sighed softly. Then, he supported himself with his walking stick and left the classroom. After all, he was old and weak, so he had to take a break from time to time. “Woohoo!” Just a few moments after the teacher left, the entire room descended into chaos. Some students threw books while others threw pens. Some of the braver ones jumped onto the tables to cause a ruckus. Although the others were not so impudent, they also began to chase each other and fight in the room. Yan’er glanced at them and shook her head. She did not pay too much attention to them. Instead, she ground her ink onto the inkstone until it was full. Then, she finished writing a poem in one breath. “Good handwriting, it’s really good handwriting.” “If Dad sees it...;” She was biting her red lips and admiring her ink treasure proudly. Suddenly, the table was hit hard. The Inkstone was knocked over. The ink splashed on the paper. In an instant, Yan’er’s ink treasure turned into a blot of filth. Yan’er was stunned, and it took her a long time to recover. She raised her eyelids and saw a boy standing by the table. The boy was smiling mischievously, his body covered in ink. But he didn’t seem to care at all. Yan’er narrowed her eyes. She knew this guy. His name was Lei Dong. He was about seven or eight years old. His father was Lei Feiche. Lei Feiche was the patriarch of the Lei family. The Lei family was not a small clan. They were quite famous in Xiaoyu Town. Therefore, Lei Dong was usually rude and unreasonable. He liked to cause trouble. Yan’er hated this kind of person from the bottom of her heart. Her voice was as cold as an icy stream. “Lei Dong!” “What?” Lei Dong was still smiling mischievously. He did not feel like he was in trouble at all. “Apologize!” “Huh, apologize? On what basis?” “On the basis that you dirtied my writing.” Upon hearing this, Lei Dong snorted disdainfully. Not only did he not apologize, he even started a ruckus. He grabbed and tore up the paper on Yan’er’s table. “Not only did I dirty your handwriting, I even tore up your paper.” “But if I don’t apologize, what can you do about it?” Lei Dong pouted, crossed his arms across his chest, and put on a nonchalant look. Yan’er shot a cold glance at him. Then, she said indifferently, “You’re not going to apologize? Then just wait to be beaten up.” “Haha!” This time, Lei Dong was not the only one who laughed. The few brats behind him who were covered in ink also laughed. “What? You’re just a girl. Do you want to fight with me?” “If you really dare to fight me, just watch how I’ll deal with you!” Lei Dong looked at Yan’er with contempt. He thought that even though she was a girl, he would not show mercy. Yan’er did not continue to argue with him. Instead, she subconsciously looked at Wan’er’s position. “Big sister, wake up!” Liu’er was shaking Wan’er’s shoulder. Wan’er was really sleeping very soundly. There were so many people making noise, but they could not wake her up. “Stop shaking, stop shaking. My beautiful dream has been ruined by you.” Wan’er mumbled a few words in a daze as she slowly woke up. But Liu’er didn’t have time to care and said anxiously, “Big sister, second sister is being bullied!” Wan’er, who had planned to continue her beautiful dream, suddenly shivered when she heard these words. She instantly jumped up from her stool. “Who dares to bully my sister?!” Her voice resounded throughout the classroom. The entire room instantly became quiet. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The room was silent. Lei Dong raised his eyebrows and sized Wan’er up. Then he said disdainfully, “I bullied your sister. What’s the matter?” ‘I’m a grown man. I can’t believe I was actually scared by this little girl just now!’ Lei Dong cursed in his heart. Actually, he hadn’t even grown hair yet. Did he even count as a man, not to mention a grown man? “Alright!” “You’re so honest!” Wan’er saw that he didn’t show any signs of repentance, and her heart immediately burned with anger. She didn’t even ask what had happened. Instead, she simply took a step forward, advancing on Lei Dong. Lei Dong gave her a contemptuous glance. “What, you really want to fight?” “Believe it or not, I’ll beat you until...;” Before he could finish his sentence, he suddenly heard a crisp “smack” sound. His entire body suddenly soared into the air and flew backward under everyone’s astonished gazes. Crash! His entire body fell to the ground. Lei Dong’s mind was blank. ‘What happened? I was beaten up? I was beaten up by a girl?’ he thought. He was still puzzled when he suddenly felt a burning pain on his left cheek. He finally understood. He had been hit by Jiang Wan’er. And it was a slap! (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “Aaaaaaah!” Lei Dong let out a shrill scream. Then, he hurriedly covered his left cheek and pointed at Wan’er. He gritted his teeth and hissed, “You!” “Yes? Do you still want to be hit?” Looking at Lei Dong’s ferocious expression, Jiang Wan’er waved her small fists and threatened him. Then, she turned around and asked Yan’er about what had happened. Yan’er did not hide anything and pointed at the mess on the table. She explained everything clearly. Among the three sisters, Yan’er was the most sensible. She felt that she should take care of her two sisters, so she rarely called Wan’er ‘sister’. However, she still acknowledged Wan’er as her big sister in her heart. It was just like how only Wan’er could help her vent her anger when she encountered such a situation. Wan’er understood the situation clearly. Her two eyebrows instantly knitted together. Suddenly, she turned her head to look at Lei Dong. Her sharp gaze caused his entire body to tremble involuntarily. “If you encounter a problem that cannot be solved, then solve the person who created the problem.” Wan’er muttered. She had heard her father say that once while eavesdropping. Thinking of this, her heart suddenly brightened. With a faint smile, she clenched her fists and walked towards Lei Dong. At the same time, in the Jiang Mansion’s pavilion. “Achoo!” Jiang Ping suddenly sneezed. He put down the brush in his hand and took out a tissue to wipe his nose. Jiang Ping looked at the words on the paper, then looked up at the sky. “Sigh, the weather today doesn’t seem too good.” “I wonder if I can still watch the sunset today.” ...; “Will you apologize or not?!” Wan’er stepped on the stool with one foot, looking ferocious. In front of her was a kid with a bruised face. If it weren’t for the clothes he was wearing, even his father, Lei Feiche, wouldn’t have recognized him. “I’m not going to apologize!” Lei Dong couldn’t even speak clearly. It sounded like there was air leaking from his mouth as if he had lost two front teeth. “Well, it seems like you didn’t feel any pain after being hit!” Wan’er was furious when she heard what he said. She pumped her two small fists against each other, and two sharp little canine teeth were exposed in her mouth. “You, you still dare to hit me?” Looking at her, Lei Dong immediately panicked. He was already miserable enough. Could he still take it? “If you’re scared, hurry up and apologize to my sister!” “Pfft, even if I’m beaten to death, I won’t apologize,” Lei Dong spat. What kind of joke was this? Even though he was badly beaten, how could he be the king of the children in the future if he admitted defeat now? “If you dare to make a move again, don’t blame me for bullying you!” “Go ahead and try! I have a lot of underlings!” After Lei Dong finished speaking, there were really quite a number of children who quickly stood beside him. Among them, there were a few older children who were 11 or 12 years old. They recognized Lei Dong as their boss. This was because their family was far less powerful than the Lei family and needed the Lei family’s support. Therefore, although they were a little afraid of Wan’er, they did not dare to back down after hearing Lei Dong’s words. With the sudden addition of many people around him, Lei Dong’s courage grew once again. “How about now? Are you afraid?” “Afraid? I don’t know how to write the word ‘afraid’!” There was nothing wrong with these words. Jiang Wan’er always slept during class. Sometimes, it seemed like she really didn’t know how to write the word ‘afraid’. However, Lei Dong felt that she was looking down on him. He ordered his underlings to attack her. Everyone looked at each other, and then they braced themselves and rushed forward. ‘We have so many people, why should we be afraid of her?’ they all thought. Wan’er looked at the people swarming forward and snorted. Without hesitation, she rushed into the crowd, waving her small fists wildly. She was like a red whirlwind sweeping forward, and anyone who came close to her was instantly sent flying. Liu’er saw this scene and quickly reached out her small hand to cover her eyes. However, she still watched through a gap between her fingers. Yan’er, on the other hand, had a calm expression on her face. As for the others who did not get involved, they were so scared that their jaws almost fell off. They rubbed their eyes desperately, afraid that they had seen wrongly. A moment later. The entire classroom was in a mess. “Hehe, is that all you have?” Wan’er placed her hands on her hips smugly. “How is it? Are you convinced?” There were eight or nine children lying at her feet. Their bodies were curled up into little balls. All of them were crying for their parents. Snot and tears flowed down their faces. At this moment, they looked at Wan’er as if they had seen the devil. How would they dare to answer? The other children could not help but gasp. They all knew Jiang Wan’er. She was usually a little wild, but no one had expected that she could take care of so many opponents easily! Until now, they still couldn’t believe it. Creak! At this moment, the classroom door was slowly pushed open. Everyone instantly looked towards the door. They saw the white-haired old man standing at the door with his walking stick. They saw the old man, and the old man naturally saw them. When the old man saw this scene, he was dumbfounded. What was going on? Why did a large group of children fall to the ground? How long had he been gone before chaos ensued? A series of questions flashed through the old man’s mind. Just as he was about to find someone to give him a proper explanation, Lei Dong ran over. “Boo hoo, sir, Jiang Wan’er hit us!” When Lei Dong saw the old man, he immediately burst into tears. If he didn’t cry now, was he ever going to cry? When he learned of the culprit, the old man’s expression immediately changed. He angrily shouted, “Jiang Wan’er, what’s going on?!” Although Wan’er wasn’t afraid of the old man, she was afraid that he would report her to her father. ‘If Dad found out that I hit someone again, he would definitely...;’ When Wan’er thought of this, her entire body trembled. She quickly waved her small hands and explained, “Sir, he bullied my sister first.” “In the end, not only did he not apologize to my sister, he even dragged a group of people along to beat me up.” “I had no choice but to fight back. In the end, they were all beaten up by me.” “Yes, yes!” Yan’er and Liu’er also quickly agreed. They did not want to see Wan’er being taught a lesson by their teacher. The old man was stunned for a moment, then he looked at Lei Dong and asked, “Is what they said true?” Lei Dong was so frightened by this question that he lowered his head, not daring to say anything. The old man looked over the crowd again, taking in all their expressions. He already understood in his heart that Wan’er wasn’t lying. Sigh! What a mess. The old man sighed helplessly. This Jiang family and Lei family weren’t people he could afford to offend unless he didn’t want this job anymore. Thinking of this, the old master said with a straight face, “In that case, I can only call your parents over.” Hearing this, Wan’er’s jaw dropped. Oh no, she was going to be scolded again. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Red Gate Alley. This was the most prosperous street in Xiaoyu Town. Many wealthy families lived here. These wealthy families painted their gates red, and that was how Red Gate Alley got its name. For example, the Li mansion was at one end of Red Gate Alley, while the Lei mansion was at the other end. The Lei family’s backyard. Although the Lei family’s backyard was not as luxurious as the Jiang family’s backyard, it was filled with all kinds of weapons and sandbags. The patriarch of the Lei family, Lei Feiche, had a full beard and a fiery personality. He was the kind of guy who didn’t talk much. He was very fond of martial arts, so he often practiced in his own backyard. For example, at this time, he was practicing a set of fist techniques in the courtyard. This fist technique was vigorous and very extraordinary. At the peak of his practice routine, he was suddenly distracted by a series of shouts. “Patriarch, something bad has happened!” A gray-robed figure came in and knelt at the side of the backyard as he spoke. “Patriarch, the private school teacher sent someone to report that Young Master was beaten up in school!” Lei Feiche, whose cultivation practice had been interrupted, was about to fly into a rage. But when he heard this, he froze and hurriedly stopped cultivating. His gaze was like two sharp blades, piercing through the servant who had brought him the news. His voice was equally sharp. “What did you say?” “Who has the guts to lay a hand on my son?!” “Patriarch, I heard that it was those young ladies from the Jiang family.” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) The servant was trembling in fear. He didn’t even dare to raise his head as he replied with a trembling voice. “The Jiang family!” Lei Feiche’s expression immediately changed when he heard ‘the Jiang family’. His gaze was so ferocious that it could set things aflame as he hissed, “Why is it them again?!” “Damn it! This time, I must teach the Jiang family a lesson!” After he finished speaking, he didn’t even bother changing his clothes. Still dressed in his sweaty martial arts training outfit, he left the main gate of the Lei mansion and headed towards the school. The servant’s body trembled. He didn’t dare to delay and hurriedly followed him. At the same time, in the Jiang Mansion. Jiang Ping was practicing his calligraphy when he suddenly received a report from a servant. On the surface, Jiang Ping acted as if nothing had happened, but his heart skipped a beat. The word he was currently writing was written incorrectly. He knew that Wan’er would definitely cause trouble again. But he didn’t expect that only two days had passed...; He really didn’t know whether it was a good thing or a bad thing to let them cultivate. Sigh! Jiang Ping sighed softly. He sighed because he had ruined a word in his calligraphy, and also because of this daughter of his, who never failed to give him a headache. ...; Lei Feiche stormed through the street. The fierce look on his face scared the passers-by out of his way. But before he could leave Red Gate Alley, Lei Feiche was stopped by someone. “Brother Lei!” Hearing a familiar voice, Lei Feiche subconsciously turned his head. He saw a person behind him waving his hand and quickly walking towards him. Seeing the person who came, Lei Feichong was immediately overjoyed. He also hurriedly took a few steps forward to welcome him. “Brother Li! It’s you.” That’s right, the person who came was Li Batian. The two of them cupped their fists and saluted each other. Li Batian sized up Lei Feiche and found that he was still wearing his martial arts outfit. Moreover, Lei Feiche looked quite anxious, so Li Batian couldn’t help but be a little curious. “Brother Lei, you seem to be in a hurry, I wonder why?” Lei Feiche looked a little hesitant to tell Li Batian about it. Li Batian could also tell that Lei Feiche didn’t want to talk about it. He immediately said seriously, “Brother Lei, Our two families are very close.” “You and I are even closer. We’re like brothers. If you have something to say, just say it.” That was what Lei Feiche wanted to hear from Li Batian, so he sighed and continued, “I won’t hide it from Brother Li. I’m just ashamed to say it.” “My youngest son was just beaten up in school.” “What? Your son was also beaten up?” Hearing Lei Feiche’s words, Li Batian couldn’t help but tremble as he thought of his youngest son, who had also been beaten up two days ago. Originally, he wanted to take the opportunity to extort money from Jiang Ping, but in the end, he failed to get what he wanted. He could understand why Lei Feiche was hesitating. After all, this matter was embarrassing! But when he thought of the imposing manner that Jiang Ping had released that day, and how that oppressive feeling made him unable to breathe, his whole body shivered. Now, even when he went out, he had to be careful, for fear of bumping into Jiang Ping. Just as he said this, he realized that he had said the word “also”. How was he going to explain this? He stole a glance at Lei Feiche and realized that his expression was a little ugly. He seemed not to have noticed that detail, making Li Batian heave a sigh of relief. After all, being beaten up was a shameful thing, but being beaten up by a girl was even more shameful! “Brother Lei, you don’t have to worry too much.” “I’m sure your son will be fine.” Li Batian casually comforted Lei Feiche. “I hope it’s as Brother Li says,” Lei Feiche replied, sighing and shaking his head. “If my Lei family could be as powerful as the Li family, and I had Brother Li’s strength, then this wouldn’t have happened today.” “In Xiaoyu Town, who doesn’t know how powerful the Li family is?” “Who would dare to provoke Brother Li? It’s a pity that our Lei family is far inferior!” “Ahem! Brother Lei is really flattering me.” Hearing this, Li Batian couldn’t help but blush and laugh. Firstly, he felt pleased being praised, especially when he was being praised by someone like the patriarch of the Lei family. Secondly, he felt a little embarrassed. Who would dare to provoke him? Jiang Ping, of course. He almost killed him to make him admit his mistake. Although Lei Feiche didn’t know about this matter, he couldn’t help but feel a little flustered. He also felt a little uneasy, as if something bad was going to happen. Li Batian’s expression only confirmed what he thought. He smiled and said, “Brother Li, if you have nothing to do, why don’t you come with me?” “That way, I can borrow Brother Li’s prestige and suppress the enemy’s arrogance.” “Haha, that’s fine too!” Li Batian was delighted by the compliments. Moreover, he had nothing to do today, so he might as well give him some support. He laughed and said, “Today, I’ll go with you.” “Let’s see which idiot dares to offend us!” “Thank you, Brother Li!” Lei Feiche’s plan succeeded, so he was naturally overjoyed. The Lei family was not as powerful as the Jiang family. The fierceness he displayed in front of his servants just now was just for show. With the Li family’s help, they might be able to defeat the Jiang family today. That was why he deliberately approached Li Batian. And now, he had succeeded. Hmph, Jiang Ping! I don’t believe your family can withstand the pressure of the Lei and Li families at the same time! At this moment, Lei Feiche felt much better. The two walked side by side towards the school. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Soon, Li Batian and Lei Feiche arrived at the school together. Before the two of them entered the door, the old teacher came out to welcome them. Lei Dong was also by his side. “Dad!” The moment Lei Dong saw his father, he immediately burst into tears and dashed into his arms. Lei Feiche instinctively hugged him. Before he could react, Lei Dong had already started crying. “Dad, you have to help me!” “Someone bullied me and beat me up so badly!” He was slurring his words, and his speech was a little unclear. Li Batian and Lei Feiche were stunned when they heard this. Lei Feiche held his son at arm’s length. He was furious when he saw what had happened to his son. If not for the clothes he was wearing, Lei Feiche would not be able to recognize his own son! Lei Dong’s head and face were all bruised. His face was bruised and swollen, and there were two black circles around his eyes. The blood from his nose flowed slowly and his clothes were stained red. “Cough cough!” Even Li Batian could not help but feel a little surprised when he saw Lei Dong’s state. He had been beaten into a pulp, and he was in a much worse state than his own son. He could not help but secretly curse in his heart. That fiend was so ruthless. For a moment, Li Batian suddenly had a very ominous premonition. Lei Feiche, who was at his side, was absolutely furious. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) He squatted down, held Lei Dong’s shoulder, and gnashed his teeth as he said, “Lei Dong, tell me who did this.” “I will definitely teach that kid a lesson and help you vent your anger!” “Yes, yes...;” Lei Dong tried very hard to say Jiang Wan’er’s name. But because he was crying too hard, he couldn’t stop sobbing and actually couldn’t speak. Seeing this, Lei Feiche quickly helped him to calm down. Then, he glared fiercely at the old teacher and said, “Sir, who did this?!” “You have to give me an explanation today, or else I’ll tear your school apart!” “That’s right, sir, you must not shield the murderer, or else my Li family won’t allow it.” Li Batian, who was at the side, also quickly echoed. The old teacher was already sitting on pins and needles under Lei Feiche’s gaze, and his hair stood on end. Now that Li Batian had opened his mouth, he did not dare to say another word. He turned around and shouted into the room, “Wan’er, why aren’t you guys coming out?!” When he heard the name ‘Wan’er’, Li Batian shuddered. Because he seemed to have heard this name somewhere before. But now, Lei Feiche’s gaze was on the door. So he did not notice Li Batian’s slight movements. Just as the old teacher finished speaking, three delicate little girls walked out of the room. Lei Feiche and Li Batian’s gazes instantly landed on the three of them. When Li Batian saw Wan’er dressed in red, his entire body could not help but shiver. Jiang Ping’s figure was like a thick dark cloud, instantly enveloping him. The scenes from that day in the room all surfaced in his eyes. ‘My god, it really is that fiend!’ Li Batian thought. He cursed the Jiang family’s ancestors in his heart! “Patriarch Lei, your son’s injuries were caused by this little girl,” the old teacher said to Lei Feiche, pointing at Wan’er. Lei Feiche was dumbfounded. A girl? A little girl who looked even younger than his son? How could she injure his own son to such an extent? “Sir, please don’t mess with me!” Lei Feiche’s voice sent shivers down the teacher’s spine, and his eyes revealed a cold glint. The old teacher immediately shuddered, and hurriedly said, “I wouldn’t dare.” “Wan’er, tell us, did you injure Lei Dong?” “It was me!” Compared to the old teacher, Wan’er appeared extremely calm. She even glanced at Li Batian, who looked a little familiar. “Dad, it’s her!” Lei Dong also pointed at Wan’er and wailed. This time, Lei Feiche was no longer puzzled. He could not understand why his son would be beaten up by a little girl like this. But once he started to fight, he did not care who the other party was. Seeing that Lei Feiche was about to go berserk, Li Batian suddenly reacted. With a flash, he stepped in front of Lei Feiche to block him. “Brother Li, what are you doing?” Lei Feiche snapped. “Brother Lei, don’t be rash. There might be a misunderstanding.” Li Batian gave Lei Feiche a few looks, but he didn’t understand at all. “Misunderstanding? How can that be a misunderstanding? Get out of the way!” “You...;! Fine, if you insist on doing this, don’t blame me for not warning you.” “Take care of yourself.” Li Batian sighed helplessly and gave way. It was obviously impossible to persuade Lei Feiche with just a few words. However, his actions stunned Lei Feiche. Why was this Li Batian acting so strangely? When did he become such a timid person? ...; At this moment, a voice came from behind. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er!” Everyone followed the voice and turned around. They saw a thin and handsome man standing behind them. The gazes of the three girls passed Lei Feiche and landed on Jiang Ping. They hurriedly shouted in unison and pounced on Jiang Ping with small steps. “Dad!” Li Batian was shocked when he saw this scene. ‘Lei Feiche, you’ve made me suffer! Oh my god, why did I come to join in the fun?!’ Li Batian thought. He roared furiously in his heart and subconsciously distanced himself from Lei Feiche. However, Lei Feiche did not notice this. His attention was focused on Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping did not even glance at the two of them. Instead, he pulled a long face and stared at Wan’er unhappily. “Tell me, what happened today? Did you hit someone again?” “Yes.” Wan’er pouted and nodded dejectedly. Looking at her expression, Jiang Ping shook his head helplessly. “Tell me, why did you hit someone again?” “Because I want to protect Yan’er!” Wan’er was not the least bit arrogant when she spoke. Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment. “Protect Yan’er? What exactly happened?” “Dad, it’s like this.” Yan’er took over the conversation and put on a pitiful expression. She told him the whole story. Of course, there were also some parts that had to be said. “If it wasn’t for Wan...;sister, I’m afraid that I wouldn’t have been able to see Dad!” “Also, big sister was injured too.” As she spoke, tears started to appear in Yan’er’s eyes. Her pitiful appearance made Jiang Ping’s heart ache. “What? Wan’er was injured?” Jiang Ping suddenly realized the main point of Yan’er’s words. “Wan’er, where are you injured? Quick, let me take a look!” “Big sister’s injury is on her arm.” Yan’er answered and then held Wan’er’s arm, rolling up her sleeve. Wan’er was like a mannequin that was at Yan’er’s mercy. She did not even know when she had gotten injured. However, she could see Yan’er signaling at her with her eyes. This sister of hers must have some trick up her sleeve. Yan’er rolled up her sleeve and took a look. Indeed, there was a red wound on Wan’er’s elbow. Jiang Ping was furious. He stood up abruptly, but he didn’t see the smug look in Yan’er’s eyes. “Sir, what’s going on?” “I don’t know exactly what happened. I just saw Lei Dong beaten badly the moment I entered the room.” The old teacher’s heart skipped a beat when he saw Jiang Ping’s furious look. Lei Feiche, who was standing by the side, also heard the conversation between Jiang Ping and the others. He couldn’t help but become even angrier. ‘Even if your daughter was injured a little, my son was beaten so badly. No matter what, you are still in the wrong,’ Lei Feiche thought. Thinking of this, Lei Feiche’s face instantly turned black as soot. He stared fiercely at Jiang Ping. “You must give me an explanation for today’s matter!” Hearing this, Li Batian shuddered. Why did this sound familiar? He had said the same thing to Jiang Ping two days ago. Some bad memories resurfaced in his mind. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping lovingly touched Wan’er’s head. He had never allowed the girls to get hurt. He felt extremely upset now that Wan’er was injured. He glanced at Lei Feiche and said indifferently, “Patriarch Lei, you should be the one giving me an explanation.” “Have you gone mad?!” Lei Feiche frowned, his gaze fierce. “Look at how badly your daughter has beaten up my son!” “My daughter will not hit people without a good reason.” Hearing these, Lei Feiche’s eyes almost spat out flames. He pointed at Lei Dong’s head and said, “Look, look at what has happened!” “Are you saying that my son is not human?” “I’m saying that he had it coming! He actually bullied a little girl!” After saying this, Jiang Ping looked at Yan’er with a doting gaze. “Bullsh*t, whatever your daughter says might not be the truth.” Lei Feiche knew that his son was used to doing things without hesitation or fear. He might really have bullied a little girl. But now, Lei Feiche could not give in at all. “In that case, we might as well ask the students in the classroom to come out and explain the situation.” Jiang Ping said calmly to the old teacher, “Sir, please ask the students to come out.” “Okay!” The old teacher did not refuse. He only hoped that he would not get involved in this matter. He hurriedly entered the room and walked out with more than twenty children. Under the gazes of Jiang Ping and Lei Feiche, a few brave children stuttered and explained the whole story of the matter. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) This time, the truth of the matter was finally revealed. “Sir, who do you think is at fault?” Jiang Ping suddenly asked the old teacher. The old teacher pondered for a moment, then pinched his beard and said slowly, “Lei Dong was at fault first.” After getting a reply from the old teacher, Jiang Ping said to Lei Feiche. “This matter started because of your son.” “Even the teacher said that your son was at fault first.” “So, you should be the one to give me an explanation!” Lei Feiche’s expression was extremely ugly. From the look of it now, he probably wouldn’t be able to win. Jiang Ping continued, “But I’m a very reasonable person and I don’t want to make things difficult for your son.” “As long as your son can apologize to my Yan’er, this matter will be over.” Hearing this, Lei Dong’s body trembled and he cried, “Dad, I don’t want to apologize!” Looking at his son, Lei Feiche was thoroughly enraged. He said angrily, “My son has already been beaten to such a state, and you still want him to apologize?” “Sure, but only if you let my son beat your daughter to a pulp first!” In an instant, Jiang Ping’s expression turned furious. If Wan’er and the others got hurt, he would make sure that Lei Feiche wouldn’t be able to stand up and speak! Li Batian’s gaze had always been secretly fixed on Jiang Ping’s face. Now that he saw Jiang Ping’s expression suddenly turn cold, he cried out in his heart, “Not good!” He hurriedly stood between the two of them and smiled apologetically at Jiang Ping, “Patriarch Jiang, please calm down.” “Patriarch Lei was too impulsive and said the wrong thing.” “Besides, you can’t blame someone when one is ignorant.” Only then did Jiang Ping notice this fellow. He snorted lightly and didn’t say anything. Li Batian was given a cold shoulder but he didn’t get angry. Instead, he turned around and faced Lei Feiche. He said earnestly to Lei Feiche, “Patriarch Lei, this matter is really Lei Dong’s fault first.” “I know Patriarch Jiang’s character. He’s very reasonable.” “That’s why you should ask Lei Dong to apologize. It will be better for everyone if we let this matter go.” Lei Feiche was stunned. What was happening now? Li Batian was obviously the one he had invited to boost his reputation, but now he was speaking up for the other party? Didn’t the Li family have always been on bad terms with the Jiang Family? Why did they suddenly change their attitude? Moreover, Lei Feiche could hear a sense of estrangement from Li Batian’s words. Previously, he had clearly called him Brother Lei, but now he was addressing him as the Patriarch. It was as if he was deliberately drawing a clear distance between them. Only now did he realize that this feeling seemed to have existed since the appearance of the three girls. His gaze swept past Li Batian and Jiang Ping. He saw that Li Batian’s expression was complicated, while Jiang Ping’s expression was calm. His heart couldn’t help but jump. Lei Feiche was not a fool. He could guess it. Li Batian had suddenly changed sides. He must have his reasons. Jiang Ping was not as simple as he looked. To begin with, his Lei family was not as powerful as the Jiang family. Now, there was the Li family on the other side. It was obvious that he was not at an advantage today. Lei Feiche thought for a while before he snorted and said to Jiang Ping, “I’ve lost in today’s matter.” “But don’t be complacent, you’ve to pay back what my son has suffered today!” “Just you wait. You will definitely pay the price soon!” After saying that, Lei Feiche did not delay at all. He picked up his son and walked out of the door. Before he left, he even glanced at Jiang Ping and Li Batian. A dangerous glint flashed across his eyes. Jiang Ping, and you traitor Li Batian! Just you wait. My Lei family is not your match. But there will always be someone who can destroy your two families! He wanted to let people know that his Lei family was not at the mercy of others! Jiang Ping felt Lei Feiche’s gaze, but he did not think too much about it. After all, the three girls were safe and sound now. This was what he was most concerned about. The old teacher was overjoyed when he saw that the matter could be brushed aside so easily. He quickly called the other children back into the room to continue with their lessons. “Dad, I don’t want to go to class anymore.” Wan’er acted coquettishly towards Jiang Ping again. “No! The matter is over. You should go back to class properly now!” “But Dad, I’m injured.” When he heard that, Jiang Ping’s heart softened again. However, Yan’er and Liu’er quickly pulled Wan’er into the room. “Alright, big sister, let’s go back to class. Otherwise, Dad will be angry.” “Dad, don’t worry. We will pay attention in class.” Wan’er couldn’t resist and was finally dragged in by her two sisters. Looking at Yan’er and Liu’er, Jiang Ping was overjoyed. As expected, these two girls loved learning! “Yan’er, what are you doing?!” After entering the classroom, Wan’er couldn’t help but grumble. But Yan’er didn’t answer and only stuck out her little tongue. ‘This big sister is really not bright. I was clearly the one who caused the injury to her arm. If Dad takes a closer look, I would be exposed,’ Yan’er thought. Outside the room, only Jiang Ping and Li Batian were left. This kind of feeling seemed somewhat familiar. Jiang Ping glanced at Li Batian indifferently. Li Batian was instantly shocked and hurriedly went forward to say. “Patriarch Jiang, please don’t misunderstand. I just happened to join in the fun today by accident.” “Did I say anything? Patriarch Li, you’re thinking too much.” Jiang Ping couldn’t help but chuckle. It seemed that Li Batian was really scared to death by him. Li Batian smiled awkwardly and then looked around vigilantly. He suddenly approached Jiang Ping and said in a low voice, “Patriarch Jiang, you have to be careful.” “Although the Lei family is not strong, there are people in a major cultivation sect behind Lei Feiche!” Jiang Ping’s eyes widened. A cultivation sect?! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Yunlai Inn at Fusheng City. In a room on the second floor of the inn, on a wine table by the window. An old man with little hair and a long gray beard, wearing a white robe, sat by the window. A blue sword was embroidered on the robe. From afar, he looked like a sage. There was an envelope beside the old man’s hand. This was a letter that had just been delivered. The sender wrote that he was a relative of the old man. The old man unhurriedly opened the letter in his hand. His gaze swept across it like lightning, and he could see ten lines at a glance. A moment later, the letter in his hand was suddenly squeezed into a ball. The old man’s expression became extremely unsightly. “Impudent!” The old man suddenly shouted angrily. A powerful aura instantly shook the cups, cutlery, and chopsticks on the table, causing them to rustle. The old man didn’t pay the slightest attention to it. Instead, he snorted and scoffed, “A mere mortal family from a small town dares to bully our Lei family?” “Among the blind, the one-eyed man is king. It seems I will have to teach them how to behave!” The old man was fuming when there was a knock on the door. “Come in!” A young man pushed the door open and entered. He was wearing the same long robe as the old man, but the embroidered sword on the robe was much smaller. The man bowed and said to the old man respectfully, “Chief Lei, the disciple acceptance ceremony is ready.” “Do you think we should start the ceremony today?” The old man, Chief Lei, pondered for a moment and then waved his hand. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) He said slowly, “You will be in charge of the disciple acceptance ceremony.” “I still have some important matters to attend to. I need to leave Fusheng City for a few days.” Hearing this, the man suddenly raised his head and looked at the old man in shock. “Chief Lei, the disciple acceptance ceremony is an important matter for our Chuanyun Sect. I’m afraid it’s against the rules for you to leave now.” “If anything goes wrong, I can’t bear this responsibility.” “It’s fine. What kind of trouble can it be?” The old man snorted disdainfully. “Who dares to provoke our Chuanyun Sect within Fusheng City?” “But I’m weak compared to you. I’m afraid...;” The man looked hesitant, but the old man interrupted him. “You are an outstanding disciple of our Chuanyun Sect. Why are you so timid?” “Fusheng City is just a small, low-class city. What trouble can there be?” “Besides, the name of our Chuanyun Sect is enough to intimidate those bad people.” Hearing this, the man’s expression brightened. The Chuanyun Sect was a serious cultivation sect. It was also a major sect in the Tianyun Empire. The secular empire couldn’t order cultivation sects like them. On the contrary, every cultivation sect’s power could influence many cities. For example, Fusheng City was under the jurisdiction of the Chuanyun Sect. Every year, the Chuanyun Sect would recruit some new disciples in the cities under its jurisdiction. These cities would also offer some treasures to thee sects every year to seek protection. Chief Lei was one of the recruiters of the Chuanyun Sect. His full name was Lei Jingyun, and he was a powerful cultivator at the last stage of the core building realm. The recruiter was only a middle-level figure in the sect, but he already had the strength of a core building cultivator. From this, one could imagine the strength of the Chuanyun Sect. By now, the man had become much calmer, and his thoughts became much clearer. Suddenly, he realized that this was actually also his opportunity. He put on a smile and said to Chief Lei fawningly, “Chief Lei, I wonder why you are going out. Do you need any help?” “No need. It’s just a trivial matter that is not worth mentioning. You just need to complete the disciple acceptance ceremony properly. When I return to the sect, there will naturally be a reward for you.” Hearing this, the man was overjoyed again and quickly said, “Thank you, Chief Lei, for your guidance!” Lei Jingyun nodded and did not delay any further. With a sword incantation in his hand, the sharp sword hanging on the wall instantly grew bigger. The sword floated in front of Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun leaped up and landed steadily on the sword. Then, he streaked across the sky like a meteor and disappeared into the horizon. ...; At the same time. In the backyard of the Jiang Mansion in Xiaoyu Town. Jiang Ping was lying on his bamboo hammock. He quietly looked at the three girls in front of him, and a fatherly smile appeared on his face. After the school fight, Yan’er and Liu’er were now working hard to cultivate. They did not want to rely on their father and Wan’er forever. However, although they had been working hard these two days, there was no progress. “Dad!” As they were cultivating, Yan’er and Liu’er suddenly stopped. Then, they ran to Jiang Ping, pouted their little mouths, and looked at him with disappointment. Jiang Ping was immediately shocked and hurriedly picked up the two girls. He said softly, “Yan’er, Liu’er, what’s going on?” Yan’er and Liu’er looked at each other, and both of them lowered their heads at the same time. Liu’er said weakly, “Dad, I am really stupid. I can’t learn this body tempering technique.” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment before he laughed again. ‘I thought something had happened!’ Jiang Ping thought. Jiang ping quickly comforted her, “Liu’er, don’t be discouraged. I believe you can definitely do it.” Upon hearing this, Yan’er also complained, “Dad, this body tempering technique is so difficult. It’s even more difficult than the books that the teacher taught!” This comparison made Jiang Ping chuckle. In his daughter’s eyes, the contents of the books were the most difficult. Jiang Ping wanted to persuade her a little more, but Yan’er continued. “Dad, why don’t you change to another body tempering technique for us?” “Sometimes, I don’t understand what the teacher taught me, but when he taught me other things, I understood it immediately.” Jiang Ping was taken aback. Yan’er was right. The path of cultivation was like reading a book. There were also thousands of methods. This body tempering technique was top-notch, but it might not be suitable for his two daughters. They could only go further if the right path was chosen. Just as Jiang Ping was deep in thought, a clear cry like a silver bell pulled him back to reality. “Dad, I’ve become stronger again!” Wan’er hopped over to Jiang Ping. Looking at her cheerful appearance, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but chuckle. However, he didn’t take Wan’er’s words to heart. It had only been two days, and Wan’er’s strength had become stronger again? Even if she had a unique physique, it was impossible that she could achieve it so fast. Wan’er saw Jiang Ping’s faint smile, she knew that he didn’t believe her. She angrily put her hands on her hips and said, “Dad, what I said is true!” “I know. Why would you lie to Dad? It’s just that...;” As Jiang Ping said that, he stroked Wan’er’s head. However, before he could finish his words, he was stunned. Because the moment he touched Wan’er, he really felt it. Wan’er was about to break through! “Wan’er, you’re so awesome!” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment, and then he patted Wan’er’s face in joy. Wan’er was extremely happy when she received her father’s praise and kiss. She immediately hugged Jiang Ping’s neck and laughed non-stop. But Yan’er and Liu’er, who were at the side, pouted their little mouths and were unhappy. They wanted a kiss from their father as well! The two girls snorted and broke away from Jiang Ping’s embrace. “Dad, I want to cultivate too!” The two girls said in unison as they entered the courtyard. They began to focus on cultivating again. Looking at the two girls, Jiang Ping laughed out loud again. How could Jiang Ping not know their little thoughts? It was great to be the center of the jealousy! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Xiaoyu Town. At the gate of the Lei Mansion in Red Gate Alley. A few guards were standing at the gate. Suddenly, a blue stream of light rushed over from afar. The guards were shocked and were about to shout for reinforcements when the stream of light arrived in front of them. It was Lei Jingyun who was riding a flying sword. The servants were dumbfounded. They had never seen such a scene before. Riding a flying sword, wasn’t this the legendary immortal method? Lei Jingyun glanced at them indifferently and said, “Is your Patriarch in the residence?” The guards came back to their senses and hurriedly said, “Yes, is the immortal looking for our Patriarch?” Lei Jingyun nodded lightly. One of the guards quickly turned around and entered the Lei Mansion to report to Lei Feiche. A moment later, a series of hurried footsteps sounded. “Uncle!” Lei Jingyun raised his eyebrows when he heard this shout. He saw Lei Feiche’s surprised look. “Uncle, you’re finally here!” After saying this, Lei Feiche was about to kneel down. Lei Jingyun hurriedly held him up and sized him up. “Feiche, long time no see.” “Yes, Uncle. Long time no see. My Dad misses you a lot too.” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “Oh right, please come in. The Lei Mansion is like home to you.” After Lei Feiche said that, he turned his body sideways and made a welcoming gesture. Lei Jingyun nodded and walked into the mansion. When he entered the main hall, he saw an aged and skinny old man standing there. Beside him, he was holding the hand of a child whose face was in a terrible state. Lei Jingyun did not know this child, but this old man was his younger brother, Lei Jingfeng, whom he had not seen for many years. When Lei Jingfeng saw him, he immediately came forward to welcome him. However, Lei Jingfeng’s legs were not very agile, and he could not walk very steadily. Seeing that he was about to fall because of his excitement, Lei Jingyun hurriedly took a few steps forward to support him. “Jingyun!” “Jingfeng!” The two of them looked at each other, and their eyes were filled with tears. Lei Jingyun looked at his younger brother in front of him and sighed again. Lei Jingfeng was much younger than him, but now he looked to be 20 to 30 years older than him. His spirit was weak, and he looked extremely old. It was as if a gust of wind could blow him down. “Jingfeng, why are you so much older?” Lei Jingyun let out a long sigh. Hearing this, Lei Jingfeng was stunned for a moment, then he smiled bitterly. “It’s human nature to live, grow old, get sick, and die.” “I’m almost eighty years old. Isn’t this how I should look?” “You are looking younger and younger, Jingyun. You look fifty or sixty years old.” “As expected of a cultivator. How enviable!” “Jingfeng, don’t be too sad. Do take care.” Lei Jingyun patted his shoulder. He wanted to comfort his brother, but he didn’t know how to persuade him, so he quickly changed the topic. “By the way, what did you say in the letter?” Lei Feiche, who was behind him, heard Lei Jingyun’s question and quickly pulled Lei Dong to him. He said with a sobbing tone, “Uncle, you have to stand up for us.” “This is your grandnephew Lei Dong. Look at how badly he’s been beaten up!” Lei Jingyun saw Lei Dong’s badly bruised head and was instantly enraged. Although he had never seen Lei Dong before, he was considered his junior. “What exactly is going on? Who is so ruthless!” Hence, Lei Feiche hurriedly explained everything that had happened that day. Of course, he hid the fact that Lei Dong had taken the initiative to stir up trouble. He even portrayed Jiang Ping as an arrogant and ruthless person. Hearing this, Lei Jingyun’s expression became more and more unsightly. Lei Feiche secretly saw Lei Jingyun’s expression and knew that the time had come. He then said with a sad face, “Uncle, you don’t know how difficult our Lei family’s situation is right now.” “This Jiang family has joined forces with the Li family and is constantly suppressing our Lei family, trying to drive us out of Xiaoyu Town.” “Although I can barely hold on, I can’t avoid their overt and underhanded attacks.” “This matter was deliberately provoked by them. I’m afraid that they will soon make a serious move against our Lei family.” “I’m useless against them. Please help us, Uncle!” After Lei Jingyun heard this, he did not suspect anything and his face turned extremely gloomy. He gritted his teeth and said sarcastically, “Great! What a great Jiang family, what a great Li family!” “How dare they humiliate our Lei family. Do they really think that our Lei family is so helpless?” Looking at his ferocious appearance, Lei Dong hurriedly shrank back behind Lei Feiche. Lei Jingyun happened to notice Lei Dong’s actions and his expression softened a little. He waved at Lei Dong. “Don’t be afraid. Come here. I will stand up for you.” However, Lei Dong was extremely fearful of this unfamiliar old man. Seeing this, Lei Feiche hurriedly carried Lei Dong and placed him in front of Lei Jingyun. He smiled apologetically and said, “Uncle, please don’t take offense. This child was bullied miserably that day. Now, he is afraid of strangers.” Lei Jingyun shook his head, indicating that he was not bothered by it. Then, he took out a small white porcelain bottle from his pocket and poured out a pill from it. “Lei Dong, take this pill. I guarantee that the injury on your face will disappear immediately.” Lei Dong was originally afraid of Lei Jingyun, but when he heard this, his expression immediately changed. He cried out in surprise, “Really?” “Of course, eat it quickly.” Lei Jingyun put the pill in Lei Dong’s hand. Lei Dong glanced at Lei Feiche again and saw the latter nod his head. Without any further hesitation, he swallowed the pill in one gulp. For a moment, spiritual energy revolved around Lei Dong’s face. Lei Dong felt as if a pair of extremely gentle hands were caressing his face. A moment later, the spiritual energy dissipated, and Lei Dong’s face was perfectly fine again. Lei Jingyun nodded his head in satisfaction. Upon seeing this scene, Lei Feiche and the others were speechless. Such a miraculous medicinal pill was indeed worthy of an immortal! It was definitely not something that the doctors of the secular world could compare to. With such a person standing up for them, Lei Feiche was confident that the Jiang family would be doomed. “Uncle is indeed an immortal god. I admire you!” “Uncle, please stand up for the Lei family!” “Of course. Feiche, take me to the Jiang family now,” Lei Jingyun pinched his beard and said slowly. Lei Feiche was immediately overjoyed and was about to agree. However, he suddenly remembered the reaction of Patriarch Li that day and felt slightly uneasy. He frowned and muttered, “Uncle, there might be more to this Jiang family than meets the eye.” “Why don’t we investigate their background first and make preparations?” Lei Jingyun smiled disdainfully. “They’re just an itinerant cultivation clan in a small mortal town. What background can they have?” “Besides, so what if they really have a background?” “Even in Fusheng City, no one dares to offend me!” As soon as he finished speaking, Lei Jingyun’s eyes glinted, and his aura poured out. A gust of wind instantly spread out from his body, causing Lei Feiche and the others to step back. “Last stage of the core building realm. What do you think?” Lei Jingyun said nonchalantly. Lei Feiche was immediately overjoyed and no longer had any doubts. Even in Fusheng City, not many had reached the last stage of core building realm. What were the chances that Jiang Ping’s background was even more extraordinary? <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The sun was setting in the backyard of the Jiang Mansion. Wan’er was cultivating with her two younger sisters. Now, Yan’er and Liu’er had started learning a new body tempering technique. They were practicing a set of imposing fist techniques. At the same time, at the gate of the Jiang Mansion. When the guards saw Lei Feiche and Lei Jingyun approaching menacingly, they had a bad feeling. Although they didn’t know Lei Jingyun, they knew Lei Feiche. And they knew he was here to cause trouble! The guards could only brace themselves and stop them. “Are both of you here for a visit? Please wait for me while I inform the Patriarch,” the guard leader said hurriedly, not daring to be arrogant. Lei Jingyun gruffly replied, “That won’t be necessary. I’ll go in and look for him myself!” “This is against the rules. Please...;” The guard’s expression was unsightly. He wanted to stall for time. However, Lei Jingyun didn’t give him the chance to finish. His expression darkened, and a cold light flashed in his eyes. The aura of a last-stage core building cultivator was released. An incomparably powerful aura instantly spread out. A few guards were instantly scared out of their wits by this powerful aura. They all trembled, looking at Lei Jingyun as if he was a ghost. This aura had completely exceeded their understanding. Despite their fear, they couldn’t help but feel a sense of reverence from the bottom of their hearts. Lei Jingyun glanced at them contemptuously and promptly strode into the Jiang Mansion. Seeing this, Lei Feiche also hurriedly followed. ‘It’s over, it’s over!’ (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) The guards wailed in their hearts as they watched the two visitors walk into the mansion. ‘Patriarch, you’ve offended such a terrifying figure! Isn’t the Jiang family finished now?’ the guards thought. If the time came, even they might have to suffer. The moment Lei Feiche entered the Jiang Mansion, he immediately bellowed, “Jiang Ping, come out!” He had come not only for revenge, but also to destroy Jiang Ping’s reputation. The bigger the commotion, the better! However, the two of them couldn’t find Jiang Ping. Unknowingly, they arrived at the backyard. “Jiang Ping, where are you?!” The three girls who were cultivating suddenly heard Lei Feiche’s shout and were immediately shocked. The three of them stopped cultivating and looked in the direction of the voice. In the next moment, Lei Feiche and Lei Jingyun appeared at the entrance of the backyard. For a moment, both sides were stunned and looked at each other for a moment. Lei Feiche was overjoyed when he saw the three girls. He had thought that this trip would be in vain, but now these three girls had fallen into his hands. Now Jiang Ping couldn’t escape even if he wanted to! Lei Jingyun also sized up the three girls. He had learned from Lei Feiche that the three girls from the Jiang family were the ones who had injured Lei Dong. Hence, he was curious as to who could actually beat up the descendants of the Lei family to such a state. Lei Jingyun’s gaze swept over the three girls, and his face was filled with disdain. They were just three ordinary little girls, it wasn’t worth it...; But when his gaze swept across Wan’er, his expression changed. She had reached the tempering realm! He was quite sure that his perception wasn’t wrong. After all, he was at the last stage of the core building realm. But what he saw still shocked him. The tempering realm was the most basic realm in the path of cultivation, and it was extremely difficult to enter. Even the most outstanding genius of the Chuanyun Sect had only entered the tempering realm at the age of fifteen! Only one in every ten thousand geniuses would be able to enter the refinement realm before the age of twenty! However, this little girl in front of him looked only five or six years old, yet she had already entered the tempering realm. Moreover, she had achieved this in such a small mortal town with poor resources. If she were to enter the Chuanyun Sect, she might be able to enter the refinement realm in less than three years! Then, she would only need to spend a few years to enter the core building realm. Perhaps, she might be able to form her golden core before thirty! There wasn’t a single golden core-stage expert younger than thirty in the entire Tianyun Empire! At the thought of this, Lei Jingyun was so excited that his entire body trembled. His mind painted an incomparably beautiful scene for him. He would take this girl as his disciple. As this girl’s strength increased, his status would also rise. When that time came, it might even be possible for him to become a sect elder! At this moment, Lei Jingyun looked at Wan’er like a hungry wolf looking at fresh meat. His eyes were shining brightly, filled with greed. Lei Feiche, who was at the side, also noticed that something was wrong with Lei Jingyun. “Uncle, what are you doing?” Lei Jingyun did not seem to hear him and walked straight to Wan’er. The three girls were shocked. This old man did not look like a good person. Wan’er did not hesitate and stood in front of Yan’er and Liu’er. She raised her eyebrows and shouted, “Who are you?” Lei Jingyun was stunned for a moment and realized that he had lost his composure. He quickly changed his expression and said with a smile, “I almost forgot to introduce myself.” “I’m a last stage core building cultivator, Lei Jingyun.” “What’s your name, young girl?” Last stage core building cultivator? Wan’er suddenly remembered that she had heard her father mention it before. That was a cultivation level that was two realms higher than her. Wan’er thought to herself, ‘Oh dear, this is not looking good. These two fellows shouted and insulted Dad the moment they entered. They are definitely not good people!’ “I’m not telling you. My Dad tells us not to talk to strangers!” “Haha, I’m not a stranger. From now on, I’m your master, okay?” As soon as he said that, Lei Feiche and the three girls were shocked. Lei Feiche was extremely confused. What was going on? When Li Batian saw Jiang Ping last time, his attitude changed drastically. Now that his uncle saw this girl, his attitude had also suddenly changed. He actually wanted to take her as a disciple? At this moment, Lei Feiche was about to collapse. Wan’er shook her head and said with a determined gaze. “I don’t want you to be my master!” “This is not up to you. Nothing that I set my eyes on can escape me.” Lei Jingyun smiled faintly, but his words made the girls shudder and turn pale with fright. “Run!” As soon as she said this, Wan’er immediately turned around and grabbed the hands of her two younger sisters, running backward. Lei Jingyun glanced at her disdainfully. The three girls wanted to escape from him? This was simply wishful thinking! He suddenly stretched out a skinny hand and rushed towards Wan’er. That hand moved like lightning, incomparably swift. In the next moment, he was about to grab Wan’er, but at this critical moment, his hand stopped. A handsome man suddenly appeared in front of him. The man’s face was expressionless, and his fingers were white and slender. One of his hands tightly held onto Lei Jingyun’s forearm. Lei Jingyun tried his best, but he could not break free from that palm. His heart sank. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The person who suddenly appeared was Jiang Ping. Beside him was Li Sushang. “Dad!” When the three girls were overjoyed when they saw Jiang Ping suddenly appear, and hid behind him. Jiang Ping swung his arm, and Lei Jingyun couldn’t help but stagger back a few steps. Lei Jingyun suddenly raised his head and looked at Jiang Ping with a shocked expression. However, Jiang Ping didn’t pay any attention to Lei Jingyun’s gaze. Instead, he crouched down, protecting his three daughters. Although he didn’t see what exactly happened, he saw his three girls fleeing in panic. “Dad!” The three girls hid in Jiang Ping’s embrace. “Don’t be afraid, I am here!” Jiang Ping comforted the three girls in a soft voice, and they felt a little better. “Tell me what happened, okay?” “Dad, that scoundrel wants to capture me!” Wan’er pointed at Lei Jingyun and said angrily when she heard Jiang Ping’s question. Jiang Ping understood that Lei Jingyun wanted to capture Wan’er, but he didn’t know why. Yan’er seemed to have seen through his thoughts, and her eyes immediately turned red. Her voice also sounded like she was crying. “Dad, the big bad guy wants to capture us and sell us!” Jiang Ping used to scare them by saying that if children didn’t listen, they would be captured and sold by the bad guys. In Yan’er’s eyes, this unfriendly Lei Jingyun was the big bad guy. “Dad! Boo hoo!” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Liu’er also wanted to say something. But her two sisters had already said what she wanted to say, so she could only look at Jiang Ping pitifully, her eyes sparkling with tears. It hurt Jiang Ping deeply to see his three girls in such a pitiful state. Jiang Ping said gently, “Alright. Don’t be afraid.” “I will reason with the bad guy. He won’t take you away.” “Really?” “Of course it’s true. When have I ever lied to you?” “Alright, all of you go back to your rooms to rest. I will ‘reason’ with them.” After saying that, Jiang Ping gave Li Sushang a look. Li Sushang immediately understood and hurriedly held the three girls’ hands. She smiled and said, “Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er, let’s go back first.” Wan’er’s left hand was being held, but her right hand was waving a small fist as she said fiercely, “Dad, don’t reason with them. Just punch them!” “That’s right. Beat them up!” Yan’er and Liu’er also quickly agreed. Those were bad people. What reason could bad people have? “No, I have already told you. We have to be reasonable.” “Dad, are you unable to beat them?” “Dad, don’t be afraid. I’ll give you a hug,” Liu’er said. “If you can’t beat them, then let me do it,” Wan’er said. Jiang Ping saw his daughters chattering non-stop, so he could only quickly signal Li Sushang to pull them away. After watching them leave the backyard, Jiang Ping stood up and turned around. As he turned to look at Lei Jingyun, his expression turned cold. “Who are you?” “Jiang Ping, why are you so arrogant? This is my uncle, Lei Jingyun!” Lei Feiche pointed at him and cursed. Lei Jingyun also said coldly, “You are Jiang Ping?” “That’s right, I am Jiang Ping.” Jiang Ping’s eyes swept over the two of them, and his expression became even gloomier. “The two of you barged into my mansion and even disturbed my daughters. What are you trying to do?” “What are we trying to do? Of course...;” Lei Feiche snorted, but he was interrupted by Lei Jingyun just as he opened his mouth. “I want to take in a disciple!” “Take in a disciple?” “That’s right. Your daughter is very talented. I want to take her in as my disciple.” Lei Jingyun replied calmly. However, Lei Feiche, who was beside him, was no longer calm. ‘You really want to take in a disciple? Have you forgotten why we are here? We are here today to make the Jiang family pay the price, not to poach someone else!’ Lei Feiche ridiculed Lei Jingyun in his heart. If they were not from the same family, Lei Feiche would have cursed Lei Jingyun’s ancestors! However, Lei Jingyun did not care about Lei Feiche at all. He continued, “Actually, you should feel lucky because I am here.” “Staying in such a shabby place will only be a waste of your daughter’s talent.” “But I’m a recruiter of the Chuanyun Sect. You know the Chuanyun Sect, right?” “There are several origin core experts in our sect!” “As long as your daughter follows me back to the Chuanyun Sect to cultivate for a few years, her achievements would be beyond your imagination!” Looking at the excited Lei Jingyun, Jiang Ping felt as if he was looking at a fool. ‘There are only a few origin core realms in your sect, and you still dare to boast. Wasting my daughter’s talent? You can’t even tell what kind of physique my daughter has, and you want to teach her? Don’t let her quick progress scare you to death. For your own sake, I can’t let my daughter go with you,’ Jiang Ping thought. Lei Jingyun saw that Jiang Ping didn’t say anything and thought he had relaxed. Just as he was about to strike while the iron was hot, he saw Jiang Ping shake his head. “That’s enough. My daughter will never take anyone as her teacher.” “Have you thought it through?” “Of course.” Lei Jingyun narrowed his eyes, his gaze dangerously sharp. “Then what if I have to take her away today?” Lei Jingyun’s expression suddenly became extremely malicious. A faintly discernible power slowly spread out from his body, causing the fallen leaves in the courtyard to rustle. Jiang Ping paused. From the looks of it, Lei Jingyun really wanted to make a move? “Are you being unreasonable with me? I already said that my daughter will not take you as her teacher.” “Don’t use your cultivation techniques to force us.” Lei Jingyun sneered, “Reasonable? I’ll only talk about reasonable with people of equal strength.” “Otherwise, I’ll only talk about fists.” Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows. “So you’re going to make a move?” “That’s right. I came here today to ask you for an explanation for the Lei family.” “If you agree to hand over your daughter, I’ll let you off on account of her.” “Otherwise, don’t blame me for being rude!” Jiang Ping didn’t answer and only looked at him calmly. Looking at him, Lei Jingyun thought that Jiang Ping was afraid of him, and didn’t bother with him anymore. “Humph, you’re still sensible!” Lei Jingyun snorted and then walked in the direction where Wan’er and the others had left. He imagined himself walking towards a bright future. However, Jiang Ping suddenly made a move while Lei Jingyun was living in his imagination. Jiang Ping stood in front of Lei Jingyun and muttered in a low voice, “Do you really think that you can just barge into the Jiang mansion as and when you like?” Lei Jingyun was infuriated. He shouted loudly, “You’ve stopped me time and time again. You’re really tired of living!” As his voice fell, a majestic aura surged out from Lei Jingyun’s body. In an instant, a gust of violent wind was stirred up. Lei Jingyun struck out with both his palms at the same time. They were like two bolts of lightning that suddenly struck Jiang Ping. It shook the air so much that it made a fluttering sound, and it was full of killing intent. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At this moment, Lei Feiche was extremely excited, because Lei Jingyun had finally made his move. Moreover, the strength of a core building cultivator like him was indeed worthy of his reputation. He was not the target, but the power contained within still made his heart palpitate with fear. “Brat, go and die!” Lei Jingyun roared, and his momentum became even fiercer. With this palm strike, even a huge rock weighing a thousand pounds would be shattered! Jiang Ping looked at Lei Jingyun coldly, his face expressionless. The next moment, he suddenly clenched his hand into a fist and threw a punch. Boom! The fist and palm collided with a loud shockwave. Lei Jingyun’s body shook a few times. However, Jiang Ping didn’t move at all and wasn’t affected in the slightest. Lei Jingyun took a deep breath before he calmed down and looked at Jiang Ping with a serious expression. Although that palm strike wasn’t his trump card, he had still used 80% of his strength. He didn’t expect Jiang Ping, who looked so young, to be able to take it so easily. “You have some skills.” “Very good, I can now take you as a serious opponent.” After saying that, he strengthened his momentum. Lei Jingyun’s eyes flashed with a cold glint. He pointed his finger at Jiang Ping like a sword. All the true Qi in his body instantly gathered on his two fingers. It was as if dozens of invisible swords were emerging. For a moment, the air churned and blew in all directions. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) The whole backyard was covered by the energy swords, throwing the trees, plants, tables and chairs into a mess. This was the move that Lei Jingyun was proudest of. He had faced many opponents in the core building stage before. Even those in the same realm as him could only temporarily avoid this move! Even the elders in the sect said that it was extraordinary to be able to train this move to such an extent. He was sure that this move was enough to heavily injure Jiang Ping! Jiang Ping felt the aura of this sword and frowned. In the next moment, Lei Jingyun streaked through the air like a beam of light and slammed into Jiang Ping. In response, Jiang Ping calmly struck out with his palm. This palm technique looked ordinary and unremarkable. There was nothing worthy of praise. It was as if he had casually extended his palm. Only experts above the origin core realm would be able to see that at this moment, Jiang Ping’s entire body was emitting a ray of light, and a core-shaped silhouette glistened within his body. Bang! The two of them collided. In an instant, sand and stones were sent flying, and dust flew everywhere. Lei Jingyun could not control his body as he flew backwards. Finally, he crashed into a stone table before he barely managed to stop. At this moment, Lei Jingyun could only feel his Qi and blood churning within his body, and it was extremely uncomfortable. He even found it a little difficult to speak. He raised his head to look at Jiang Ping, his eyes filled with fear. At this point, he knew that he was absolutely no match for Jiang Ping! Though Jiang Ping was just a young man in his twenties or thirties, he was actually stronger than Lei Jingyun. No wonder his daughter’s talent was so monstrous! Her father was already a freak! Lei Jingyun ridiculed him in his heart, before turning and running away. Since he knew he couldn’t beat Jiang Ping, it would be better for him to run, unless he wanted to be beaten up. Jiang Ping didn’t expect this move. He was startled for a moment before he reacted. Jiang Ping’s body instantly disappeared from his original position. Lei Jingyun hadn’t even taken two steps when he felt a tight punch on his back. He lost his footing and almost fell to the ground. “Wait!” Lei Jingyun was about to beg for mercy. But Jiang Ping didn’t give him the chance. His fists rained down madly on Lei Jingyun’s body. Although there wasn’t any true Qi attached to his blows, it still hurt Lei Jingyun. “You come and go as you please. What kind of place do you think the Jiang family is?” “How dare you be so arrogant when you’re only in the core building stage? Do you think you’re very strong?” “The Chuanyun Sect is trash, and you still want to take my daughter as a disciple?” “Who allowed you to think so highly of yourself?” With every sentence Jiang Ping said, his fists became heavier. Lei Jingyun covered his head and tried to scramble away, crying out, “Ouch, ouch.” Not far away, Lei Feiche, who was watching this, was scared stiff, trembling in place. Now he finally understood what Li Batian had said that day. ‘Li Batian, why didn’t you say it clearly? You wanted to trick me, right? I’ll teach you a lesson some other day!’ Lei Feiche thought. But on second thought, he was unsure if there was still another day. Jiang Ping was still chasing after Lei Jingyun and beating him up. Lei Jingyun was having a hard time now. He couldn’t run away or beg for mercy. When had he ever been in such a sorry state? Just as Lei Jingyun was in the depths of despair, Jiang Ping’s body suddenly froze. Then, he pulled Lei Jingyun over, and in a flash, they were both sitting in the pavilion of the Jiang Mansion. He even put an arm on Lei Jingyun’s shoulder. Lei Jingyun suddenly shivered. He was like a frightened bird now. Every time Jiang Ping touched him, he would panic. Jiang Ping said loudly, “Old Lei, do you think the view is a lot brighter after cleaning the leaves in the yard?” Lei Jingyun was dumbfounded. What was going on? Why did the topic suddenly change to the scenery? He looked up and saw that although Jiang Ping had a smile on his face, his gaze was like a knife. Lei Jingyun’s heart palpitated. He didn’t know what was Jiang Ping planning. But he knew that if he didn’t follow Jiang Ping’s words, his ending would be very miserable. He could only force out a wry smile and agree, “Yes, yes.” “Dad!” Just as he said this, he heard a few tender voices. The three girls behind him were running towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping looked at the three girls who appeared and revealed a shocked expression. “Why are you here?” “Dad, we heard a big commotion just now!” “Dad, we were worried about you!” “Dad, that’s why we ran out.” The three girls spoke rapidly and non-stop. Jiang Ping felt proud of them as they showed concern for him. “Everything is alright, I am having tea with Grandpa Lei. What’s there to worry about?” Hearing this, the three girls frowned and looked at Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun quickly squeezed out a bitter smile and nodded with an extremely humble attitude. Yan’er felt that it was strange and looked at the messy backyard. She asked again, “Then what has happened in this backyard?” Jiang Ping’s mind was racing. “Grandpa Lei helped to clean up the backyard.” “Isn’t it a lot emptier? It’s easier to bask in the sun this way!” “But the backyard is in a mess now. It’s not fun.” Yan’er pouted. She hated dirty and messy things the most. Flowers, plants, stones, and wood chips were scattered everywhere. It was so ugly! “Don’t worry. Grandpa Lei hasn’t finished taking care of it yet.” “He already said that he would only leave after he helped us take care of the backyard.” “Really?” Yan’er stared at Jiang Ping with a puzzled gaze. Jiang Ping lied, but his face was not red and his heart was not beating. “Of course! If you don’t believe me, you can ask Grandpa Lei.” Jiang Ping walked to Lei Jingyun’s side and glared at him without letting his daughters see it. He threatened with a voice that only the two of them could hear. “If you want to live, then follow my words and stay in the Jiang Mansion.” Lei Jingyun’s body suddenly trembled. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio In the backyard of the Jiang Mansion, the sun had just risen. Ever since the fight between Jiang Ping and Lei Jingyun yesterday, the backyard was still a mess. Lei Jingyun glanced at the messy backyard and couldn’t help but sigh. He was holding a broom in his left hand, and his eyes were listless. It was obvious that he hadn’t slept well. But he didn’t dare to stay in bed. As soon as dawn broke, he hurriedly got up to clean the backyard. He didn’t expect that as a recruiter of the Chuanyun Sect, he would become a handyman in the Jiang Mansion. He wanted to run, but he didn’t dare. Jiang Ping had placed a restriction on his body, and his life was in his hands. Jiang Ping even threatened him, forcing him to stay in the Jiang Mansion as a handyman for a year. At the thought of this, Lei Jingyun wanted to cry but had no tears. Jiang Ping looked harmless, but when he fought, he was extremely cruel. After his encounter with Jiang Ping, he finally understood what a wolf in sheep’s clothing was. Lei Jingyun was filled with regret again. He didn’t know what kind of sin he had committed. Originally, he had been recruiting new disciples in Fusheng City. But now? He ended up in Xiaoyu Town as a handyman. Of course, these weren’t the most important things. The most important thing was that he couldn’t understand how a remote settlement like Xiaoyu Town could house an expert like Jiang Ping. To be able to defeat him so easily, Jiang Ping must be an expert at the origin core realm or above. Such a person would be worshipped in the Chuanyun Sect. Yet, he was hiding in Xiaoyu Town for some unknown reason. For a moment, Lei Jingyun seemed to have discovered some secret, and even his breathing became a little hurried. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) In his opinion, an origin core realm expert only did things for a good reason. This was especially so for a young and powerful young man like Jiang Ping. Could it be that there was something extraordinary in Xiaoyu Town? If Jiang Ping knew what he was thinking, he would definitely feel helpless. There were indeed treasures in Xiaoyu town, and they were his three daughters. Lei Jingyun was still thinking when he suddenly heard a string of light footsteps. The sound could not escape his ears on this quiet morning. Lei Jingyun quickly found a place to hide. After all, he was not familiar with the Jiang Mansion, so it was safer to keep a low profile. Just as he hid behind the pillar, he saw a petite red figure appear in the courtyard. Lei Jingyun was stunned. Wasn’t it Jiang Wan’er? Just as he was curious, Jiang Wan’er also looked around. Seeing that there was no one in the courtyard, Wan’er chuckled a few times. Then, she took a stance and started to punch under Lei Jingyun’s gaze. This set of fist techniques was part of the “spiritual body tempering technique”. Ever since Wan’er entered the physical tempering realm, she had become more proficient. This set of fist techniques was fierce and powerful as if it was natural. Her fists were powerful, and every step created a breeze. Lei Jingyun was stunned by what he saw. As the recruiter of the Chuanyun Sect, he had many physical tempering realm disciples under him. However, those guys were far inferior to this five-or six-year-old girl. At the thought of this, Lei Jingyun was getting excited. The broom in his hand fell to the ground, making a crisp sound. In the quiet morning, this sound was very ear-piercing. Wan’er, who was practicing her fist techniques, was shocked. She quickly stopped practicing and nervously stared at the place where the sound came from. “Who’s there? Is it Dad?” The little girl’s voice was trembling as she spoke. Her little head was spinning rapidly as she thought of how to explain it to her father. “Ahem, ahem!” Lei Jingyun walked out from behind the pillar with a red face. He felt as though he was caught red-handed for doing something bad. “It’s not your father. It’s me.” Wan’er was first shocked when she saw an old man with gray hair walk out from behind the pillar. Then, she relaxed. Luckily, it wasn’t her father. Just as she began to feel relieved, Wan’er suddenly realized that something was wrong. She remembered that this old man wanted to catch her yesterday. Although he and her father seemed to get along quite well after that, this old man was still a bad person in her heart. Now, this old man was hiding in the courtyard early in the morning. She didn’t know if he was thinking of doing something bad. For a moment, Wan’er became vigilant again. She took two steps back and stared suspiciously at Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun noticed her actions and immediately realized that she had misunderstood. Just as he was thinking about how to explain his presence, Wan’er took the initiative to ask. “Old man, what are you doing here?” “Ahem.” Lei Jingyun choked at the way Wan’er addressed him. This was the first time someone dared to call him, a powerful core building cultivator, an “old man”. “I am cleaning up this dirty courtyard.” Wan’er saw that he was indeed holding a broom in his hand and didn’t doubt what he said. “Then you don’t have to wake up so early.” “I can’t sleep, so I might as well wake up earlier.” “Oh, I know. Is it like what my Dad said? When you get old, you can’t sleep?” Wan’er had a look of sudden realization. Lei Jingyun’s mouth twitched. ‘How can I be considered old when I only look 50 or 60 years old? Besides, it was your Dad who forced me to clean up the courtyard before he got up. Otherwise, who would get up earlier than a rooster?’ Lei Jingyun thought. Of course, Lei Jingyun didn’t dare to say these words. Just as Lei Jingyun was secretly complaining, Wan’er rolled her big black eyes. Suddenly, her expression became pitiful. “Old man, please don’t tell my Dad that you saw me cultivating by myself?” Lei Jingyun was puzzled when he heard the inexplicable request. ‘Why does she want to hide it while those disciples in the sect pretend to be diligent and hardworking, afraid that their elders would not notice them? Something is wrong,’ Lei Jingyun thought. “Cultivation is a good thing. Why don’t you want him to know?” “I can’t tell him!” Wan’er snorted angrily. “My Dad doesn’t allow me to practice secretly. He always says that there will be problems.” Lei Jingyun was silent for a moment, then said slowly, “Wan’er, your Dad is right.” “You are still too young, and you have just started cultivating. It is very easy for you to have problems with your own cultivation.” “But my Dad only teaches me for a short time every day, and it always ends before I can practice more.” Lei Jingyun could not help but exclaim in admiration. Amazingly, she actually complained that she did not have enough time to practice every day. For a moment, his love for talents arose. “You are still young. It’s better if you only practice for a short period of time every day. If you practice for too long, it will backfire.” “Wan’er, you have to listen to your Dad. Your Dad will not harm you.” Wan’er immediately looked at Lei Jingyun with a strange expression. ‘Why did he say the same thing as Dad?’ Wan’er thought. After a long while, Wan’er pouted and complained, “Why are you afraid of everything, just like my Dad?” “You behave like a coward. You only know how to talk.” When Lei Jingyun heard this, he almost lost his balance and fell to the ground. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Lei Jingyun wanted to ask Wan’er, “Was she serious when she said Jiang Ping was afraid of everything?” Lei Jingyun could not associate Jiang Ping with the word “afraid”. It would be great if Jiang Ping was really afraid of trouble. If he was, perhaps he would have been able to lure Jiang Wan’er back to the Chuanyun Sect. Wan’er didn’t know what he was thinking. Right now, she just wanted to hurry up and cultivate. Her father was going to get up soon. “Alright, old man, I’m going to continue cultivating. Don’t disturb me.” “Also, don’t tell my father, or I’ll beat you up.” After saying that, Wan’er pretended to be fierce and waved her small fists a few times. Lei Jingyun was amused by her actions. Wan’er ignored him and walked to one side of the yard, then she continued to cultivate the body tempering technique. Lei Jingyun shook his head with a bitter smile and then started to clean the courtyard. However, the corner of his eyes kept looking at Wan’er. He was still thinking about this little girl, so naturally, he would not let anything happen to her. So, he kept an eye on her. If there was anything wrong, he would immediately make a move. With Lei Jingyun’s efforts, the courtyard slowly became much cleaner. When the cleaning was almost done, Lei Jingyun decided to take a break. His gaze naturally fell on Wan’er. He was initially looking on with satisfaction. However, in the next moment, he was completely stunned. At first, Wan’er’s punches and palm strikes were natural and in tune with her Qi rhythm. However, her face was flushed red, and her body was emitting wisps of white smoke. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) A faintly discernible aura was emitted from her body. Lei Jingyun looked at this scene in disbelief. Body tempering was also divided into two realms, which were external tempering of the skin and flesh, and internal tempering of the tendons and bones. Wan’er’s current appearance was clearly at the stage of internal tempering of the tendons and bones. As long as she took another step forward and completed the bone tempering, her cultivation of the body tempering realm would reach completion. At that time, she would be able to cultivate the mental cultivation method for Qi refinement, and it would be just a matter of time before she reached the refinement realm! Thinking of Wan’er’s age, Lei Jingyun’s heart was in turmoil. He had underestimated Wan’er’s talent. With her talent, she might be able to enter the refinement realm in half a year. Back then, he was in his twenties before he became a refinement realm cultivator. It was really infuriating to compare himself to Wan’er! Wan’er didn’t pay attention to Lei Jingyun at all. She was focused on refining her cultivation technique and didn’t dare to be careless with any move. But soon, she also realized that something was wrong with her. She felt that her cultivating was getting smoother, as if she was about to have a breakthrough! After finishing the set of movements, Wan’er took a deep breath. The chaotic aura in her body gradually calmed down. Her aura was restrained, and it was impossible to tell that she had just achieved a breakthrough. Lei Jingyun knew that this was something that could only be achieved when one’s cultivation was very solid. Wan’er really seemed a treasure trove, constantly surprising him. It was impossible for any cultivator not to be attracted to such a treasure trove. Lei Jingyun’s brows were tightly knitted together, and his heart was extremely conflicted. Two images were interweaving in his mind. One was of Jiang Ping fiercely chasing after him and beating him up, making him look extremely miserable. The other was of Wan’er becoming the youngest origin core cultivator in the Tianyun Empire. And as Wan’er’s master, he would be honored as a distinguished guest by all the major forces. Lei Jingyun’s face changed back and forth, from livid to smug. ‘Damn it, I’m going all out!’ He hesitated for a long time and finally made up his mind. ‘I’m going all out. If I can’t use force, I can at least use a soft approach. As long as Wan’er is willing to be my disciple, I doubt Jiang Ping will object!’ Lei Jingyun thought. Lei Jingyun narrowed his eyes, and a determined light flashed in his eyes. Having made up his mind, he didn’t hesitate anymore. He had to act as soon as possible. Otherwise, when Jiang Ping woke up, this would be over. After all, he didn’t dare to fool his daughter in front of Jiang Ping. Lei Jingyun rubbed his somewhat stiff cheeks and squeezed out a smile. Then, he walked in front of Wan’er and said with a grin. “Congratulation, Wan’er! You’ve broken through again.” Wan’er’s eyes immediately lit up when she heard this. “Old man, you can tell that I’ve broken through too?” “Of course. I have this ability.” Looking at Wan’er’s expression, Lei Jingyun knew that he had spoken the right words. Sure enough, there was no one who did not like being praised. “Wan’er, do you know the different cultivation realms?” “Yes, my father said that I’m in the body tempering realm now, and the next realm is the refinement realm.” Lei Jingyun nodded. The fact that she knew the cultivation realms made it much easier for him. “Well, then do you know martial techniques?” “Martial techniques?” Wan’er stared at him with her big, curious eyes and tilted her small head in confusion. “What is a martial technique?” Looking at Wan’er, Lei Jingyun was delighted again. There was hope! However, he put on a regretful expression and said with a frown. “Alas, it’s a pity that there’s a flaw.” “Martial techniques are battle moves that are indispensable for cultivation.” “After learning martial techniques, you will become much stronger.” Lei Jingyun tried to make it as simple as possible, but Wan’er did not seem to understand. “How about this, I’ll show you.” Lei Jingyun suddenly combined his fingers into a sword, and true Qi blossomed from his fingertip. Then, he pointed at the stone pillar a few meters away. As Lei Jingyun’s fingertip shook, stone chips began to fall off the pillar. A moment later, the word “Wan’er” appeared out of thin air on the stone pillar. Wan’er’s eyes sparkled like stars when she saw this scene. “Wow! Old man, is this a martial technique?” Lei Jingyun pinched his beard and said proudly, “That’s right. This is the Luoyun sword style, the martial technique of our Chuanyun Sect.” “It uses your finger like a sword and it’s very powerful. You can carve characters in the air and hurt people at a distance!” “How about it, Wan’er? Do you want to learn it?” “Yes! I want to learn it!” Wan’er was so excited that she almost jumped up. If she could injure people at a distance, then she would use this move to beat people in the school in the future. No one would be able to find out, hehe! Lei Jingyun was very satisfied with her reaction and said with a smile. “This Luoyun sword style isn’t considered a profound martial technique.” “The Chuanyun Sect, which I’m a part of, has many more powerful martial techniques.” “Apart from that, there are also many magical treasures and people who cultivate like Wan’er.” “How about it? Wan’er, do you want to go to the Chuanyun Sect with me?” “But my father won’t let me go, and I can’t bear to part with my father.” Wan’er suddenly became a little disappointed, pouting and lowering her head. Lei Jingyun thought for a moment and said, “You’re still young. It’s normal for your father to worry about you leaving.” “But as long as you want to, I believe that your father will not stop you when you grow up.” Wan’er did not have any reaction after hearing Lei Jingyun’s words. She still lowered her head and looked disinterested. Lei Jingyun immediately became anxious. He had just seen some hope, so he could not let it go so easily. “Wan’er, how about this? I will teach you a set of martial techniques. Do you want to learn it?” “Really?” Wan’er suddenly raised her head and looked at Lei Jingyun with a smile. Her eyes were full of anticipation. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Early the next morning. Lei Jingyun was waiting in the courtyard early in the morning. “Old man, I’m here!” Suddenly, a soft cry came from behind him. Lei Jingyun hurriedly turned around. It was Wan’er. After their conversation yesterday, it was already quite late. Although Wan’er had decided to learn martial techniques from Lei Jingyun, both of them were worried that Jiang Ping would find out. Therefore, after a discussion, they decided to practice every day at this time. Lei Jingyun was overjoyed when he saw Wan’er come as promised. He believed that Wan’er would definitely be willing to take him as her master as time passed. “Old man, what martial techniques are we learning today?” Wan’er was already impatient. When she thought she could learn martial techniques today, she didn’t sleep well last night. Lei Jingyun put down the broom, pinched his beard, and said with a smile. “Today, we’re learning a palm technique called the Feiyun breaking palm.” “This palm technique has boundless magical power, but it’s also graceful and agile. It’s most suitable for female cultivators at the body tempering realm to learn.” “Yes!”  This palm technique sounded like it was tailor-made for her. “Let me demonstrate it once, then I’ll teach you.” After Lei Jingyun finished speaking, he didn’t wait for Wan’er to reply and started demonstrating it in the courtyard. This Feiyun breaking palm wasn’t complicated. Instead, it was rather beautiful. Its moves were like a cloud floating in the wind. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) From afar, it looked like an immortal dancing in the clouds. Wan’er’s eyes sparkled as she watched. She was looking forward to learning it. After Lei Jingyun finished his moves, the clouds dispersed and the wind and waves around him calmed down. “Old man, is this the Feiyun breaking palm?” Wan’er quickly ran to Lei Jingyun and looked at him eagerly. Lei Jingyun smiled and said, “Yes, this is the Feiyun breaking palm.” “From now on, I will teach you this set of martial techniques.” “Okay!” Time was tight, and Jiang Ping would wake up soon. Therefore, the two of them didn’t delay, and Lei Jingyun only demonstrated once. After a while, Lei Jingyun squinted his eyes and looked at Wan’er, who was practicing excitedly in the courtyard, and sighed in his heart. Wan’er was indeed unusual. She was able to fight well, even though he only gave her a few pointers. Dressed in red, she was like a burning cloud. She was graceful and agile yet magnificent at the same time. Her moves were natural and incomparably beautiful. She was already good even though she had only practiced for a short while. If she practiced for a little longer, she might even be able to fight better than him. For a moment, Lei Jingyun felt a little uneasy again. Time passed quickly. Three months passed by in the blink of an eye. For the past three months, Lei Jingyun had been guiding Wan’er in her cultivation every morning. Now, he had already taught her several extraordinary martial techniques of the Chuanyun Sect. But at this time, Lei Jingyun was a little depressed. Wan’er was indeed an anomaly among anomalies. In less than half a month, she would be able to completely grasp a set of martial techniques. If this continued, he would soon be teaching her all of his ultimate moves. He had originally wanted to use a few martial techniques to keep Wan’er interested. Who would have thought that her learning ability would be so strong? At this rate, before he could arouse her interest in the Chuanyun Sect, he would have nothing else to teach Wan’er. Wouldn’t that mean that his efforts would be in vain? Therefore, Lei Jingyun was feeling very conflicted recently. On one hand, the more outstanding Wan’er was, the more it meant that his judgment was right. He wanted Wan’er to become his disciple even more. But on the other hand, he felt inferior. He felt that he really wasn’t worthy to be Wan’er’s master. For the past three months, Wan’er had been practicing martial techniques with Lei Jingyun in the morning. In the afternoon, she had been practicing martial arts with her father, and her cultivation realm had steadily increased. As early as a month ago, she had completed the tempering of the tendons and bones, and now she had completed her physical tempering. She could start practicing the Qi refinement mental cultivation method and prepare to enter the Qi refinement realm. He wanted to teach Wan’er a set of mental cultivation methods for Qi refinement, but he was afraid that Jiang Ping would not allow it. However, he did not dare to ask Jiang Ping personally. During this period of time, he had been hiding from Jiang Ping whenever he could. Needless to say, he would never take the initiative to look for Jiang Ping. In fact, during this period of time, Jiang Ping had already forgotten about him. Recently, Yan’er and Liu’er both showed signs of entering the tempering realm. Therefore, Jiang Ping spent most of his time and energy on the two of them. After all, all three of them were his daughters. He didn’t want any of them to fall behind. In the training room, Jiang Ping let out a long, turbid breath and subconsciously looked into his body. There was a golden, resplendent origin core floating quietly in his body. Jiang Ping had already stepped into the advanced stage of the origin core realm. He had successfully formed a golden core. Of course, this was all thanks to the medicinal pills produced by the system. A full three months had passed before he once again received a medicinal pill reward through the sign-in. This also allowed his strength to soar to another level! “The next advancement will be the nascent soul realm.” Jiang Ping stood up and walked towards the door, muttering to himself. “Creak!” Jiang Ping slowly opened the door. Caught off guard, a petite figure threw herself into Jiang Ping’s arms. “Ouch, you hurt me!” Jiang Ping called out jokingly. With just a glance, he could tell who she was. It was his precious second daughter. Yan’er freed herself from Jiang Ping’s arms and said with a smile. “Dad, where does it hurt?” “My heart is hurt.” “You are lying. I didn’t hit your heart.” Jiang Ping chuckled. “Really. If you hurt yourself, wouldn’t my heart feel hurt?” “You’re talking nonsense, Dad!” When Yan’er heard Jiang Ping’s words, her pretty face turned red and she even stuck out her tongue. Jiang Ping was immediately amused. Yan’er’s mischievous appearance was really cute. “Yan’er, what are you doing outside the door?” “I’m waiting for you, Dad.” Yan’er blinked her big bright eyes as if she was sending a signal. Jiang Ping was stunned. His second daughter was exquisite and clear-minded, and her mind was quick. Looking at her, it seemed like she had some secret to tell. He frowned and asked, “Why? Do you have something to tell me?” When she heard this, Yan’er shook her little head and looked around. She realized that there was only herself and her father around. Then, she hurriedly waved her little hand at Jiang Ping, acting sneakily. “Dad, squat down quickly.” Jiang Ping smiled but didn’t squat down. Instead, he picked up Yan’er and held her in his arms. He said softly, “What’s wrong? Do you have some big secret to tell me?” Yan’er quickly leaned over to Jiang Ping’s ear and covered it with her little hands. She whispered, “Dad, big sister has been acting strange recently!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping looked at Yan’er with a puzzled face. “Wan’er? What’s wrong with Wan’er?” Yan’er pouted mysteriously, which made her look cute. “Dad, big sister has been getting up early these days.” “It can’t be!” Jiang Ping said subconsciously. He didn’t suspect that Yan’er was lying to him. But he woke up the three girls almost every day. And Wan’er was there every day, so he didn’t notice anything strange. “It’s true, Dad!” Yan’er saw that her father didn’t believe her, so she was a little anxious. “I discovered it by accident.” “I then secretly observed it for a few days before I found out.” “Every morning, big sister would go to the backyard to learn cultivation from Old Uncle Lei.” “Then, when you are about to wake us up, she will come back to her room to pretend to be asleep.” Jiang Ping was shocked when he heard this. There was no reason for Yan’er to lie to him. There was no need to doubt this. He also knew that Wan’er liked to cultivate. Therefore, it was not surprising that Wan’er was able to overcome her laziness and wake up early to cultivate every day. Moreover, recently, Wan’er’s progress was indeed quite fast. She was only one step away from the refinement realm. Not only that, although Wan’er was still practicing the body tempering technique, there were faint traces of martial techniques. Thinking of this, Jiang Ping immediately understood. During this period of time, Lei Jingyun had been hiding from him. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) He originally thought that it was because Lei Jingyun was afraid, but it turned out that he was taking drastic measures to deal with his situation. Jiang Ping snorted lightly and then continued to ask her questions. “Yan’er, does Auntie Sushang know about this?” Yan’er raised her small head and thought for a while before she stammered, “Auntie? I don’t think so.” Jiang Ping nodded without any doubts. Even he didn’t notice it, so how could Li Sushang know? And if she knew, she would have told him a long time ago. “By the way, Dad, I have another secret to tell you!” “Another secret? Is it related to big sister?” “Yes, Dad. I overheard it.” “Big sister is leaving home with Old Uncle Lei tonight.” After saying that, Yan’er revealed an expression as if she had discovered something big. Jiang Ping’s expression instantly darkened, and a cold glint flashed in his eyes. Lei Jingyun wanted to take his daughter away from the Jiang family. What exactly was he trying to do? Could it be that he still hadn’t given up on Wan’er? Jiang Ping snorted coldly and formulated a plan in his mind. ...; At midnight, on the west side of the Jiang Mansion. The moment he crossed this wall, he would be out of the Jiang Mansion. This was the time that Wan’er and Lei Jingyun had agreed upon. “Meow!” Suddenly, a cat’s meow came from somewhere. Then, a dog’s bark came from somewhere else. “Woof woof!” The dog’s bark seemed to be in response to the cat’s meow. A moment later, two figures jumped out from the darkness. One was petite, and the other was skinny. The petite figure was Jiang Wan’er. “Old man!” Wan’er called out excitedly. This was the first time she had sneaked out of the Jiang Mansion in the middle of the night. She actually felt very excited! “Shhh, lower your voice!” Lei Jingyun hurriedly lowered his voice and reminded her. He could feel Wan’er’s excitement. However, he was terrified. After all, if Jiang Ping found out about this, he would definitely skin him alive. “Wan’er, be careful, in case your father finds out!” At the mention of her father, Wan’er quickly covered her mouth. She looked around and realized that the surroundings were very quiet. She smiled and said, “It’s alright, old man. My father won’t find out.” “Why did you come so late? I’ve been waiting for you for two hours,” Lei Jingyun suddenly complained. Wan’er spread her hands helplessly and said, “I had no choice. My father insisted on telling us a bedtime story.” “Old man, please don’t be angry.” Lei Jingyun was about to shake his head when Wan’er exclaimed, “Old man, your face is so red.” “Are you running a fever? Are you alright?” Hearing this, Lei Jingyun felt dizzy again. He was not having a fever, instead, he was feeling embarrassed. ‘Isn’t it your fault for coming up with this way of signaling? You made me, an old man in the last stage of the core building realm, learn to bark like a dog. Only you would do this. Yet, you didn’t take it seriously and asked me if I’m feeling alright. Are you making fun of me?!’ Lei Jingyun thought to himself. Lei Jingyun really wanted to cry but he could not. The entire Jiang family made him at a loss of what to do. He glared fiercely at Wan’er before changing the topic. “Alright, hurry up and get out.” “Don’t bump into your father, or else I’ll have to suffer.” “Okay.” With this, Wan’er’s attention shifted away from Lei Jingyun’s blushing face. Then she ran to the corner of the wall and jumped a few times. She turned around and muttered, “Old man, I can’t jump over.” “This wall is too high. Why did my father build the wall so high?” Lei Jingyun now knew. Wan’er was indeed an anomaly in terms of cultivation. But in other aspects, she was still an ignorant five-or six-year-old child. In some aspects, she was even silly. Lei Jingyun sighed softly and suddenly held Wan’er’s small hand. With a leap, they flew up to the top of the wall. Then, they flew up into the sky, facing the moonlight. At the same time, Jiang Ping appeared in a flash at where they stood a few moments ago. Without saying a word, he quietly looked in the direction where Lei Jingyun and Wan’er had left. Jiang Ping was already here when they meowed like a cat and barked like a dog. Their every move, every word, and every action could not escape Jiang Ping’s eyes and ears. Jiang Ping completely believed that Wan’er’s recent changes were all related to Lei Jingyun. He did not expect this guy would not give up. He had beaten him up a few times and told him not to take his daughter as his disciple. But it seemed that he did not take Jiang Ping’s warning to heart at all. Jiang Ping’s expression became even darker. He looked pale and gloomy under the moonlight. If Lei Jingyun had seen this expression, he would have been scared to death. “You had better watch out. Don’t do anything out of line.” “Otherwise, don’t blame me for being merciless!” Jiang Ping said coldly as he glared in their direction. Then, his figure instantly disappeared from that spot. Like a shooting star streaking across the sky, he chased after Lei Jingyun and Wan’er. “Could it be that he has already reached the origin core realm?” Looking at Jiang Ping leaving, a faint voice came from the dark night. Then, a calm and elegant figure slowly walked out. It was Li Sushang! Her beautiful eyes stared in the direction where Jiang Ping had left. After a long while, she sighed softly. “Oh, Wan’er.” Li Sushang shook her head. In the end, she had nothing to say. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Late at night, outside of Xiaoyu Town. This was a world of cultivation. It was also a world where demonic beasts ran rampant. Although there weren’t any powerful demonic beasts in the outskirts of Xiaoyu Town, there were quite a few fierce beasts. At this moment, there was a hungry wolf opposite Wan’er. The wolf’s eyes emitted a dark green light as it stared at Wan’er. Its huge mouth was creepy. Under the moonlight, its two fangs were like two sharp blades. However, Wan’er was not afraid at all. In front of a 200-pound hungry wolf, she looked like she could swallow it in one bite. The corners of her mouth curled up slightly, and her eyes were filled with anticipation. Meanwhile, Chief Lei was quietly stroking his beard and watching the confrontation. After half a month of observation, he was certain that Wan’er’s current strength was enough to defeat a hungry adult wolf! Therefore, he took the initiative to bring Wan’er out. On the surface, it was to test Wan’er’s strength. But the real reason was to let Wan’er experience the power of martial techniques. “Awoo! Awoo!” Just as he was thinking, the hungry wolf launched an attack. Lei Jingyun quickly came back to his senses and stared at the battlefield warily. He saw the hungry wolf suddenly rise into the air, open its bloody mouth, and pounce on Wan’er. Wan’er quivered, stomped on the ground, and quickly dodged to the side. The hungry wolf missed and turned around. Its face became even more furious and ferocious. With a swipe of its claws, it leaped up again. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Wan’er’s gaze focused, and she confronted the hungry wolf face to face. Just as the hungry wolf was about to pounce on her head, Wan’er suddenly bent backward. Then, she took the opportunity to strike out with both her hands. She shouted in a delicate voice, “Feiyun breaking palm!” A strong wind suddenly rose up and swept towards the hungry wolf. The hungry wolf did not have the time to react at all. Its stomach was hit by the palm. In an instant, the hungry wolf suddenly flipped a few times in the air and fell backward, as though it had been hit by a small mountain. Finally, it crashed hard on the ground, and a cloud of dust rose up. Two streams of blood flowed out of the corner of the hungry wolf’s mouth, and it howled a few times. Under the gaze of Wan’er and Lei Jingyun, it was completely unable to move. “Yeah! I got it!” Wan’er saw this and quickly jumped in front of Lei Jingyun. She clenched her small fists and smiled widely. “Old man, I got the hungry wolf!” she exclaimed in excitement. Lei Jingyun pinched his beard and smiled. “Well, you’re really amazing. You beat the hungry wolf in one move.” “Of course! I am my father’s daughter, Yan’er and Liu’er’s elder sister!” Wan’er felt proud when she heard Lei Jingyun’s praise, and her chin was raised high. Lei Jingyun quickly said, “Wan’er, do you know why you could win so easily?” “Of course, I know, because I am very strong.” “Correct, you’re very strong, but...;” Lei Jingyun deliberately paused to catch Wan’er’s attention. “But what?” Wan’er fell for it and asked anxiously. Lei Jingyun laughed again and said. “But if you didn’t learn the martial techniques, you could not have won so easily.” Wan’er nodded her head when she heard what Lei Jingyun said. Pleased with himself, Lei Jingyun continued to speak. “This is why martial techniques are very important. It’s a pity that you won’t be able to learn any martial techniques in the Jiang family.” “However, if you come to our Chuanyun Sect, you will be able to learn many more powerful martial techniques.” “So, Wan’er, you should...;” Lei Jingyun was still talking to himself when he suddenly noticed that Wan’er’s expression didn’t seem quite right. Her small head was almost buried in her chest, and her small hands were uneasily twisted together. Lei Jingyun hurriedly asked with concern, “Wan’er, why are you...;” “What should Wan’er do? Continue talking.” Before he could finish his words, he heard a familiar and cold voice coming from behind him. Lei Jingyun’s body immediately shivered. His face turned deathly pale, and his entire body was covered in a cold sweat. The fear of this voice had already been carved into his bones. “Dad!” Wan’er saw Lei Jingyun’s reaction and felt a little sorry for him. She immediately opened her mouth and wanted to defend herself. However, she was interrupted by Jiang Ping. “Wan’er, come here!” Jiang Ping shouted sternly. Wan’er immediately trembled with fear. Jiang Ping rarely spoke to his daughters in such a tone unless they really made him angry. Wan’er didn’t dare to defend herself anymore, so she walked silently to Jiang Ping’s side, without saying a word. Lei Jingyun also slowly turned around, met Jiang Ping’s stern gaze, and subconsciously swallowed. “So this is what you’re trying to do!” Jiang Ping snorted, and his eyes revealed a cold glint. Being swept by Jiang Ping’s gaze, Lei Jingyun instantly felt as if he had fallen into an ice cave. He didn’t dare to look at Jiang Ping, but he could still feel the killing intent in his eyes. It was like a bucket of cold water poured on his head, causing him to instantly react. What happened tonight had already crossed Jiang Ping’s bottom line! He was too anxious to act, and now he had angered Jiang Ping instead. “I don’t think you have anything to say in defense of this.” “I...;” Lei Jingyun wanted to say something, but Jiang Ping didn’t give him the chance at all. “You want to abduct Wan’er. That’s not very good.” As soon as these words were said, Lei Jingyun and Wan’er’s expressions changed at the same time. Wan’er spread her arms and stood in front of Jiang Ping and Lei Jingyun. She said anxiously, “Dad, he is not kidnapping me.” “He was just teaching me martial techniques.” Jiang Ping looked at Wan’er and really felt like scolding her. But in the end, he couldn’t make up his mind and just sighed. His gaze became gentler than the moonlight. “Wan’er, there are many bad people in this world.” “Moreover, some bad people look like good people. You must not be deceived by them.” “That won’t happen. I can tell the difference between a bad person and a good person.” Wan’er shook her head, her gaze firm. “I believe that he is a good person. He just wants to teach me martial techniques.” Lei Jingyun, who was behind Wan’er, instantly flushed red when he heard this. He did have his own intentions when he taught Wan’er martial techniques, but he did not expect Wan’er to protect him so much. For a moment, his face flushed red. Jiang Ping was also stunned. Wan’er was actually so determined to protect Lei Jingyun? Although Wan’er was only a child, she should be able to sense who treated her well. Jiang Ping sighed inwardly. His gaze swept over Lei Jingyun again. He said indifferently, “Wan’er, I’m not going to do anything to him.” “It’s just that I received a message from the patriarch of the Lei family. Chief Lei still has some important matters to take care of at home.” “Therefore, Chief Lei won’t be able to teach you martial techniques in the future.” Lei Jingyun and Wan’er’s bodies paused when they heard this. “Old man, is this true?” Wan’er turned around and asked Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun raised his head and could see Jiang Ping’s deep gaze. He immediately understood what Jiang Ping meant. He was afraid of Jiang Ping from the bottom of his heart. He could only force out a bitter smile and say, “Yes, I am going home.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio A few days later, inside the Jiang Mansion’s training room. Jiang Ping was meditating and cultivating. Now, he had successfully formed a golden core. After a few days of cultivation, his realm was now more and more stable. He was only one step away from completing the origin core realm. At this moment, five colored mystic lights were slowly flowing through the spirit lake in Jiang Ping’s internal Qi field. The five mystic lights were green liver wood, red heart fire, white lung gold, black kidney water, and yellow spleen earth, the five great sources of Qi. The five sources of Qi were like vortexes, tightly surrounding the golden origin core in his body. As time slowly passed, wisps of smoke began to rise from Jiang Ping’s body in spirals. Jiang Ping’s body also became more and more transparent. The golden core in his body was clearly visible, as if it had wrapped his entire body in golden light. The golden core was originally only the size of a bead. But after one night of meditation, the size of the golden core also began to expand. Countless streams of light flowed from Jiang Ping’s limbs and bones into the golden core. Like a hundred rivers flowing into the sea, the golden core slowly expanded. Only when it expanded by a full circle did it show signs of stopping. At the same time, the color of the golden core also became more solid. The light it emitted also became more resplendent. Jiang Ping’s entire body was bathed in its brilliant golden light. He let out a long breath and slowly opened his eyes. It looked like there were stars flickering within his pupils. Jiang Ping lightly sighed and said slowly, “With my current rate of cultivation, it’s only a matter of time before I reach the peak of the origin core realm.” “My current strength is enough to deal with all kinds of troubles within the boundary of Fusheng City.” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “However, I have to break through to the nascent soul realm as soon as possible.” The origin core realm was already extremely rare. But in some larger sects, such as Lei Jingyun’s Chuanyun Sect, there might be several origin core experts. That night, Lei Jingyun left the Jiang family. As for where he went, Jiang Ping didn’t care. If it wasn’t because he didn’t want Wan’er to feel sad, Jiang Ping wouldn’t have let Lei Jingyun leave alive, because he could expose Wan’er’s existence at any time. “Sigh, I hope he won’t do such a stupid thing. Otherwise, he can’t blame me.” Jiang Ping clenched his fists. A warm feeling instantly gushed out from the golden core in his body. Like a hot spring, it nourished his limbs, bones, and the major acupoints all over his body. In an instant, his whole body was full of strength, and he felt like he only needed one punch to destroy this training room. Of course, this was only a small interlude. Jiang Ping’s mind was now focused on how to improve his strength. Only by improving his strength could he protect the three girls better. “That reminds me, I haven’t signed in yet.” He had been meditating since last night, so he hadn’t had time to sign in yet. “I hope the reward is something useful today.” Jiang Ping murmured as a thought appeared in his mind. A transparent virtual interface popped out. Jiang Ping pointed his finger in the air, and the entire interface suddenly burst out with a blue light. The sudden change made Jiang Ping instantly nervous. Usually, the light was much less bright when he signed in. It seemed that today’s reward would be something good, but what would it be? For a moment, Jiang Ping’s heart beat faster. He stared at the blue light with anticipation. After a moment, the light gradually dissipated. Then, a treasure plate quietly floated in mid-air. With a gentle wave of his hand, the treasure plate steadily landed in Jiang Ping’s hand. Jiang Ping held the treasure plate and carefully examined it for a while. The treasure plate was octagonal in shape, representing eight different directions. There was a transparent circle in the middle of the treasure plate. If one looked carefully, it looked like there was a galaxy flowing within it. Just as Jiang Ping was feeling puzzled, the system interface refreshed once again. Without a doubt, it was the description of this treasure plate. [Heavenly treasure concealment plate: a top-grade spiritual artifact. When one infuses true Qi into it, one can cast a formation. The divine concealment formation can block heavenly secrets, prevent spying, conceal one’s aura, and also has a defensive effect.] Jiang Ping looked at the description on the panel and could not help but be stunned for a moment. He had some understanding of artifacts. Artifacts were divided into four classes. From low to high, they were magical artifacts, spiritual artifacts, immortal artifacts, and divine artifacts. Each class was divided into four sub-classes: low, medium, high, and top-grade. Artifacts were extremely rare. They were at least as rare as those pills that could forcibly upgrade the user’s strength. Ordinary magical artifacts were already very rare. As for spiritual artifacts, that was something that nascent soul realm experts yearned for, Furthermore, this heavenly treasure concealment plate was a top-grade spiritual artifact! But what made Jiang Ping the most excited was the function of this spiritual artifact. It blocked heavenly secrets, concealed one’s aura, and also had a defensive function. This was simply a perfect artifact that was tailor-made for him! As long as he activated the artifact in the Jiang Mansion, he could avoid being spied on by those who had evil intentions. In this way, it would save him a lot of trouble. Most importantly, the three girls would also be much safer. Jiang Ping became very excited when he thought of it. In his heart, nothing was more important than the safety of his daughters. “Dong dong dong!” Just as Jiang Ping was about to try out the heavenly treasure concealment plate’s divine ability...; A series of hurried knocks sounded on the door. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but frown. He had already instructed that no one was allowed to go near the training room without his permission. Of course, the three girls were the exception. Therefore, unless there was an urgent matter, no one would knock on the door of the training room. “Could it be that something urgent has happened?” Jiang Ping’s heart sank. He flipped his palm and put away the heavenly treasure concealment plate. Then, he hurriedly stood up and opened the door. “Greetings, Patriarch!” The moment the door opened, a woman in a pink dress came into view. Jiang Ping’s heart suddenly panicked. This maid was Wan’er’s personal maid, Cai Rou. “Why are you here? What happened to Wan’er?” “Master, something happened to Miss Wan’er!” Cai Rou’s face was very anxious as she replied nervously. “Something happened? Did she fight with someone again?” “No, Miss Wan’er is missing!” “Missing? What happened? Tell me clearly.” Jiang Ping immediately became nervous. Countless thoughts flashed through his mind. Could it be that Lei Jingyun abducted Wan’er? At the thought of this, Jiang Ping’s expression became even uglier. Cai Rou was so frightened that she quickly spilled the beans. “Miss Wan’er has run away from home!” “Just now, Cai Die and I went to help the young ladies get out of bed and ready for the day.” “But when we entered the room, we discovered that Miss Wan’er had already disappeared.” “We also found a letter with Miss Wan’er’s name written on it.” “Where is the letter?” Jiang Ping scared Cai Rou when he suddenly shouted. “I have given the letter to Butler Li.” “Butler Li and the two young ladies are in the backyard.” When he heard that, Jiang Ping didn’t delay any further. He rushed to the backyard. Cai Rou also quickly followed. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio In a pavilion in the backyard of the Jiang Mansion. Li Sushang was sitting upright with a letter in her hand. Beside her were Yan’er and Liu’er. The three of them looked a little upset. Li Sushang’s eyes were a little blurry. Yan’er and Liu’er were not as lively as they usually were. “Yan’er, Liu’er!” Jiang Ping’s magnetic voice suddenly sounded. Yan’er and Liu’er, whose heads were lying on the table, instantly bounced up. “Dad!” The two girls shouted in unison and they ran toward Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping squatted down, and the two girls jumped into his arms.  “Dad!” Liu’er used her head to rub against Jiang Ping’s shoulder. Then, with a pair of sparkling, big black eyes, she stared at Jiang Ping and said pitifully, “Dad, big sister doesn’t want us anymore.” Jiang Ping wanted to kiss her face when he saw her cute look. However, he was worried about Wan’er and felt a little uncomfortable when he heard what Liu’er said. He forced a smile and said, “Liu’er, don’t think too much. Why would big sister not want us?” “As long as you’re obedient, big sister will like you. Are you obedient, Liu’er?” “I am obedient! I like big sister too. Dad, can you get big sister to come back?” When Jiang Ping heard this, he laughed from the bottom of his heart. Just as he was about to talk, Yan’er spoke up. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “Hmph, big sister was kidnapped by that scoundrel!” Yan’er pouted and said with a dissatisfied face. Liu’er’s face instantly turned pale as she muttered. “No, it’s not true!” “Humph, that’s right. She must have been kidnapped by that Old Uncle Lei.” Yan’er didn’t know exactly what happened that night. She was quick-witted to realize that something was not right. Alhough Jiang Ping told them the next day that Lei Jingyun had left because something had happened at his home, she noticed that Wan’er was acting a little strangely these two days. Moreover, Wan’er ran away from home today. It was natural that she associated this with Lei Jingyun. Jiang Ping was a little surprised when he heard her words. Because his first reaction was the same as Yan’er’s. But Yan’er was only a five or six-year-old little girl. As expected, his own daughter was very precocious. Jiang Ping sighed and said with a smile, “Alright, Yan’er, Liu’er, don’t worry about it.” “I will find your sister and bring her back.” As Jiang Ping said that, he walked into the pavilion. After putting the two girls down, Jiang Ping took the envelope from Li Sushang. There were a few big words written on the envelope, addressing it to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping tore open the seal and took out the letter. There were a few lines of crooked, messy handwriting on the letter. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but secretly complain about his daughter’s handwriting. It was really a waste of time! Li Sushang looked at Jiang Ping’s furrowed brows and panicked. “What’s wrong? Is Wan’er in danger?” “Don’t just read it yourself. Tell me about it too!” Li Sushang was really worried about Wan’er. In a moment of desperation, she had forgotten about her manners. When Jiang Ping heard what Li Sushang said, he handed the letter to her. He heaved a sigh of relief and said, “It’s not a big deal. Wan’er just feels that she has become stronger.” “So, she plans to go to the demonic wolf mountain range to temper herself.” “She also said in her letter that we don’t need to worry too much.” “How can we not worry? She is just a little girl.” Li Sushang felt anxious and uneasy. “This girl is too much. How can she...;” “It’s alright. There are only ordinary beasts at the demonic wolf mountain range. They can’t hurt Wan’er at all.” “But I still have to make a trip personally to bring Wan’er back safely.” Jiang Ping sighed and said slowly. “While I’m away, I’ll leave Yan’er and Liu’er to you.” “Don’t worry, I’ll take good care of them.” Li Sushang felt much more at ease after hearing Jiang Ping’s words. Then, she ridiculed Jiang Ping playfully. “But you’re really too much. You even deliberately made that expression to scare me just now.” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment before he realized what she meant. He smiled and said, “You’ll know why I’m frowning after you read Wan’er’s letter.” Li Sushang quickly opened the letter, and her face instantly fell. ‘Damn! Why is Wan’er’s handwriting getting from bad to worse?’ Li Sushang thought. ...; Demonic wolf mountain range. The mountain range spanned over two hundred miles. The ancient trees on the mountain were verdant and lush. It was a beautiful and vibrant place. But everyone nearby knew that it was only beautiful and vibrant in appearance. In reality, the demonic wolf mountain range was fraught with danger, and every step was frightening. Every nook and cranny was filled with ferocious beasts that were desperate for food. If an ordinary person were to rashly enter the demonic wolf mountain range, they would definitely end up as a corpse. Moreover, there were rumors that there was a demon wolf in the depths of the demonic wolf mountain range. It was not an ordinary beast. It was a demon beast that could kill cultivators! The nearby villages had also organized hunting teams to go deep into the demonic wolf mountain range. In the end, they never came back, and no one knew if they were alive or dead. The rumors of the demon wolf in the depths of the demonic wolf mountain range were deeply rooted in people’s hearts. Now, no one in the vicinity dared to go deep into it. However, the danger was bound to be accompanied by opportunity. Although the demonic wolf mountain range was dangerous, it also had many valuable things. In the outer area of the mountain range, there were still many people hunting for treasures. Jiang Wan’er followed a team from Xiaoyu Town there. They wanted to go to the outer area of the demonic wolf mountain range to collect herbs. However, upon arriving at the demonic wolf mountain range, Wan’er expressed her gratitude, and then she sneaked into the mountain alone. At this moment, a petite figure was walking through the dense forest alone. Wan’er was still dressed in her bright red clothes. She even had a dagger with her. She looked around and carefully walked forward while mumbling to herself. “Don’t be afraid. You can do it.” “You can kill a wolf with one palm and a tiger with one punch!” “You can’t be afraid. Otherwise, you won’t be able to increase your strength.” “If you’re afraid, you won’t be able to protect your father and sisters.” “If there are bad people in the future, we’ll see if we can reason it out with them.” “If they’re as reasonable as that old man, we’ll let my father reason with them.” “If they’re unreasonable, I’ll use fists to talk to them!” Wan’er kept cheering herself on. Although she was very confident in her ability, this was, after all, the first time she went out alone. She couldn’t help but feel afraid in this demonic wolf mountain range that was filled with fierce beasts. “Roar!” Just as Wan’er was cheering herself on, the forest suddenly began to shake. A thunderous tiger’s roar came from afar. The roar shook the trees all over the mountain. Wan’er suddenly shivered and looked in the direction of the sound. Two conflicting expressions appeared in her eyes. “Hmph, who’s afraid of who!” “Even if you’re a big tiger, I’ll beat you into a pulp!” After a long while, Wan’er finally made a decision. Didn’t she come to the demonic wolf mountain range to train herself? She was her father’s eldest daughter. She would not disgrace her father! Wan’er clenched her fists and walked towards the direction of the tiger’s roar. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Somewhere in the demonic wolf mountain range. “Roar!” A large striped tiger suddenly roared. Its bloody mouth and dozens of sharp teeth gleamed. Not far in front of it, there were a few helpless and pitiful deer fawns huddled together, their eyes filled with fear. Those spotted deer fawns were just a few months old. How could they fight against an adult tiger? “Roar!” The tiger let out another roar. The fawns in front of them immediately trembled in fear at the deafening roar. The fawns sat on the ground, tears flowing from the corners of their eyes. They even let out mournful cries. The tiger suddenly opened its bloody mouth and pounced on the fawns, as if it wanted to swallow the fawns in one bite. The fawns’ legs were so weak that they could not stand up. They could only silently accept their fate. However, at this critical moment, a fiery-red petite figure suddenly jumped out from the bushes and crashed into the tiger. The tiger fell to the side like a thrown sandbag as it was hit. It fiercely crashed into a tree, and it even let out a wail. This fiery red figure was Wan’er. Wan’er stood proudly in front of the fawns. She glanced at the pitiful fawns behind her, and immediately pouted before she turned to the tiger and said, “Hey, big kitty, it’s not right to bully the weak.” “If you know what’s good for you, then leave quickly. Otherwise, don’t blame me for taking action!” Wan’er clenched her small fists and fiercely waved them at the tiger. Only then did the tiger clearly see the person who bumped into it. In the next moment, it immediately became furious. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) A tiny human cub actually dared to take action against it? Moreover, it even acted as if it was giving the tiger an order. How could the king of all beasts endure this? “Roar! Roar!” The tiger roared twice. The loud sound could be heard clearly even from a mile away. The nearby trees were shaken so much that they swayed and leaves fell from their branches. “Don’t be afraid, I’m here!” Wan’er looked at the fawns that were trembling in fear and said softly. Then she pointed her finger at the tiger and scolded, “Stop shouting. It’s too noisy. If you keep shouting, I’ll beat you until you cry!” Before Wan’er could finish her words, the tiger stopped roaring, only to kick its four limbs against the ground and jump up. Like a mottled meteorite falling from the sky, it smashed towards Wan’er. Wan’er was shocked for a moment but quickly calmed down, staring at the tiger in the sky. The tiger’s sharp claws suddenly swiped down towards Wan’er’s head. At this moment, Wan’er moved. She suddenly stretched out her two small fists and met the tiger’s paws. Wan’er’s hands were tiny compared to the tiger’s thick paws. However, the moment they met, the tiger suddenly felt a huge force coming from Wan’er’s hands. In an instant, all the bones in its body went soft, and the Qi and blood in its body surged wildly. Its entire body was sent flying, slamming into a tree and snapping it in two. “Howl!” The tiger that fell to the ground let out a shrill scream. Fresh blood slowly flowed out from the corner of its mouth and onto the ground. It stared at Wan’er with fear in its eyes. A wave of fear rose from the bottom of its heart, threatening to drown it. Out of animal instinct, it felt the threat of death from Wan ‘Er. “Big kitty, I’m going to beat you until you cry!” Wan’er pouted angrily and walked towards the tiger. This big kitty was fierce and aggressive. Not only did it want to scare people, but it also wanted to eat these pitiful deer fawns. It was simply too detestable! When the tiger saw Wan’er’s furious look, it was instantly shocked and all the hair on its body stood up. With a whimper, it turned around and ran away frantically with its tail between its legs. Wan’er was stunned by what she saw. Who would have thought that this tiger wanted to fight her just a moment ago? After being hit twice by Wan’er, it had become soft and fluffy. At the same time, in the sky. Jiang Ping was hiding in the dark and watching everything that happened. In fact, he had found Wan’er a long time ago. He originally wanted to show himself and bring Wan’er home. But in the end, he hesitated for a while. He didn’t expect that this hesitation would give Wan’er a chance to show off. In fact, this was also a good thing for Wan’er. It could temper her courage and increase her strength. Rather than putting in all his effort to protect them, it would be better to help them improve as soon as possible. In particular, Wan’er’s performance just now had indeed made him very satisfied. Therefore, he did not plan to forcefully stop Wan’er’s training. “However, there are still some hidden dangers.” Jiang Ping suddenly raised his head and looked into the depths of the demonic wolf mountain range. A dangerous light flashed in his eyes. Then he flew into the depths. ...; In the depths of the demonic wolf mountain range. This place was quite different from the outer areas of the mountain range. There were dead trees and rocks everywhere, and many skeletons could be seen everywhere. A snow-white demonic wolf was lying on a huge smooth rock in its center with its eyes closed. The bright sunlight shone on its body, making the snow-white wolf’s fur shimmer like crystals. If one listened carefully, one could still hear faint snoring sounds. It was a quiet and peaceful scene. Suddenly, the demonic wolf’s fur stood up, and its dark green eyes suddenly opened. A human figure floating in the air was reflected in the demonic wolf’s eyes. “Refinement realm? It should be able to understand human language.” This human was naturally Jiang Ping. He carefully sized up the demon wolf and muttered. “Don’t be nervous, I just want to discuss a small matter with you.” Jiang Ping looked at the demon wolf’s extremely vigilant expression and smiled. However, the demon wolf did not pay attention to what he said. Instead, it seemed like it was preparing to attack. Jiang Ping could not help but frown. He did not make any offensive actions, but the demon wolf still looked at him with extreme vigilance. This put him in a dilemma. What could he do to make the demon wolf stay here obediently? Just as Jiang Ping was pondering, the demon wolf suddenly launched an attack. Two sharp claws suddenly swept through the air and pounced directly at Jiang Ping. The snow-white figure shone under the sunlight. Jiang Ping could only sigh helplessly when he saw this scene. “Sigh, why can’t we discuss it properly?” He only wanted this demon wolf to stay here quietly for a few days and not run around. Was this an excessive request? Why did it have to attack for no reason? Jiang Ping was puzzled as he slowly extended his right hand. A moment later, a tragic howl suddenly came from deep in the forest. It scared the nearby beasts so much that they all shuddered and began to flee frantically. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The wailing in the depths of the mountain rang out for a long time before it stopped. Jiang Ping floated expressionlessly in the air, his feet three feet above the ground. A huge demon wolf was quietly crawling in front of him. The demon wolf’s fur was no longer as white and shiny as before. Instead, it was a mess, mixed with blood and dust. It curled up into a ball and looked at Jiang Ping with fear in its eyes, and even let out a miserable howl. However, every time it cried out, it felt as if its body was about to fall apart. Jiang Ping looked at the shivering demon wolf and shook his head helplessly. “I told you not to make a move. If you have something to say, we can talk it out. Look at you, you just won’t listen.” Jiang Ping muttered to himself and said in a low voice. The demon wolf couldn’t figure out Jiang Ping’s plan at all. It subconsciously took a few steps back, trying to increase the distance between Jiang Ping and itself. Jiang Ping knew that the demon wolf was really afraid of him, so he didn’t continue to attack it. Instead, he said in a commanding tone, “Stay here for the next few days. You can’t take even a step out of this place.” “And don’t hurt humans, especially children. Do you understand?” The demon wolf nodded frantically when it heard what Jiang Ping said. He acted as if he didn’t dare to disobey. Jiang Ping laughed out loud. “So you can understand human language.” “Then why did you have to fight just now?” “Do you have to be beaten up to learn a lesson?” The demon wolf didn’t dare to reply. With a howl, it buried its head. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but sigh. He clearly wanted to be a reasonable person. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) But why did he keep meeting people, as well as demon beasts, who wanted to attack him? He really couldn’t understand! Seeing that the matter had been settled, Jiang Ping didn’t delay any further. His figure turned into a streak of light and flew towards Wan’er. ...; Three days later. In the middle of the demonic wolf mountain range. This was the area where the fiercest beasts lived. The outer area of the mountain range was very dangerous as there were many human hunting squads. The depths of the mountain range were the habitat of the demon wolf, which was a forbidden area for the fierce beasts. So, a large number of fierce beasts gathered in the middle of the mountain range. At this moment, a gray wolf was wandering under a fruit tree. Suddenly, it fiercely knocked against the fruit tree. Immediately, it saw stars and felt dizzy. But several fruits also fell from the tree. The gray wolf paused for a long time before it recovered. Then, it picked up the fruits on the ground and ate them one by one. From time to time, it even squeezed out a bitter expression. At this moment, there was a sudden sound from the bushes behind him. The vigilant gray wolf quickly turned around and stared nervously at the bushes. In the next moment, a huge yellow figure jumped out from the bushes. It was a tiger! However, when the gray wolf saw the tiger, it was relaxed and was not afraid at all. The two fierce beasts approached each other and rubbed their heads together. They looked like two old friends. “Howl!” “Howl!” The two different beasts let out their own howls at the same time. If one could understand what they were saying, they might sympathize with their suffering. They asked each other the number of days they had been vegetarian. As carnivores, the demonic wolf mountain range was their paradise, because this was a place where the strong preyed on the weak. Elk, wild boar, rabbits, and so on were all their prey. But since the little human demon king came to the demonic wolf mountain range, everything had changed. They could no longer eat meat. If they dared to hunt smaller animals and came across the little demon king, they would be beaten up. The wounds on their bodies still had not recovered. The gray wolf’s tail had been chopped off, and the tiger’s two front legs were still unable to exert strength. In short, the surrounding area had become the territory of the little demon king. But the strange thing was, the demon wolf in the depths, who was the mountain lord, did not have any reaction. They could only obediently accept the persecution of the little human demon king. The two fierce beasts that were once awe-inspiring could only hide and eat fruits now. All they could do was lick each other’s wounds. How pitiful! The two fierce beasts wanted to complain a little more, but suddenly they saw a fiery red figure. Their entire bodies began to tremble violently, and they did not dare to make a single sound. Because that terrifying figure was already ingrained in their minds, and they could not get rid of it! Wan’er came out from the forest and saw the two beasts. However, she only took a casual glance and then raised her head. Looking at the big red fruit on the tree, she couldn’t help but lick her lips. She suddenly stretched out her palm and slapped the tree trunk. The fruit tree shook in an instant, and a few big fruits immediately fell down and were caught by Wan’er. Wan’er wiped the skin of the fruit with her sleeve, then put it to her mouth and took a bite. In an instant, a sour and astringent taste blossomed in her taste buds. The gray wolf and the tiger watched this scene in horror. They felt uncomfortable, as they were on a barbeque. They didn’t dare to leave without the permission of this little demon king. But they didn’t dare to stay here any longer. Maybe this little demon king would suddenly punch them and would make them suffer. But Wan’er didn’t care about them at all. Instead, she ate the fruit in her hand expressionlessly and looked into the distance calmly. Only three days had passed, but Wan’er’s appearance had changed. The liveliness on her face had disappeared, and she was now beginning to look mature. Wan’er took a few bites and suddenly stopped. She had been eating wild fruits for the past few days. But most of the wild fruits were sour and astringent. She could only take a few bites. These days, she had not eaten her fill at all. Although there were many small animals in the mountains, she could not bear to kill them. On the contrary, she tried her best to protect all kinds of weak animals from falling into the mouths of fierce beasts. She had also beaten up many wild beasts, such as the gray wolf and the tiger. At first, she was quite excited, but as time passed, that excitement faded away. Now, it was replaced by depression, boredom, and longing. After all, there used to be delicious food at home every day. Sometimes, her father would personally cook and make things that she had never eaten before. But now, it was different. She could only eat sour wild fruits every day. “Dad, Yan’er, Liu’er, Auntie Sushang!” “I really want to eat Dad’s cream cake!” Wan’er suddenly threw away the fruit and sobbed. She had just finished speaking when a familiar voice came from the forest. “Do you now understand how hard it is to cultivate, Wan’er?” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Wan’er instantly trembled. It was like an electric current flowing through her entire body. This voice was really too familiar to her. Wasn’t this the most beautiful voice she had ever heard? Wan’er suddenly turned her head around. She saw the figure that she dreamed of every night. At this moment, a faint smile hung on Jiang Ping’s face. In Wan’er’s eyes, this look was as sweet as honey. “Dad!” Wan’er smiled brightly. Then, she pounced on Jiang Ping, surprised to see him. Jiang Ping bent down and pulled her into his arms. “Dad, I miss you so much.” Wan’er wrapped her arms around Jiang Ping’s neck and hung it on his body. This was very comfortable. It was her favourite feeling. Jiang Ping looked at Wan’er lovingly and then reached out to help her tidy up her messy hair. He said gently, “I miss you too.” “I’m not the only one who misses you, Wan’er. Auntie Sushang, Yan’er, and Liu’er all miss you.” Wan’er’s heart skipped a beat when she heard what Jiang Ping said. The pleasant surprise in her heart faded in an instant, and she began to feel a little afraid again. She said to Jiang Ping with utmost sincerity, “Dad, I really miss them too!” “Oh right, Dad, why are you here?” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Wan’er quickly changed the topic. Speaking of this, Jiang Ping suddenly put on a straight face and pretended to be angry. He snorted and said, “You still have the nerve to say it!” “I don’t know which little bastard left a letter and ran away from home.” “She made everyone in the family worried about her, making everyone unable to eat or sleep well.” “Most importantly, that little bastard’s handwriting is so ugly.” Wan’er was at first worried that her father would be angry. Moreover, she felt unable to face her sisters and Auntie Sushang. But after hearing Jiang Ping’s last sentence, she knew that her father wasn’t really angry. So, she hugged Jiang Ping’s neck and swayed like she was on a swing. “Dad, my handwriting isn’t ugly, ” she said in a cute voice. “The teachers in the school say that my handwriting is getting better and better.” “Really?” Jiang Ping gave her an expression that said, “Don’t lie to me.”. Wan’er’s pretty face turned red. She raised her head and puffed out her chest and said, “It’s true. I won’t lie to you.” “Then your teacher’s eyes are getting worse and worse!” As Jiang Ping said that, he suddenly laughed. Wan’er also laughed coquettishly. The boredom and homesickness that she had suffered for the past few days seemed to have disappeared in an instant. Jiang Ping saw that Wan’er’s mood had improved a little, so he returned to the main topic. Narrowing his eyes, he asked, “Wan’er, what do you think of the past few days’ experience?” “Of course it’s great!” Speaking of this, Wan’er became excited again. She jumped to the ground and began to gesture with her hands and feet. “Dad, I have been eliminating the strong and helping the weak in the past two days.” “I have protected many weak animals in the mountain range, and even fought off many hateful fierce beasts.” “Now, everyone is amiable and friendly. They get along well with each other and do not invade each other.” “Dad, do you think I am awesome?” Jiang Ping nodded and then shook his head helplessly. Wan’er thought that her father did not believe her and immediately became a little anxious. She quickly pointed at the tiger and the gray wolf and said, “Dad, what I said is true.” “If you don’t believe me, you can ask them if it’s true.” The tiger and the gray wolf were originally planning to sneak away. Now that Wan’er suddenly pointed at them, they immediately turned pale with fright. They also couldn’t understand what Wan’er was saying and were so afraid that they trembled. Wan’er was immediately overjoyed. She knew that these fierce beasts could understand what she was saying. Otherwise, why would they run away with their tails between their legs every time she rolled up her sleeves and threatened them? “Dad, look, they’re all nodding their heads!” Wan’er was so excited that she almost jumped up. Jiang Ping could only smile helplessly, he was secretly ridiculing in his heart. ‘This isn’t nodding, it’s clearly trembling with fear. And yet you are still so proud. If I have not been by your side at all times, I’m afraid...;’ Jiang Ping thought. In fact, Jiang Ping had been watching over Wan’er the past few days. Otherwise, how could a little six-year-old girl spend three days and three nights in the demonic wolf mountain range unscathed? But even so, Wan’er still made him feel very proud, because she was innocent, kind and courageous. Jiang Ping was recalling the scenes that had happened over the past few days. Rumble, rumble! Wan’er’s stomach suddenly started to growl. Jiang Ping and Wan’er were both stunned, and then they looked at each other. Wan’er instantly blushed, pouted, and blinked her big eyes. “Dad, I’m hungry.” Jiang Ping looked at her cute expression, and his heart instantly softened. He smiled gently and said dotingly, “I am hungry too.” “Wan’er, let’s go home and eat something delicious, okay?” “Yes!” Wan’er immediately clapped. When she heard her father say that he was hungry too, her shyness instantly disappeared. Her father’s unique delicacies appeared in her mind. Saliva dripped from the corner of her mouth unconsciously. When Jiang Ping saw Wan’er’s appearance, he also felt a burst of joy. Actually, how could he be hungry? For someone like him who had reached the origin core realm, even if he didn’t eat or drink for three months, it wouldn’t be a big deal, let alone three days. For people who had reached this realm, they only needed to breathe the spiritual energy between heaven and earth to replenish the energy in their bodies. However, Wan’er, who had not even reached the refinement realm, had to eat to replenish her energy. Moreover, Jiang Ping really hoped that Wan’er could taste all kinds of delicacies. He just said he was hungry to ease Wan’er’s embarrassment. Jiang Ping did not delay any further and carried Wan’er in his arms. He leaped lightly and flew into the air. Then, he slowly flew toward the direction of Xiaoyu Town. Wan’er, who was being held in Jiang Ping’s arms, was shocked. She stared at Jiang Ping with her big, puzzled eyes. “Dad, you can fly?” “Yes.” “Then why didn’t you tell me, Dad?” Jiang Ping tilted his head and said with a smile, “You didn’t ask.” “I see.” Wan’er thought for a moment. That seemed to be the case. Then, she thought of an important question. “Dad, why can you fly?” “Even that old man can’t fly.” In Wan’er’s heart, Lei Jingyun, who was in the core building realm, was already very powerful. But even he could only stay in the air for a short time. He couldn’t fly as long as Jiang Ping. “That’s because his realm isn’t high enough. When you reach my level, you can also fly.” “Really?” Wan’er cried out in surprise. “Of course it’s true. When have I ever lied to you?” Usually, when he said that, he was actually lying to this little girl. But this time, it was true. Wan’er didn’t doubt her father either. Her eyes were suddenly filled with anticipation. The tiger and the gray wolf raised their heads to look at them leaving. They raised their heads and involuntarily shed tears. But in their hearts, they were screaming wildly in joy. ‘Finally, this little demon king has finally left! Our happy life is back!’ they thought. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At Jiang Mansion in Xiaoyu Town. The surface of the pond in the courtyard shimmered in the sunlight. The soft wind gently brushed past the lotus flowers in the pond. The dewdrops on the lotus leaves slowly dripped down into the water, creating ripples. Jiang Ping was lying on a bamboo chair, with a parasol above his head. A maid would pour him another cup of tea when his empty teacup was put down. Jiang Ping was admiring the scene of his three daughters cultivating. “Haha, haha!” The three girls were cultivating under the sun. S few drops of sweat slowly dripped down their delicate little faces as they cultivated with determined expressions. However, none of the three girls gave up. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but nod in satisfaction. In the past, only Wan’er would be seen cultivating like this. But now, Yan’er and Liu’er were catching up. Ever since he brought Wan’er back a few days ago, they seemed to have been stimulated by something. They would ask to cultivate almost all the time. “I didn’t expect Wan’er leaving home to yield so many unexpected benefits,” Jiang Ping muttered. Then, he remembered that Wan’er was already in the last stage of the tempering realm. After her trip to the demonic wolf mountain range, her realm was now even more stable. It was also time to find her a mental cultivation method for Qi refinement. And it had to be a top-notch cultivation method. The three realms of physical tempering, Qi refinement, and core building mae up the foundation of a cultivator. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Without a solid foundation, it was impossible to go far in the future. The Qi refinement realm, as its name implied, involved refining the body’s blood essence into true Qi. One could release true Qi only at the refinement realm. At that point, one was only barely considered to have entered the path of cultivation. The importance of the mental cultivation method was self-evident. Jiang Ping naturally wanted to find the best cultivation method for Wan’er, so that Wan’er’s unique physique was not wasted. Also, Wan’er was his daughter, so he definitely wanted to give her the best he had to offer. However, this matter could only be settled by the system. Just as Jiang Ping was deep in thought, Yan’er suddenly became excited. She felt something was happening in her body. Her whole body suddenly became warm. She didn’t expect that a few days of hard training would really work. Yan’er glanced at Wan’er from the corner of her eye. These days, she was very different from usual and worked hard to cultivate. It was because Wan’er had bragged to them a few nights ago that there was a secret between her and their father. She would only share this secret with her sisters when they reached her level of cultivation. Yan’er and Liu’er were jealous of Wan’er, so they began to work hard to reach her level. “Dad!” Yan’er finished another set of body tempering techniques. The strange feeling in her body became more obvious. She ran to Jiang Ping excitedly. She shouted excitedly, “Dad, I think I have broken through!” Jiang Ping, who was lost in his thoughts, instantly came back to his senses. “Yan’er, what did you say?” Yan’er saw Jiang Ping’s shocked expression and immediately laughed out loud. Covering her small mouth, she said proudly, “Dad, I said that I had a breakthrough!” This time Jiang Ping truly believe that he had not misheard. Jiang Ping did not answer but instead grabbed Yan’er’s wrist. A stream of true Qi instantly entered Yan’er’s body. It slowly flowed through her limbs, bones, meridians, and acupuncture points. Finally, it returned to Jiang Ping’s body. Jiang Ping suddenly opened his eyes, revealing an extremely surprised and delighted expression. “You’re really good! Congratulations, Yan’er, you are now like your sister, a tempering realm cultivator!” It was understandable why Jiang Ping was so excited. From the point of view of the outside world, it was truly inconceivable to enter the tempering realm in three months. But compared to Wan’er, Yan’er and Liu’er’s progress was really a little slow. Fortunately, they had finally entered the rudiments of cultivation. A while ago, he had even thought of letting Yan’er and Liu’er practice other body tempering techniques, but it seemed that was unnecessary now. Jiang Ping was overjoyed. He picked up Yan’er and patted her. Yan’er giggled and her eyes sparkled. She didn’t think that after breaking through, her father would be so happy. If she had known earlier, Yan’er would have worked hard to practice earlier and her father would be happy earlier. Jiang Ping hugged Yan’er and continued to praise her. Not long after, Liu’er ran over excitedly. “Dad, I seem to have broken through as well!” “What?” Jiang Ping’s whole body quivered. What a happy day today! Why were there so many surprises? “Come over quickly, Liu’er. Let me take a look.” Hearing this, Liu’er jumped into Jiang Ping’s arms proudly. Jiang Ping used Qi to check Liu’er’s cultivation as well. The smile on his face could no longer be hidden. He kissed Liu’er on her little face again. Liu’er was so happy that she couldn’t stop giggling. “You’re really good! Now you are like your two sisters.” But Yan’er, who was also in Jiang Ping’s arms, was unhappy. Her elder sister had broken through a few months earlier than her. Logically speaking, she should have broken through a few months earlier than her younger sister. But both of them had broken through on the same day. Then Dad would definitely feel that she, as Liu’er’s elder sister, was useless. No, she still had to make the best of her time and continue cultivating! So Yan’er huffed angrily and jumped to the ground. She continued cultivating without looking back. “Dad, what’s wrong with sister?” Liu’er’s large eyes were filled with doubt. Jiang Ping looked at Yan’er who had left and he immediately understood. Yan’er was one who was eager to do well in everything and as a middle child, she was sandwiched between her two sisters. It could be a headache dealing with her. ...; The sun gradually grew hotter. The three little girls finished their morning cultivation. “Girls, get ready for your meal!” Jiang Ping shouted at them from under his parasol. He couldn’t bear to let his daughter continue training in the middle of the day under the scorching sun. The three girls responded, but they weren’t in a hurry to run to their father’s side. Wan’er knew that her two sisters had successfully broken through today, so she was also very happy. She was happy for her sisters, but also proud that she had broken through earlier than them. “Yan’er, Liu’er, I’ll protect you in the future. I won’t let you be bullied.” Wan’er placed her hands on her hips, with an expression that said, “I’ll protect you.” But Yan’er felt even more uncomfortable. She snorted. “One day, I’ll be able to protect you too.” But Yan’er felt that her words did not have much credibility, so in the end, she added another sentence. “I can protect Dad too!” When Wan’er heard this, she was a little unconvinced and said angrily, “Then let’s wait until you become a big sister!” “Hmph, just you wait and see,” Yan’er retorted back. How could she not understand what Wan’er meant? Since birth, Wan’er was destined to be a big sister and this could not be changed. So, based on what Wan’er’s said, it was impossible for her to do it. Then the more she had to do it to prove her wrong! Liu’er stood at the side and blinked her big eyes. She looked at the two sisters arguing in confusion. She really could not understand what was there to argue about. Their father would definitely protect them. She felt that the best thing was to hide in her father’s arms. She was happy to be a lazy little worm who received protection from her father! “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, come over quickly!” Jiang Ping waved at them again. Wan’er and Yan’er reluctantly stopped fighting. They snorted at each other and turned their faces away. Boom!!! The two girls had just raised their heads arrogantly. Suddenly, a loud sound came from the sky. The earth seemed to shake violently, startling them <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio A few hundred meters in the sky above Xiaoyu Town. Two old men were facing each other. One of them was dressed in a gray robe, while the other was dressed in gray cotton clothes. Both of them had white hair and white beards. Though they were skinny, they were in great spirits, and their divine splendor was restrained. Their eyes were not as turbid as those of ordinary old men. On the contrary, they shot out extremely sharp rays of light. One could tell at a glance that these two were definitely not ordinary people. They faced each other in the air, and a terrifying aura surrounded them. Streams of true Qi emitting different colors flowed around them. The two looked at each other with eyes filled with anger and disdain. After a long while, the gray-robed elder snorted and said coldly, “Feng Xinghe, it’s been so long, but you still haven’t made any progress.” “You couldn’t beat me back then, and you’re even worse now.” The gray-robed old man didn’t want to be outdone and said coldly. “Yu Feiyang, don’t be boastful here.” “I can’t beat you, but when did you ever beat me?” “Of course it’s today, I’ll let you know how powerful I am!” Yu Feiyang snorted coldly and the veins on his neck bulged. However, Feng Xinghe did not care about his attitude and said indifferently, “Yu Feiyang, after hearing your big words for so many years, my ears are starting to hurt.” After saying that, Feng Xinghe even pretended to prick his ears. This completely infuriated Yu Feiyang. He narrowed his eyes and a dangerous glint flashed across his eyes. His voice was as cold as ice. “Whether it’s the hard truth or just boastful words, I’ll let you find out right now!” Before he could finish his sentence, he suddenly pushed his palms forward. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) A pale blue light immediately swept towards Feng Xinghe. Even the surrounding air was stirred up. Feng Xinghe did not dare to be careless. He could also sense the dangerous aura from this palm. He didn’t dare to slack off. He suddenly stretched out a thin finger, and a dazzling red light suddenly burst out from his fingertip. In an instant, the red light dyed half of the sky red. Rumble, rumble! The red and blue light suddenly collided and instantly exploded. It was like two huge waves crashing into each other and exploding with a deafening roar. The surrounding clouds and mist were instantly dispersed, like the clear sky after a violent storm. Both of them were origin core realm experts. As the pillars of their respective sects, their strength was matchless. But the two sects hated each other. They had been locked in conflict for many years, with casualties on both sides. There was never a clear winner, causing the two old men to become irreconcilable enemies. Moreover, on top of the grudges between the two sects, there was also a personal grudge between them. It was rumored that both of them had a close relationship in the early years, and they had even fallen in love with the same woman. However, the final result was not as expected. As a result, today’s battle was fueled by both public feud and private hatred. They did not show any mercy when they fought. In an instant, all kinds of powerful spells were unleashed. They did not hesitate to use their rare magic treasures. Bright lights flew in all directions and fiercely collided with each other. A terrifying aura swept through the sky like a gale. The entire space was thrown into unstable chaos. It looked extremely strange from the ground, as if the sky and earth had changed color. The two of them were fighting in the sky hundreds of meters above the ground, but it was, after all, a great battle between origin core realm experts. Even the side effects of such battles had unimaginable destructive power. Countless spells fell from the sky like heavenly flames, smashing into Xiaoyu Town. The innocent residents of Xiaoyu Town were now suffering a sudden disaster for no reason. Many people’s houses collapsed, and the entire town was in a mess. Everyone scrambled to get to cover and hide. The originally bustling Sansheng Street suddenly became empty. Everyone’s hearts were filled with fear and unease. Xiaoyu Town had always been a piece of blessed land where disasters rarely occurred. This was the first time most people had seen such a strange and terrifying scene. All of a sudden, the entire Xiaoyu Town was in a state of panic. ...; At the Jiang Mansion. The spells crashed against each other, producing deafening noises like rolling thunder. Wan’er and Yan’er hid behind Jiang Ping like two little rabbits, trembling and shuddering in fear. Liu’er was the most timid of them all. She begged Jiang Ping for a hug and buried her little head into Jiang Ping’s arms like an ostrich. Li Sushang stood at the side, her expression calm. But her gaze was fixed on everything that happened in the air. Yan’er suddenly pulled the corner of Jiang Ping’s clothes to cover her face. She stammered, “Dad, is this the end of the world?” After hearing Yan’er’s words, Liu’er became even more terrified. She let out an “ahh”, and then her whole body desperately shrank into his arms. It made Jiang Ping’s chest itch, but it was not funny now. He could only gently comfort the girls. “Yan’er, Liu’er, don’t be afraid.” “This is not the end of the world. It’s just that someone is setting off firecrackers.” “You’re lying. Who would set off firecrackers in broad daylight?!” Yan’er pouted and said while shivering. “Dad, don’t treat me like a three-year-old child. I’m not that stupid!” Jiang Ping found it funny again. Though she wasn’t three years old, she was not that much older. He had once told Yan’er and the others a bedtime story about the end of the world. But he didn’t expect the girls to take it seriously now. She was still a child. Jiang Ping said gently, “Yan’er, I am not lying to you.” “Someone is really setting off fireworks. It’ll probably be over soon.” “Really?” Hearing her father’s confident tone, Yan’er’s mood finally calmed down a little. But she looked at Jiang Ping in disbelief. “When did I lie to Yan’er?” “Besides, I am here. Everything will be fine.” Yan’er hesitated for a while, but in the end, she still nodded. Her expression was not so ugly anymore, but she continue to hide behind Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping chuckled, then raised his head to look at the sky. His gaze passed through the layers of white clouds and landed on the two figures who were fighting. He had hidden the heavenly treasure concealment plate in the Jiang Mansion. That top-grade spiritual artifact should be enough to protect the mansion from the attacks of an origin core realm expert. Therefore, Jiang Ping wasn’t worried that this battle would destroy his house or hurt the three little girls. However, a battle between mighty figures was ultimately not a good thing. Sigh, he could only hope that they would quickly finish their work and leave. Jiang Ping secretly looked forward to it. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Two hours later. The sun was gradually setting. Jiang Ping sat upright on the chair in the main hall. He picked up a cup of tea with his hand, but just as he put it to his mouth, the earth shook violently again. Jiang Ping’s hand trembled as a result. Boiling hot tea flowed out of the cup and stained his pants. Jiang Ping’s face darkened. Were these two old guys done yet? They fought from noon to the afternoon, and it wasn’t over yet. He thought they would stop after a while, but it was obviously not the case! What kind of grudge did they have that could make these two old guys fight till they die? “Dad!” Just as Jiang Ping was feeling depressed, the three girls came over with Li Sushang. Each of them was holding a doll that was bigger than their own bodies. Jiang Ping was stunned when he saw the three girls appear suddenly. He quickly asked, “Why are you here? Didn’t I tell you to take a nap?” Taking a nap was a good habit that Jiang Ping “forced” them to do. “Dad, we can’t sleep.” “I had just fallen asleep when the sky roared again,” Wan’er said. “Dad, I’m sleepy!” Yan’er said. The three girls pouted. Their eyes were also blurry, as if they hadn’t fully opened yet. The three girls knew that what was happening in the sky wouldn’t harm them. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) So they ate their lunch and went to sleep when it was time. But the commotion in the sky didn’t stop, making them unable to rest well. “Daddy, it’s so noisy in the sky. Liu’er wants to sleep!” Liu’er stomped her feet said angrily. Jiang Ping hurriedly rubbed her little face and comforted her gently. “Okay, Liu’er, don’t be anxious. I will go and reason with them now. I’ll tell them to stop setting off fireworks. They are disturbing my baby’s sleep.” “What if they don’t agree?” Liu’er was a little worried again. Jiang Ping couldn’t help but smile at her charming appearance. “How can they not agree?” “We’re all reasonable people. I will reason with them properly.” Jiang Ping rubbed the three girls’ little heads and then gave Li Sushang a look. Li Sushang understood and quickly called the three girls back to their rooms. Then, he strode out of the door. ...; At Sanshi Street of Xiaoyu Town. This was supposed to be the most prosperous street in Xiaoyu Town, but now it had become a mess. A large area of houses had been burned and turned into charcoal, and many pillars and wooden planks were scattered on the ground. Even the cobblestones on the street were shattered by the explosion and reduced to rubble. Rumble!! Another spell bombardment caused a house to collapse to the ground. As the smoke and dust dispersed, two figures slowly walked out from the ruins. They were Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang! However, these two were also in a rather sorry state now. Their immortal-like elegance from before had disappeared. Their clothes were covered in smoke and dust, and their hair was also messy. Their battle had indeed been very intense. The two of them had fought from the sky to the ground, but there was still no winner. However, they did not cower in the slightest. Their eyes were filled with a bright light and boiling fighting spirit. Feng Xinghe patted the dust off his body. Of course, it did not make much of a difference because he was wearing a gray robe. He sneered and said, “Yu Feiyang, is this all you can do?” “To think that you still had the nerve to boast earlier. What a shame!” Yu Feiyang heard him and did not feel the slightest bit angry. He did not back down. “Look at how pathetic you are now.” “Hey, you even lost a big piece of your hair. How pitiful!” “Is there any point in trying to talk your way out of this?” Feng Xinghe snorted coldly and continued unhurriedly. “You look just as bad as I do!” “To think that you still dare to boast shamelessly. Do you think you can beat me with just these two moves of yours?” “In your entire life, you’ve only ever been good at talking!” Upon hearing Feng Xinghe’s sarcastic words, Yu Feiyang’s expression changed drastically. “I’m only good at talking? Let me tell you, the winner hasn’t been decided yet!” “Watch how I beat the shit out of you!” Yu Feiyang roared, his aura overflowing. Then, his palms turned into two sharp blades and slashed at Feng Xinghe. Feng Xinghe didn’t waste any time. His body instantly disappeared from where he was. Like a whirlwind, he pounced on Yu Feiyang. In an instant, the two of them once again engaged in a battle. In an instant, all sorts of spells and magic treasures were sent flying. All sorts of violent explosions shook the sky and earth. Colorful rays of light swept past, and countless buildings collapsed around them. ...; Not far away, Jiang Ping was standing on a pile of ruins. He looked at the scene in the field with a calm expression. Earlier, he wasn’t able to tell the exact cultivation level of these two old men. Now that he got closer, he realized that they were only at the early stage of the origin core realm. Of course, though they were only at the early stage, they were already very strong. After all, Lei Jingyun was about the same age, but he was only in the last stage core building realm. Jiang Ping believed that if he attacked, he would be able to defeat these two guys easily. As the two of them fought, a huge storm swept over once again. Countless opulent buildings were reduced to rubble. Compared to the fight in mid-air, the impact on Xiaoyu Town was much greater now. At this rate, perhaps in another hour, the entire Xiaoyu Town would be reduced to ruins. In the end, Jiang Ping couldn’t hold it in anymore. These two guys were fighting too fiercely. Not only did they disturb his three daughters so much that they couldn’t sleep, but they were also about to destroy the entire town. Jiang Ping planned to live in seclusion here. How could he let them continue? He snorted lightly, and his dense Qi instantly swept towards the two of them. “If you want to compete, please go outside the town and compete.” “This town has been almost completely destroyed by you.” Jiang Ping used the true Qi voice transmission method to send out the message. Only Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang could hear it. The two of them were fighting when they suddenly heard a low voice in their minds. They immediately stopped fighting and retreated from each other. They looked around nervously, and their hearts tightened. If this person could directly send a voice transmission to them, he was probably not much weaker than them. But they were at the origin core realm. How could there be such an expert in this town? Thinking of this, the two looked at each other. They saw the disbelief in each other’s eyes. “Who are you?” they shouted in unison. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Both of them shouted in unison, their expressions filled with nervousness. Jiang Ping had no plans to continue hiding. He knew that it was impossible to make them leave with just a few words. The faint sound of footsteps could be heard. Both Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang had sensitive hearing. Their gazes shot directly toward Jiang Ping, who was slowly walking out from the corner. When Jiang Ping’s figure completely appeared in front of them, the two of them couldn’t help but frown again. This fellow in front of them was really too young. He didn’t look like someone who had mastered the voice transmission method. Could a young man in his twenties or thirties be an origin core expert? They did not believe it was possible. The two of them looked at each other and knew they shared the same thought. Since they had been enemies for many years, they naturally understood each other’s thoughts. Yu Feiyang sized up Jiang Ping and pondered for a moment. Then, he slowly said, “Young lad, were you the one who sent a voice transmission to the two of us just now?” “That’s right.” Jiang Ping nodded indifferently. Looking at the two old fellows who had gone silent, Jiang Ping was too lazy to beat around the bush. He said indifferently, “I have no intention of interfering with the grudges between the two of you.” “But please leave the town and settle it yourself.” “My children need to have a quiet environment to rest at home. Also, the town can’t afford to suffer even greater losses.” Jiang Ping spoke calmly in a reasonable manner. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) However, Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang instantly felt offended. After all, with their strength and status, when had any young man ever dared to speak to them in this manner? “Hmph, we’ll fight wherever we want.” “If we’re not willing to leave, what can you do?” Yu Feiyang looked at Jiang Ping from the corner of his eyes and said disdainfully. “Then I can only invite the two of you out!” Jiang Ping’s voice suddenly sank as he spoke. The two old fellows didn’t take it seriously. They had carefully sized up Jiang Ping, but they didn’t sense the slightest bit of cultivation aura from his body. There were only three possibilities. Either Jiang Ping was just an ordinary person and hadn’t cultivated at all, or Jiang Ping’s cultivation level was far higher than theirs, so they couldn’t sense it; or perhaps, Jiang Ping had some magical treasure that could conceal his cultivation level. In their opinion, the first guess was the most likely. After all, this was just a small mortal town. How could there be experts who fulfilled the latter two options? As for Jiang Ping’s telepathic transmission, they also found a reason to explain that. Perhaps it was some secret technique that could be used to transmit sound. Although such a secret technique would be very rare, it was more likely than the other two reasons. At least, that was how they felt. “Alright, young lad, you can scram. Don’t come and interfere with our fight.” “A guy like you can’t even take one palm strike from me!” Yu Feiyang waved his hand at Jiang Ping, then he looked at Feng Xinghe. He gritted his teeth and said, “Old Feng, no matter who comes today, you will die!” “Same here, I will kill you!” Feng Xinghe snorted coldly and did not back down at all. Hence, they did not look at Jiang Ping and once again engaged in a fight. The clamorous wind and waves swept over, and the ground shook violently again. Jiang Ping looked at them as they fought again, and his face instantly darkened. No matter what grudges these two had, Xiaoyu Town did not provoke them. If they had gone to the demonic wolf mountain range to fight until the sky turned dark, he would not care about them. But they insisted on fighting in Xiaoyu Town, which meant that they did not care about the mortals at all. Jiang Ping did not indulge them anymore. The power of the origin core realm’s last stage suddenly burst out. A golden pillar of light shot out from his body. The huge impact instantly sent large chunks of rubble flying. Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang immediately stopped fighting. They stared closely at this sudden change, their eyes filled with shock. They could clearly feel that this aura was far stronger than theirs by at least two stages! They were already at the early stage of the origin core realm. If this young man’s cultivation level was two stages higher, didn’t that mean that he was at the last stage of the origin core realm?! The two of them instantly lost their composure. They didn’t expect this young man to be so terrifying. In the end, they had misjudged him. Jiang Ping didn’t intend to give them time to regret it. The two of them only saw Jiang Ping strike out two palms. In an instant, both palms seemed to transform into two golden dragon phantoms. The golden dragons let out a whistle, like an arrow that had left the bow, and their huge bodies pounced towards the two of them. For a moment, it was as if the area was shaken by the golden dragon phantoms, making the very air rustle. The entire space seemed unable to withstand such a powerful pressure and was about to shatter. This was the swimming dragon palm technique granted by the system! Since it was produced by the system, it must be a high-quality product! Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang could already feel Jiang Ping’s destructive might when he had just condensed his power into his palm. The battle intent that filled their hearts disappeared in an instant. They did not know why Jiang Ping had such strength. However, they knew that none of them would be able to withstand this palm. The two of them looked at each other and did not hesitate to use their trump cards. A huge sword phantom appeared in front of Yu Feiyang. A rain of swords filled the sky above Feng Xinghe’s head. “Go!” Both of them shouted at the same time. In an instant, the golden dragon and the sword rain collided with each other. The dragon roared, and then its two huge claws stretched out, grabbing the long sword and the sword rain. With a sudden grip, the long sword and the sword rain disintegrated and turned back into Qi. After the attack was broken, Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang both spat out a mouthful of blood. That move just now had consumed too much of their true Qi. But unexpectedly, they couldn’t even block one move from this young man. They looked at Jiang Ping again, their eyes full of fear! Under their fearful gazes, Jiang Ping’s figure suddenly disappeared from the spot. “Ouch!” The two of them let out a miserable cry at the same time, clutching their heads and hopping around. Jiang Ping had unknowingly appeared behind them and punched them in the head. The two old men were in so much pain that they cried out repeatedly. However, Jiang Ping had no intention of stopping. His fists rained down like raindrops, causing the two old men to curse in pain! Jiang Ping was also cursing and scolding them. “I told you to go out and fight, but you refused to listen!” “Do you have to destroy Xiaoyu Town before you give up?” “You have disturbed my precious daughters’ afternoon nap. Tell me, don’t you think it’s reasonable to beat you up?” After chasing the two old men for half a day, Jiang Ping finally stopped until they were exhausted and collapsed on the ground. Jiang Ping looked at the two old men who were in a sorry state and sneered. He said indifferently, “If you don’t restore Xiaoyu Town to its original state, then you can stay here forever!” The hearts of the two old men instantly sank, and they saw Jiang Ping suddenly perform an incantation with both hands. A golden shadow suddenly lit up and then entered the bodies of the two men. The two old men instantly turned pale with fright. Wasn’t he trying to seal their powers away? They were too familiar with it! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Mansion. After dealing with the two old men, Jiang Ping didn’t delay any further. In any case, he had placed a seal on their powers. They could only obediently do whatever he told them to do. Jiang Ping had just stepped into the main hall. When he looked up, he saw Wan’er holding the doll and dozing off on the chair. When Wan’er saw Jiang Ping, she immediately became energetic. She jumped down from the chair and ran to Jiang Ping in small steps. She smiled and said, “Dad, you’re back!” “Well, why is only Wan’er here?” Jiang Ping glanced around but didn’t see Li Sushang and his two other daughters. He asked again, “Where are Auntie Sushang and your sisters?” “They’re sleeping.” “Then why aren’t you sleeping?” Wan’er thought for a moment and blinked her big innocent eyes. She said softly, “I am worried about you, so I don’t dare to sleep.” “You’ve nothing to worry about. I am just trying to reason with others and ask them not to set off fireworks.” “It’s no longer noisy now. Go to sleep quickly, okay?” Jiang Ping squatted down and rubbed Wan’er’s head lovingly. Wan’er listened as he spoke, then pouted and shook her head. She said proudly, “Dad, you can fool Yan’er and Liu’er, but you can’t fool me.” “I saw it clearly. There were two black shadows fighting in the sky.” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “You didn’t go and reason with them. You went to mediate the fight.” Jiang Ping’s hand that was rubbing Wan’er’s small head immediately stopped when he heard this. However, his heart was in turmoil. He had almost forgotten that as one’s realm improved, the various functions of the human body would also be strengthened. Wan’er was now in the last stage of the tempering realm. Her eyesight and hearing abilities had long surpassed that of an ordinary person. It was not surprising that she could see what was happening in the sky. Jiang Ping scratched his head and asked stiffly, “Wan’er, did you see what those two black shadows were?” “I don’t know what they were.” “Dad, weren’t there two people in those two black shadows?” Wan’er frowned and thought for a while before mumbling. Looking at Wan’er’s expression, Jiang Ping calmed down slightly. It seemed that Wan’er didn’t see what had happened. She could only vaguely see two shadows fighting. Just as Jiang Ping was racking his brain for a way to ‘explain’ the situation to Wan’er, the guard came rushing in. The guard said respectfully, “Patriarch, someone is looking for you outside the door.” “Looking for me? Who is it?” Upon hearing this, Jiang Ping felt as if he could avoid ‘explaining’ to Wan’er. He quickly stood up and was about to walk out the door. The guard hurriedly replied, “It’s two old men, but they look very unfamiliar.” Two old men? Jiang Ping immediately had a guess of who they were. He then said to Wan’er, “Someone is looking for me outside.” “I will not tell you for now.” After saying that, he didn’t wait for Wan’er to react and immediately left. “Hey!” Wan’er immediately stretched out her hand, wanting to grab her father’s clothes, but she missed it. “Hmph, Dad is always like this!” Her attack missed, and Wan’er’s cheeks instantly puffed up with anger. “No, I must figure it out today!” Wan’er muttered to herself and quickly followed. ...; “Patriarch!” When the guards at the door saw Jiang Ping, they immediately bowed respectfully. Jiang Ping nodded indifferently and swept his gaze over to Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang! Both of them happened to meet Jiang Ping’s gaze. Judging from the reactions of the guards, they could finally confirm that this young man in front was really the Patriarch of this family clan. The two of them couldn’t help but curse in their hearts. You’re so young, but why don’t you have the vigor of a young man? Why do you have to keep such a low profile? Are you here to hide from someone? Jiang Ping caught a glimpse of Wan’er from the corner of his eye and his heart skipped a beat. However, his expression didn’t change as he slowly walked in front of them. He said in a low voice, “Why are you here?” The two old men stuttered for a long time before Feng Xinghe finally said. “Our, our cultivation levels have been restricted. We can’t take out money from our storage spaces.” “Could you see if you can unseal a few of our cultivation levels?” Feng Xinghe said with a red face, but he was afraid that Jiang Ping wouldn’t agree. He quickly waved his hand and said nervously. “There’s no need to unseal too much. Just let us take out the money from the storage space.” Jiang Ping glanced at them. It was obvious that they were very nervous. After pondering for a moment, Jiang Ping nodded. “Okay, but you have to restore the town to its original state within ten days.” “Sure, sure!” After they received Jiang Ping’s permission, the two old men answered respectfully. Jiang Ping was not worried that these two fellows would play any tricks. After all, he could release the restriction at any time, and of course, he could also seal the restriction at any time. With a light tap of his finger, an invisible aura swept past the two of them. The two of them immediately felt that the true Qi that was restrained instantly loosened a little. “Thank you, young master!” “Please rest assured, young master. Within ten days, we will definitely restore the town to its original appearance.” The two fellows felt the changes in their bodies, and they couldn’t help but be delighted. They hurriedly made a solemn promise to Jiang Ping. They were just short of patting their own chests. Jiang Ping waved his hand and said expressionlessly. “Alright, you can go. Remember, don’t think of playing any tricks.” The two old men trembled and did not dare to delay any further. They only said a few more words to reassure Jiang Ping before leaving. When the two old men left, Wan’er walked out from behind the door. She tugged on the corner of Jiang Ping’s clothes and asked in a childish voice, “Dad, who are those two old men?” Jiang Ping suddenly said with a straight face, “What old men? You have to call them grandfather!” “Didn’t I tell you to be polite!” “Alright, Dad, don’t interrupt. who exactly are they?” Wan’er quickly acted as a good girl and hugged Jiang Ping, while she said coquettishly. Jiang Ping gave up and told her the ‘truth’. “They are building houses. They are going to build a lot of new houses for the town.” “Humph, Dad, you are lying. You’re treating me like a three-year-old child again.” Wan’er placed her hands on her hips and turned her head away. It was obvious that she did not believe Jiang Ping’s words. Jiang Ping was speechless. Sigh, there was nothing he could do. Ever since he had flown home with Wan’er the last time, she was becoming more and more sensitive. Jiang Ping decided to change the topic. “Ahem!” “Wan’er, why do you think we have to cultivate?” “So that we can fight!” Wan’er blurted out, scaring Jiang Ping so much that he staggered. He gave her a slap on the head and said snappily. “Is fighting the only thing you think of all day long? I’m not teaching you to fight!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio A few days later, at the Jiang Mansion’s main gate. Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang were pushing and shoving each other. The guards were still the same people from a few days ago, so they still had some impression of these two old men. After making the two of them wait for a while, the guards went in to report. However, this time was different from the last time. Jiang Ping did not personally come out. Instead, the guard led the two of them directly into the Jiang Mansion. When they arrived at the main hall, they saw that Chen Zhong was already there. When Chen Zhong saw the two of them, he didn’t neglect them at all. He didn’t know the true identities of these two old men, but as a butler, he treated them well. “May I know why you are looking for our Patriarch?” Chen Zhong asked with a smile after he invited both of them to sit down and then ordered the servants to serve tea. Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang subconsciously looked at each other, and their faces instantly flushed red again. What else could it be? It was regarding their cultivation being sealed. But could these words be said out loud? They could, but not to anyone. At least to this ordinary person in front of them, they couldn’t say it out loud. Two origin core realm experts had their cultivation sealed. If these words were mentioned out loud, it would be very embarrassing for them! “Ahem, ahem.” Feng Xinghe coughed lightly twice. “We came to look for your patriarch because we have something important to discuss, naturally.” “But this matter is of great importance, so we must speak with your patriarch alone.” “So you’d better go and ask your patriarch to come out.” Feng Xinghe said, pretending to be mysterious. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Chen Zhong couldn’t help but frown when he heard this. He had been the Jiang Mansion’s butler for so many years, so he had some ability to judge people. The two old men in front of him looked like immortals, and they were definitely not ordinary people. Since they said so, perhaps there really was something urgent. Thinking of this, Chen Zhong didn’t dare to delay. “Alright, please come with me to the backyard to rest for a while. I’ll inform the patriarch.” After Chen Zhong said that, he led the way for the two of them. They looked at each other and could only hurriedly follow. When they reached the backyard, Chen Zhong let them wait there for a while. Then, he turned around and disappeared. “Do you think that this guy is also a cultivator?” Yu Feiyang pinched his grayish-white beard with a strange expression. He was referring to Chen Zhong. When Feng Xinghe heard this, he only snorted disdainfully. “I think Jiang Ping has caused you to be too paranoid. Everyone looks like a cultivator to you now.” “This person’s feet are weak and there is no true Qi in his body.” “He is just an ordinary mortal. And you think he’s a cultivator? Ridiculous!” Yu Feiyang’s one sentence provoked a fierce rebuttal from Feng Xinghe. A furious argument was lit up in an instant. He said angrily, “An ordinary person? Didn’t you also think that Jiang Ping was an ordinary person back then?” “What happened in the end? He taught us a lesson!” “That’s different. Do you think origin core realm experts are so common?” “Besides, I’m not the only one who made a mistake.” Feng Xinghe was also enraged. The two of them had made a mistake the last time, and they even paid a heavy price for it. This also became an embarrassing matter that he did not want to be reminded of. However, Yu Feiyang’s skin was obviously thicker than his. He grabbed onto this topic and kept on bickering. They almost started fighting again. However, if they had to start fighting now, they could only do it by pulling at each other’s beards. It wouldn’t affect others in the slightest. ...; Of course, they didn’t start fighting in the end, because Li Sushang happened to appear with three girls. Other than Wan’er, no one else had seen these two old men. Li Sushang immediately became vigilant and protected the three girls behind her. She asked them in a cold voice, “Who are you two? Why are you in the backyard of Jiang Mansion?” They sized up Li Sushang and didn’t dare to be negligent. They hurriedly said, “Miss, we have something to discuss with the Patriarch Jiang.” “The butler of your mansion told us to wait here.” “Auntie Sushang, I’ve seen them before. Dad does know them,” added Wan’er who suddenly appeared from behind Li Sushang. Li Sushang then relaxed a little and seriously glanced at both of them. Then she said to the three girls, “Wan’er, take your sisters and go cultivate first.” Wan’er nodded and looked at both of them. Then she took the two sisters and ran into the courtyard. Seeing that the three girls were a little far away, Li Sushang turned around. She said unhurriedly, “Both of you are cultivators, right? You should know the amount of time required for closed-door cultivation.” “Our patriarch is currently in closed-door cultivation, so please come back another day.” They were stunned and wanted to say something, but swallowed their words when they saw Li Sushang’s indifferent expression. They could only nod unwillingly. “In that case, we will come back another day...;” Before they could finish speaking, their expressions changed drastically. They suddenly looked toward the courtyard and saw an unbelievable scene. Yan’er’s body suddenly erupted with a soaring aura. That aura was not very powerful, but it was extremely domineering and fierce. Light and Qi flowed majestically from Yan’er’s aura like a peerless treasure sword. Anyone who looked directly at it felt a faint pain in their eyes. Yu Feiyang, Feng Xinghe, and Li Sushang were all stunned, especially the two old men, whose jaws almost dropped from shock. They certainly knew what was going on. She had broken through to the tempering realm?! A tempering realm cultivator around the age of five or six? The two of them were utterly bewildered. Their understanding of cultivation seemed to have been overturned. Along with this soaring aura, a pink sword pattern like a lotus flower appeared between Yan’er’s brows. The lotus sword pattern flickered with a faint light, and a humming sound seemed to reverberate around Yan’er. This humming sound was like a tidal wave, shaking the sky and the earth. It was a magnificent sight, like a powerful natural phenomenon! If Jiang Ping was here, he would definitely be overjoyed to see this scene. It was not only because Yan’er had broken through, but also because Yan’er actually had a unique physique that had never been seen in a long time. The legendary spiritual chaos sword physique! This physique had long been lost. Now, it was only recorded in some ancient books. The spiritual chaos sword physique was said to be the most supreme physique in the world for cultivating the sword path. The sword path led to an understanding of the true essence of the sword! Those with the spiritual chaos sword physique were naturally supreme in the sword path. Once they awakened, their cultivation speed would increase by leaps and bounds. Moreover, with the power of ten thousand swords in their grasp, they would be widely respected. If one progressed far enough in their cultivation, they would become a sage of swords. Such a person could tear the fabric of time with a single word, and flatten mountains and rivers with a single thought! The power and rarity of such a sword physique weren’t inferior to Wan’er’s ancient divine physique! “Damn, what’s going on!” “Something is wrong with this girl. This disturbance is similar to when I broke through to the origin core realm!” The two old men were stunned and cried out involuntarily. This scene left them dumbfounded, though they were in the origin core realm. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The disturbance caused by Yan’er’s awakening of the spiritual chaos sword physique was more than that. A strange scene suddenly occurred in Xiaoyu Town. With the Jiang Mansion as the center, all the swords within a radius of three miles seemed to have suddenly become spiritual. The swords trembled slightly and let out a low groan. They were behaving like officials trembling in front of the emperor. Fortunately, Xiaoyu Town was only a small town for mortals, and not many people used swords. This strange scene did not cause any major disturbance. As Yan’er completed her breakthrough, this disturbance gradually disappeared. Only those who were also cultivators could vaguely feel that something was not right. In the backyard of the Jiang Mansion. Yan’er was about to complete her breakthrough. The overbearing aura that soared into the sky had weakened by a lot. However, the faint sword-like power that Yan’er was emitting became purer and purer. Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang only took a sideways glance at her, as if they were looking at a blinding light. The hairs on their bodies stood on end, as if they were caught in floodlights. Of course, they didn’t dare to act rashly. “This is the sacred body of the sword path!” Yu Feiyang suddenly thought of something and could not help but let out a loud cry. He was also a sword path cultivator. Naturally, he knew a lot about the sword path. It was rumored that some people were born with the sacred physique of the sword path. The man was the sword, and the sword was the man. The man and the sword were one, and together they were unrivaled! He had never seen such a miraculous physique with his own eyes. However, the aura on Yan’er’s body seemed to have reminded him of something. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) It made him naturally think of the legendary sacred physique of the sword path! He wasn’t the only one who was surprised. Li Sushang and Feng Xinghe were also extremely shocked. They were knowledgeable people, so they had also heard of the sacred physique of the sword path. Li Sushang stared at Yan’er, her eyes filled with excitement and shock. There was no better explanation. Could it be that Yan’er really had such a powerful physique? As time passed, the aura on Yan’er’s body completely disappeared. The sword mark between her eyebrows gradually faded, and finally disappeared. It was as if it was just a big dream, leaving nothing behind. But Yan’er knew that everything that happened just now was real. She had broken through, and now she was also a tempering realm cultivator! This kind of confidence came from the surging power in her body! Yan’er couldn’t help but clench her small fists, and all the power in her body instantly surged into her fists. She felt powerful enough to kill a fierce beast with one punch! Yan’er shouted excitedly, “Wan’er, Liu’er, I’ve finally broken through!” “I can protect all of you in the future!” Liu’er, who was not far away, smiled faintly when she heard this. However, Wan’er pouted, as if she didn’t think much of it. At this moment, she was secretly ridiculing Yan’er in her heart. Before breaking through, Yan’er addressed Wan’er as an elder sister. But after breaking through, she now addressed Wan’er by her name. ‘Humph, I don’t need the protection of a little girl like you!’ Wan’er thought. Wan’er seemed to have forgotten that she was actually the same age as Yan’er. “I’ve already broken through to the advanced stage of the tempering realm, alright?” Wan’er said indifferently. “You’ve only just broken through to the early stage of the tempering realm. You’re still far from being able to protect me!” She was probably intentionally trying to anger Yan’er by saying so. Wan’er suddenly stretched out her right palm and slammed it fiercely at the stone table in front of her. The entire stone table instantly shattered into pieces, and all the stones scattered on the ground. “Look, this is the power of a last stage physical tempering cultivator. I can easily break a stone table with a single palm!” Wan’er placed her hands on her waist and said proudly. Yan’er took a look and said “tsk” without changing her expression. She said casually, “Later, I’ll tell Dad that you have broken his table again!” Wan’er was like a cat whose tail had been stepped on when she heard that, and she suddenly shivered. ‘Oh no...;I was too impulsive, I was too careless!’ Wan’er cried in her heart. Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang, who were watching this scene quietly, were now numb. When they heard what Wan’er said just now, they thought that she was just trying to bicker with Yan’er. But in the end, she was clearly telling the truth! She was only a five or six-year-old girl, and she was at the last stage of the tempering realm. If this girl were to enter their sect, would those so-called geniuses in the sect still have a reason to live? Looking at her sister choking on her own words, Yan’er was secretly delighted. Then, she waved at Li Sushang and called out. “Auntie Sushang, I have broken through!” Li Sushang came back to her senses and looked a little anxious. She quickly walked forward and squatted in front of Yan’er to carefully examine her. “Yan’er, do you feel uncomfortable?” “No, I’m fine!” Yan’er shook her head and looked very proud. However, Li Sushang did not dare to relax. After all, to be able to cause such a big commotion, this sword physique was definitely not simple. Li Sushang could not help but pay more attention to Yan’er. “Yan’er, did you really not feel that something was wrong?” “Don’t hide it from me, or else I’ll complain to your father.” Li Sushang pouted and put on a serious look. Yan’er was a little anxious and wanted to defend herself. But at this moment, something unexpected happened. While Liu’er was cultivating not far away, her aura suddenly changed. The entire backyard suddenly fell silent. Everyone’s gaze fell nervously on Liu’er. Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang subconsciously looked at each other. From the other party’s eyes, they could accurately see their current state of mind. To put it simply, their mind was exploding! One had the sacred physique of the sword path, and the other was at the last stage of the tempering realm. Could it be that this girl, who looked even younger, was also about to break through to the tempering realm? Was there no end to this? Wasn’t this enough to suffocate people? Wan’er looked at Liu’er, whose aura was surging, and she was incomparably excited. If Liu’er also succeeded in breaking through, then the three of them would all be cultivators! Yan’er, who was at the side, had a complicated expression on her face. Although she was also excited about her younger sister’s breakthrough, she couldn’t help but feel a little upset. Why did her younger sister insist on breaking through with her? Why couldn’t Liu’er let her be proud of her achievement for one or two days first? To everyone’s surprise, Liu’er’s breakthrough process was very calm. It was as if everything had happened naturally. There wasn’t any powerful phenomenon, nor was there any sword resonance. Liu’er’s aura was the same as the aura of everyone else who broke through. After witnessing Yan’er’s breakthrough, everyone had a vague expectation in their hearts. Therefore, when they saw Liu’er’s ordinary breakthrough, they felt somewhat uncomfortable. However, this discomfort was only fleeting. What they cared about more was that Liu’er was now also a tempering realm cultivator! A cultivator who had truly walked on the path of cultivation! However, no one saw that the moment Liu’er successfully broke through, a red light flashed and disappeared in her eyes, and the corners of her mouth also revealed a faintly discernible evil smile. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio In fact, at the moment when Liu’er successfully broke through. An extremely strange thing happened. Liu’er only felt dizzy, as though she was outside down. Then her entire body suddenly went out of her control. When she opened her eyes to take a look, she found herself in an extremely mysterious space. In this space, everything was pitch black. Liu’er felt as if she was floating in mid-air. Then, she saw a person who looked exactly like her. That person’s entire body was bound by shackles, and there was an evil smile on the corner of her mouth. Her entire body was emitting a faint evil aura. If it were another person, she might feel a chill. But when Liu’er looked at this person, her eyes seemed to be glued to her. She didn’t feel the slightest fear. She had always been the timidest of the three sisters. But now looking at this strange person, she only felt warm. It was a kind of warm feeling from the bottom of her heart. It was as if that was her, but not her. Liu’er had never experienced this before. Her feet subconsciously walked towards that person as she muttered. “Who are you?” “Are you in pain?” “You want to come out, don’t you?” (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Liu’er did not know why she asked these questions. But after asking them, she seemed to already know the answer. Her gaze steadily fell on that person. That person did not answer but just smiled faintly at Liu’er. The smile was evil, strange, and mysterious. But this smile seemed to have some kind of innate magic to Liu’er. Liu’er approached that person step by step, carefully looking at her. A pair of small hands gripped the chain, and then suddenly pulled hard. The whole chain suddenly made a ‘crackling’ sound. The chain slid past the person’s body like a snake swimming. The whole chain scattered and disappeared in an instant. And the person who looked exactly like Liu’er stood up! ...; Liu’er was still recalling everything that had happened in her consciousness when her body suddenly swayed. It was Wan’er who shook her. “Liu’er, what’s wrong with you? You look dazed after breaking through!” Wan’er kept shaking Liu’er with her hands, her eyes full of curiosity. Liu’er was shocked and quickly waved her hands. “Nothing, I’m just confused.” Wan’er was no longer puzzled when she heard what Liu’er said. However, Li Sushang could not help but frown. Her intuition told her that Liu’er’s reaction was indeed not quite right. Breaking through to the tempering realm was the first step of cultivation, and no hidden dangers must be left behind. Li Sushang grabbed Yan’er’s and Liu’er’s forearms and said gently, “Yan’er, Liu’er, do you really not feel any discomfort?” As she said this, two streams of true Qi suddenly separated from her body and entered the bodies of the two girls respectively. “Auntie, I’ve already told you I don’t feel uncomfortable. Why do you not believe me?” Yan’er was so angry that her cheeks puffed up. Liu’er’s heart skipped a beat. She did not dare to tell Auntie Sushang what she saw in her consciousness. She stammered, “That’s right. I am not uncomfortable either.” Li Sushang looked at the two girls quietly again. Yan’er’s reaction was not abnormal, but Liu’er was not quite right. However, after her examination, the two girls’ bodies were surprisingly healthy. In the end, she could only feel that she was being too paranoid. “Okay, I believe you.” “Let’s call it a day for cultivation. Both of you go and play first, okay?” “Okay!” The three girls agreed in unison. Liu’er felt relieved. Then, the three of them ran away. Li Sushang, Yu Feiyang, and Feng Xinghe were left in the backyard. Li Sushang turned around and stared at them with eyes as cold as a block of thousand-year-old ice. Both of them suddenly felt a chill. “Please keep what happened today a secret.” “Otherwise, you will die!” Li Sushang’s tone suddenly became cold. A vast and turbulent aura instantly poured out of her body. The powerful aura instantly forced the two old men back a few steps. “Origin core realm!” Feeling Li Sushang’s strength, the two subconsciously blurted out. They didn’t expect that this cold and aloof young woman in front of them was actually an origin core realm cultivator! For a moment, Jiang Ping’s figure became mysterious in their minds again. His three daughters were all freaks, and even this young woman was an origin core realm expert. Then what was Jiang Ping’s true identity? They originally thought that Jiang Ping was just an expert with extraordinary talent. But now they suddenly realized that Jiang Ping was definitely not that simple! Suddenly, at this moment, a strong aura suddenly rose up from somewhere in the Jiang Mansion. This aura shot straight into the sky like a huge light pillar. The huge pillar of light penetrated the heavens, instantly dispersing all the white clouds in the sky. Endless dark clouds began to brew, and the entire world seemed to become gloomy in an instant. Immediately after, a white array formation enveloped the sky, cutting off the pillar of light at its waist. Everything returned to peace in an instant. The white array formation also gradually faded away. Outside the Jiang Mansion, everything was normal. The sky was blue, the clouds were white, and the birds were flying in the clear sky. It was as if nothing had ever happened. But inside the Jiang Mansion, the shocking scene became even more obvious. The sky above the entire Jiang Mansion was filled with extremely dense dark clouds. Li Sushang, Yu Feiyang, and Feng Xinghe’s bodies were trembling as if they could not hold on any longer and were about to kneel down. At this moment, their bodies were under incomparably heavy pressure. This pressure affected every inch and every pore of their skin. The three of them raised their heads with great difficulty and looked in the direction where the aura was coming from. Their eyes were filled with disbelief. This aura, this powerful pressure, what kind of cultivation level was it?! In comparison, Li Sushang was under even more pressure. This was because she was at the intermediate stage of the origin core realm, a level higher than the two of them. This was where it was strange, as in the higher one’s strength was, the stronger the pressure would be. For someone in the tempering realm like Wan’er, although she also felt the pressure, she did not have much of a reaction. She only felt that her breathing was a little uncomfortable and stifled. As for the mortals in the Jiang Mansion, such as Chen Zhong and the others, they did not feel anything at all. They were still doing what they were supposed to do as before. Occasionally, they would pass by the backyard and look at Li Sushang with a strange look in their eyes. Why were the three of them trembling non-stop and staring blankly in the direction of the Patriarch’s training room? <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Not long ago, in the Jiang Mansion’s cultivation room. Jiang Ping was sitting cross-legged in silence. At this moment, Jiang Ping’s eyes were tightly shut and his face was expressionless. However, golden waves of true Qi were circulating around his body. His entire person looked extremely mysterious. Suddenly, Jiang Ping’s eyes opened abruptly. A faint golden light radiated from his eyes. “Did she break through?” Jiang Ping looked in the direction of the courtyard and murmured. In the next moment, a shocked expression flashed in his eyes. “Is this aura the sacred body of the sword path?” “Yes, it is indeed...;” Jiang Ping could feel that his second daughter had successfully broken through to the tempering realm. Moreover, she seemed to have awakened some extraordinary physique. However, he couldn’t act rashly now, nor could he go out and investigate. Because he was also at a crucial moment of breaking through! That’s right, through signing in, Jiang Ping obtained a hollow spirit pill. And this hollow spirit pill was precisely used to help golden core cultivators break through to the nascent soul realm! This kind of pill could even be used as a cornerstone treasure by some middle-tier sects. Of course, such a pill could only be found by chance. It was impossible for ordinary sects to obtain it. “Forget it. I’ll find out after I break through.” Jiang Ping shook his head lightly and tossed the distracting thoughts out of his mind. Then, he closed his eyes. (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) Immediately after, a mystical and mysterious transformation began to occur in his body. Jiang Ping’s entire body suddenly became illusory and transparent. All of his internal organs, bones, and meridians were clearly visible. In his internal Qi field, a golden core the size of half a fist quietly floated. If one looked carefully, one could see that the golden core was slowly rotating. Streams of spiritual Qi flowed out of Jiang Ping’s body and limbs, slowly flowing toward the golden core. It was like a hundred rivers flowing into the sea, like ten thousand Buddhas worshipping their ancestors. It was truly amazing! After absorbing the spiritual Qi, the golden core’s light became even brighter. Countless golden lights spread out from the golden core. Right at this moment, Jiang Ping’s eyes suddenly opened wide. He quickly gestured with both hands, and shadows appeared around him one after another. Jiang Ping suddenly shouted in a low voice, “Break!” As Jiang Ping uttered the word “break”, the golden core in his body suddenly underwent a huge change. The golden core began to expand unstoppably. An incomparably bright light burst out from the golden core. Then, the golden core suddenly began to shake violently. One after another, cracks began to appear on the golden core. A red and golden light interweaved and overflowed from those cracks. It was as if an extremely powerful force was about to break out of it. With the appearance of the cracks, Jiang Ping’s aura also underwent an earth-shaking change. An incomparably powerful, vast, and dense aura poured out from his body. It was like a huge wave that could destroy the world in an instant. “Not good!” Jiang Ping suddenly frowned. The power of this aura was beyond his imagination. If this aura was released recklessly, no one knew what kind of consequences it would bring. It might destroy half of Xiaoyu Town, or attract the attention of the top experts. Jian Ping wasn’t strong enough to deter the most ambitious people. Now was the critical moment for Jiang Ping to break through. He could not allow any unexpected changes to occur! Jiang Ping flipped his slender palm, and the heavenly treasure concealment plate appeared in his hand. Jiang Ping pressed down with his finger, and a stream of rich golden true Qi instantly poured into the heavenly treasure concealment plate. In an instant, the transparent sphere in the center of the heavenly treasure concealment plate suddenly started to rotate. Upon closer inspection, it seemed as if there were thousands of galaxies slowly flowing within it. Then, a white ray of light shot out from within and rapidly expanded. In the blink of an eye, it had surrounded the entire Jiang Mansion. More than half of the terrifying aura that Jiang Ping emitted from his body instantly disappeared. Sensing the marvelous changes, Jiang Ping lowered his head and muttered to himself, “This way, there should be no mistakes!” The heavenly treasure concealment plate was indeed marvelous. It should be enough to conceal his aura. “However, I still have to break through as soon as possible.” “The longer this drags on, the greater the danger!” After solving the problem of his aura leaking out, Jiang Ping did not relax. All kinds of accidents could happen while he was breaking through to the nascent soul realm. Jiang Ping didn’t dare to have any distracting thoughts. He focused on his cultivation to breakthrough. With Jiang Ping’s cultivation, vast amounts of true Qi continuously flowed into his golden core. The size of the golden core was also expanding, and it had already reached an extremely terrifying size. The huge golden core was about to occupy his entire lower abdomen. The cracks on the golden core also grew. As the cracks grew, Jiang Ping’s aura also became stronger. Every time it became stronger, it would be crazily compressed by Jiang Ping again and again. After a while, the entire golden core was full of cracks. It seemed like if Jiang Ping even breathed too hard, the entire golden core would instantly break into pieces. The aura emitted by the golden core was terrifying. The light emitted from it had become almost completely red. Jiang Ping knew that it was time! He suddenly let out a loud shout. The boundless true Qi seemed to be under some kind of pull, and in an instant, it all surged into the golden core. The true Qi was mixed together, like wind blowing from different directions and stirring up a golden red whirlwind. The golden-red whirlwind circled above the golden core without stopping. It tightly wrapped the entire golden core within it. “Bang!” A soft sound was suddenly emitted from within Jiang Ping’s body. The golden-red whirlwind gradually stopped. The true Qi that was wildly flowing in Jiang Ping’s body disappeared in an instant. It suddenly became calm and peaceful, like a vast ocean. Jiang Ping’s breathing suddenly disappeared without a trace. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The terrifying aura that could destroy the world suddenly disappeared. The world seemed to have returned to calm and tranquility. The aura from Jiang Ping’s body was incomparably mysterious. His body was still transparent and illusory. His internal organs, meridians, and bones were all clearly visible. However, the golden core that should have been floating above his internal Qi field had disappeared. It was replaced by an illusory golden-red baby-like figure. Apart from the changes in his body, Jiang Ping’s appearance seemed to have undergone quite a transformation. The most obvious change was in his eyes. Jiang Ping’s eyes became profound and mysterious, as if there were galaxies flowing within them. His skin also became whiter and firmer, as if he was a newborn baby. His entire body also emitted a faintly discernible aura. His every move was perfectly smooth. It was as if he could stir up the power of the world with just a raise of his hand. “Is this the nascent soul realm?” “I’ve finally succeeded in breaking through!” Jiang Ping couldn’t help but let out a low sigh. When he was at the origin core realm, he could feel the vast and vigorous energy within his body. But now, the power he felt was no longer his own. It was an indescribable and unpredictable power that existed between heaven and earth! But he could transform this power into various attacks and spells. This was a completely different realm from the golden core realm! (If you have problems with this website, please continue reading your novel on our new website freewebnovel.com THANKS!) “This nascent soul realm really lives up to its name. I don’t even need to mobilize the true Qi in my body to defeat the enemy!” Looking at the illusory baby in his body, Jiang Ping was also extremely excited. The nascent soul realm was divided into three stages. The beginning stage was the sleeping baby, the intermediate stage was the awakening baby, and the last stage was the divine baby. And each stage was divided into three sub-stages. Now, Jiang Ping was at the first sub-stage of the sleeping baby. Therefore, the baby in his body was only a shadow of a sleeping baby. But even though he had just stepped into the nascent soul realm, his strength had undergone a tremendous change. He believed that if he were to face a cultivator at the peak of the golden core realm, he would not even need to make a move. He would be able to directly defeat his opponent! “Oh yes, Yan’er!” Jiang Ping had just stabilized his cultivation when he hurriedly stood up. Just now, he had already sensed the aura that Yan’er had erupted from her breakthrough. He was thinking about Yan’er in his heart. ...; When Jiang Ping arrived in the backyard, he immediately saw Feng Xinghe and Yu Feiyang shivering. The two old men also saw Jiang Ping at the same time. In an instant, the two of them unconsciously lowered their heads. Initially, they were here to look for Jiang Ping, but now they didn’t dare to speak. Because with just that one glance, they could feel that Jiang Ping had undergone an earth-shattering change. At this moment, the feeling that Jiang Ping gave them was mysterious and profound. It was like a vast, unfathomable ocean. It was also like a vast galaxy, bright and deep. They could not feel the slightest trace of true Qi on Jiang Ping’s body. But when they faced Jiang Ping, it was as if there was a great power forcing them to lower their heads. The two old men lowered their heads and looked at each other. Both of them could guess what was on the other’s mind. Nascent soul realm! Both of them couldn’t help but suck in a breath of cold air. In the entire Tianyun Empire, only a few large sects had nascent soul realm experts. A nascent soul realm expert was already the most formidable level of cultivator in the entire empire! Both of them couldn’t afford to offend such a person. The sect behind them couldn’t afford to offend such a person either! Both of them nodded without leaving a trace. At this moment, they had already made up their minds. After they returned, the first thing they would do was to report the specific situation here to the sect, that a nascent soul realm expert had appeared in Xiaoyu Town, and warn everyone in the sect not to offend Xiaoyu Town. Because that might bring a disaster to the entire sect! Just as they were making plans in their hearts, Jiang Ping had already arrived in front of them. “Why are you here?” Jiang Ping’s voice was still as calm as before, but it made them have the urge to kneel before him. They took a deep breath and forced themselves to calm down. “Patriarch Jiang, the things you ordered us to do have already been done,” they said respectfully to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping nodded and said with a calm expression, “Well, you’ve worked hard. It’s only the eighth day.” “We don’t dare to neglect Patriarch Jiang’s orders!” they answered in unison. Feng Xinghe hesitated for a while and then continued. “Patriarch Jiang, since we’ve completed your orders, do you think you can undo the restrictions on our bodies?” “We still have some urgent matters in the sect that we need to rush back to resolve.” After Feng Xinghe finished speaking, they glanced at Jiang Ping nervously, as if afraid that he would disagree. Jiang Ping did not hesitate at all and nodded lightly. “Since you have completed the tasks that I have instructed you to do, then I will naturally help you remove the restrictions according to our agreement.” “However, you must remember that if similar things happen again, I won’t show any mercy!” “We promise that there won’t be a next time!” The two old men hurriedly patted their chests and said confidently. As for next time, they wouldn’t even dare to come within a hundred miles of Xiaoyu Town. After all, the current Jiang Ping was an expert in the nascent soul realm! Jiang Ping waved his hand casually, and the restriction on the two of them was immediately removed. Feeling the sudden recovery of true Qi, the two of them were overjoyed, and they bowed to Jiang Ping to thank him. “Alright, you guys can go.” However, Jiang Ping gave them an order to leave. Both of them chuckled. They had long been eager to leave this terrifying place. They instantly turned into streams of light and flew into the wind, disappearing from the spot. At this time, the three girls coincidentally arrived at the backyard. “Dad!” The three girls shouted in unison. Jiang Ping had just turned around when the three girls pounced on him. “Oh dear, you’re so heavy!” Jiang Ping hugged the three girls and said with a smile. The three girls just laughed and ignored his complaints. “Dad, what was that oppressive aura just now?” Yan’er pouted and suddenly asked. The smile on Jiang Ping’s face instantly froze when he heard that. He didn’t want the three girls to know his realm, but how was he going to explain this now? Li Sushang looked at Jiang Ping’s awkward expression and couldn’t help but snort softly. When he had broken through just now, he had put her under such strong pressure. Now that she could see Jiang Ping suffer at the hands of the three girls, she really felt a little happy that she had gotten her revenge. Jiang Ping also heard Li Sushang’s soft snort and his sharp eyes suddenly looked at her. Li Sushang quivered before she quickly walked forward to help Jiang Ping out of the predicament. “Oh right, Patriarch, Yan’er seems to have awakened a special physique. I can’t tell what it is. Why don’t you come and take a look?” Jiang Ping took the opportunity to avoid the three girls’ question and hurriedly said to Yan’er. “Yan’er, quickly show me your physique so that I can have a look!” Wan’er exclaimed Yan’er was pleased when she heard that. Then, under Wan’er’s urging, she released the power of her sword body. When he saw the lotus sword pattern between Yan’er’s eyebrows, Jiang Ping’s whole body shook. He blurted out, “This...;this is the spiritual chaos sword physique?!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio ‘The spiritual chaos sword physique could be said to be one in a million. It was a peerless sword physique that was hard to come across in a thousand years! Throughout the ages, anyone who possessed the spiritual chaos sword physique was a peerless and legendary expert! However, in the long annals of history, there were only a handful of almighty experts who had awakened the spiritual chaos sword physique. ‘Those who had such a physique could be said to be as rare as phoenix feathers and unicorn horns, rare throughout history! Previously, when Jiang Ping saw that Yan’er’s cultivation progress was slow, he thought that it was because her talent was mediocre and that she was not suitable for cultivation. In the end, he did not expect that Yan’er would be able to amaze everyone with a single feat. She had directly awakened the spiritual chaos sword physique, and even broke through and become a tempering realm cultivator! This surprise came too suddenly. Even Jiang Ping was a little stunned. His face was filled with shock and disbelief. Seeing this, Yan’er stretched out her small white hands and covered her mouth as she giggled. ‘Dad’s shocked expression was really too interesting!’ Yan’er thought. She did not expect her father to look at her in a daze. He was simply like a big, dumb goose! Her father was only looking at her and not at her sisters. Yan’er was really happy! Yan’er clenched her little fists. She had decided that she would cultivate well in the future. She wanted her father to be amazed by her every time, so he would dote on her the most! A bright light flashed across her big eyes, she smiled sweetly and said, “Dad, what’s wrong? Am I very powerful? You can rest assured in the future. I’ll not only protect Wan’er and Liver, but I’ll also protect you and Auntie Sushang!” ‘Wan’er, who was at the side, immediately pouted when she heard that. Her face was full of displeasure. ‘Roar! Dad only stared at Yan’er. It was already enough to make people unhappy! She even said that she wanted to protect me, Liu’er, Dad, and Auntie Sushang now. I’m the big sister, okay?’ Wan’er thought to herself. ‘Wan’er pouted and couldn’t wait to refute Yan’er. “Dad, I am the big sister. I should be the one to protect Yan’er, Liu’er, and Dad and Auntie Sushang!” “Yan’er, you have just broken through. I have already broken through for a long time. Let me protect you all!” Wan’er patted her little chest and said proudly to Yan’er. Yan’er was also unhappy. She had also broken through. Now everyone was in the tempering realm, okay? She did not want to continue being the younger sister. She wanted to be the elder sister, so she could protect everyone! So, she snorted and said unwillingly, “In the past, it was always Wan’er who protected me and Liu’er. Now that I have broken through, I will protect both of you in the future!” “Hmph, then let’s wait until you can beat me first.” ‘Wan’er did not argue anymore. Her two small arms crossed in front of her chest, and she raised her small face , snorting disdainfully. ‘This instantly angered Yan’er! Her little face flushed red and her cheeks were puffed up with anger. Jiang Ping, who was watching from the side, could not help but hug her and give her a kiss! Yan’er did not know that her father was thinking of kissing her. Her heart was filled with dissatisfaction. In the past, every time she quarreled with Wan’er, she always had the upper hand. Yet was she actually intimidated by Wan’er this time? Absolutely not! She absolutely could not let Wan’er look down on her, much less let her father down! As long as she defeated Wan’er, she would be the big sister. In her father’s heart, she would be an adult. She had to defeat Wan’er! Yan’er looked at Wan’er as if she was looking at a tiger blocking the way. Her two big eyes were wide open and her body was like a gust of wind. With a whoosh, she was about to rush out. “ah!” Yan’er suddenly let out a clear cry. She took a step forward with her left foot and her entire body was about to rush towards Wan’er. ‘Wan’er did not panic at all when she saw this. Instead, she was excited and eager to give it a try. ‘The provoking method that her father had taught her was really effective! After she defeated Yan’er, she would make Yan’er behave like Liu’er, who obediently addressed her as a sister! Just as she was thinking about this, Wan’er took on a stance and curled the corners of her lips. She planned to teach Yan’er a small lesson. She wanted to let her know who the older sister was, and who her father’s most sensible child was! Yan’er had already rushed out. In just a short while, the two little girls were about to collide. The imminent collision was so terrible that it was unbearable to look at… Just at this critical moment, Yan’er suddenly felt as if she was flying. ‘This sudden change shocked Yan’er for quite a while. Then, she heard her father’s slightly serious voice ring in her ear, “Yan’er, Wan’er, do you want to fight in front of me? Have you forgotten what I have taught both of you?” Only then did Yan’er see clearly that her father had grabbed her like an eagle grabbing a chick and sent her into the air. ‘Sob, bad Dad. I am already five years old, and you still want to catch me like you did when I was young and scare me! Wan’er and Yan’er had caused a lot of trouble since they were young, and they had already been reprimanded by Jiang Ping countless times. They had long learned how to “read people’s expressions’. When they saw their father’s stern face and his serious tone, they knew that their father was not really angry. Yan’er immediately acted coquettishly and said, “Dad, I am wrong, Don’t be angry, okay? I will help you soothe your breath!” As she said that, she reached out to touch Jiang Ping’s chest. Unfortunately, her hand was too short. Jiang Ping lifted her up in mid-air, and she could not touch Jiang Ping’s chest no matter what. Looking at Yan’er, who was like a little bear, constantly struggling to soothe his breath, Jiang Ping suddenly felt amused. However, on second thought, Wan’er and Yan’er had not admitted their mistakes. He still had to put on a serious look, he could not let them get away so easily! It was not easy to be “ruthless” and serious when he had such cute children. He had to take this opportunity to educate them properly. Jiang Ping snorted lightly, indicating that he would not fall for Yan‘er’s trick. He said indifferently, “Let’s talk about soothing my breath later. Wan’er, tell me first, what have I taught you before?” Wan’er was instantly startled. She had wanted to act coquettishly just now, but Yan’er had taken the initiative. In the end, her father did not act as usual. In the past, when he was teased by Yan’er, he would beam with joy immediately and acted as if nothing had happened. Was he really angry now? However, there were hundreds and thousands of stuff that her father had taught her before. How would Wan’er know which one was Dad talking about now? Her small hands were twisted behind her back. She twisted her body uneasily and revealed an aggrieved expression. She muttered, “I forgot.” Jiang Ping was so angry that he glared at her. However, looking at Wan’er’s expression, he could not bear to really scold her. If he scolded her until she cried, wouldn’t his heart feel the pain? “Yan‘er, what do you think?” he asked in a muffled voice. Suddenly, Yan’er was also shocked.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Yan’er frowned, her two small eyebrows almost scrunched together. Out of the three sisters, she was usually the most intelligent and quick-witted. But now, her father seemed to be really angry. In a moment of panic, Yan’er couldn’t figure out what her father was talking about. Looking at how anxious she had gotten, Jiang Ping could only sigh helplessly. ‘Sigh, it’s really too difficult for me! It’s hard enough to be the father of one cute daughter, but I’m the father of three cute girls. How could I be ruthless enough to teach my daughter a lesson?” He gently put Yan’er on the ground and sighed. Just as he was about to speak, he saw Liu’er, who had been watching the show, suddenly raise her small hand. She said excitedly, “I know, I know. I still remember what Dad said!” “on?” Jiang Ping was delighted and said softly, “Well, Liu’er, what exactly did I say?” After receiving her father’s permission, Liu’er suddenly became like a proud rooster. She raised her head and puffed out her chest as she walked confidently past Wan’er and Yan’er towards Jiang Ping with small steps. She cleared her throat and signaled to everyone that she was about to speak. Then, she smiled coquettishly and said, “Dad once told us the story about chopsticks.” Then, she stretched out a white and tender little finger and said, “Dad said that a chopstick can be broken very easily as it’s very fragile.” ‘Then, she spread out her two small palms and continued, “But when ten chopsticks are put together, it’s very difficult to break them. Dad wants Wan’er, Yan’er, and me to be united. We should not fight among ourselves. We should be united against the outside world, right?” “Haha!” Jiang Ping was amused. He picked Liv’er up with both hands and directly smacked her pink little face. He smiled and said, “Well, Liu’er is so obedient. Well said. That’s exactly what I said.” 1 “You’re indeed my thoughtful little girl. I love you the most!” Jiang Ping was very satisfied. It seemed that his regular education was not completely useless. For example, Liu’er remembered what she learned clearly. She was really an obedient child! “Hehe, I haven’t forgotten a single word of what Dad said!” After receiving her father’s praise, Liu’er immediately became complacent. She may as well have written the word “smug” on her face. ‘When they saw how affectionate their father and Liu’er were, Wan’er and Yan’er immediately felt extremely upset. Their hearts were filled with regret. ‘Dad had clearly said this principle many times. Why did we forget it?” Both Wan’er and Yan’er thought. Wan’er and Yan’er also wanted their father’s hugs and kisses. They also wanted to be their father’s favorite little girl! ‘When Jiang Ping saw their aggrieved expressions, it was as if he had heard their innermost thoughts. He suddenly stretched out his hand and picked them up. Under the astonished expressions of the three girls, he then kissed Wan’er and Yan’er’s chubby little faces one after another. Then, he chuckled and said, “Wan’er and Yan’er are also my lovely little girls. I also like Wan’er and Yan’er the most!” “Really?!” Wan’er and Yan’er were delighted and asked in unison. “Of course it’s true. Why would I lie to you? Have you forgotten the story I told you? When you lie, your nose will grow longer. Did you see my nose grow longer?” After saying that, he buried his head in the hands of the three girls. ‘Wan’er really touched Jiang Ping’s nose and said happily, “You didn’t lie. Your nose didn’t grow longer!” “Of course. I like Wan’er, Yan’er and Liu’er. Why would I lie to you?” “We also like you the most!” Wan’er and Liu’er laughed in unison and quickly wrapped their arms around Jiang Ping’s neck. “But Dad, I forgot the principle you taught. Am I very useless?” Yan’er drooped her little head and felt a little ashamed in her heart. Her father liked her so much, but yet she did not remember what her father had said. She was not a good child. Jiang Ping was stunned, then he smiled and comforted her. “Yan’er, you are only five years old, and you have already become a tempering realm cultivator. How can you be useless?” “But I forgot what you said!” Yan’er still felt dejected. “It’s normal that you cannot remember everything I said,” Jiang Ping said earnestly. “Just talking about it is not enough. The principle needs to be experienced personally to have a deeper impression.” “Let me ask you, will you still forget what you have learned today in the future?” “Absolutely not! I will never forget it in the future!” Before Jiang Ping could finish speaking, Yan‘er answered firmly with her little fists clenched. “So, how can you be useless? You are also my lovely little girl!” “Yes, I also like Dad the most!” Yan’er could not hold it in any longer and immediately stretched out her little arms to hug Jiang Ping’s neck. The three girls’ small heads were rubbing against his face, which was extremely comfortable for Jiang Ping! Li Sushang, who had been standing silently behind the three girls, could not help but sigh in her heart when she saw this scene. As expected, blood is thicker than water. Being their aunt, she usually treated the three girls so well that she did not even dare to say anything harsh. In the end, when had the girls shown affection to her? ‘All of you like your Dad the most, but what about your aunt? Oh, how infuriating!’ Li Sushang thought. Just as they were rubbing against each other like little dogs, Liu’er suddenly stopped. Her big eyes blinked as she said proudly, “Dad, I have also broken through. Now, I am also in the tempering realm!” “Dad, I can also protect you in the future. I am also not useless!” “Who said you’re useless if you can’t protect Dad?” Jiang Ping asked with a smile. Then, he continued, “In my heart, you’ve always been useful. But it’s really amazing that you have broken through, and you surprised me.” “I didn’t expect that all my three precious daughters are geniuses with outstanding talent!” In fact, Jiang Ping had already sensed that Liu’er had broken through to the tempering realm However, the strange thing was that he actually couldn’t sense what kind of physique Liu’er had? However, the world at large was full of strange things. There were naturally many physiques that were unknown to people, or even unrecorded. Since the physiques that Wan’er and Liu’er had awakened were so strong, the physiques that Liu’er had awakened would definitely not be inferior. Therefore, Jiang Ping didn’t think too much about this matter right now. Now that Liu’er took the initiative to mention it, it was another matter.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping placed the three girls firmly on the ground. Then, he bent down and asked Liv’er with a smile, “Liver, do you know what kind of physique you have awakened?” Liu’er was stunned. ‘Physique? Is that something that can be eaten?’ she thought to herself. ‘No, I remember that a physique is not something that can be eaten. Oh, it seemed that Wan’er had a physique, which was called the ancient divine physique. Yan’er also had a physique, which was called the spiritual chaos sword physique. What about me? Do I have a physique? Liv’er pouted her little mouth and thought hard for a long time. Then she said embarrassedly, “Dad, I don’t know if I have awakened any physique.” “Haha, It’s okay. Don’t feel embarrassed, Liu’er!” Jiang Ping smiled and comforted her. In fact, he was just asking casually. After all, he couldn’t even tell if Liv’er had awakened any physique. If she had, what kind of physique did she awaken… No matter what, Liu’er was only a five-year-old girl. How could she know anything? Therefore, Jiang Ping changed the way he asked, “Liter, do you still remember that when you broke through, did anything special happen? Did you have any special feelings?” “Special things, special feelings?” Liu’er’s small mouth whispered softly. She suddenly remembered that when she broke through, she saw a little girl who looked exactly like her in her mind! She had a very familiar but yet very strange feeling when she saw that little girl. She wanted to get close to that little girl, but once she got close to that little girl, she couldn’t help but feel afraid. Was this the special thing or special feeling that her father referred to? Should she tell her father about this? It seemed that her physique was different from those of her two sisters. Liu’er opened her mouth, but she didn’t say anything. She hesitated for a long time, but in the end, she didn’t say anything. Because she seemed to be a bit confused herself, let alone explain this matter to her father. She shook her head dejectedly and said helplessly, “Dad, I don’t have any special feelings. Have I awakened any physique?” “But my two sisters have awakened their physique. Why am I different from them? Am I not as good as them?” “Okay, okay, Liu’er, don’t let your imagination run wild.” Seeing this, Jiang Ping quickly comforted her. “You must have awakened a very strong physique. It’s just that I can’t see it yet.” “Dad is right. You are very good too!” Wan’er also clenched her small fists to cheer Liu’er on. “Even if you haven’t awakened any physique, I will protect you!” Yan’er patted her small chest and comforted her with an air of confidence. As a result, Liv’er’s expression became even more unsightly when she heard that. Her mouth was pouting so high that it almost touched her nose. It seemed that if she was not careful, sparkling tears would fall. Wan’er suddenly said in a bad mood, “Yar’er, look at you. You only know how to talk nonsense. You forgot what Dad said just now!” Yan’er panicked. She hurriedly waved her hand and said, “I haven’t forgotten. I meant to say that Liu’er must have awakened a very powerful physique. In the future, I will protect Liv’er, and Liver will also protect me, right?” “Yes, right. I will also protect Yan’er, Wan’er, Dad, and Auntie Sushang!” Liver immediately broke into a smile and replied repeatedly. Looking at the scene in front of him, Jiang Ping really smiled from the bottom of his heart. It seemed that the three girls were now more considerate and attentive to each other’s feelings. As a father, he had done really well. But he still had to continue to work hard! However, Li Sushang was not so happy. These girls always placed their father in front of her, and she was always last. In the hearts of the three girls, she would never be comparable to their father! Although she knew that this was reasonable, she could not help but feel uncomfortable! She gave Jiang Ping a look, hinting to him. Jiang Ping immediately understood and said with a smile, “Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liver, are you guys hungry? I will bring you out to eat delicious food!” “Tm hungry!” “Really?” “Delicious food?!” The three girls instantly changed their expressions into one of pleasant surprise. Jiang Ping smiled and said, “Then what are you waiting for? Hurry up and go back to your room to change your clothes and get ready to set off!” “yes!” The three girls jumped up high. Then, like three small whirlwinds, they disappeared on the spot with a whoosh. Jiang Ping clicked his tongue when he saw their speed. As expected, they were still children. When they heard that there was something delicious to eat, they would run faster than the wind! “Patriarch, has Liu’er awakened her physique? Can’t you tell what physique Liv’er has awakened?” After the three girls were gone, Li Sushang finally asked the question that she had been holding back in her heart. Jiang Ping pondered for a moment before saying slowly, “Liu’er must have awakened her physique, but what kind of physique has she awakened? To be honest, I’m completely unsure.” When questioning Liu’er just now, Jiang Ping had noticed Liuer’s every move, expression, and the change in her eyes. How could he not notice that Liu’er was definitely not telling him the truth? Therefore, he was sure that Liu’er must have awakened some kind of physique. It was just that this physique was extremely special. Even he could not see it and Liv’er did not want to not tell him the truth. “Then will this physique hurt Liu’er?” Hearing Jiang Ping admitted that he could not see Liu’er’s physique, Li Sushang immediately panicked. Although she was not as knowledgeable as Jiang Ping, she was not ignorant. She knew that there were some physiques in this world that could even backfire on the possessor of the physique! Although this type of physique was very rare, as long as it existed in this world, it was possible! Before she could determine what physique Liv’er had awakened, she could not completely relax. Back then, when she was asked by the mistress to help take care of the three girls, she had swom that she would not let the three girls suffer the slightest bit of harm! Jiang Ping understood what she was worried about. He shook his head and comforted her, “Definitely not. Although I can’t see what kind of physique Liver has, I can feel it and it won’t hurt Liv’er.” “Besides, I’m here. I definitely won’t let Liv’er suffer any harm!” Jiang Ping said calmly. Under the sunlight, Jiang Ping’s eyes sparkled. They were bright and clear, filled with incomparable determination. Li Sushang didn’t know why, but she suddenly felt very relieved. She let out a long sigh and thought to herself, ‘Miss, you are right about him!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Two flowers bloomed, each representing a branch. Tiangi Sect. ‘The sect that Feng Xinghe was in. Even in the entire Tianyun Empire, the Tiangi Sect was ranked among the top sects. At this moment, in the main hall of the Tiangi Sect, a few figures sat upright. In front of these figures, Feng Xinghe stood alone and was describing something to them. After listening to Feng Xinghe, the man with white hair and a long beard raised his eyebrows and asked in a doubtful tone, “Xinghe, is what you said true?” “How can there be such a talented person in the tempering realm at the age of five or six?” “Person? If they are really in the tempering realm at the age of five or six, I think it would be more appropriate to call them a ‘monster! No, even the word ‘monster’ cannot be used to describe them!” An old man with white hair and a long beard sneered. In fact, he didn’t believe what Feng Xinghe said. If he didn’t know Xinghe well enough to know that he wouldn’t say such nonsense, he would have treated it as a joke. Of course, Xinghe could hear the doubt in their tone, but he wasn’t displeased at all. As the saying went, ‘Seeing is believing. However, even though he had seen it with his own eyes, he was still greatly shocked. Back then, he did not dare to believe it at all! Furthermore, these people only heard his description, so if they were doubtful about this matter, it was totally reasonable! However, he still insisted, “Sect leader and elders, you should know my character and know that I would never joke about such things.” “If anyone else had told us, we would have considered that person a madman and chased him out! If it wasn’t for the fact that we have some understanding of your character, do you think we would be here listening to your explanation?” The one who spoke was still the old man from earlier. Although he questioned the authenticity of what Feng Xinghe said, his personal relationship with Feng Xinghe was quite good. Therefore, he was straightforward and did not have any scruples. Feng Xinghe also knew his character. He said indifferently, “Elder Su, since you don’t believe me, why don’t you come with me personally? When the time comes, it will be clear at a glance whether it is true or not!” “1m not free!” Elder Su waved his sleeve and declared. Then, he added, “I’m only one step away from reaching the golden core realm, so I have to meditate and cultivate. I don’t have the time to waste on you.” Feng Xinghe suddenly chuckled when he heard what he said. He said, “I think you don’t dare to, and not because you want to meditate and cultivate. Am I right?” “If the truth is really as I said, then wouldn’t your face be completely lost?” “Bullsh*t!” Elder Su’s face immediately turned red. He shouted, “What face can I lose? Who will believe it when you tell others? Ask the sect leader. Will he believe it? Even if it’s true, I’m not the only one who will lose face!” “But if it’s fake, you’d be lying to the sect. If that is so, I’ll tear your old bones apart!” ‘When the sect leader heard this, his face immediately became a little embarrassed. He thought to himself, ‘Why am I involved in the argument between both of you? Moreover, can you blame me? If news of this matter was spread, no one would believe it! Even though he was ridiculing them, as the leader of a sect, he still had to step out and mediate at this moment. “Alright, Elder Feng and Elder Su, both of you are pillars of our Tiangi Sect and have been old friends for many years, don’t let this small matter affect our harmony!” Both of them looked at each other when they heard that. In the end, they both snorted and turned their heads away at the same time. Looking at this, the sect leader felt helpless again, “Elder Feng, you don’t understand Elder Su’s intentions. He wants to save your face!” “To be honest, you really can’t blame everyone for not believing you. After all, this matter sounds too shocking.” How could Feng Xinghe not understand? Just now, he was also in a fit of anger and had only exchanged a few words with Elder Su. Now that the sect leader had personally given him a way out, it would be insensible if he didn’t follow through. Feng Xinghe nodded and said, “Sect leader and elders, I know you don’t believe what I said, but I guarantee with my life that this matter is absolutely true!” “Sect leader and elders, please take the trouble to go to Xiaoyu Town with me. When the time comes, we will know whether it is true or not!” Looking at Feng Xinghe’s determination, the people present couldn’t help but mutter to themselves. Could it be that this was true and that there really were five or six-year-old body tempering realm cultivators in the world? “Fine, since that’s the case, then I will accompany Elder Feng to make a trip personally!” After a long time, the sect leader finally interrupted the murmurs of the crowd and made his final decision. “Good! Elder Su, the sect leader has decided to see it for himself. I wonder if you’re interested in going to take a look together?” Feng Xinghe looked at Elder Su and said “provocatively’. He wanted to let his old friend know that he really did not lie to him and did not make fun of him! Elder Su snorted. Although he was not convinced, he did not refuse again. “In that case, I will accompany the sect leader. However, if it is fake, then you will suffer!” “Haha, the one who will suffer is definitely not me!” Feng Xinghe smiled proudly. Then, he asked, “Elders, what do you think?” The rest of the elders shook their heads. They wanted to take a look. However, their relationship with Feng Xinghe was not as close as Elder Su’s. Regardless of whether this was true or not, one of them would lose face. ‘When the time came, it would be hard to avoid a ruckus and non-stop argument. What was the point of joining in? Anyway, with the sect leader leading them, nothing would happen! Feng Xinghe did not force them. Instead, he said to the sect leader, “Sect leader, there’s something I have to say first. Although those little girls’ father looks like in his early twenties, his cultivation might have already…reached the nascent soul realm!” Boom!! Everyone’s hearts felt as if they had been struck by a huge stone. The entire hall was so quiet that only the sound of heartbeats could be heard. “ant” After a long while, the sect leader was the first to react. He raised his brows and said, “Nascent soul realm? Elder Feng, you’re not joking, right?” “Everything that I said, I saw with my own eyes!” Feng Xinghe said without hesitation. Although he wasn’t sure, the pressure that Jiang Ping gave him was definitely not something that an origin core realm cultivator possessed. After all, the sect leader was an advanced stage origin core realm cultivator who had successfully condensed a golden core. If Jiang Ping was also an origin core realm cultivator, Feng Xinghe would definitely be able to sense it! The sect leader fell silent again. Nascent soul realm. The number of sects that had a nascent soul realm cultivator in the entire Tianyun Empire could be counted with one’s fingers. Those nascent soul realm cultivators were usually majestic figures who dominated a region. Would such figures live in seclusion in a small town? The impact of this news was as great as the news of a five or six-year-old tempering realm cultivator! After all, it was hard to believe that a five or six-year-old was a tempering realm cultivator, but a nascent soul realm cultivator in his early twenties could even decide their life and death! At the same time. A similar scene happened at Luo Shan Gate where Yu Feiyang was at…. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Outside Xiaoyu Town. Feng Xinghe was trekking through the mountains and rivers. The sect leader of Tianqi Sect and Elder Su were following behind him. After walking for a while, Elder Su couldn’t hold it in anymore and asked angrily, “Old monster Feng, what is the meaning of this? Why are you making us walk? And we have been walking for so long, why haven’t we reached Xiaoyu Town yet?” Feng Xinghe glanced at him. Watching Elder Su get defeated was really enjoyable, but his face didn’t reveal the slightest bit of complacency. Instead, he said unhurriedly, “What’s the hurry? We’ve only walked less than fifty miles, and we’re halfway there!” “The one in Xiaoyu Town said that within a hundred miles’ radius of the town, we can’t use our cultivation to attack, or else we’ll become enemies with him! Can you bear the fury of a nascent soul realm cultivator? I am doing this for your own good, do you understand?” “You!” Elder Su was so angry that he immediately blew his beard and glared. He didn’t doubt Feng Xinghe’s words. On the contrary, he was more and more convinced right now that there was a nascent soul realm cultivator in Xiaoyu Town. After all, those nascent soul realm cultivators had weird tempers and each had his own rules. If you broke their rules, they could chase you to the ends of the earth! But when these words came out of Elder Feng’s mouth, and he was using such a tone, his blood immediately surged up. “Alright, stop talking!” The sect leader helplessly shouted at Elder Su who was about to make a move. As long as these two old fellows met, it would be like a needle against a grain of wheat, and they would never stop! He could occasionally suppress it because of his identity as the sect leader. “We’ve already walked for two hours, and we’re only halfway there. If we don’t hurry up, I’m afraid we’ll have to sleep in the wilderness!” After he finished speaking, he didn’t wait for the two of them to respond and walked forward first. In fact, if one looked carefully, one would notice that his feet were still slightly off the ground as he walked. This was the symbol of the origin core realm. Even if he didn’t use his martial arts, he would still be able to walk like the wind. An ordinary person would need to walk for more than half a day to walk that distance, but it would only take one or two hours for an origin core realm cultivator! Feng Xinghe and Elder Su both snorted. Both of them just wanted to teach the other a lesson. But in the end, they didn’t make a move. After glaring at each other for a while, they temporarily “stopped and followed the sect leader. In front of the Jiang family’s courtyard in Xiaoyu Town. Feng Xinghe took the lead and said to the guard in front of the gate, “My two young friends, I am Feng Xinghe. I need to see Patriarch Jiang. Please go in and inform him. As long as you mention my name, Patriarch Jiang will naturally know.” “Oh, it’s you!” At the gate, someone also recognized Feng Xinghe. “Aren’t you the one who came to our Jiang family with another old man a few days ago?” “Yes, yes, yes. Young friend, you have a good memory!” Feng Xinghe quickly echoed. He didn’t expect that someone would still remember him after a few days. It seemed that this trip wouldn’t be in vain. ‘The guard chuckled and said, “Our Xiaoyu Town is only a small place. It’s rare to see an old man with a sage-like demeanor like you. I won’t forget you after seeing you once!” “There are a few old…distinguished guests behind you. Please wait for a moment. I’ll go in and report to the patriarch right away.” “Thank you!” Feng Xinghe was extremely excited. He quickly cupped his hands and said. “You’re too polite. But by the way, have you arranged this with that old man that day? He had just brought a few old men here. Why did you follow after him The guard mumbled to himself again. Then, without waiting for Feng Xinghe to reply, he rushed into the courtyard. After a while, Feng Xinghe finally reacted. Who else could it be other than Yu Feiyang who came with him that day?! Although he had already guessed that Yu Feiyang would definitely report to the sect when he returned, he didn’t expect them to act so quickly and even beat him to it?! He and Yu Feiyang had fought for their entire lives and had never been willing to lag behind. Hence, he was immediately angered when he heard the news. “Hmph, Yu Feiyang, what’s the use of you coming so quickly? Haven’t you heard of the saying ‘stupid birds fly first’? Haven’t you heard of the saying ‘slow and steady wins the race’? Even if you beat me to it now, those girls can only be disciples of Tiangi Sect!” Feng Xinghe thought. Soon, the three of them were led to the backyard by the guards who had returned. Feng Xinghe saw Yu Feiyang standing respectfully in front of Jiang Ping at a glance! It was indeed that old fellow! Beside him were the sect leader of Luo Shan Gate and an elder of their sect. His gaze passed through the three of them and landed on Jiang Ping, who was standing opposite them. At this moment, Jiang Ping was lying on a bamboo cane chair, leisurely drinking tea. The three little girls were massaging his shoulders and legs, and the female butler who was at the origin core realm was also standing beside him. Feng Xinghe immediately said in a deep voice, “Patriarch Jiang, I have brought the sect leader of Tianqi Sect and Elder Su to pay you a visit! Please forgive us for disturbing you.” Hearing his voice, Yu Feiyang and the others immediately turned around and met eyes with Feng Xinghe and the others. The moment their eyes met, they were both filled with hatred. ‘The Tianqi Sect and the Luo Shan Gate had been enemies for many years. They were no strangers to each other, and they were filled with unresolvable grudges. The moment they saw each other, they immediately assumed a stance, as if they were about to make a move at the slightest disagreement. Jiang Ping sipped his tea and didn’t even lift his eyelids. He only said coldly, “If you want to fight, go fight outside of Xiaoyu Town!” “If you dare to make a move here and destroy any brick or tile, any blade of grass or tree, then it won’t be as simple as asking you guys to clean up again.” Although he said it calmly, there was something faintly threatening about his tone. The people on both sides instantly shivered when they heard that. They were all origin core realm experts, and their perception far surpassed ordinary people. In addition, Jiang Ping intentionally displayed his realm through his voice to intimidate everyone. Therefore, they could naturally sense that the cultivation strength of the person who spoke was absolutely above the origin core realm! Above the origin core realm, wasn’t that the nascent soul realm?! The sect leader of Tianqi Sect and Elder Su instantly had no more doubts, and their expressions instantly became respectful. The sect leader cupped his hands in a salute and said respectfully, “I am the sect leader of Tianqi Sect, Qie Ting. I was disrespectful for a moment. Please forgive me, senior!” “Please forgive me, senior!” Elder Su also echoed. Although he had scoffed at Feng Xinghe’s words earlier, he was not a fool. He knew when to lower his head. The other party was obviously a nascent soul realm expert. If he still put on airs in front of the other party, wouldn’t he be asking for death? Jiang Ping snorted and did not seem to forgive them. He said in a bad mood, “I don’t deserve to be called senior. All of you look older than me, how can I be your senior?” “Senior, you must be joking!” Qie Ting said embarrassedly, “In the path of cultivation, the one who has reached the peak is the senior. You are still young, but you have already reached the nascent soul realm. You deserve to be our senior!” “We have unintentionally disturbed your cultivation, and we feel really guilty and uneasy!” Hearing that, Jiang Ping glanced at him and nodded indifferently. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping glanced at Qie Ting, the sect leader of the Tianqi Sect. Advanced-stage origin core realm, golden core realm cultivator. His cultivation was quite strong, and he was on the same level as the sect leader of Luo Shan Gate. However, he was more polite than the people of Luo Shan Gate, and he didn’t seem to be that annoying. It was just that…Qie Ting? There was actually someone with the surname ‘Qie’. It was really eye-opening. Jiang Ping retracted his gaze. Although he had roughly guessed what they were here for, he still asked, “Tianqi Sect? I don’t seem to have any impression of this sect, and I have nothing to do with you.” “Lwonder what you’re here for. Could it be that you’re here for the same reason as the people of Luo Shan Gate?” “If it is, then you’d better not say anything, because I won’t agree to it.” Qie Ting immediately raised his eyebrows when he heard this. “We haven’t even said anything yet, and the other party already knew our intention? Oh right, what were we planning to do? I almost forgot we were here to see if there was a little girl who had entered the tempering realm at the age of five or six,’ Qie Ting thought. Just as he was thinking, his gaze naturally landed on Wan’er and the other two. ‘When they first came in, their gazes were focused on those people from Luo Shan Gate. Then they only paid attention to Jiang Ping who was in the nascent soul realm. It wasn’t until now that he recalled what the purpose of the visit was. He noticed that the little girls who were massaging Jiang Ping’s waist and legs were really in the tempering realm! From their looks, weren’t they just five or six-year-old little girls? ‘The slower kids probably could not even walk stably yet at that age. But these little girls had already reached the tempering realm?! This family was full of monsters. Their father was only in his early twenties, and he was already a mighty cultivator in the nascent soul realm. ‘The three daughters were even more outrageous. At the age of five or six, they had already crossed the threshold that many people would never be able to cross in their entire lives, and became true cultivators! Although Qie Ting was excited, he did not have an exaggerated expression on his face. ‘The hot-tempered Elder Su was more emotional. His body visibly trembled, and he blurted out excitedly, “Monsters, these little girls are really monsters!” “At such a young age, they have already broken through to the body tempering realm. This is simply unheard of, and is rarely seen in history!” “Little girls, do you want to train with me? I promise that in the future, your achievements will definitely be above mine!” Elder Su said to the three little girls with a “kind” expression. His appearance instantly reminded Wan’er and her siblings of the story their father had told them. ‘The way he behaved was the same as how some of the bad guys deceived and kidnapped children! Liu’er was so scared that she took two steps back. ‘Wan’er quickly stood up, waved her little fists, and said arrogantly, “Bad guy, don’t come over. We won’t go with you. If you want to kidnap us, I will beat you!” Ugh… Elder Su didn’t expect that he would be treated as a kidnapper! This was really extremely embarrassing! Jiang Ping almost could not hold back his laughter. In order to prevent the three girls from running around all day, Jiang Ping used to tell them all kinds of scary stories in the past. The most common ones were the stories of human traffickers. In his stories, those human traffickers used honeyed words, and they hid a dagger behind their smiles. On the surface, they were amicable but they were all deceiving children. In reality, they were all vicious and merciless. They would sell children to faraway places, and these children would never return home! If they couldn’t return home, they naturally wouldn’t be able to see their father. Therefore, every time they heard this story, the three little girls would be so scared that their faces would turn pale and they wouldn’t dare to go out for several days. He never expected that in the eyes of Wan’er and the others, the ‘kind-looking’ Elder Su would become a detestable human trafficker! However, how should he put it? Yes, Elder Su’s smile was indeed a little stiff and creepy. It was not Wan’er’s fault for misunderstanding. Just as Elder Su was about to explain, Yu Feiyang, who was at the side, secretly mocked him. “Some people are really bold and reckless. Senior Jiang has already told us not to mention the topic of taking in disciples.” “He ignored what Senior Jiang had said. Not only did he want to take these girls as disciples, but he also revealed such a frightening expression. I’m afraid he’s going to scare the girls!” As soonas he said this, those people’s expressions from Tiangi Sect instantly became extremely ugly. They had just arrived, so how would they know what the people from the Luo Shan Gate had said to Jiang Ping just now? ‘As the leaders of large sects, they naturally wanted to take Wan’er and the others in as disciples when they saw these girls had good potential. However, they had guessed that the people from the Luo Shan Gate must have also proposed the idea of taking Wan’er and the others in as disciples, and they were sternly rejected! From the looks of it, this mighty figure did not intend to let his daughters go to another sect to cultivate! If they offended this mighty figure because of this, then they would really be in big trouble. Feng Xinghe immediately retorted, “Bullshit! How would our sect know what you guys said? From the looks of it, senior must have rejected your idea, right?” Elder Su quickly reacted and hurriedly chimed in, “That’s right, why don’t you guys do some reflection? How could a filthy sect like yours be worthy of taking in the three daughters of a mighty figure as disciples?” “If you think my expression is scary, then your face can scare a dead person back to life!” “You!” Yu Feiyang and the other two were instantly furious. “Am I not telling the truth? Why don’t you guys make a ‘kind’ expression and see for yourself?” “I can’t be bothered to argue with you, you bunch of idiots!” Yu Feiyang retorted. Then, he really stopped arguing. Qie Ting shook his head helplessly. With a perturbed heart, he tried to figure out how to explain it to Jiang Ping. Then, he heard Jiang Ping say calmly, “Alright, you guys are really noisy. Are you going to let us rest?” “Those who are ignorant about my attitude towards recruiting my daughters as disciples are not to blame. However, I will make it clear once again. I will teach my daughters myself. I will not let them enter any sect to cultivate.” ‘As soon as these words were said, everyone’s eyes instantly dimmed. There were three girls with high potential right in front of them, yet they were unable to recruit them into the sect. It was as if they saw a pile of money on the ground, yet they couldn’t pick it up. It was unbearable! Qie Ting was still unwilling to give up. He braced himself and said tentatively, “Senior, please allow me to say a few more words.” “although Tiangi Sect isn’t a first-class sect in the Tianyun Empire, it is backed by a very large sect that spans across many countries.” “As long as your three daughters join Tiangi Sect, they’ll definitely be able to enter that larger sect to cultivate in the near future. At that time, they’ll receive cultivation resources and guidance from almighty experts…” Halfway through his sentence, he forcefully swallowed the rest of his words. That was because he suddenly felt Jiang Ping’s gaze on him, cold as a blade! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping looked coldly at Qie Ting. He had thought this guy understood basic etiquette. Why didn’t he understand human language? He had made it clear that it was impossible for him to let his daughters join their sect! In the end, Qie Ting kept nagging. He must be tired of living! If it weren’t for his daughters, Jiang Ping would have thrown them on the street like sandbags. Avery big sect? No matter how awesome the sect was, it wasn’t as awesome as the system! Could his cultivation resources be compared with the resources produced by the omnipotent system? ‘With those skills, you still dare to talk nonsense in front of me? I think you’re tired of living!” he thought to himself. Jiang Ping snorted coldly and said disdainfully, “What big sect? In my eyes, you’re just a bunch of useless people.” “You guys don’t have the qualifications to teach my daughters! Hurry up and scram before I lose my temper. Otherwise, you might have to stay here forever!” Instantly, everyone’s hearts trembled. Even a fool could hear the threat in Jiang Ping’s words. ‘They didn’t mind his contemptuous words. In this world where strength reigned supreme, as long as you were strong, no one could refute you. On the contrary, they felt that they had done something wrong. It would be an absolute disaster for them and their sect if they angered a nascent soul realm expert! Although Qie Ting was very unwilling, he hurriedly apologized, “I’ve offended you. Please forgive me, senior. Since that’s the case, we won’t disturb you anymore. Goodbye.” After he finished speaking, he bowed deeply to Jiang Ping. Elder Su and Feng Xinghe, who were beside him, also hurriedly bowed and apologized. Jiang Ping nodded indifferently and didn’t say anything else. He just waved his hand. ‘The three of them didn’t dare to delay any longer and turned around to leave the Jiang Mansion, leaving behind those people from Luo Shan Gate who had yet to leave. Jiang Ping turned his gaze to the three of them and frowned. He said coldly, “The people from Tiangqi Sect have already left. Is there anything else I can do for the three of you?” “Senior, you must be joking. We should be the ones who do things for you!” Yu Feiyang said with an apologetic smile. “Don’t flatter me!” Jiang Ping said unhappily, “I think you guys want to stay here forever. Don’t you?” “We know that you are hospitable.” The sect leader of Luo Shan Gate pretended not to understand what Jiang Ping meant and continued, “We know of your love for his daughters.” “However, I think that if you love them, you should respect their opinions. If you really want the best for them, why don’t we listen to their opinions first?” Jiang Ping was stunned. “This guy doesn’t give up until he is faced with grim reality. Do you think I’m stupid? Jiang Ping thought. “Okay, since you say so, I’ll let you give up this time!” Jiang Ping asked the three girls again, “Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er, do you want to leave home with these guys, leaving me and your Auntie Sushang, and go outside to cultivate?” Those people from Luo Shan Gate immediately revealed a smug expression as if their plan had succeeded. The three of them rubbed their stiff faces and squeezed out a smile that was uglier than crying. They grinned and said to the three girls, “How about following us to Luo Shan Gate to cultivate?” “As long as you come to Luo Shan Gate, you will have delicious food and fun activities every day!” “As long as you come to Luo Shan Gate, many of us will teach you cultivation. You will soon become very powerful people!” They were like salesmen, trying to sell the “benefits” of Luo Shan Gate to the three girls. Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liv’er immediately shrank towards Jiang Ping’s body. Their movements and expressions were like little white rabbits that had seen a big bad wolf. The three little girls replied in overlapping voices. “No, I don’t want to go with you. You are human traffickers who specialize in abducting and selling children!” said Wan’er. “Idon’t want to go with you either. I want to be with Wan’er, Liu’er, Dad, and Auntie Sushang forever.” “Dad, quickly chase them away. I am afraid!” Liver said with a sobbing tone. “Alright, I will chase them away now. You are the best, so don’t cry.” Jiang Ping quickly comforted her. His face darkened, and he said coldly to Yu Feiyang and the other two, “You’ve heard them. What else do you have to say now? If not, I do have something to say. You have scared my daughters. How should we settle this?” They immediately felt as if they had fallen into a cesspool. They had laughed at Elder Su just now, but now they were in the same predicament and they couldn’t laugh at it now. Yu Feiyang stuttered, “Patriarch Jiang, we’ve been presumptuous in this matter. We’re here to apologize to your three daughters.” “Since your three daughters have no intention of leaving home to cultivate, then we’ll take our leave. We’ll pay a visit another day and apologize.” “There’s no need for that. Scram!” Jiang Ping replied coldly. The three of them looked at one another. Although they were extremely unwilling, they could only leave helplessly. “Phew, these frightening old men are finally gone!” After everyone left, Wan’er instantly felt better. It was like a sunny day after rain. “That’s right. These old men are very evil. I can tell that they are evil with just one look!” Yan’er pouted and said unhappily. Jiang Ping almost spat out the tea that he had just drunk when he heard this. He had said such a sentence in front of the three girls a few times, and Yan’er had actually remembered it. He had to be careful when he spoke in front of them in the future! Liver pounced on Jiang Ping and hugged him tightly. “Dad, I will never leave you. I will always be with Wan’er, Yan’er, Dad, and Auntie Sushang.” “Me too!” said Wan’er and Yan’er. The two girls also pounced on Jiang Ping and hugged him tightly. Jiang Ping was amused by their funny looks and laughed. “Don’t worry. I will never leave you too.” “But there’s no water in the teapot. Can any of you help me get some hot water in the kitchen?” “Tcan!” The three girls answered in unison. ‘Wan’er had the fastest reaction. She picked up the empty teapot and ran to the kitchen. “You are really too much, Wan‘er!” “You broke the rules, Wan’er!” Yan’er and Liu’er muttered a few words and quickly followed, afraid that they would be left behind. After they left, Li Sushang said faintly, “You sent the three girls away purposedly. What do you want to tell me?” Jiang Ping looked at her and smiled helplessly. “Since you’ve been with me for a few years, you can see through my thoughts. I cannot hide anything from you.” Li Sushang snorted. Although she did not say anything, she looked proud.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping ignored the smug Li Sushang. He looked up at the horizon. After a long while, Li Sushang finally could not hold it in anymore. She said calmly, “We have been living in seclusion in Xiaoyu Town for several years, haven’t we?” “In the past, we deliberately hid in the countryside because we didn’t want to attract attention. We were afraid that someone would eye on Wan’er and her siblings.” “Now it seems that Xiaoyu Town has been completely exposed. We can’t stay here any longer. It’s time for us to leave.” Li Sushang’s body trembled slightly when she heard this. In fact, over the past few years, she had long gotten used to these kinds of quiet and peaceful days. Her greatest wish was that Wan’er and her siblings could grow up healthily. If she could, she really hoped that she could maintain her life in Xiaoyu Town. However, she also knew that Jiang Ping was right. In the past, she could enjoy peace in Xiaoyu Town and did not have to worry about anything in the world. But it was different now. Take the Tianqi Sect that appeared today and the people from Luo Shan Gate as an example. They were all eyeing Wan’er and her siblings. As the saying goes, one was not afraid of thieves stealing, but afraid of thieves remembering! Although they didn’t dare to be presumptuous in front of Jiang Ping today, that didn’t mean that they didn’t have other thoughts! Jiang Ping definitely couldn’t always be by his daughters’ side. One day, he might give these people a chance to take advantage of him. The best way was to leave Xiaoyu Town! As Li Sushang thought about it, she said indifferently, “Where do you want to move to?” Although her tone was calm without a trace of emotion, Jiang Ping knew that she had agreed. He pondered for a moment and said slowly, “Fusheng City.” “Okay,” Li Sushang did not hesitate at all. After replying, she left the place and went back to her room to pack her things. Looking at her back, Jiang Ping smiled helplessly. He really didn’t know why this woman could be so calm and straightforward. Soon, Wan’er and her siblings came back with a pot of hot tea each. “Dad, this pot of tea is the one you drank just now. I gave Yan’er and Liver their teapots in the kitchen, so you should drink mine!” Wan’er said proudly as she raised the teapot to the height of her head. Yan’er and Liu’er were immediately unconvinced. They argued in unison, “Wan’er, you’re shameless. You stole our teapot!” “Dad, drink mine. I will pour tea for you.” After saying that, Liu’er stood on the stool and carefully prepared to pour tea into Jiang Ping’s teacup. Jiang Ping did not say anything and quickly reached out to take the teapot from her hand when he saw that. He put his other hand behind Liv’er to stop her. When he held the teapot, he did not feel that it was very heavy. The water in the teapot was probably not even one-third of its original volume. The three girls probably argued in the kitchen. After understanding the situation, the kitchen helper had given the other two girls a teapot each so that all of them were evenly matched. The kitchen helper had also taken into consideration that these girls would not be able to walk steadily, and the hot water would spill out and burn them, so she had poured only a little water. Jiang Ping was extremely pleased when he saw his daughters treating him well! He took his daughters’ teapots one by one, then poured some tea into his teacup until it was a full cup. Then he drank it all in one go. He drank it twice to his heart’s content before chuckling, “Alright, I have drunk all the tea in your teapot. Are you all satisfied now?” The three little girls pouted. It was obvious that their father was trying to reconcile disputes! If all the tea in the three teapots was drunk, then who had the best drink? Jiang Ping ignored his daughters’ silent protest and pulled them in front of him. He smiled and said, “Alright, Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liver, the tea that you poured is all delicious!” “As long as it’s the tea you made for me, I will drink it all!” The little unhappiness the three girls initially felt in their hearts was immediately forgotten when they heard that. “Twill make tea for you every day from now on!” Wan’er said. “Talso want to make tea. I want to make tea every day, but also in the morning, in the afternoon, and at night!” Yan‘er said as she counted her fingers. “Then, I will immediately prepare tea whenever I see you finish drinking.” Liv’er was unwilling to be left behind. However, the time frames had all been mentioned by Yan’er, so she could only say that. Jiang Ping could not help but force himself to laugh dryly when he heard what his daughters said. If they really made tea for him every day in this manner, he would become a bucket that would be constantly filled with tea. Fora moment, he really felt as if he had thrown a stone at his own feet. He quickly changed the topic and said, “Wan’er, Yan‘er, and Liv’er, Ihave something to tell you guys.” “Thave discussed with Auntie Sushang just now. We’re planning to move. What do you guys think?” “Move?” The three little girls were all stunned. Why did they suddenly have to move? “Dad, are you afraid of those human traffickers?” Wan’er raised her eyebrows. Then she said, “Dad, you don’t have to be afraid. I will protect Yan’er and Liu’er!” Jiang Ping suddenly laughed and said, “Wan’er, what are you thinking? It’s just a few human traffickers. Why would I care about them?” Jiang Ping couldn’t help but secretly amazed. Although Wan’er was usually noisy, she was really quick-witted! “Then why do we have to move?” Yan’er asked in puzzlement. Jiang Ping said gently, “That’s because Xiaoyu Town is too small. You thought it was okay when you were young.” “Now that you are growing up, you will start to feel that Xiaoyu Town is too small for you. There are too few places to play and too few delicious things. You could even walk out of Xiaoyu Town easily, so it’s not fun at all.” “What if we move to Fusheng City? That place is much more lively than Xiaoyu Town. Wan’er, you can play with more people, eat more good things, ride horses, and set off fireworks…” “Do you think we should move to Fusheng City?” “yes! Yes!” The three girls did not have any objections. Although Jiang Ping’s description was very simple, they were already able to imagine the fun and lively Fusheng City! In the school, many children had been to Fusheng City. There were also many delicious and fun things that they bought back from Fusheng City. So, they had long been filled with curiosity and yearning for Fusheng City. After listening to what Jiang Ping said, they couldn’t wait to fly straight there! “Well, it’s better to be early than late. Everyone should start packing quickly!” Jiang Ping was proud of his wits. He shouted again, “Our destination is Fusheng City!” “Our destination is Fusheng City!” The three girls looked at one another excitedly and echoed in unison.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Fusheng City. It was a city located in the southwest of the Tianyun Empire. In the entire empire, Fusheng City was only a small city. However, Fusheng City was quite spectacular in the southwest region. Compared to Xiaoyu Town, it was totally different. The streets were bustling with people most of the time. ‘As soon as they entered the city, Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er were mesmerized by the bustling scene on the streets. “Dad, Dad, Look! It’s so lively over there!” Wan’er pointed at a group of people who were juggling on the side of the road and said excitedly to Jiang Ping, “Dad, what are they doing? Why are they putting a big rock on that person lying on the ground?” Jiang Ping glanced at them and said indifferently, “Oh, they are going to crush that rock on his chest.” “Crushing a big rock on his chest?” Wan’er repeated with a puzzled look. “Yes, they are putting a big rock on the person lying on the ground, and then someone will take a big hammer and smash it down!” Jiang Ping explained while waving his hand and gesturing. “ah!” The three girls were immediately shocked. “Then…will that person be smashed to death?” Wan’er stuttered as she asked. “That won’t happen. That person is very skilled. When the hammer smashes down, the rock will shatter, but that person will be completely fine.” Jiang Ping patted Wan’er’s head and explained with a smile. ‘Wan’er pouted. It was obvious that she didn’t quite believe Jiang Ping’s words. At this moment, the juggler moved. ‘A strong man raised a large hammer high above his head and smashed it down. Boom! ‘The hammer hit the rock and instantly produced a deafening sound. ‘The huge rock instantly shattered into pieces and fell to the ground. ‘The man lying on the ground patted the rock debris on his body and stood up with a whoosh. He bowed to the crowd around him and said with a smile, “Thank you very much. If you have money, please support me financially. If not, please also support me by being present!” ‘The crowd burst into thunderous applause when they saw that he was not injured at all. ‘The copper coins were thrown into the center of the stage like snowflakes. Although this was a cultivation world, there were still many people with blocked veins who could not cultivate. The currency used by these people was gold, silver, and copper coins, which was different from the spirit stones that cultivators liked to trade. “Amazing!” ‘Wan’er couldn’t help but clap her hands. Jiang Ping chuckled and took out some scattered silver from his bag and threw it out. As this performance could make his precious daughter laugh, it was worth offering him this amount of silver! “Dad, he’s really good, just like you said!” “Of course.” Wan’er asked again, “Dad, how did he do it? Is his chest harder than a rock?” “Just about, there’s actually nothing surprising about it.” Jiang Ping waved his hand and said indifferently. In fact, there was nothing much to say about it. Jiang Ping could tell at a glance that the man had already broken through to the tempering realm and was a cultivator who specialized in refining the body. His chest might really be harder than a rock. Such a performance was only good in front of these ordinary people who didn’t have any cultivation. If he had met a cultivator, he might not even bother to look at it! Logically speaking, as long as Wan’er and her siblings trained their bodies, they could easily do this. Of course, Jiang Ping would never let his daughters do such a thing. If they accidentally got hurt, he would be the one whose heart would ache. “Dad, Dad, I want to play with dolls!” “Dad, I want to eat candy!” On the street, the three little girls’ voices rose one after another. “Okay, one candy for each one of you. After you take it, we’ll go and play with dolls. Tell me which dolls you like, and I will get it for you!” They entered Fusheng City in the early morning. They only reached a quiet courtyard at sunset. “Uncle Zhong, is this the place?” Jiang Ping glanced at the courtyard and asked. ‘As early as yesterday, he had instructed Chen Zhong to enter the city and find a better courtyard first. Chen Zhong was quite efficient. In just a day, he found a rather elegant courtyard. In terms of size, this place was even bigger than the Jiang Mansion in Xiaoyu Town. In terms of architectural layout, it was obvious the work of a master. It was exquisite, unique and ingenious. In terms of location, it was also very much in line with Jiang Ping’s intentions. It was far away from the bustling city, so it would not be noisy on normal days. However, it was not a remote place either, so it did not have that kind of lifeless feeling. Chen Zhong quickly replied, “Yes, Patriarch. This is the courtyard that I found. I wonder if you are satisfied?” “Mm, not bad. I can be relieved if the job is done by you.” Jiang Ping could not help but praise Chen Zhong. Chen Zhong was instantly overjoyed when he heard the praise. He felt that even his back had straightened quite a bit! Jiang Ping turned around again and asked the three little girls, “Wan‘er, Yan’er, Liu’er, we will live here from now on. What do you guys think?” “Really?” ‘The three little girls’ eyes suddenly widened and became as big as stars. Although they had not visited the whole courtyard, this place was already better than the Jiang family in Xiaoyu Town. Plus, there was a sense of novelty, so they were naturally very happy. Jiang Ping understood and chuckled, “It seems that you’re all very satisfied?” “That’s great then. This will be our new home from now on. Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liver, why don’t the three of you go and pick your own room?” “Yes!” ‘The three little girls were overjoyed. They hopped around the courtyard. Looking at them, Li Sushang could only let out a bitter laugh. She quickly followed and shouted, “Slow down, don’t fall!” “Patriarch, it seems that the young ladies like this place!” Looking at the three happy girls, Chen Zhong also felt happy from the bottom of his heart. Jiang Ping nodded and asked again, “How much is this house?” Chen Zhong’s face immediately sank, but he didn’t answer for a long time. “Why, is this house very expensive?” Jiang Ping also sensed that something was wrong with him, so he raised his eyebrows and asked. “Yes and no,” Chen Zhong answered helplessly. Then he continued to explain, “The original owner of this house was a cultivator, so…the thing he wanted was a bit special.” “What is it?” Jiang Ping was also quite surprised. He didn’t expect to get involved with a cultivator when he bought a house. What a coincidence! Chen Zhong slowly stretched out a finger and said with a bitter expression, “He said that he wants a high-quality spirit stone.” “But he also said that if it really doesn’t work, two thousand silver is also fine.” Chen Zhong hurriedly added as he was afraid that Jiang Ping would be in a difficult position. In the end, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but laugh when he heard that. ‘Two thousand silver was indeed not a small amount to him. After all, the daily expenses of his family were high. But a high-quality spirit stone was like a drop in the ocean to him. After signing in to the system, he didn’t even know how many high-quality spirit stones he had accumulated over the years. Perhaps in the eyes of many cultivators, such a spirit stone was extremely precious.. But to him, it was not worth mentioning! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping accompanied his three daughters and had great fun on the streets for a few days. Wan’er and her siblings were like wild horses in the past few days. They were as crazy as they could be! The thing they regretted the most right now was that they had not moved to Fusheng City earlier. They did not have to go to school, nor did they have to stay at home all day. The streets were also so lively. There was delicious food, fun, and good-looking…there was no shortage of them. It was as if they could never finish shopping! Of course, the most important thing was that their father would go shopping with them every day! They hadn’t played with their father for a very, very long time. “Dad, what are we going to play next?” asked Wan’er incoherently as she chewed on a piece of fragrant tofu. Jiang Ping casually wiped the tofu off the comer of her mouth and said with a smile, “Next, I will take you to play darts.” “Yeah, I love throwing darts!” said Wan’er. As soon as Wan’er finished her sentence, Yan’er, who was beside her, said with a smile, “Wan’er loves throwing darts, but her darts are the most inaccurate!” “Humph, you’re talking nonsense. You’re the one who is the most inaccurate. I don’t want to play with you anymore,” Wan’er said snappily as she put one hand on her waist. Her little face was red as if she was unwilling to admit defeat, but at the same time, she seemed to have been poked in a sore spot and felt embarrassed. Liv’er, who was at the side, giggled with the tofu in her mouth. The way the three girls were playing was so cute that Jiang Ping couldn’t help but pick them up and kiss them on the face. In fact, he was also quite curious. Logically speaking, Wan’er should be the most athletic one among the three girls. However, when Wan’er played darts, she was always the one who was the least accurate. There were even occasional incidents where she missed her target. The darts were all aimed at the surrounding people! At that time, the owner of the darts stall was so scared that he insisted on refunding the money to him. No matter how hard Jiang Ping tried, he refused to let Wan’er touch the darts again. On the contrary, Yan’er was the one who threw the darts most accurately among the three girls. When Jiang Ping brought them to play darts for the first time two days ago, Yan’er could almost hit the bullseye with the darts! Not to mention the onlookers, even Jiang Ping was shocked and couldn’t help but exclaim. In the end, the stall owner was so scared that he wanted to refund him money and refused to let Yan ‘er continue playing. It was because every time she hit the bullseye, she would receive a reward. At that time, Yan’er almost won all the prizes from the dart stall. The stall owner, who was in his forties or fifties, lost so much that he was on the verge of crying. Jiang Ping thought about it, but he could only blame it on their respective physiques. Wan’er had an ancient divine physique. Although she had a top-tier physique, this kind of physique walked a tyrannical path of brute force. As for Yan‘er, she had a spiritual chaos sword physique. She was born to be the master of all weapons, so it was easy for her to control all kinds of weapons. However, what kind of physique did Liu’er awaken? It had been almost half a month, but Jiang Ping still couldn’t find any clues. A few days later. On the street of Fusheng City. The three cute little girls, who looked like porcelain dolls, were holding hands and jumping up and down on the street like a gust of wind. “Quick, quick, quick, I want to eat kebabs today!” ‘Wan’er pulled Yan’er and Liu’er along. With her strength, she was able to pull her two sisters through the crowds easily. “Big sister, slow down. My hands are about to be torn off by you.” Liver was pulled by her right hand, and she found that her arms were already numb. She felt that if this continued, she might not be able to keep her arms by the time they reached the kebabs. “That’s right. Wan’er, slow down. Dad and Auntie Sushang are not here today. You can eat as many kebabs as you want. What’s the rush?” Yan’er, who was on the other side, said in a bad mood. ‘Wan’er didn’t turn back her head. She said excitedly, “Hurry up, hurry up. We’ll have to wait for a long time for the kebabs. If we don’t hurry up, when Dad and Auntie Sushang are done with their work and come out to look for us, we won’t be able to eat much!” When she thought of the succulent and crispy kebabs, Wan’er felt the fragrance in her mouth. Her saliva almost flowed out from the corner of her mouth. In Xiaoyu Town, there were no such delicacies as kebabs. The first time Wan’er tried it, she was completely enamored with the delicacy of the kebabs. However, her father always said that eating too many kebabs was not good for her health. Every time they came out, Wan’er and her siblings would pester Jiang Ping by using all kinds of coquettish and cute tricks to say that they wanted to eat the kebabs! Their father was very fond of them and he would satisfy their wishes every time. He controlled the amount they could eat. So before they could eat to their hearts’ content, he would stop them! It was rare to have such an opportunity like today. Their father had to discuss things with others at home, and Auntie Sushang had to go to Chengxi City to buy some furniture. The three girls could finally be free and enjoyed it without any restriction, so they naturally had to eat to their heart’s content! Yan’er and Liv’er saw that they could not persuade Wan’er, so they gave up their struggle. Just like puppets, they were led by Wan’er. However, the thought of being able to eat the kebabs that they dreamed of soon made them feel happy! At the same time, in the Jiang Mansion of Fusheng City. In the main hall, Jiang Ping sat on the main seat. Beside him, Chen Zhong respectfully served him. At his side sat a middle-aged man with a full beard. This man was the original owner of this house. According to Chen Zhong, this man was originally the leader of a small cultivator sect in Fusheng City. However, he lost in a battle with other forces in the end and was also betrayed by a traitor in his sect. His power instantly fell apart, and he was forced to flee Fusheng City. It was only until the limelight had passed that he sneaked back into the city, preparing to gather his old subordinates and seek revenge from his enemies. However, if he wanted others to work for him, he had to give them some benefits. Or perhaps, at least gave them confidence. To put it bluntly, he was now crestfallen, and so only a fool would continue to work for him! Therefore, he could only choose to sell this secret mansion of his. It would be best if he could exchange it for a high-quality spirit stone, which would help him improve his strength. Otherwise, he would be able to bribe the people who had followed him back then with two thousand silver coins and get them to continue to work for him. Most of this information was obtained through Chen Zhong’s investigations during this period of time. Jiang Ping felt that there wouldn’t be too big of a deviation from the truth. However, the man before him was a little laughable. With a single glance, Jiang Ping could tell that he was only in the middle stage of the Qi refinement realm. With his current realm, it was impossible for him to fully utilize a high-quality spirit stone. It would be a waste. However, what did this have to do with him? <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio A few years ago, the main reason why Jiang Ping took his three daughters and lived in seclusion in Xiaoyu Town was that most people in Xiaoyu Town were ordinary people who didn’t know how to cultivate. Although ordinary people could be good or evil, they were much more stable and peaceful compared to cultivators, whose lives were cruel and full of life-and-death struggles. People’s desires were endless, but ordinary people would keep such desires to themselves. In the cultivation world, people could display their desires unscrupulously. As long as you had the strength, you could satisfy your desires as much as you wanted, and no one would dare to refute you. comment Therefore, fighting and killing were common in the cultivation world. Jiang Ping really didn’t want to have anything to do with the cultivation world, as it might affect the growth of his three daughters. Therefore, as long as it involved struggles in the cultivation world, Jiang Ping would stay far away. There was no way to hide this time. After all, he had already bought the new house. Of course, hiding didn’t mean that Jiang Ping was afraid. For example, the man in front of him was a minor character in the refinement realm. Jiang Ping could kill a lot of such characters with a single palm strike. However, if he were to fight a refinement realm expert, he might provoke an origin core realm expert tomorrow, and then a nascent soul realm expert the day after… In short, there would be a pile of troublesome matters! Jiang Ping was not afraid. However, he really disliked trouble, and he was also afraid that the three girls would be hurt. Therefore, he didn’t intend to interfere in the middle-aged man’s matters, who was currently in front of him. He also wouldn’t remind him that with his current cultivation, it would be a waste to ask for a high-quality spirit stone. In any case, it was just a high-quality spirit stone, and he had countless of them. Right now, he only wanted to settle the matter regarding the house as soon as possible, and then send this fellow away, and everything would be fine. Retracting his gaze, Jiang Ping asked indifferently, “A high-quality spirit stone, right?” “Yes, a high-quality spirit stone.” The other party hesitated for a moment, and in the end, he nodded his head in embarrassment. Looking at Jiang Ping sipping his tea and didn’t answer immediately, he thought that Jiang Ping was unwilling and was thinking about how to answer him, his heart couldn’t help but tense up. He gritted his teeth, and as if he had made a decision, he said, “Mr. Jiang, to tell you the truth, I also know that the price of one high-quality spirit stone for this house is a little too high.” “Tam not one of those greedy people. It’s just that I have no other choice. If you can agree, you will be my friend in the future. As long as you have any orders, I will not dare to refuse!” “Of course, if you really can’t take out high-quality spirit stones, then two thousand silver is also fine.” As he said this, the color in Qiu Chi’s eyes dimmed quite a bit. In fact, after staying in Fusheng City for so long, he was very clear about what a high-quality spirit stone actually meant. Spirit stones were the most common currency used by cultivators to trade with each other. They could be roughly divided into low-quality, middle-quality, high-quality, and supreme-quality spirit stones… The ratio of spirit stones of each quality to spirit stones of the previous quality was ten to one. In other words, one high-quality spirit stone could be exchanged for ten middle-quality spirit stones and a hundred low-quality spirit stones. In Fusheng City, someone with a middle-quality spirit stone could be considered a lord. Most could only scrape together a few dozen low-quality spirit stones after emptying out their assets. Unaffiliated cultivators, might not even see a low-quality spirit stone in their lives. Ifa high-quality spirit stone appeared in Fusheng City, it would definitely attract the attention of all the cultivation powers in the city! Therefore, Qiu Chi did not have any confidence at all when he asked for one high-quality spirit stone as the selling price. Not to mention his house, there probably wasn’t any house that was worth a high-quality spirit stone in the entire city. His price wasn’t just inflated, it was an exorbitant price! However, he also knew what he was worth. Even if Jiang Ping agreed to the price of a high-quality spirit stone, his final intention was not to possess that spirit stone. It was not that he did not want to possess it, but that he was not qualified enough! In his current situation, if someone knew that he had a high-quality spirit stone, he would definitely not be able to see the sun tomorrow. In the world of ordinary people, killing and looting usually happened in the wilderness. But in the world of cultivators, such a tragedy could happen anywhere at any time! Therefore, in his final and the worst case scenario, he had planned to use the high-quality spirit stone to ask some important figures of the major powers to help him eliminate his enemies. A high-quality spirit stone was enough to invite a nascent soul realm expert! In the end, he could just leave and never return to Fusheng City. Of course, this was a desperate move that didn’t leave a way out. There were safer methods, but everything revolved around getting a high-quality spirit stone. Ifhe couldnt get a high-quality spirit stone, all his plans would be in vain. “Two thousand taels of silver. The price is reasonable, but I don’t have that much cash on hand,” Jiang Ping sipped his tea and said unhurriedly. Hearing this, Qiu Chi let out a sigh. Although he knew that any normal person would understand that a high-quality spirit stone was worth more than two thousand taels of silver. But when he heard that the other party intended to use silver instead of spirit stones to trade, he couldn’t help but feel disappointed. He sighed softly, he said, “Mr. Jiang, you are an expert. You must know that the value of this house is actually not just two thousand taels of silver! If it was in the past, I would not mind selling it cheaper. I would consider you as a friend. However, I am really in urgent need of a sum of silver now.” “Therefore, I hope that you can help me by gathering two thousand taels of silver. I. Looking at the clothes on Jiang Ping’s body and the imposing manner he exuded, he knew that he was definitely not an ordinary person. Thus, he still hoped that he could fight for a little more. However, before he could finish his words, Jiang Ping waved his hand and interrupted him. “Sir, you have misunderstood.” “Tam unable to fork out two thousand taels of silver at this moment, so I am willing to take a small loss and give you a high-quality spirit stone.” Before he could finish his words, he flipped his palm, and a jade-green stone appeared in his palm. Qiu Chi was still paying attention to what Jiang Ping was saying, but in the next moment, he was blinded by the light of the stone. He was instantly stunned. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Qiu Chi stared at the dazzling stone on Jiang Ping’s palm ina daze. His heart was beating like a drum, thumping wildly. A few words appeared repeatedly in his mind. It was the easiest way to identify spirit stones that he had once understood. Low-quality spirit stones emitted a light green light, while middle-quality spirit stones emitted a green light. A high-quality spirit stone would emit a green-blue glow while a supreme-quality spirit stone would emit a green-pink glow! This spirit stone before his eyes… Qiu Chi had never personally witnessed what a high-quality spirit stone looked like. comment However, he had seen it before and was extremely fortunate to obtain a middle-quality spirit stone. At that time, he would always keep the spirit stone in his pocket and carefully examine it. Therefore, he was sure that the spirit stone in front of him was emitting a green-blue light, and it was a high-quality spirit stone! After a long while, his consciousness slowly returned to his body, and he suddenly felt thirsty. He fiercely drank a cup of tea and stammered, “This…is a high-quality spirit stone?” “That’s right,” Jiang Ping said indifferently. After receiving the affirmative answer, Qiu Chi’s heart pounded again. He probed, “Mr. Jiang, are you planning to use this high-quality spirit stone to buy my house?” “No, what you said is not right,” Jiang Ping said calmly as he glanced at him. “ah?! Qiu Chis heart fell to the bottom of the valley again when he heard what Jiang Ping said. Although he was extremely uncomfortable, he mocked, “That’s true. Although this house is good, it is only worth three or four middle-quality spirit stones. It’s still far from the price of one high-quality spirit stone.” “I dont dare to expect you to take out this high-quality spirit stone, but this high-quality spirit stone is very important to me.” “If you can give this spirit stone to me, I’m willing to serve you as my master for the rest of my life to repay your kindness!” “No, you’ve misunderstood.” Jiang Ping knew Qiu Chi had misunderstood him, so he quickly explained, “When I said you’re wrong, I meant that this house is no longer yours. I’ve already bought it with this high-quality spirit stone.” “As for worshipping me as your master, forget it. I don’t lack servants now.” With that, he flipped his wrist, and the high-quality spirit stone steadily landed on the table beside Qiu Chi’s hand. Inan instant, Qiu Chi felt as if he had returned to heaven from hell. He felt his blood surge, and his heart was filled with extreme excitement. Looking at the spirit stone beside his hand, he wished that he could immediately grab it tightly in his hand and not let it escape! However, another voice in his heart told him that he could not do that. At the end of the day, he felt that he had gained a great advantage. His emotional fluctuation naturally could not escape Jiang Ping’s eyes. “Take it. This spirit stone is yours now.” “Mr. Jiang, I…really don’t know what to say.” Qiu Chi cupped his hands with gratitude on his face and said incoherently, “In the future, I will not dare to disobey your orders in the future.” “If Lam lucky enough to be alive after completing my task, I will serve you as my master for the rest of my life and repay your great kindness!” “There’s no need to. Although your price is a little high, this is something I am willing to do. Now that both of us have gotten what we wanted, there will no longer be any relationship between us.” Jiang Ping raised his hand, indicating that he could leave. ‘What kind of joke was this? If he really became a servant of the Jiang family, then the trouble that he had caused outside would sooner or later affect the Jiang family! At that time, it might get Jiang Ping into unexpected trouble. Jiang Ping did not want to leave behind any hidden dangers. Qiu Chi left a good impression on Jiang Ping. Although he was currently plagued with trouble, he still remembered to repay kindness at such a time. From this point of view, he was at least a good person. Of course, this didn’t stop Jiang Ping from having too much contact with him. Good impressions and trouble were completely two different things. Qiu Chi also saw Jiang Ping’s impatience and sighed in his heart. He didn’t dare to say anything more and carefully put the high-quality spirit stone into his pocket. Then, he cupped his fists and bowed to Jiang Ping, he said respectfully, “I will definitely repay your great kindness in the future!” Jiang Ping nodded indifferently. Qiu Chi didn’t delay any further and turned around to leave the Jiang Mansion. “Sigh, I’ve finally succeeded. Fortunately, I didn’t get into any trouble.” Looking at Qiu Chi disappearing from his sight, Jiang Ping finally heaved a sigh of relief. “But why does my right eyelid keep twitching? I have a feeling that something terrible is going to happen.” An hour ago. On the street in Fusheng City. The three little girls, who had just finished eating skewers, ran to a dart stall. Liver looked at Wan’er, who was excited and eager to try, and could not help but complain, “Big sister, you still want to play darts? You’ve never hit the bull’s eye before!” ‘Wan’er was immediately upset. She pouted and said, “In the past, it was because I didn’t have the strength to throw accurately. Today, I’ve eaten and drunk enough. I’ll definitely hit the bull’s eye!” “Pfft!” Yan’er and Liu’er immediately covered their mouths and laughed out loud when they heard Wan’er’s argument. ‘With Wan’er’s strength, it wouldn’t be a problem for her to carry a cow. Yet, she had the nerve to say that she didn’t have the strength. “In my opinion, you are like what Dad said. You just like to play!” Yan’er couldn’t help but complain. This was a phrase that her father often said. She felt that it was the most appropriate way to describe her big sister! “Yan’er and Liu’er, you guys…” ‘Wan’er was so angry that her face tured red. She put her hands on her hips and said angrily, “Okay, I will let you guys have an eye-opening experience today. I will let you know what it means to hit the target at every shot!” After saying that, she picked up a dart and narrowed her left eye. She pretended to aim at it. “Liver, how many points do you think Wan’er can hit this time?” Yan’er deliberately asked loudly from the side. Liver immediately understood what she meant and replied loudly, ‘Oh, how many points does missing target count as?” “There’s no point in missing target! Haha!” The two of them worked together seamlessly. After saying that, they could not help but laugh out loud. ‘Wan’er was so angry that her whole body was trembling. In the next moment, the dart in her hand flew out. “Hit!” Looking closely at the target in front of her, there was a dart sticking out of the bull’s eye. The three girls were instantly stunned.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The three little girls stared at the dart at the bull’s-eye for a long while. ‘Wan’er was the first one to react. Her face was instantly covered with a smile. She jumped up excitedly and shouted, “Yeah, I got it! I got it!” “Yan’er and Liv’er, did you see that? I got it! Bull’s-eye!” Yan’er and Liu’er stood rooted to the ground, they were unable to react. Although the truth was right in front of their eyes, they felt that something was strange… No matter what happened in the past, Wan’er had never hit the bull’s eye. Could it be that she had been provoked today, and that was why… While they were still confused, they heard a few clear laughter, which sounded really ear-piercing! “Chun Chun, look quickly. Is that little girl by the side an idiot? Why is she so excited about the target that you had hit? It’s really hilarious, Haha!” ‘Wan’er and her siblings instantly became much more clear-headed. They turned their heads and saw four girls who were slightly older than them looking at them with a faint smile. ‘They were looking at them as if they were looking at a fool. Immediately, Wan’er was angry and said unhappily, “What are you talking about? What do you mean you hit the target? It was clearly me who hit the target. So what if I’m excited?” “You hit the target?” Agirl in front of them stood up and sneered, “Why don’t you open your eyes and take a good look? is that your dart on the bull’s-eye? It was clearly Chunchun’s dart!” “With your dart skills, you’d better go home and hide under the covers. Don’t come out and embarrass yourself!” “That’s right. You can’t even hit the target and yet you have the nerve to play with darts. Hurry up and find out where your dart fell to.” Another girl stood up from opposite and sneered disdainfully. “You!” ‘Wan’er was so angry that she gritted her teeth. She really wanted to curse out loud, but her father had never taught her to curse, so she could only glare fiercely at the few girls opposite her. “Little girl, no matter how much you glare, this dart isn’t yours. It’s mine. If you don’t believe me, take a good look.” The girl leading the group stood out at this time. She looked to be only a little over ten years old, but she was incomparably arrogant. “Hmph, why should I believe you. This is clearly my target. Your dart didn’t hit your target, but how did it hit my target…” ‘Wan’er retorted angrily. Yan’er, who was at the side, had already sensed that something was wrong. Without saying anything, she directly ran to the target’s center, looked at the dart carefully, and then looked around the target. Then, she ran all the way back to Wan’er’s side and tugged at the corner of her clothes. With an unsightly expression, she said in a low voice, “Wan’er, the dart on the target is not yours. Your dart fell to the ground.” As she said that, Yan’er spread out her small hand and a small dart, with the word “nine” engraved on it, was lying on her hand. “Impossible!” Wan’er immediately denied and shouted. However, she subconsciously took the dart from Yan’er’s hand. She suddenly froze in the next moment. Her eyes were wide open and her face was full of astonishment. This really was her dart! ‘There was a rule in this dart stall. Each target had a corresponding dart. Hers was target number nine, so the corresponding dart would have the word “nine” engraved on it. ‘The dart on the target was still there, which could only mean that her dart was indeed picked up by Yan’er from the ground. “Then, what about the dart on the target?” Wan’er immediately became anxious and quickly asked. “The dart on the target is engraved with the word ‘eight,” Yan‘er replied in a low voice. Engraved with the word ‘eight? In other words, it was the dart from target number eight. Weren’t these arrogant girls’ target number ‘eight’? Looking at Wan’er and Yan‘er’s expressions and whispers, the girls opposite knew that Wan’er and Yan’er had already known the truth. The girl who had ridiculed them earlier immediately snorted disdainfully, she mocked, “Now do you believe it? This dart was clearly thrown by Chunchun. With your mediocre skills, you couldn’t even hit the target, and you still want to hit the bull’s eye?” ‘Wan’er immediately became angry again. She pointed at them and scolded, “You guys are target number eight. Why did you throw it at my target number nine?” “Hmph, I can throw to whatever target I want. What can you do?” said the girl who looked like the leader. She was probably Chunchun that they were talking about. “You! You don’t follow the rules!” “Rules, our Fang family is the rules!” Fang Chunchun crossed her arms and snorted coldly. She replied indifferently, “I have the ability to throw to whichever target I want. You can’t control me!” “What? You can’t even hit the target. Even if I put the target in front of you, can you hit it?” “You should throw your dart according to your target number. If you don’t follow the rules, I’ll tell the owner!” As she said this, Wan’er hurriedly looked around. In the end, she found that the stall owner had already hidden to the side. He lowered his head and didn’t dare to look at what was happening. ‘The surrounding crowd also hid far away. From the looks of it, they seemed to be afraid of getting involved. “Owner? Without the consent of our Fang family, does he dare to set up a stall here?” Fang Chunchun raised her head, looking like an arrogant swan. She said condescendingly, “Don’t talk about these targets. As long as I want, I can throw them anywhere!” “Tcan even throw them at your head!” Before she could finish her words, Fang Chunchun’s expression suddenly changed and became much sharper. With a flip of her palm, a dart appeared in her hand. She swung the dart with all her might and it shot straight at Wan’er. “Well done, Chunchun!” ‘The remaining three girls, Fang Xiaxia, Fang Qiuqiu, and Fang Dongdong, immediately clapped and flattered Fang Chunchun when they saw that she had revealed this move. Looking at the dart that was only a hair’s breadth away from her head, Wan’er was just about to dodge to the side. Ina flash, a fair and tender little hand suddenly stretched out. Two little fingers firmly grasped the dart. Everyone was stunned.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Wan’er looked at the familiar figure before her and could not help but be stunned. After a long while, she blurted out, ‘Yan’er, you…” That’s right, the owner of that fair and tender hand was Yan‘’er. Yan’er did not answer Wan‘er. Instead, she looked at the four Fang sisters and said coldly, “You guys, aren’t you going too far?!” Yan’er was very angry with the four girls’ unreasonable, arrogant, and rule-breaking actions. She was extremely furious now, as they actually attacked Wan‘er! Looking at the flying trajectory of the dart, it was obviously aimed at Wan’er’s head. They actually started attacking! Although Yan’er always fought with Wan‘er for the position of elder sister, that only happened at home. It would be fine no matter how they fought. However, if outsiders wanted to bully Wan’er, they would have to go through her! ‘The four Fang sisters, especially Fang Chunchun, were also stunned by Yan’er’s sudden display of skill. ‘The dart in her hand was so fast that even she couldn’t see it clearly. How did this little girl manage to pinch that dart with two fingers? However, she remained arrogant and said disdainfully, “What? So what if we’re going too far? If you have the ability, you can also throw the dart directly at my head. I just don’t know if you…” Before she could finish her words, she suddenly felt a bone-piercing chill, which immediately made her whole body feel cold. Then, a cold feeling slid over her head… Fang Chunchun’s gaze slowly fell on Yan’er. She saw that Yan’er was following through with a familiar movement, which was like…the movement of throwing darts! Realizing this, Fang Chunchun suddenly felt uneasy. Soon, this uneasy feeling was confirmed. “Ah, Chunchun, your hair!” Fang Xiaxia suddenly covered her mouth and pointed at Fang Chunchun’s hair with trembling arms. Hearing this, Fang Qiuqiu and Fang Dongdong also looked over and saw that a portion of Fang Chunchun’s head was actually bald for no reason! Looking at the mark, it was very similar to the size of the dart. “What’s wrong with my hair?” Fang Chunchun realized later, and the uneasy feeling in her heart became even stronger. She hurriedly reached out and touched the top of her head. ‘The next moment. “ah, my hair! Why are some of my hair missing!” Fang Chunchun was so scared that she cried out loud. She pointed at Yan’er and cursed through gritted teeth, “You…you did this, didn’t you?” Yan’er placed her hands on her hips and snorted, “That’s right. I did it. Didn’t you say that as long as I have the ability, I can throw darts at your head? Why? It’s too late for you to go back on your words now!” “My father said before that this is called giving you a taste of your own medicine! It’s the most effective way to deal with scoundrels like you!” “You!” Fang Chunchun was so angry that her entire body was trembling. Her upper and lower teeth were chattering non-stop. However, she did really say it. For a moment, she was actually unable to refute. “You wretched girl, you’re dead for sure. Do you know that?” Seeing that Fang Chunchun was so angry that she could not speak, Fang Qiuqiu hurriedly pointed at Yan’er and scolded. “Tm sorry, I don’t know that, but I know that your sister’s hair has gone bald!” Yan’er pouted and replied Hearing the word “bald’, Fang Chunchun was like a fox whose tail had been stepped on. She immediately jumped up and shouted sternly, “Bullsh*t, I’m not bald!” “You are bald, why am I not allowed to say it? My mouth belongs to me, you can’t control me!” Wan’er immediately imitated her and retorted according to her earlier logic. “You, I’m going to kill you!” Fang Chunchun shouted in exasperation. ‘Then, she instructed Fang Xiaxia and the others, “You guys, quickly go and arrest these three girls. I want to pull out their hair first, then kill them!” Fang Xiaxia stole a glance at Yan’er and the others. She immediately cowered and asked tentatively, ‘Chunchun, why don’t we go back home first…” ‘The move that Yan’er had displayed just now still frightened her. She was not a fool. She had long realized that Yan’er had real abilities as she was able to grab Fang Chunchun’s darts with her bare hands and sliced off a portion of Fang Chunchun’s hair without anyone noticing. If she were to suddenly use such a move again… Wouldn’t they all be wiped out? However, Fang Chunchun didn’t think too much about it. She wanted to teach Wan’er and Yan’er a lesson so that she could vent her anger. When she heard that Fang Xiaxia dared to refute her, she immediately became furious and said fiercely, “No, no matter what, I have to pull out all the hair of these three wretched girls today!” “Why aren’t you guys attacking? Don’t tell me you’re not listening to me!” Sensing Fang Chunchum’s fiery gaze, Fang Xiaxia and the other two couldn’t help but lower their heads. As the direct descendant of the family, Fang Chunchun, who was older than them, was their big sister. As long as she had any orders, Fang Xiaxia and the other two never dared to disobey. They were afraid that if they offend Fang Chunchun, it would be difficult for them to move an inch in the family. Seeing the look in Fang Chunchun’s eyes, they knew if they refused again, they would definitely offend Fang Chunchun ané retaliate by her in the future. Now, they had to bite the bullet and attack. “Chunchun, we wont dare to disobey you,” Fang Qiuqiu hurriedly explained. “Then quickly arrest them!” Although they were a little displeased with Fang Chunchun’s bossy attitude, Fang Xiaxia and the other two did not dare to reveal any of it. ‘The three of them gritted their teeth and looked at one another as if they had made up their minds. Suddenly, they shouted. “ah! Then, they charged straight towards Wan’er and the others. Looking at this, Fang Chunchun’s anger was slightly appeased. Her gaze toward Yan’er and the other two was filled with resentment and pride. In her opinion, since Fang Xiaxia and the other two had made their move, Yan’er and her siblings would soon be tortured a hundred times more painfully than herself. Although Fang Xiaxia and the other two weren’t as strong as her, they were all relatives from the same cultivation clan, so they had some cultivation skill. Even if they hadn’t broken through to the tempering realm, it would still be easy for them to deal with these three girls of age five to six years old. However, she soon realized that she was wrong. She was totally wrong! It was to the point that Fang Chunchun who was only a little over ten years old began to doubt her life. She had completely forgotten that Yan’er could throw darts that even she couldnt see.. How could she be a weak little girl? <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Following that, the onlookers witnessed a scene that they would never forget for the rest of their lives. ‘When they saw Fang Xiaxia and the others begin to make their moves, most of them began to mourn for Wan‘er and her siblings in their hearts. ‘The names of the Fang family’s four demonesses were extremely infamous in the area! ‘The eldest, Fang Chunchun, was only eleven years old, and the youngest, Fang Dongdong, was only eight years old. However, they relied on the Fang family’s influence and often acted arrogantly in this area! Many people present had been “tortured” by the four demonesses! However, they could only be angry but did not dare to speak up! After all, most of the onlookers were ordinary people who didn’t know how to cultivate. ‘The Fang family, on the other hand, was a famous cultivation family in Fusheng City. Everyone in the family was able to cultivate, and they also had a lot of connections with many top powers in the city. Just a few months ago, the Fang family had destroyed a cultivation sect in the south of the city called the Sky Wolf Sect. Since then, the Fang family had become even more famous. Many ordinary people who had never heard of the Fang family now knew how terrifying it was, and they all kept their distance. ‘The four demonesses of the Fang family were direct descendants of the main bloodline. They had only been out of their mother’s womb for a few years before they began to cultivate. Therefore, although these four girls were young, if they were to really fight, even some adult men might not be their match! How could Wan’er and her cute siblings be their match? Just as they closed their eyes and could not bear to look anymore, a few screams suddenly came from the arena… Everyone’s eyes instantly widened. ‘They saw Yan’er and Liver standing where they were, as if they were watching a show. ‘Wan’er was like a gust of wind. In just a few seconds, she had knocked down Fang Xiaxia and the others… Everyone hurriedly rubbed their eyes and realized that they hadn’t seen wrongly just now. Wan‘er, a cute little girl of five or six years old, threw the three of them to the ground mercilessly like a sandbag. “Big sister…is mighty!” Liver wanted to cheer for Wan‘er, but before she could finish her words, she saw Fang Xiaxia and the others lying on the ground ina sorry state. So she had no choice but to change it to “mighty’. ‘Wan’er put one hand on her waist and blew her nose with her right hand. “Tsk,” she said proudly, “I thought you guys were good at fighting. I didn’t expect you guys to be so weak!” “With your weak martial arts skills, it’s better for you guys to hide under the covers at home. Don’t come out and embarrass yourselves!” If Jiang Ping heard what Wan’er said, he would definitely feel upset. It was not because he felt that Wan’er had done something wrong, but because if Wan’er could imitate other people’s words so quickly, why couldn’t she learn what he taught her? Fang Chunchun was shocked by what Wan’er said. She was completely flustered. As if cold water was poured on her, the anger in her heart instantly calmed down a lot and fear began to invade her body and mind. One versus three, and she had defeated Fang Xiaxia and the others so easily. Even she couldn’t do that! In other words, she, Fang Chunchun, couldn’t beat a five or six-year-old little girl! How was this possible? ! She looked at Fang Xiaxia and the other two who were rolling on the ground and swallowed her nonexistent saliva. She stammered, “No, this is impossible. What kind of demonic technique did you use?” “How could you beat the three of them? !” “Why is it impossible?” Wan’er snorted proudly and said, “These three girls are not even in the tempering realm, and I didn’t even use 10% of my strength to defeat them.” “So? Do you want to be beaten up too?” “Come, you look like you can fight a little better than them. I’ll use 20% of my strength to fight against you.” ‘Wan’er waved her hand at Fang Chunchun. She was so scared that she couldn’t help but take a few steps back. She thought Wan’er sounded very annoying while she bragged, but from the way Wan’er could easily defeat Fang Xiaxia and the other two, she knew very well that she was unable to fight against Wan’er. “Just you wait if you have the ability!” Fang Chunchun snorted angrily and ignored Fang Xiaxia and the other two girls on the ground. She said a few harsh words and ran away. The hearts of Fang Xiaxia and the other two girls on the ground sank to the bottom. Their faces instantly turned extremely ugly. Were they being abandoned? “What are you looking at? Do you still want to get beaten up?” Wan’er pretended to glare at them fiercely, scaring them so much that their bodies trembled. They didn’t dare to say another word. They hurriedly rolled and crawled away from the scene. “Haha, Yan‘er, they look like rats when they run away!” Liu’er laughed loudly while holding her stomach. ‘The way they ran away made Liver laugh until her stomach hurt. Yan’er also laughed and echoed, “Well, they are big rats! I really don’t know who can raise such a big rat!” ‘Wan’er turned around and looked at her two sisters with a smug look. She was like a general who returned victorious after winning a battle. She said with delight, “Alright, the rats have been beaten away. Let’s start playing.” Liver was the first to raise her hand and said, “Great! I haven’t played darts today, so I want to play darts!” Wan’er said, “Then I want to play darts too.” “Big sister, you couldn’t even hit the target today, and you still want to play darts?” Liv’er couldn’t help but grumble and ridicule. “That was an accident. Do you understand that?!” Wan’er immediately blushed and quickly pretended to be angry as she explained, “If those girls didn’t cause trouble just now, I would have hit the bull’s eye!” “Hey! Wan’er isn’t ashamed of boasting!” Yan’er pointed at her little face and said with disgust, “Even if no one caused trouble, your darts would still miss the target!” “Impossible! I’m going to compete with you again today!” Wan’er said unconvincingly. The three girls were arguing with one another when the owner of the darts stall came over and said with a bitter face, “My young ladies, are you still in the mood to play darts now?” “Do you know who you just provoked? They must have gone home to call for help. You’d better run!” “Let them call then. What does it have to do with us? We haven’t had enough fun yet. We don’t want to run,” replied Wan’er indifferently. “ah, my young lady, the Fang family is a cultivation family. The elders in her family are all cultivators in the tempering realm. If you don’t run quickly, you will definitely get into trouble!” “Tempering realm?” The three girls looked at one another and finally couldn’t help but burst into laughter. ‘They were also in the tempering realm. So what if they came? Who was afraid of who? Their fearless attitude scared the owner so much that he couldn’t help but complain in his heart. ‘Heavens, what kind of sin have I done to get into such trouble? the owner thought to himself… <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At the Fang family. ‘The Fang family had welcomed a joyous event recently. More than a month ago, Chuanyun Sect held a student recruitment ceremony in Fusheng City. Fang Wuji, who was sixteen years old, was successfully selected. He was the eldest son of the head of the Fang family and the successor of the Fang family. Of course, if that was all, it wouldn’t have been enough for the Fang family to mobilize so many people. More importantly, after Fang Wuji entered Chuanyun Sect, he was selected by an elder of the Chuanyun Sect and accepted as his disciple. He directly went from an ordinary external disciple to a core disciple, bypassing the stage of being an internal disciple. Moreover, the elder was a beginner-stage origin core realm expert! ‘The strongest person in the entire Fusheng City was only at the intermediate stage origin core realm. And Fang Shen, the head of the Fang family, was only at the advanced stage refinement realm. ‘The Fang family’s foundation in Fusheng City had become more stable as they now had a connection with someone prestigious. This was naturally a joyous occasion. At this moment in the hall of the Fang family, with Fang Shen as the family head, the older generation’s figures were all gathered together. “Everyone, please be quiet!” ‘As soon as Fang Shen spoke, all the whispers instantly disappeared. “Cough cough!” Fang Shen cleared his throat and continued, “Everyone, I’ve already received news from my son. Reverend Mu Chun and he had already set off from the Chuanyun Sect.” “Based on the time, I estimate that they will arrive at Fusheng City around the day after tomorrow.” Reverend Mu Chun was Fang Wuji’s master, who was also a beginner stage origin core realm expert. In Tianyun Empire, any expert above the origin core realm could be called a reverend. A nascent soul realm expert, on the other hand, would be a mighty figure. After Fang Shen announced it, it immediately caused a huge uproar, and all sorts of discussions began to ring out. “So soon? But that’s good too. The young master has returned home with Reverend Mu Chun to visit the patriarch. This is really a great honor to our family!” “That’s right. At the welcome banquet, we’ll invite all the important people in Fusheng City. In the future, let’s see who dares to look down on our Fang family!” “But they’ll be here the day after tomorrow. Isn’t it a bit rushed? The banquet venue hasn’t been set up yet.” “What’s there to worry about? How much effort will it take to set up the venue? The most important thing is to set up the banquet well and let everyone know that our young master is a rare talent. He became a tempering realm genius at the age of sixteen!” “Let them know that our Fang family doesn’t only have the support of the Blood Fang Gang, We also have the Chuanyun Sect supporting us now!” Everyone discussed for a long while before Fang Shen clapped his hands and suppressed their voices. “Alright, everyone, stop for a moment.” Fang Shen looked around at everyone. After pondering for a moment, he continued, “What everyone said makes sense. For this welcoming banquet, our Fang family will do two things.” “First, let Fusheng City know that our Fang family has a successor who has reached the tempering realm at the age of sixteen.” “Second, our Fang family is not some pushover. We have the Blood Fang Gang behind us, as well as the even more powerful Chuanyun Sect!” “A few months ago, our Fang family exterminated Qiu Chi’s Sky Wolf Sect and chased Qiu Chi out of Fusheng City like a stray dog, Thanks to that, more people know the strength of our Fang family.” “However, there are also some people who are dissatisfied with us and secretly plan to deal with our Fang family. This time, we will use this opportunity to completely deter the ambitions of those rascals and shatter their delusions!” “Well said, patriarch!” Loud cheers came from the hall. At this moment, the main hall’s door was suddenly opened. Everyone’s gaze was like a sharp sword, suddenly shooting towards the door. They saw the miserable Fang Chunchun holding her head, completely ignoring everyone’s gazes, and directly pounced into Fang Shen’s embrace. She cried, “Dad, I’ve been bullied. You have to avenge me!” “What?” Fang Shen, who was stunned at first, immediately flew into a rage when he heard his daughter had been ‘bullied’. He asked fiercely, Who is it? Who dares to bully my daughter? That guy must have some guts!” *Chunchun, don’t cry. Quick, let me take a look. How are you? Are you alright?” As he said this, Fang Shen pulled Fang Chunchun out of his arms. In the next moment, his face turned even darker than the bottom of a pot. Part of Fang Chunchun’s head was actually bald. Under the contrast of her thick hair, this bald spot was particularly eye-catching. Looking at Fang Chunchun’s pitiful state of crying, Fang Shen was furious. He slapped his hand and shattered a table beside him. ‘Chunchun, who did this? I must make that person pay!” Fang Chunchun was about to reply when Fang Xiaxia and the other two entered the main hall at the same time. However, they were not as casual as Fang Chunchun. ‘When they saw so many elders of the Fang family sitting in the hall, they immediately became timid and did not dare to move at all. Everyone merely glanced at them indifferently. When they saw their miserable appearance, they knew what had happened and did not pay any more attention to it. Fang Chunchun continued to cry and complain, “Dad, don’t ask anymore. Hurry up and help me take revenge. I must kill those guys in order to get rid of the hatred in my heart!” ‘Okay.* Fang Shen didn’t care at all when he heard his daughter say that she wanted to “kill”. Didn’t a family like theirs become stronger through fighting and killing? Fang Chunchun could be considered Fang Shen’s daughter because she was fierce. He comforted her, “Chunchun, I have something to discuss with everyone. I can’t leave yet.” “How about this? I’l let Uncle Hui follow you and help you take revenge!” Uncle Hui was Fang Hui. He was one of Fang Shen’s trusted aides, a beginner stage refinement realm expert. He felt that the ones who bullied little girls could not be a big shot, so a beginner stage refinement realm expert was enough to deal with them. “Alright! Uncle Hui, let’s go!” Fang Chunchun didn’t refuse and turned to leave. She knew Uncle Huis cultivation level. He would definitely be able to take care of those wretched girls! ‘What she needed to do now was to hurry back as soon as possible. She could not let those wretched girls run away. Otherwise, she would be very upset! Fang Hui, who had been standing behind Fang Shen the entire time, immediately bowed to accept the order and followed Fang Chunchun out of the hall. Fang Xiaxia and the other two bowed respectfully to the elders in the hall before slowly retreating. They did not dare to saya single word from the beginning to the end. Even a fool could tell that these elders were gathered together to discuss some major matter. They were not Fang Chunchun, so they did not dare to unscrupulously disturb the elders’ major matter. Seeing that they had all retreated, Fang Shen shook his head helplessly and said with a smile, “My daughter, Chunchun, doesn’t know manners.” “Alright, let’s not bother about her. Let’s continue discussing.” The others did not dare to mention anything. They chuckled and started discussing again. Compared to Fang Wuji’s return to the Fang family, Fang Chun Chun was just a small matter and was not worth their attention. Even if someone really died, their Fang family could easily wipe it out! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio ‘Wan’er and her siblings were still playing at the darts stall. No matter how the stall owner tried to persuade them, the three of them had no intention of leaving. ‘Wan’er had performed well today. She did not miss the target again. There was even one time when she almost hit the bull’s eye! ‘Wan’er was pleasantly surprised about it. She felt that she had finally begun to grasp the technique of throwing darts. As a result, her confidence soared and she challenged Yan’er and Liu’er with a high fighting spirit. However, the final result did not change. Wan’er was defeated by Yan’er and Liu’er in every round. “Impossible. Why can’t I win Liu’er when I could hit the bull’s eye?” Wan’er said dispiritedly as she threw the darts and pouted. Liver was instantly unhappy when she heard that. She asked angrily, “What do you mean you can hit the bull’s eye? It’s obvious that you didn’t hit it. It doesn’t count when you almost hit it!” “Also, what do you mean you can’t even beat me? Don’t tell me I can’t be compared to second sister, Yan’er?” “Hehe!” Yan’er suddenly pulled Liu’er over and touched her little head, she said with a chuckle, “Liver is right, it doesn’t count when you almost hit it. Unfortunately, someone is boasting here…boasting shamelessly.” “But isn’t it obvious who it is?” “Indeed you can’t be compared to me!” Yan’er covered her mouth and laughed complacently. It was not easy for her to be able to beat her sisters in something. She was extremely happy when her father praised her endlessly. “Humph!” Liu’er pushed Yan’er away. She was so angry that her cheeks puffed up. She said, “No, I have to compete with you too. I will definitely win against you this time!” “Alright, alright. You will win against me. Not now, but in a very, very long time!” The three of them were playing around when the stall owner suddenly came over and said anxiously, “My young ladies, you should run quickly. Those Fang family’s young ladies are rushing over here with their helpers!” “all of them are fierce and aggressive. If you don’t run now, it will really be too late!” “Okay!” ‘Wan’er’s eyes immediately lit up when she heard that someone was coming to seek revenge. She was not as good as Yan’er and Liu’er in throwing darts, but she was the most powerful one in fighting! She had lost a few rounds in the competition just now, and now she was holding back her anger and had nowhere to vent it. It was a good opportunity to teach those guys a lesson and vent her anger at the same time! Although Yan’er and Liu’er were not as excited as she was, it was obvious that they did not take the stall owner’s words to heart. They only replied impatiently, “Alright, we understand. We want to continue playing darts. If you’re scared, hurry up and leave. Don’t hinder us!” The stall owner had completely given up. He didn’t know where these little girls had come from, but they were fearless! ‘The other party was already here to seek revenge, but they were not afraid at all. He really didn’t know if they were ignorant or fearless? He really did not want to see these three cute little girls being bullied by the Fang family. However, he had already done his best to remind them many times. Since they did not listen to his advice, he could not blame himself. “Come, Yan‘er, I must seriously compete with you today!” Liu’er did not seem to take the stall owner’s words to heart at all. All she was thinking about was winning against her second sister once. “Alright then, since you…” Yan’er was only halfway through her words when she heard a familiar voice. “Uncle Hui, it’s those damn girls. Hurry up and catch them!” ‘The three girls turned around and saw Fang Chunchun pointing at them with a face full of uncontrollable anger. Fang Chunchun had deliberately wrapped a piece of cloth around her head, which made her look ridiculous. However, the few adult men behind her looked fierce and frightening. The expressions of Wan’er and her siblings did not change. However, the stall owner who was originally beside them had disappeared. Fang Hui was stunned when he heard Fang Chunchun’s instructions. He almost doubted whether there was something wrong with his eyes. The ones who bullied Fang Chunchun and made her cry was not the Fang family’s enemy, but some young girls who appeared out of nowhere. Their total age was probably not even 18 years old! How was this possible?! Although Fang Chunchun was not as good as her brother, Fang Wuji, he had watched her cultivate since she was young. Her physical fitness was very good. When she faced adult men who did not know how to cultivate, she could still gain the upper hand most of the time. Yet she actually cried after being bullied by a few young girls. “Oh it’s you, big rat. Why are you back?” said Yan’er as she smiled at Fang Chunchun, her eyes flashed with a crafty glint. “Who are you calling a big rat!” Fang Chunchun immediately flew into a rage and asked fiercely. Liver smiled and replied, “Isn’t it you? When you ran away in a panic just now, you really looked like a big rat!” “You!” Fang Chunchun was so angry that her whole body was trembling. She shouted, “Uncle Hui, what are you waiting for? Hurry up and arrest them all!” After listening to their conversation, although Fang Hui was doubtful, he was sure that these young girls were the culprits, so he instructed the few guards who followed him, “Get into action and arrest them first.” “Yes!” ‘The few guards behind him quickly bowed and replied. In the next moment, these few guards were like lightning as they suddenly rushed towards Wan’er and her siblings. Fang Hui’s gaze towards Wan’er and her siblings was filled with coldness and ruthlessness. It was as if they were already birds in a cage and could only surrender. ‘What kind of joke was this? They were only dealing with three young girls who were five or six years old. Did they need a refinement realm expert like him? ‘When a refinement realm guardian made a move, it was like a modest display of a master… Wan’er looked at the Fang family’s guards who were rushing over. Her eyes flickered with excitement that she could not hide. She said to her two younger sisters in a low voice, “Step back, Yan’er and Liver.” “But big sister, these two guys seem a little difficult to deal with. Otherwise, we…” Liver was a little worried. These few guards looked very unfriendly. “alright, alright. Liv’er, put your heart at ease. I will definitely defeat these bad guys.” Yan’er held Liu’er’s small hand and retreated a short distance as she was told. ‘As one who awoke from the spiritual chaos sword physique, she was particularly sensitive to auras. In her perception, although the difference in strength between Wan’er and the few people charging at her was not big, she was still superior to them. In addition, she had been holding a few darts in her hand. If anything went wrong, she would attack at any time. Therefore, she was not worried at all. She watched everything that happened as if she was watching a show. However, the people around her had hidden far away. They were too scared to stay to watch the show as they were afraid that they would be implicated. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Fang Chunchun was overjoyed as she watched the guards move forward at lightning speed. They were so fast that she couldn’t see them clearly. She shouted at Wan’er proudly, “You brat, when I catch you, I will make your life a living hell! Aren’t you very powerful? I want to see if you can escape from me this time!” ‘So what if she is powerful? Even if I can’t beat her, I still have the Fang family behind me! Who dares to offend me? With a single order from me, I can get a large group of experts from the Fang family to help me vent my anger! This little girl actually dares to bully me in front of everyone and humiliate me. See, this is what you’ll get!’ Fang Chunchun thought to herself. Hearing this, Wan’er ignored the people who rushed up and replied with a smile, “Then we’ll see if you can catch me or not!” “It has reached this point, and yet you dare to disrespect me!” Fang Chunchun was furious and she ordered sternly, “You guys better hit her hard. First, break this wretched girl’s hands and feet!” “Yes, sure!” replied the few guards hurriedly. They did not dare to be negligent. ‘The gaze they looked at Wan’er was instantly filled with viciousness. They sneered and said, “Young girl, don’t resist fearlessly. Obediently accept the punishment so that you can suffer less. If you want to blame someone, blame yourself for provoking someone you shouldn’t have provoked!” Before they finished their sentences, they had completely surrounded Wan’er. Four to five fists landed on Wan’er’s young body. The stall owner who was hiding in the dark couldn’t help but shake his head when he saw this scene. His heart was also deathly silent. ‘Sigh, I told them to run away quickly, but they refused to listen to me. They’re in trouble now. I didn’t expect that such a cute young girl would be destroyed by the fists of a few rough men.’ Fang Hui’s expression didn’t change at all as he looked on. She was just a little girl. He didn’t know how Fang Chunchun was bullied by them to the point of going home to ask for help. In his view, no matter how powerful these little girls were, they could not be stronger than tempering realm cultivators. He felt it was really a waste of time that he had to come personally for such a small matter! Boom!!! Just as Fang Hui was feeling bored, Wan’er had already started fighting the guards. However, Fang Hui’s eyes immediately widened in the next moment. In an instant, Wan’er sent out several fist shadows to attack the guards. ‘The guards’ expressions suddenly changed when the moment their fists met. Then, like birds whose wings had been broken, they flew backwards and fiercely smashed onto the ground. Thud. ‘The surrounding floor was smashed into pieces. A few guards rolled on the ground in pain and let out mournful wails. Wan’er clapped her hands and looked proudly at the guards rolling on the ground. Her face was full of disdain. “What!” Fang Hui’s body suddenly shook. His eyes were filled with shock and disbelief. He was extremely clear about the strength of these guards. Two of them were at the intermediate stage of the tempering realm, and three of them were at the beginning stage of the tempering realm. With these five guards working together, even an advanced stage of the tempering realm cultivator would still have no choice but to dodge the attack. But what did he just see? This young girl did not retreat. Instead, she chose to fight head-on, taking the initiative to face the power of these five people. And from the looks of it, she won very easily. Could it be that this little girl’s cultivation was actually in the refinement realm? Fang Hui’s expression was solemn as he carefully sized up Wan’er. Now, he completely put away the thoughts of underestimating her from before. Immediately after, his brows furrowed even more tightly. If Wan’er was really in the refinement realm, then it was impossible for him not to be able to see it. This was because when one reached the refinement realm, their true energy would naturally spread outward. However, Wan’er clearly did not have such characteristics. In that case, Wan’er was at most in the tempering realm. However, it was a little unimaginable for a tempering realm to be able to easily defeat these five people! “Big sister is mighty, big sister is powerful!” Liver clapped her hands crazily and cheered with a smile. “Keep a low profile, it’s nothing. It’s not worth mentioning.” ‘Wan’er turned around and waved at Yan‘er, Liu’er, and the others. Although she said she wanted to keep a low profile, the smug look on her face seemed to say, “Continue, shout louder!” Liver also tactfully continued to clap for her. “Trash, they’re all a group of trash!” Compared to Wan’er and the others’ smug look, Fang Chunchun was extremely angry. Just now, she had brought people here to take revenge and had even thought of how she would torture Wan’er and her siblings after capturing them. She planned to make them suffer a fate worse than death and beg for mercy on her knees. However, reality had slapped her hard! ‘These guards were really trash! Five people in the tempering realm couldn’t even defeat a little girl! She had lost all her face! “Uncle Hui, you go! You must catch this damn girl!” Fang Chunchun clenched her fists, her whole body trembling as she shouted through gritted teeth. Hearing this, Fang Hui nodded heavily and said with a solemn tone, “Please rest assured, I will definitely catch these girls.” “Not only to let you vent your anger, but also for the face of our Fang family! I will let these little rascals know that the Fang family is not to be trifled with. Those who dare to provoke the Fang family must be prepared to pay the price!” His voice was not concealed at all. On the contrary, he secretly used his true Qi to send his words further. ‘The reason why he did so was to intimidate the onlookers so as to prevent them from saying anything that would negatively affect the face of the Fang family. After all, this was not pleasant when others knew that the five tempering realm guards of the Fang family were easily defeated by a five or six-year-old girl. “Aiya, if you want to fight, then fight. Why are you talking so much nonsense?” Wan’er tilted her head and spread out her hands. She looked at Fang Hui helplessly and said, “You’ve said so much, but I…didn’t really understand.” “But if you want to fight, then don’t say so much nonsense, okay? My father said that dogs that bark won’t bite. They behave very cowardly.” “Are you scared? That’s why you’re talking so much nonsense?” “You! You dare to call me a dog?!” How could Fang Hui endure it any longer? His status in the Fang family was reasonably high, and others had tried to flatter him on a daily basis. Even those bigwigs in Fusheng City would give face to the Fang family and treat him politely most of the time. ‘Even the eldest young master and eldest young missy would respectfully address me as “uncle”! Who does this wretched girl think she is? She actually dares to call me a dog? Fang Hui thought to himself. “I think you don’t want to live anymore!” Fang Hui immediately threatened fiercely. “Haha!” However, before Wan’er could reply, a burst of clear laughter came from the sky. “This little girl is right. A dog that can bark won’t bite.. Your Fang family is indeed a bunch of cowards who only know how to bark and say vicious words!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Hearing the voice coming from the sky, Fang Hui’s face suddenly darkened. This voice was too familiar. Could it be that person? But that guy had been chased out of Fusheng City by the Fang family. Why would he appear here again? “Who are you? Why are you playing tricks here? If you have the guts, come out and show yourself!” Fang Hui forced himself to calm down and shouted in a deep voice. “Humph, I will meet you. I, Qiu Chi, am not afraid of your Fang family.” Qiu Chi! It was indeed him! ‘The former sect master of the Sky Wolf Sect. He was also the sworn enemy of the Fang family! In the next moment, that familiar figure appeared in front of Fang Hui. “Haha, Fang Hui, why don’t you recognize your old friend?” Qiu Chi laughed loudly, but no matter how one looked at it, there seemed to be a ball of anger hidden in his voice. “Have you forgotten that you left a wound on my back?” Fang Hui snorted and quietly blocked Fang Chunchun behind him. He said coldly, “I was wondering who it was, but it turned out to be a stray dog!” “Has the wound on your body healed so quickly? Why didn’t you hide? Did you forget about the pain after the wound healed? Instead of hiding obediently, you still dare to appear in front of our Fang family.” “Could it be that you want to die now?” Looking at Qiu Chi, he couldn’t help but become vigilant. He was only at the beginning stage of the refinement realm, whereas Qiu Chi was at the intermediate stage of the refinement realm! If he were to face Qiu Chi, he would be more likely to lose. If it was just him alone, it would be fine. If he couldn’t defeat Qiu Chi, he could still run. As long as he ran back to the Fang family, no matter how bold Qiu Chi was, he wouldn’t dare to trespass. However, Fang Chunchun was by his side. If the other party caught her, they might use this to threaten the Fang family. Therefore, he absolutely couldn’t show the slightest bit of cowardice at this time! “Yes, I do want to die, but you will definitely die before me. Don’t worry!” Qiu Chi said indifferently. Hearing this, Fang Hui’s brows rose. He was silent for a long while before saying, “Qiu Chi, today is not the time to settle the score between us. If you want to settle the score with our Fang family, I will wait for you to pay a visit to the Fang family another day.” “Thave to settle the score with these girls today. You’d better not interfere.” “Another day? I never picked a day to settle the score with you. Since you and I happened to meet today, it’s time to settle the score between us first.” Qiu Chi glanced at Wan’er and her siblings indifferently. He found that Wan’er and her siblings were also curiously sizing him up, and he was greatly surprised when there was not a trace of fear in their eyes. However, his face remained expressionless as he said, “I want to stop whatever your Fang family wants to do. If you want to settle scores with these young girls, then I will not let you get what you want!” “Cut the crap, let’s do i Before he finished his words, Qiu Chi’s expression suddenly turned stern, and he brazenly attacked. Fang Hui’s pupils constricted, and he spat angrily, “Damn it!” Then, he didn’t dare to be the slightest bit negligent and hurriedly circulated his true Qi to meet Qiu Chi. “Hey, how can you do that? I haven’t even made a move yet!” said Wan’er. ‘Wan’er saw that Qiu Chi suddenly made a move after talking briefly, and she immediately became anxious. She did not have much fun yet after finishing off those tempering realm guards easily, without even using her martial skills just now. ‘Wan’er was hoping that Fang Hui, who looked fierce and liked to talk nonsense, would be able to have a good fight with her. She hadn’t expected that before she could make a move, this strange guy who had descended from the sky would steal her opportunity. It was really infuriating! “Big sister, who do you think will win between the two of them?” Liver asked impatiently as she and Yan‘er came over quickly. ‘Wan’er immediately replied unhappily, “Humph, I don’t care who wins. Anyway, if they fight with me, I will definitely win!” “You’re bragging again!” Yan’er pouted and ridiculed, “You are only in the tempering realm. These two people look like they are in the refinement realm. How can you beat them?” “Forget it if you don’t believe me. I will never brag!” ‘Wan’er and her siblings were bickering softly. Fang Chunchun, Fang Xiaxia, and the others were so scared by the scene in front of them that they fell silent. Qiu Chi was not only the sect master of the Sky Wolf Sect, but he was also the sworn enemy of the Fang family! His name was known to all women and children in the Fang family. Hence, it was no surprise that they knew him. On their side, the strongest was Fang Hui. However, Fang Hui was already at a disadvantage when he started fighting. If Fang Hui lost, then their ending would probably be… Fang Chunchun didn’t even dare to think about it. She wanted to escape, but her legs seemed to be stuck, and she couldn’t move at all. At this moment, Qiu Chi and Fang Hui were clashing fiercely. The air seemed to be torn apart by the two of them, and the sound of rustling could be heard from time to time. Stone chips and dust were stirred up and filled the sky, making it look like a wasteland. After all, Qiu Chi was in the intermediate stage of the refinement realm. With the advantage of his realm, he had been steadily suppressing Fang Hui. However, his face did not look relaxed. Instead, as time passed, it became more and more serious. He realized that he could not completely defeat Fang Hui. Perhaps, it was because the old wounds on his body had more or less limited his ability to perform. Fang Hui noticed the abnormality in Qiu Chi’s body and instantly felt much more relaxed. He suddenly said, “Qiu Chi, if this continues, your old wounds should be about to reopen soon, right?” “Believe me, if we continue to fight, you definitely won’t win!” “Ljust want to settle the score with those stinky girls today. It has nothing to do with you. You can leave first. When you’ve recovered from your injuries, it won’t be too late to settle the score between us another day…” “How dare you get distracted when you’re fighting with me? Stop talking so much nonsense. I think you’re really courting death!” Qiu Chi harrumphed coldly, and the true Qi in his body abruptly poured into his arms. Fang Hui felt that the other party’s aura had suddenly increased, and in an instant, it actually pressed down on him until he was unable to breathe. His heart immediately jolted! However, before he could react, he felt a powerful force suddenly assault him, directly slamming into his chest. “Pfft!” Fang Hui gazed at himself, terrified, and saw his own blood spurting out like a pillar. Following that, his entire body was instantly sent flying, and he crashed heavily onto the ground. The faces of Fang Chunchun and the others tuned pale completely. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio “Cough, cough!” Qiu Chi couldn’t hold it in any longer and coughed twice. ‘That burst of power just now had caused quite a burden to his body. But as long as he could defeat people from the Fang family, it was worth it! He looked at Fang Hui, who was lying on the ground, and sneered, “Fang Hui, how is it? The feeling of losing to me isn’t bad, right?” “Pfft!” Fang Hui was angered by what he said and immediately coughed up two more mouthfuls of blood. Soon, he laughed out loud again, and it was a very scary laugh. “Haha, Qiu Chi, a stray dog like you can only show off in front of people like us.” “If you have the ability, do you dare to compete with our patriarch? I bet you can’t even last ten moves under our patriarch!” “Don’t worry, I’ll settle the score with Fang Shen sooner or later!” Qiu Chi’s gaze focused, and he said coldly, “Of course, you won’t be able to see that scene.” Before he finished speaking, he suddenly pulled out the dagger at his waist, and with a flash, his entire body instantly disappeared from the spot, pouncing towards Fang Hui. Just when Qiu Chi was only two to three meters away from Fang Hui, Fang Hui suddenly shouted loudly, “Go to hell!” Then, he threw out countless hidden weapons, and they were like locusts, coming at Qiu Chi from all directions. “This is bad!” Qiu Chi was shocked. He quickly withdrew his hands and retreated backward, barely managing to dodge all the hidden weapons. But when he got up, he saw that Fang Hui and Fang Chunchun were gone. As for Fang Xiaxia and the others, although they were still here, he had no intention of attacking these young girls. Though these young girls weren’t good people, Qiu Chi wasn’t a good person either. However, attacking a child wasn’t something he could do. Qiu Chi couldn’t help but shout angrily, “Go and die!” He didn’t expect that even after interacting with the Fang family for so long, he would still fall for their tricks! “Hey, who are you scolding? Are you scolding that fellow who fought with you just now?” At this moment, Wan’er and her siblings also came over. Qiu Chi glanced at them and sighed. He smiled bitterly and said, “No, I’m scolding myself.” “You’re cursing yourself to die?” Wan’er widened her eyes and asked in disbelief. Was he a fool? What kind of fool scolded himself. “Yes, I’m cursing myself to die. I actually got carried away and didn’t guard against the Fang family’s tricks,” Qiu Chi sighed regretfully. “You’re really strange!” Wan’er couldn’t help but ridicule. “Haha, you won’t understand.” Qiu Chi didn’t take Wan’er and her siblings’ gazes to heart. “Right, how have you offended the Fang family? Why would they attack you, young girl?” “Hmph, we are not young girls!” Yan’er interrupted before Wan’er could speak. “That’s right, I’m very powerful and those guys can’t beat me!” Wan’er also clenched her small fists and added with a smug look. Qiu Chi chuckled and didn’t take Yan’er’s words to heart. He had rushed over when he heard Fang Hui’s voice earlier. He had no idea what kind of entanglement had happened between the Fang family and Wan’er. However, this didn’t affect him from making a move against the Fang family. ‘As for Wan’er and her siblings, they were obviously just young girls. How could the members of the Fang family not be able to take care of these few young girls? Although this was what he thought in his heart, he did not express it out. “Yes, you aren’t young girls, all of you are the best. Those guys from the Fang family aren’t your match!” “Hmph, of course!” After receiving his acknowledgment, Wan’er instantly felt smug. She said again, “Let’s not talk about those guys, actually you are not my match too. Why don’t we have a fight?” “My father said that there is a rule in the pugilistic world that we could make friends in martial arts through fighting. I will show mercy to you, we can be friends after fighting.” Qiu Chi was instantly delighted when he saw a cute young girl acting in a mature manner. However, he obviously did not take Wan’er’s words to heart. He laughed and said, “Alright, you’re the best. I’m not your match either. However, I don’t have time to spar with you now. Let’s wait until the next time.” “The next time we meet, let’s have a good fight!” ‘Wan’er pinched her chin and “thought hard’ for a long while before she helplessly said, “Alright, since you have something to do, you can go back to work first. My father said that one can’t force others to do what one doesn’t others to do on to himself.” “But my father also said that if you lie, your nose will grow longer!” His nose would grow longer if he lied? He had never heard of such a thing. If that was true, then almost everyone in the cultivation world would have long noses. Presumably, these young girls’ father had told them a story to scare them from telling lies. Qiu Chi smiled and said, “Then do you think my nose is long?” Wan’er took a good look at his nose carefully, then shook her head and said, “It’s not long. It’s about the same as my father’s, but it’s not as high as my father’s nose bridge.” “That’s right. If it’s not long, it means that I haven’t lied to anyone. How would I lie to you then?” “Oh, that’s true.” Wan’er nodded thoughtfully. Qiu Chi asked again, “Who is your father? Why do I always hear you talking about him?” “Our father is the smartest, the most amazing, and the one who cares about us!” Wan’er replied without hesitation. Yan’er and Liv’er were not willing to be left behind. One after another, they replied, “That’s right, our father is the most amazing!” “alright, then send my regards to your father. I still have some matters to attend to, so I’ll take my leave first. The three of you should hurry back as well. It’s really too unsafe outside.” After saying that, he did not wait for Wan’er and her siblings to reply before turning around and leaving in a hurry. He was not a brainless boor. Although he hated the Fang family very much, he knew that he was still far from being a match for them. Just now, it was a coincidence that he couldn’t help but make a move. Now, the members of the Fang family might have gone back to get reinforcements. If he didn’t leave now, he would be waiting for death. “Hey, you mustn’t forget. The next time we meet, we’ll have a fight!” Wan’er was anxious and immediately shouted. “Lwon’t forget!” Qiu Chi didn’t turn his head. He just waved his hand and disappeared into the sea of people. He returned to Fusheng City to complete a mission that would cost him his life. He was not sure when he would be gone, and then there wouldn’t be the next time. So in a way, he wasn’t lying. “Wan’er, you always want to find someone to fight with. If our father knew, he would definitely scold you,” Yan’er said angrily to Wan’er as she puffed up her cheeks. Upon hearing this, Wan’er’s body suddenly stiffened. She hurriedly smiled apologetically and said, “Hey, as long as you and I keep silent about it, how would our father know?” “You want me to keep it a secret for you? No way!” Yan’er snorted. Liu’er added, “Unless you treat us to stinky tofu!” Wan’er was delighted. She quickly grabbed the hands of her two siblings, as she ran away, she said, “Okay, let’s go and eat stinky tofu now!” On the other hand, Yan’er, who had finally gotten hold of Wan’er’s weakness, suddenly felt angry when she heard what Liu’er said. Big sister’s weakness was exchanged for a bowl of stinky tofu? ‘Was it worth it? However, the stinky tofu was very fragrant! If a bowl wasn’t worth it, then she could it to exchange for a few more bowls! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The sum was setting in the west. At the Jiang family, Jiang Ping looked at the gradually darkening sky and shook his head helplessly. His three daughters were too energetic. They had gone out in the moming, and yet they still hadn’t returned home when the sun was about to set. Jiang Ping sighed and said, “Uncle Zhong, go and ask around tomorrow to see if there are any good schools in this Fusheng City. We must send Wan’er and the rest to school as soon as possible.” “Otherwise, they will be out all the time as they won’t be able to stay idle for even a moment. According to their character, they will get into trouble sooner or later.” “Fusheng City is unlike Xiaoyu Town. There are all kinds of people here, so it’s better to be cautious.” “Yes, I will go and find out tomorrow,” replied Chen Zhong as he quickly bowed. Then, he smiled and said, “However, you don’t have to worry too much. Although Miss Wan’er and her siblings are a little mischievous, they are all kind and warm-hearted. They will definitely not cause any trouble.” Jiang Ping waved his hand and said, “I’m just afraid that they are too warm-hearted. They don’t know anything, but they want to get involved in everything!” “You don’t have to say anything more about this matter. Just do as I say.” Just as Chen Zhong was about to agree, Jiang Ping suddenly sat up straight. His face darkened and he shouted over Chen Zhong, “Stop!” “Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liver, you guys still know to come back? I thought you guys had forgotten about this family!” The three young girls, who were tiptoeing and planning to sneak back into the room, suddenly stopped. When they heard their father’s angry tone, they knew that they would not be able to escape this scolding. They quickly put on a cute expression and pounced on Jiang Ping. “Dad!” The three girls were like octopuses, hanging on Jiang Ping’s body in a strange posture. “Dad, I have so much fun today!” said Wan’er. “Dad, I miss you so much!” said Yan‘er. “Dad, I am hungry,” said Liver. The three girls were chattering and mumbling, not giving Jiang Ping a chance to speak at all. However, Jiang Ping had experienced this so many times. Although he was still unable to resist their coquettish acts, his resistance was definitely much better than before. “Cough cough.” He coughed twice and deliberately put on a straight face. He pushed the three girls away from him one by one and put them on the ground. He said in a deep voice, “Alright, don’t think that just because you are giving me sweet talk now, I will let you off.” “Do you remember what you promised me when you went out this morning? You promised that you would definitely come home before lunch, but what happened in the end? You’re back only after dinner.” “Tt seems to me that there’s too much fun outside, and you’ve forgotten about your family and me!” “No, no!” The three little girls were shocked and quickly waved their small hands to deny it. “You’re the best. I will never forget you, never!” said Wan’er. Yan’er followed suit and said, “Me too. I will never forget you too.” “Dad, I will never forget you and I’ll think of you all the time,” said Liver. Looking at his daughters explaining anxiously, Jiang Ping finally felt a little better. Fortunately, his effort to raise them was not in vain. They still had some conscience. But on the surface, he pretended to be angry and said, “Then why did you play outside all day?” “Tell me, what did the three of you do today? You can’t hide or lie to me, or else I will be angry!” “Dad, don’t be angry. I am the most obedient so I won’t hide or lie to you.” Yan’er promised as she quickly patted her small chest. “We went to eat skewers, ice cream, stinky tofu…we even played nesting dolls, threw darts, and…” As she spoke, Yan’er suddenly revealed a troubled expression. Was she going to tell him about Wan’er getting into a fight with someone? ‘Dad used to say that after taking benefits from others, one had to be deliberately courteous and not to tell tales about them. Now that I have eaten the stinky tofu that Wan’er had offered, I had promised to help her keep it a secret. If I tell Dad, I’l be one who can’t keep a promise.’ ‘But if I don’t tell him, then I’ll be lying to Dad, and I’ll not be the most obedient daughter. I’m so conflicted!” Jiang Ping saw the conflicted look on Yan’er’s face, and he immediately had a bad premonition in his heart. He hurriedly said, “Yan’er, what else? You’ve said before that you’re my most obedient daughter, so you absolutely can’t hide it from me.” “Also, we competed with a few girls in throwing darts!” Wan’er knew that if this continued, Yan’er would definitely sell her out. Hence, she was anxious and blurted out. “A dart throwing competition?”Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows. “Yes, they are older than me but they are not as good as me. So I defeated them easily!” Wan’er said with a proud face. Jiang Ping looked at Yan’er and Liv’er. Seeing that they both nodded, he was relieved. He couldn’t help but feel a little puzzled. He chuckled and said, “Wan’er, don’t brag. I know how good you are. How can you win?” “Hmph, if you don’t believe me, then forget it.” Wan’er placed her hands on her hips and twisted her face. She pretended to be angry and snorted. She only said that she beat those girls. She did not specifically say that she won them in throwing darts. But if Dad thought so, it was not because she was lying! Looking at his daughter’s cute and arrogant attitude, Jiang Ping’s love for her grew. He hugged Wan’er in his arms and kissed her red little face, he smiled and said, “Okay, I believe you.” Wan’er immediately beamed with joy and smiled proudly. She hugged Jiang Ping’s neck and kissed him on the side of his handsome face. “We also want a kiss!” Yan’er and Liu’er were not willing to lag behind and quickly jumped up and down to beg for a hug. “Okay, okay, okay. Everyone will get it. Don’t be anxious, don’t squeeze…” The three young girls squeezed into Jiang Ping’s arms and played around. Jiang Ping was very happy and he had a huge smile on his face. Then, he said, “However, the three of you had played far too much today. You were not around for an entire day.” “It has been half a month since we moved to Fusheng City. You have played long enough. It’s time for you to go to school.” “Thave already instructed Uncle Zhong to find you a school tomorrow. In the future, you’ll be able to make more new friends. What do you think?” “No!” ‘When they heard that they were going to school, their expressions suddenly changed. “I don’t want new friends, I only want you, Dad. I must always keep you company!” “We are the same. We must always keep you company, Dad!” Jiang Ping smiled, but he wasn’t surprised. His three daughters obviously didn’t want to go to school and used him as a shield! However, this wasn’t up to them.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At Fusheng City, in the main hall of the Fang family. Hearing Fang Hui’s description, Fang Shen was furious. “What? Qiu Chi, that stray dog, actually dared to come back and attack our Fang family in public?!” Fang Shen glared at Fang Hui. His gaze was so fierce as if he wanted to slice off pieces of Fang Hui’s flesh. Fang Hui felt a chill run down his spine, and he panicked. He quickly lowered his head, not daring to look Fang Shen in the eye. He replied weakly, “That’s right, it’s that guy Qiu Chi.” “Patriarch, I don’t know what’s going on. Qiu Chi was not afraid when he saw our Fang family members, instead, he was a little…agitated?!” “Hmph!” Fang Shen glanced at him and retracted his gaze, he then said disdainfully, “You’ve already said it yourself, he’s a stray dog. When a dog is anxious, it will bite people. Sky Wolf Sect was exterminated by us, so it’s obvious that he hates us to the core.” “When he sees us, it’s natural that he is extremely agitated and wants to take revenge.” “Your words make sense.” Fang Hui nodded. His tone suddenly changed as he continued, “However, Qiu Chi not only attacked us, he even threatened to seek revenge on you very soon.” “From the looks of it, he doesn’t seem to be putting on an act. Could it be…could it be that he found some kind of help that gave him the courage to challenge us openly?” Fang Shen instantly calmed down and thought for a moment when he heard that. Then, he said slowly, “That shouldn’t be. Those powers that had a close relationship with the Sky Wolf Sect in the past had long cut off contact with Qiu Chi. Otherwise, our Fang family wouldn’t have been able to destroy the Sky Wolf Sect so easily.” “He’s all alone now. It’s possible that he might not have money to eat.” “With his ability, how can he find help who can challenge us?” Fang Hui nodded as he felt that Fang Shen’s careful analysis was very reasonable. Perhaps the reason why Qiu Chi would say such a thing was to boost his own courage and at the same time, to scare the Fang family. “However, we are not afraid of thieves who steal, but we are afraid of thieves who remember!” Fang Shen hesitated for a moment, then said coldly, “Our relationship with Qiu Chi has been irreconcilable. Since he has returned, he must be planning to destroy our Fang family at all times.” “Twill not give him such a chance!” “He is just a stray dog. If our Fang family can destroy him once, we can destroy him a second time!” “This time, I will order the first elder and the second elder to personally lead the action. You will assist them. You must hit the target in one strike and capture Qiu Chi in one fell swoop!” “Take advantage of the welcome banquet in two days’ time to let all the influential figures in Fusheng City know that our Fang family is not to be trifled with!” “Yes, Patriarch!” Fang Hui hurriedly bowed and replied respectfully. “Qiu Chi, you’re consigning yourself to hell!” Fang Shen narrowed his eyes, and a ruthlessly smug light flashed in his eyes. He said in a low and fierce voice, “You escaped quickly back then, so I give you a chance to escape.” “didn’t expect that you would walk right into the lion’s den. But since you’re here, then don’t even think about escaping this time. Use your life to tell those old fellows in Fusheng City a bloody truth!” “Oh right, patriarch, there’s one more thing…” Fang Hui suddenly thought of Wan’er and her siblings, and couldn’t help but hesitate. Looking at him, Fang Shen raised his eyebrows and said in an unfriendly tone, “If you have something to say, just say it. You know that I hate guys who stutter the most.” Fang Hui was shocked and hurriedly said, “Before I bumped into Qiu Chi today, I met those people who bullied Miss Chunchun and the others.” “Oh, so it’s about that matter.” Fang Shen replied in a moderate tone. If Fang Hui didn’t mention it now, he would have almost forgotten his daughter was being bullied. After all, compared to the face of the entire Fang family and his precious son, Fang Wuji, Fang Chunchum’s matter was not as important. To him, a girl would marry someone outside the family sooner or later, and then she would side with others. So she couldn’t be considered a member of the Fang family. Fang Shen did not pay much attention to it and asked indifferently, “How is it? Have you taught those guys who bullied Chunchun a lesson?” “Those who dared to attack simply did not put the Fang family in their eyes. They are just smacking our Fang family’s face. So, when dealing with such people, there is no need to show mercy at all.” “Just like Chunchun said, just kill them directly.” Fang Hui was at a loss. ‘The patriarch seemed to think that those guys must be fools since they dared to attack Miss Chunchun. Why could it not be that these people did have the ability to ignore you? Why did you think that you could kill them? Of course, he didn’t dare to say this, because if he did, he would definitely be beaten to death. He calmed down a little and mustered up his courage before he braced himself and slowly said, “Patriarch, those guys who bullied Miss Chunchun were only three young girls, they were about five or six-year-old…” “What, five or six-year-old young girls?” Fang Shen was stunned for a moment before he asked in a deep voice, “What kind of family did the other party come from? What kind of strength did their guards have?” He subconsciously felt that a five or six-year-old girl probably couldn’t even speak clearly. How could she possibly bully his spoiled daughter who was over ten years old? Most likely the other party came from some kind of prestigious family, which explained why she dared to attack Miss Chunchun. However, Fang Hui sighed and shook his head helplessly. “No, those few girls didn’t have any servants or guards by their side, but one of them was very strong, She even defeated our Fang family’s guards. I reckon…Miss Chunchun and the others were bullied by that girl.” Fang Shen immediately flew into a rage and cursed, “Trash, all of you are a bunch of f*cking trash!” “Even if she started cultivating since she was born, how strong could a five or six-year-old girl be??” “When did our Fang family’s guards become so trash that they couldn’t even defeat a five or six-year-old girl?” “Patriarch, please calm down!” Fang Hui was shocked and knelt down immediately. He said quickly, “Could this be a trick of Qiu Chi’s?” “What does this have to do with Qiu Chi?” Fang Hui quickly explained, “Just when I was about to attack those girls today, Qiu Chi suddenly appeared.” “think, since that girl dared to bully Miss Chunchun and could even defeat our Fang family’s guards, could it be a trick of his?” Fang Hui originally didn’t have such thoughts. But now that he heard Fang Shen’s words, he also felt that this matter didn’t make sense no matter how he thought about it. In addition, Qiu Chi’s appearance was really too coincidental, so he suddenly had an idea and hurriedly pointed the spearhead at Qiu Chi. “Hmph, Qiu Chi!” After hearing his explanation, Fang Shen didn’t doubt it. However, his desire to kill Qiu Chi instantly became even more intense.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The next day. The streets of Fusheng City were bustling with activities. The Fang family was going to hold a welcoming banquet for their young genius the next day, and the news had long spread among the cultivation powers in the city. All the influential figures had received invitations from the Fang family, and they all knew what the Fang family was planning. The Fang family wanted to use this opportunity to show off their strength and connections so that they could be respected as a first-rate power in Fusheng City, rather than a second-rate power. In fact, a few months ago, when the Fang family forcefully annexed the Sky Wolf Sect, many people had noticed this second-rate family. After all, although the sect master of the Sky Wolf Sect was only at the intermediate stage of the refinement realm, he was still quite famous in Fusheng City. The fact that the Fang family was able to defeat him in such a short amount of time showed that the Fang family was very ambitious. However, now that the Fang family had a genius who had reached the tempering realm at the age of sixteen, and even had an elder of Chuanyun Sect as his teacher, the Fang family was somehow connected to Chuanyun Sect. In addition, the Blood Fang Gang had always been the Fang family’s strongest backer. Therefore, although many old families looked down on the Fang family, they still had to give the Fang family some face. Even if it wasn’t the Chuanyun Sect, the Blood Fang Gang wasnt to be trifled with! Fusheng City was the home of a powerful force, which resided in the mansion of the Fusheng City mayor. This was the official power of the Tianyun Empire that was stationed in Fusheng City. In name, they had the authority to manage and lead the entire city. However, in reality, many powers in the city didn’t obey the mayor’s management and leadership. Instead, they did things by their own rules. Only ordinary people would obey the mayor’s decrees. The mayor was the number one cultivation expert in Fusheng City on the surface. He was at the intermediate stage of the origin core realm. However, the mayor had not fought for many years, so he was a lot less intimidating now, compared to the Blood Fang Gang, the Golden Door Sect, and the Open City Sect. These three major powers were above many first-rate and second-rate powers in Fusheng City. They were considered by many to be top forces, and were actually not much inferior to the mayor’s own forces. According to rumors, the rulers of the three major powers had already been beginning stage origin core realm experts many years ago. Now, many people speculated that they had probably already entered the intermediate stage origin core realm, and were completely on par with the mayor! However, the mayor’s mansion had the support of the dynasty, so they were still firmly suppressed. No matter how rebellious they were, they could not do anything about it. Among the three major powers, the Blood Fang Gang was the most notorious and feared. The Blood Fang Gang was ruthless and unpredictable. Sometimes, when they were walking on the street, they would kill anyone they saw as an eyesore. They didn’t care whether the other party was an ordinary person or a cultivator. In fact, they didn’t care about the laws at all. Many people hated the Blood Fang Gang so much that they wanted to rip their tendons, skin them, and grind their bones into dust. However, the Blood Fang Gang was very powerful. There were also many first-and second-rate powers that sought refuge with them, such as the Fang family, which had recently risen to power. The Blood Fang Gang was already deep-rooted in the city, it had the power that could easily deceive the masses. It was already good enough for ordinary powers not to be targeted by the Blood Fang Gang. How would they dare to seek justice? Originally, the mayor’s mansion would definitely make a move when they encountered such a situation. However, in the past few years, the mayor’s mansion had remained silent for some reason. As for the Golden Door Sect and the Open City Sect, although they could compete with the Blood Fang Gang in terms of strength, they always remained silent and did not make any moves. This forced most of the powers in Fusheng City to avoid the Blood Fang Gang at all costs. However, this time, they could not avoid it. They would definitely meet the Blood Fang Gang at the Fang family’s banquet! Everyone knew that the Blood Fang Gang was the Fang family’s backer. However, from the looks of it, the relationship between the two was not that simple. The Blood Fang Gang might have the ambition to use the Fang family to get close to the Chuanyun Sect and further strengthen their connections and influence. The Fang family also hoped to use this opportunity to completely bring their relationship with the Blood Fang Gang into the light. They wanted everyone to know that offending the Fang family was offending the Blood Fang Gang, and this would truly boost their reputation in Fusheng City. The Fang family’s banquet had stirred the hearts of countless people. Of course, Jiang Ping, who was strolling along the streets with his three precious daughters, did not know about this. The streets of Fusheng City were bustling with activities every day. The sounds of all kinds of hawking, shouting and cheering were incessant. In this world, ordinary people who ultimately didn’t know how to cultivate made up the vast majority of the population. These people didn’t know about the Fang family, the Sky Wolf Sect, or the grudges between cultivators. Of course, they didn’t want to know either. They only hoped that they could live peacefully. “Dad, this building is so beautiful!” Jiang Ping was holding his daughters’ hands and strolling on the street. Suddenly, Wan’er felt like her legs were stuck to the road. She couldn’t walk anymore. Her eyes were fixed on the right side of the road. Jiang Ping stopped and looked in the same direction. He saw a magnificent building with carved beams and murals not far from the right side of the road. There was a vermilion board hanging at the entrance of the building with three big words written on it: “Hundred Treasures House”! Jiang Ping’s body froze. He had learned a lot about Fusheng City in the past few days. He had also heard a little about the Hundred Treasures House in front of him. It was just as its name suggested. It was probably the building that contained the most treasures in Fusheng City. However, it wasn’t because it was very rich or powerful. It was because the Hundred Treasures House was actually an auction house. Inside it was treasures from dozens of surrounding cities. Basically, it had everything. ‘Whenever the Hundred Treasures House held an auction, the major powers in Fusheng City would definitely send people to participate. This was because everyone knew that when the Hundred Treasures House held an auction, something extraordinary would definitely appear! Coincidentally, there was an auction today, and it was about to begin. Jiang Ping patted Wan’er’s little head and said with a smile, “You really have good taste. This Hundred Treasures House is indeed very beautiful.” “Hundred Treasures House? Dad, let’s go in and take a look. I want to go in and take a look!” Wan’er hurriedly shook the corner of Jiang Ping’s clothes and puffed up her cheeks cutely. “But, they seem to be holding an auction. We…” Jiang Ping said with a troubled expression. “Auction? Isn’t that where Dad said there would be a lot of treasures? Yeah! Dad, let’s go in and take a look.” “Talso want to go in and take a look!” said Yan‘er. “Me too!” ‘When the three girls heard that it was an auction, they were all excited. There had never been any auction in Xiaoyu Town. This was a new thing.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio In the end, Jiang Ping compromised. Sometimes, he really regretted telling the three girls bedtime stories. Why did they always remember them so well? Just like this so-called auction. In the past, the three girls didn’t know what an auction was because there was no such thing in Xiaoyu Town. But once, when Jiang Ping was telling the three girls a story, he accidentally mentioned an auction. At that time, Jiang Ping created a sense of mystery to the audition, as he wanted his three daughters to feel that he, who had been to the auction, was very powerful. He was practically boasting about the auction. He said that there were all kinds of magical treasures in the auction. There was nothing that couldn’t be found there. ‘When the three girls heard that at that time, the yearning in their eyes could not be hidden at all. They clamored to go to the auction. However, they could not go at that time, so this left the three girls with a lot of regrets. Now that they suddenly heard the word “auction’, the little ones immediately became excited. No matter what, Jiang Ping had to bring them in to take a look. Jiang Ping sighed. Who asked these three little ones to be his precious treasures? He could only helplessly say, “Alright, then we’ll go in and take a look. But remember, it’s just a look. You must not cause trouble for me.” “Otherwise, I will never bring you out to play again!” “Alright!” The three girls immediately clapped their hands in satisfaction and replied in unison. In the hall of the Hundred Treasures House. After understanding the purpose of Jiang Ping’s visit, the middle-aged man who was responsible for guarding the entrance of the auction looked at Jiang Ping, then looked at Wan’er and her siblings with a strange expression. Finally, he revealed a bitter smile and said, “I’m sorry, sir. The auction that is currently being held inside is extremely high-level.” “Only important figures in Fusheng City are able to join the auction today. They all have an exclusive invitation from us. We really can’t let anyone else in.” “L know that you want to bring your daughters in to broaden your horizons. To be honest, I also want to let such cute young girls in, but this is the Hundred Treasures House’s rule.” “If I take the liberty…” Jiang Ping laughed bitterly in his heart. He didn’t expect that the person in charge of the guards was also a chatterbox. However, his attitude was good. He was straightforward and didn’t hide or look down on others. Jiang Ping naturally didn’t want to make things difficult for him. He wasn’t even interested in this auction. However, when he felt the expectant eyes of Wan’er and the others, Jiang Ping could only helplessly take out a high-quality spirit stone from his storage space and handed it to the man. He chuckled and said, “With this, it should be enough to prove my identity, right?” ‘The man was talking non-stop when he was suddenly interrupted by Jiang Ping. He could not help but feel a fire burn in his heart, and then he felt his hand sink. ‘When he focused his eyes, it turned out to be an exquisite and clear spirit stone that was emitting a green-blue light! ‘The man’s mouth immediately opened wide! He stared at the spirit stone in a daze for a long while. Then suddenly his whole body shivered as if he had come back to his senses. He hurriedly handed the spirit stone back to Jiang Ping. He stuttered, “Sir, this is a high…high-quality spirit stone, right?” ‘As a worker of the Hundred Treasures House, he had a certain level of understanding of such things, even though he was just a guard in charge of the door. Naturally, he knew that the quality of spirit stones could be determined with just a glance by the color of the spirit stones. ‘Wasn’t a spirit stone that was emitting a green and blue light a high-quality spirit stone? Under his shocked gaze, Jiang Ping slowly nodded his head and said, “That’s right, this is a high-quality spirit stone. Do you think that I can now prove that I have the qualifications to enter?” “Yes, yes, yes!” the man replied repeatedly. Although the influential figures in Fusheng City would receive an invitation letter from their Hundred Treasures House, it was inevitable that they would miss out on some experts who lived in seclusion in the mountains or came from other places. Jiang Ping looked too young, but the indifferent and otherworldly temperament on his body, as well as his ability to casually take out a high-quality spirit stone, made him have no doubt that Jiang Ping must have a powerful background. After all, there were very few people in Fusheng City who owned a high-quality spirit stone. Although ten middle-quality spirit stones could be exchanged for a high-quality spirit stone, high-quality spirit stones were actually much rarer. Many large powers clearly had dozens of middle-quality spirit stones, but they could not exchange them for high-quality spirit stones! If a person with a high-quality spirit stone was not even qualified to enter the Hundred Treasures House’s auction, who else could be qualified? ‘The man immediately changed into a cautious expression and respectfully said, “Please wait a moment, sir. I will ask the manager to personally receive you.” With that said, he hurriedly waved his hand and beckoned to a servant standing behind him, whispering in his ear. That servant hurriedly ran to the back. This was also an instruction from the owner of the Hundred Treasures House. If any important figure that he had not seen appeared, he had to inform the manager. That way, he might be able to form some good relationships. Even if it was not possible, it could fully show the sincerity of the Hundred Treasures House and leave a good impression on the other party. Of course, there was another reason. This man was actually a little uncertain whether the spirit stones in Jiang Ping’s hands were actually high-quality spirit stones. Very soon, the manager of the Hundred Treasures House rushed over. He was a middle-aged man with a gray beard and yellow hair. Seeing the person who had come, the guard hurriedly went up to greet him. He gave him a look and said respectfully, “Manager, this is the gentleman.” The manager nodded, tidied up his clothes, and walked up to Jiang Ping with a smile, saying, “Honored guest from afar, I apologize for not welcoming you. I hope you can forgive me!” “I don’t deserve it,” Jiang Ping replied indifferently. But with a glance, the manager’s entire body instantly froze. He stared intently at the high-quality spirit stone in Jiang Ping’s hand, not saying a word or moving at all. After a while, the guard called out softly by his ear, and he finally reacted. He quickly bowed and smiled apologetically at Jiang Ping, “I’m sorry, I lost my composure. I apologize for making a fool of myself.” Jiang Ping smiled and shook his head, saying, “It’s fine, but I don’t know if we can go in now. My three little girls are getting a little impatient from waiting.” “If you don’t let Wan’er go in, she will get angry!” ‘Wan’er immediately cooperated with her father’s words and puffed up her cheeks. “That’s right, we will also get angry!” Yan’er and Liu‘er also echoed at the side. The manager quickly apologized, “It’s my negligence. Please follow me in, Sir and these three…young ladies.” “Twill arrange a VIP room for you.” After saying that, the manager immediately turned his body and made a gesture of inviting them in. With his experience, he could easily tell that Jiang Ping was holding a high-quality spirit stone in his hand! Although a person who owned a high-quality spirit stone might not be a big shot, he definitely had the qualifications to sit in a VIP room! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping, Wan’er, and the others were led to a VIP room on the second floor of the auction house. Looking out from the private room, they could clearly see the entire auction house, but people from the outside could not see inside. ‘As soon as they entered the private room, Wan’er and her siblings were so excited that they almost jumped up and down. However, when they saw that there were outsiders, they forcefully suppressed their excitement. ‘The manager chuckled and said to Jiang Ping, “Sir, is the environment here okay?” “Yes, it’s okay,” Jiang Ping replied casually. ‘The manager did not care. On the contrary, Jiang Ping’s appearance made him even more convinced that Jiang Ping must be a young master from a major power! He smiled and asked again, “By the way, may I know your surname, sir?” “My surname is Jiang.” “So it’s Mr. Jiang!” The manager pretended to be enlightened. He was frantically searching for information about the major powers with the surname Jiang in his mind. However, he couldn’t recall any major powers with the surname Jiang in Fusheng City or the surrounding cities. That’s right. He must be some hermit expert, right? ‘The manager temporarily threw these thoughts out of his mind and explained with a smile, “Mr. Jiang, there are a total of twelve private rooms on the second floor of the Hundred Treasures House’s auction hall.” “These private rooms are prepared for distinguished guests like you. The private rooms are on the second floor and can overlook the entire auction. You can learn about the items on the stage at the first moment.” “Moreover, the privacy of these rooms is excellent. From the private rooms below and next door, it is absolutely impossible to pry into the situation in this room. It can definitely protect your privacy.” In an auction, there would always be many people who would take a fancy to a treasure. There was only one of each treasure, and those who failed to obtain the treasure at the auction would inevitably feel indignant. They might even take the risk to kill and steal. This was especially so for the competition between those large powers, which was extremely dangerous. It was either you die or I live! Even tigers were afraid of a pack of wolves, so many large powers did not want to be harried by all kinds of enemies. Therefore, in order to take care of those big customers, private rooms like this were essential. ‘The manager nagged for a while, and when he saw that Jiang Ping revealed a trace of impatience and his thoughts were somewhere else, he quickly shut his mouth. He smiled and said, “Mr. Jiang, please go ahead. I will take my leave first.” “If you have any instructions, just ring the bell on your hand. I will serve you.” “Okay, you may leave.” Jiang Ping waved his hand. The manager did not dare to delay any longer and respectfully left. ‘Wan’er and her siblings had suppressed their questions for a long time. They suddenly exploded and said, “Dad, this is great! I finally know what an auction is like!” “Dad, does an auction really have everything?” “Hiss, this…” Jiang Ping was stunned when he heard what Yan’er said. An auction naturally couldn’t have everything, but if he were to say it directly, Yan’er would say that he was lying in the past. He thought for a while and then explained, “Yan’er, although an auction has everything, there are many auctions in the world. The things in different auctions are still different.” “Oh, so that’s how it is.” Yan’er did not doubt him and nodded thoughtfully. Immediately after, her eyes suddenly lit up and she asked again, “Dad, what was that stone just now?” “Why did that uncle let us in after you took out that stone?” Jiang Ping smiled and took out that high-quality spirit stone again from his storage space. He said, “This is called a spirit stone.” “Spirit stone? What is it?” The three girls were instantly attracted by the light emitted by the spirit stone and asked in a daze. “A spirit stone is something that can help you cultivate.” Jiang Ping thought for a moment. The three girls had already broken through to the tempering realm, and it was likely that they would soon break through to the refinement realm. At that time, they could absorb the spiritual energy in the spirit stones and speed up their cultivation. Now, he might as well explain it to them first so that they had a better understanding of spirit stones. Therefore, he continued to explain, “Spirit stones are divided into low-quality, middle-quality, high-quality, and supreme-quality spirit stones. They contain spiritual energy, and the concentration of spiritual energy contained in spirit stones of different grades is also different.” “Generally speaking, refinement realm cultivators can only absorb the spiritual energy of low-quality spirit stones. If they absorb the spiritual energy of middle-quality or even high-quality spirit stones rashly, they might not be able to withstand it, resulting in explosion and death.” “Origin core realm cultivators can absorb middle-quality spirit stones, while nascent soul realm cultivators can absorb high-quality spirit stones…of course, things are not absolute. It still depends on one’s physique.” ‘Though Jiang Ping had explained so much, Wan’er and her siblings didn’t really understand! ‘They now knew that after the tempering realm was the refinement realm, and after the refinement realm was the origin core realm…but as for the other things, they were all at a loss and couldn’t react in time. “Dad, this stone…the spirit stone is so beautiful. Can you give it to me?” asked Yan’er abruptly as she stared at the spirit stone in Jiang Ping’s hand. Jiang Ping knew that the three girls didn’t understand what he was saying at all. They were simply mesmerized by the dazzling appearance of the spirit stone. Girls were known to like shiny things. As expected, this was their nature, regardless of age. “yan’er, I can’t give this spirit stone to you.” Jiang Ping refused as he put the high-quality spirit stone back into his storage space. “Ah, why? Do you not love me anymore? Sob, sob, sob…” Yan’er immediately put on an aggrieved look. Jiang Ping didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He quickly picked Yan‘er up and placed her on his lap. He comforted her, “How can I not love you? Even if you want the stars in the sky, I will pick them for you.” “But I can’t give you that spirit stone now. I will give you another spirit stone, okay?” As he said this, he took out a low-quality spirit stone that was emitting a light green light. Actually, it wasn’t that Jiang Ping was reluctant to give Yan’er a high-quality spirit stone. Not to mention a high-quality spirit stone, he had a huge pile of supreme-quality spirit stones in his storage space. He didn’t feel the slightest bit reluctant to give it up. However, it was impossible for him to be by Yan‘er’s side at all times. If other people found out that Yan’er carried a high-quality spirit stone with her at all times, she might end up being targeted by others. Moreover, Yan’er was only in the tempering realm now, so it was impossible for her to absorb the spiritual energy of a high-quality spirit stone. ‘A low-quality spirit stone was more suitable for her current cultivation realm. Holding the low-quality spirit stone that was emitting a light green light, Yan’er immediately broke into a smile. She stared at the spirit stone in a daze as she softly said “yes”. “Dad, I want it too, I want it too!” ‘Wan’er and Liu’er, who were at the side, immediately acted coquettishly when they saw their father giving Yan’er such a nice spirit stone. “Alright, Wan’er and Liver will get one too!” Jiang Ping said with a light smile. Since he had given it to Yan’er, he naturally would not favor one over the others.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The auction soon began. During this period, Jiang Ping would occasionally sense some movements coming from the private rooms next to him. The confidentiality of the private rooms in the Hundred Treasures House was really good. Even Jiang Ping, who was in the nascent soul realm, couldn’t hear it clearly. Of course, this was also because Jiang Ping didn’t use his full strength to sense what was happening in the surrounding private rooms. Otherwise, he would most likely be able to hear what the people in the private rooms were saying. However, he didn’t have the habit of eavesdropping on other people’s conversations. His attention was focused on the auction stage on the first floor. After all, he was already here, so he might as well see if there were any good things. Though this was unlikely. After all, he could sign in through the system and receive all kinds of generous rewards, hence he really didn’t have much interest in many treasures. For example, the high-quality spirit stones, which were regarded as the most precious treasures in the entire cultivation world of Fusheng City, were not worth mentioning in his eyes. If he wasn’t worried about attracting too much attention, he would have taken out supreme-quality spirit stones just now. In his storage space, there were more supreme-quality spirit stones than high-quality spirit stones. He also had more high-quality spirit stones than middle-quality spirit stones. In short, the better the item, the more he had! Therefore, Jiang Ping didn’t think that there would be anything that would move his heart in this auction. “Hey, do you guys feel that this auction seems to be the grandest one in the past two years?” “Do you feel it too? I think the Hundred Treasures House hasn’t held such a grand auction for many years. Look at the second floor. Other than the private room reserved for the mayor’s mansion, the other eleven private rooms are all occupied. In the past few years, where have so many important figures come together?” “In other words, the most precious auction item that the Hundred Treasures House has handled in the past few years might appear in this auction?” “According to my understanding of the Hundred Treasures House, it should be so. If it wasn’t for the good stuff, the Hundred Treasures House wouldn’t have invited so many important people to participate in this auction.” In the lobby on the first floor, the people who were sitting and waiting had already begun to whisper and share information about the auction. These people were cultivators, and there was no lack of second-rate powers among them. However, they knew nothing about the inside story of this auction. This was too rare, so everyone was talking about it. They felt that this auction was definitely not simple. On the second floor. In the exclusive private room of the Golden Door Sect. There were two beautiful women with seducing bodies. One of them was wearing a red dress, and the other was wearing a purple dress. Although they were both first-class beauties, the aura they gave off was completely different. ‘The woman in the red dress gave off a hot and straightforward feeling, while the woman in the purple dress was elegant and demure. One was like cooking oil in a raging fire, while the other was gentle and calm. ‘When these two women were together, they gave off a visual impact of ice and fire, which was very exciting. ‘The woman in the red dress looked at the noisy scene on the first floor and said excitedly, “Yue’er, the Hundred Treasures House is so lively today. Do you think the Hundred Treasures House has found something good?” Zi Yue gently blew at the bubbles on the tea, and without even lifting her eyelids, she said softly, “If there was nothing good, the Hundred Treasures House wouldn’t have gone through so much trouble to invite so many important figures here.” “Don’t tell me that the Hundred Treasures House doesn’t know your temper, Miss Feng Dan? If they can’t bring out anything good and make you come here in vain, you will tear down the Hundred Treasures House!” In their relationship, they always liked to make fun of each other, so this kind of joke was very common. Hearing this, the woman in the red dress rolled her eyes and said snappily, “Yue’er, why do you always make fun of me? Am I such a person? I’m also a very elegant and demure woman, okay?” “Cough cough!” Zi Yue almost choked. Elegant and demure? These four words had nothing to do with the lady next to her. Anyway, Zi Yue had known Feng Dan for more than ten years, but she had never seen her elegant side. Feng Dan saw her smile. She was so angry that she immediately stomped her feet and snorted fiercely. “Zi Yue, stop making fun of me!” Then, she rolled her eyes and revealed a relaxed expression. She smiled and said, “Anway, who else in Fusheng City is more prestigious than you, Miss Zi Yue? You are the daughter of the mayor’s mansion. If you want to destroy the Hundred Treasures House, you don’t even have to do it yourself!” “You can erase the Hundred Treasures House from the map of Fusheng City with just one order!” She smiled and put her head close to Zi Yue’s face, and said with a smile, “By the way, Yue’er, didn’t the Hundred Treasures House send an invitation to the mayor’s mansion? Why do you still want to use my private room?” Zi Yue used a finger to push Feng Dan’s red face away with a look of disgust. She said indifferently, “Why? You don’t welcome me?” “Why would I?” Feng Dan laughed and hugged Zi Yue. She smiled and said, “Of course I welcome you, but…” Feng Dan suddenly let go of her hands, she crossed her arms and took two steps back. She stared at Zi Yue “vigilantly” and said, “I’m not interested in girls. Don’t have any wicked ideas about me!” “You!” Zi Yue, who had been maintaining her calm all this time, was now so angry that her little face turned red. As a result, Feng Dan felt very pleased with herself. She laughed loudly and said, “Oh, why are you blushing, my most elegant and demure Miss Zi Yue? Am I really right that you do have wicked thoughts about me?” “That won’t do. My body is reserved for your future brother-in-law!” “It’s getting more ridiculous as you talk about it. I can’t be bothered with you!” Zi Yue snorted and quickly turned her face away, no longer paying attention to Feng Dan. She didn’t have the guts to say whatever Feng Dan wanted to say. If she continued to pester on this topic, she would definitely lose miserably. In another private room, there was a man with a gloomy face and a cold gaze seated there. Behind him stood the Fang family’s patriarch, Fang Shen! “Patriarch Fang, how are the preparations for tomorrow’s matter coming along?” The man suddenly asked. His voice was incomparably ear-piercing and made people shudder. Fang Shen hurriedly replied, “Young lord, the matter is almost ready!” So this man was Blood Shadow, the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang! Blood Shadow snorted lightly and did not reply. Instead, he continued to look downstairs and muttered, “The good show is about to begin.” “Dong!!!” Along drum and gong sound suddenly came from the auction stage on the first floor. Everyone was immediately energized… They all knew that the auction was about to begin! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio On the auction stage. ‘A mature and charming woman walked out slowly. ‘As soon as she appeared, everyone in the hall instantly quieted down. The woman’s hands were crossed in her abdomen, and her red lips were slightly parted. A sexy and charming voice instantly entered everyone’s ears. “Thank you all for taking the time to come to the auction held by our Hundred Treasures House.” With that, the woman bowed slightly, showing off the curves on her chest. Many people in the hall felt their mouths and tongues dry, and they couldn’t sit still anymore. “Humph, slutty fox!” In the private room on the second floor, Feng Dan couldn’t help but complain. The woman seemed to be completely unaware of the reactions of the people in the hall. She continued, “Everyone should already know who I am, but as there are many new faces here today. I will introduce myself again.” “My name Is Fei Cai, and I’m the manager of Fusheng City’s Hundred Treasures House. I’m also the host of this auction.” “If you have any treasures, you can entrust them to Hundred Treasures House. I promise you that I will definitely give you a satisfactory result.” ‘As she said this, she glanced at the private rooms on the second floor from the corner of her eyes. The manager had already informed her that a young master with a high-quality spirit stone had come to the auction house. Moreover, that young master looked unfamiliar and didn’t seem to be someone from Fusheng City. Fei Cai was interested at that time. Not only because it involved a high-quality spirit stone, but also because this was too much of a coincidence. The highlight of today’s auction was also a high-quality spirit stone! The owner of the spirit stone refused to show up and had some special requests. His request was something that even the Hundred Treasures House had never heard of before. However, the Hundred Treasures House had finally managed to get their hands on such a treasure. Fei Cai did not care what kind of request the owner had made. As long as it could help the Hundred Treasures House build up its reputation again, everything was negotiable. Unfortunately, after that person entrusted the high-quality spirit stone to the Hundred Treasures House, he did not appear again. Fei Cai initially planned to discuss some business with him, but she couldn’t do anything about it now. However, Jiang Ping’s appearance gave her a glimmer of hope. Another high-quality spirit stone! This was an extremely rare item in Fusheng City, yet it appeared one after another within two days! If there was no connection between the two, Fei Cai definitely wouldn’t believe it! Jiang Ping, who was in the private room, had extremely sharp senses. Naturally, he could sense Fei Cai’s indistinct gaze, and he was immediately puzzled. Even if the manager had reported that he had a high-quality spirit stone to this woman, it was not necessary for her to pay special attention to him. In fact, he had underestimated the temptation of a high-quality spirit stone. Even a nascent soul realm cultivator would pay attention to him if he knew that he had a high-quality spirit stone, let alone a woman in the refinement realm. Fei Cai retracted her gaze and said with a professional smile, “Alright, let’s cut to the chase. The auction that everyone has been waiting for has officially begun “The first item is an inferior spiritual treasure, an urn-gold hammer!” ‘As soon as she finished speaking, two strong men carrying a huge hammer walked slowly onto the auction stage. “Clang!” Although the two men had already tried their best to put down the hammer gently, the instant the hammer landed on the ground, it still let out a crisp and clear sound. In an instant, the crisp metal sound reverberated in the entire hall. Many people could not help but cover their ears. Looking at the situation, Fei Cai raised the corners of her mouth slightly, but she still said with a light smile, “This inferior spiritual treasure urn gold hammer is the work of Master Bai of Fusheng City’s Spiritual Weapon Hall.” “This treasure was forged from eight hundred and ten kilograms of meteorite iron. Master Bai put in painstaking efforts for forty-nine days, and finally produced this.” “On the day of completion, thunder rumbled like the howls of a hundred ghosts. Thus, it was named the urn gold hammer” “This hammer weighs about six hundred and forty kilograms. The strength of a single strike is enough to split mountains and shatter rocks. Its might is astonishing, and its strength is boundless!” “Furthermore, this hammer already has a spirit. The person who bids for this treasure only needs to pour a drop of blood essence into it, and he will be able to lift the treasure effortlessly.” “The starting bid for this treasure is five low-quality spirit stones. Every increment must not be lower than one low-quality spirit stone.” “Now, the bidding begins!” ‘As soon as she finished speaking, whispers immediately sounded in the hall. No one had expected that the Hundred Treasures House would be so magnanimous in this auction. The first item to be auctioned was an inferior spiritual treasure! Although this inferior spiritual treasure was the lowest quality, it already had spirituality. The fact that a drop of blood essence could allow one to easily lift it up was the best representation of its spirituality! Even if it was only an inferior spiritual treasure, compared to those mortal spears and iron swords, there was still a huge difference! With a spiritual treasure that was at his fingertips, a cultivator’s strength would definitely soar. It was not impossible for him to fight against someone of a higher level. However, a spiritual treasure was more difficult to come by than a spirit stone. Inferior spiritual treasures could only be forged by a master blacksmith in the refinement realm. However, forging was an especially difficult skill to learn. In the entire Fusheng City, Master Bai was the only master blacksmith in the advanced stage refinement realm. To be honest, the starting price of five low-quality spirit stones for such a treasure was indeed not very high. Very soon, someone began to bid. “Six low-quality spirit stones!” The bidder was a fat man. “Lid for seven low-quality spirit stones!” “Eight!” In the end, this low-quality spiritual treasure, the umn gold hammer, was bought by the first bidder. The fat man bought it at the price of twenty-three low-quality spirit stones. After he won the bid, the fat man hurriedly stood up, cupped his hands to the people around him, and said proudly, “Thank you, thank you!” Everyone smiled and nodded. Twenty-three low-quality spirit stones were equivalent to two middle-quality spirit stones! An inferior spiritual treasure was expensive, and compared to two middle-quality spirit stones, many people would only choose to give up. After all, inferior spiritual treasures had a limited increase in the strength of origin core realm experts, but to origin core realm experts, the middle-quality spirit stones were the ultimate treasure to increase their strength! Of course, in the entire Fusheng City, there were only a few clans that could afford twenty-three middle-quality spirit stones. Everyone also recognized this fat man. He came from a clan that wasn’t very powerful but extremely wealthy in Fusheng City. “Damn it! Damn fatty, how dare you snatch things from me. See how I’ll teach him a lesson when I get the chance in the future!” said Feng Dan angrily as she placed her hands on her hips. Zi Yue immediately said, “Miss Feng Dan, didn’t you use a whip? Why, did you switch to a hammer?” “Twant to play with a hammer now, can’t I?” Feng Dan snorted and said indifferently. “think you don’t really want to play with a hammer. You just want to tease that fat man, right?” Zi Yue revealed a look as if she had seen through everything and said, “No one raised the price at fifteen spirit stones, but you purposely raised it to twenty-three. You are really rich!” Feng Dan, whose thoughts had been exposed, did not explain herself. She chuckled and said, “As expected, you understand me the best.. Nothing can be hidden from you!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio In Jiang Ping’s private room. “yan’er and Liver, look, that man really looks like a fat pig!” Wan’er pointed at the fat man who had bought the urn-gold hammer and giggled. Yan’er and Liv’er couldn’t help but laugh when they heard what Wan’er said. The image of a fat pig was too real. “Wan’er, you must be polite. You can’t talk about others in this manner.” Jiang Ping put on a straight face and pretended to be angry. Wan’er snorted and blurted out, “That’s what it is. Dad, look, is this big guy’s belly exactly the same as those big fat pigs in Xiaoyu Town?” “How dare you talk back?!” Jiang Ping was really angry, and his voice suddenly turned cold, “Even if he has a big belly, you can’t say that he looks like a big fat pig, If he hears you, he might beat you directly!” “But he can’t hear me!” “You can’t say that even if he can’t hear you. If someone says you are like morning glory, will you be angry?” Jiang Ping didn’t scold her but quoted an example. He knew that Wan’er liked all kinds of flowers, but she just didn’t like morning glory. As expected, Wan’er nodded without hesitation and said, “I hate morning glory the most. Whoever says I am like morning glory, I will definitely be angry!” “So, Wan’er, remember. You must never talk about anyone or anything in this way again.” “You must remember…” Jiang Ping began his daily work of educating his daughter again. Unlike others, they did not focus their attention on the auction. Wan’er and her siblings were actually very curious about the auction, so they insisted on coming in to take a look. However, after coming in, the environment here and the guys sitting in the lobby on the first floor attracted their attention more than the items on the auction stage. As for Jiang Ping, these things didn’t arouse his interest at all. It was just an inferior spiritual treasure. Perhaps it was quite rare for the people on the first floor, but to him, it was completely useless! He had so many superior and even pure spiritual treasures in his storage space. Why bother with an inferior spiritual treasure? Moreover, through his perception, he found that there was a slight flaw in the urn gold hammer. This flaw was very small, even negligible. But at the critical moment, it might even cause this spiritual treasure to turn into a piece of scrap metal. Obviously, the forger’s standard was not high enough, which was why he was unable to notice this tiny flaw. This caused Jiang Ping to look down on this spiritual treasure even more. However, that fat man had nothing to do with him, so why would Jiang Ping need to remind him? ‘The process of the auction progressed very quickly. Other than the first item, which was that inferior spiritual treasure, most of the items were unable to arouse the enthusiasm of the crowd. Fei Cai naturally realized this point. She secretly sighed and suddenly raised her voice. “Everyone, the next item is a little mysterious.” “If there are people who like to spend a lot of money to see it, they might as well take this item. Who knows, it might be a windfall!” Hearing the word “windfall”, everyone instantly became lively again. Fei Cai was quite capable, her short sentence had piqued everyone’s interest again. Feeling the change in the atmosphere, Fei Cai secretly laughed and said, “Next is the ninth item in this auction!” ‘As soon as she finished speaking, Fei Cai lifted the red cloth covering a plate in front of her at the same time. Inan instant, a crystal clear stone amber appeared in front of everyone’s eyes. As an important weapon forging resource in this world, many people had some understanding of the stone amber. However, even though ordinary stone amber was transparent, its interior was exceptionally turbid. It looked as if the stone amber was dirty. However, the stone amber that appeared in front of them was indeed exquisite and clear. There were no impurities, and it looked like a piece of glass! Upon closer inspection, there was actually a flower inside the stone! It was a bright red flower that was covered with fine lines! From the looks of it, there was actually a faint, soul-stirring feeling! ‘When had the crowd ever seen such a strange thing? Immediately, there was an outbreak of discussion. “Is this stone amber? Why does it feel completely different from ordinary stone amber?” “What exactly is this thing? Why do I feel dizzy when I stare at it? Why do I feel like I can’t exert my strength?” “Yes, I have the same feeling!” “Everyone, please try not to stare at it. This thing might be some evil thing that can seduce people’s souls!” Many people immediately looked away when they heard that. ‘There were all kinds of strange things in the greater world. Among them, there were some strange things that could suck people’s blood essence, steal people’s souls, and kill people invisibly! “Miss Fei Cai, what exactly is this thing? Explain it to us quickly!” “It can’t be some kind of evil thing, right? Is the Hundred Treasures House trying to harm us?” Fei Cai was not surprised by everyone’s reaction. On the contrary, with so many strange and bizarre guesses, it could help her to make this thing even more popular. ‘Therefore, she didn’t stop the crowd’s discussion. She just watched quietly with a smile. Now that they had asked questions, it was time for her to speak. She made a hand gesture, and the entire hall instantly quieted down. Then, she said slowly, “Guests, please rest assured. This thing is definitely not some kind of evil thing.” “Although we can’t identify what this thing is, it has been in the Hundred Treasures House for three months.” “If this is really an evil thing, I’m afraid the Hundred Treasures House would not exist now.” “Moreover, we also discovered that although this thing makes people feel dizzy at first glance, it actually has the effect of helping people calm down and focus their minds.” “So, this item is definitely not an ordinary item. It’s very likely that it has an unexpected magical effect.” “However, since we haven’t been able to identify what this item is, the starting price is only one low-quality spirit stone. You can raise the price as you wish.” “If any of you are willing to investigate, you might as well bid for this item and study it slowly. Who knows, this might be a peerless secret treasure.” Her words pushed the atmosphere to a climax. No one would doubt her words. If the Hundred Treasures House dared to deceive the bidders, they wouldn’t be able to survive for long. If it was really as Fei Cai said, this item had the effect of calming the Qi and concentrating the mind, then in addition to its unknown mysteriousness, the starting price of one low-quality spirit stone was nothing. Very soon, someone made a bid. “Lbid one low-quality spirit stone and fifty taels of silver!” “I bid two low-quality spirit stones!” Jiang Ping’s gaze couldn’t help but be attracted by this thing. So, for a moment, he actually didn’t notice Liu’er’s abnormality. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio On the second floor, in the private room of Xue Ying. Fang Shen looked at this mysterious auction item and raised his eyebrows. He couldn’t help but ask, “Young master, can you tell what this is?” Xue Ying shook his head indifferently. “I don’t know, but this thing doesn’t give me a good feeling.” “Then should we take this thing?” Fang Shen asked again. Xue Ying glared at him coldly. Fang Shen was so scared that he immediately lowered his head. Xue Ying retracted his gaze and said coldly, “I already said it. It’s something that gives me a bad feeling. Do you still want to take it?” “Are you trying to make me feel disgusted?” “Lwouldn’t dare!” Fang Shen quickly bent down and apologized. Xue Ying snorted. After a while, he said expressionlessly, “The Hundred Treasures House is making such a big fuss this time. There must be some rare good treasure.” “This thing is just a piece of trash. Fei Cai, this woman, has only spoken briefly, but it has already caused the people below to start fighting crazily for it. Those who don’t know might think it’s some valuable treasure!” “Ridiculous. I don’t know if I should call them idiots or not!” Fang Shen was already used to Xue Ying’s way of speech. However, he also thought that he had been too impulsive just now and wanted to bid for this item. Therefore, as he listened to him, he felt that Xue Ying’s bluster was directed at him. He could not help but feel a little uncomfortable in his heart. Xue Ying ignored his slightly ugly expression and continued, “That’s why I said that we should keep calm. The good show is yet to come!” “In this auction, 11 of the 12 VIP rooms have been filled. There are quite a number of people here.” “although other than Golden Door Sect, the other powers aren’t worth mentioning at all, but too many cooks spoil the broth.” “Looks like the final auction will be very interesting!” An excited expression flashed across Xue Ying’s eyes. Meanwhile, in Feng Dan’s private room next door. Feng Dan had been staring at the strange auction item on the auction stage. It was as if her soul had been hooked, and she was frozen in place. It was not until Zi Yue shook her arm that she suddenly came back to her senses. She patted her own chest and said in a frightened manner, “Yue-er, this thing is really too strange. I stared at it for a while just now, and I felt drowsy. It was as if my whole body had entered that stone amber!” “If you hadn’t woken me up, I might still be trapped in that stone amber right now!” “So, I’ve already said that you should try not to look at this thing, but you’re not convinced. Not only did you insist on looking at it, but you also refused to move your eyes after looking at it!” Zi Yue said unhappily. She had also looked at the item just now, and she felt drowsy too, as if she was going to enter it. However, her self-control was better. When she noticed that something was wrong, she quickly retracted her gaze. That was why nothing happened. But even so, she could not help but feel a lingering fear. This thing was really too strange! Feng Dan knew that Zi Yue was concerned about her. She stuck out her tongue and chuckled, but she did not defend herself. She smiled and said, “Yue’er, it’s all thanks to you. Otherwise, I’m afraid I wouldn’t be able to wake up right now.” “How about I bid for this thing for you and study it properly?” Zi Yue glanced at her indifferently and immediately shouted with her true energy, “Five low-quality spirit stones!” Feng Dan was stunned for a while before she reacted. She quickly pulled Zi Yue back and said anxiously, “Yue’er, are you serious? I’m just joking with you!” “This thing is so strange. What’s the use of bidding for it?” “Did you really get brainwashed by what that vixen, Fei Cai, said?” “Do you really think that there’s a possibility of getting rich after bidding for this thing? Don’t think about it, okay? If this is really a great treasure, will the Hundred Treasures House take it out and auction it?” Feng Dan’s series of words fell like a storm, not giving Zi Yue a chance to answer. “Mmph!” Zi Yue had no choice but to cover her mouth with her hand. She sighed and said helplessly, “Can you stop for a moment?” Feng Dan immediately stopped. She widened her innocent eyes and nodded. Zi Yue then released her hand and explained, “I know you’re worried that this thing is some kind of evil thing, but since the Hundred Treasures House dares to claim that it is not, at least we can rule out the possibility that it will harm people.” “Besides…when I saw this thing, I actually had a baffling feeling.” “Although this feeling is very strange, it’s like a voice telling me that I must take this thing down!” “Really?” Feng Dan opened her big suspicious eyes and stared at Zi Yue. “Would I lie to you?” Zi Yue rolled her eyes at her, returning her suspicious gaze. “Sigh, alright!” In the end, it was Feng Dan who was the first to give in. She helplessly agreed, “You’ve always had your own thoughts, so it’s up to you.” “However, why do I feel that something is wrong?” Feng Dan couldn’t help but mutter. She clearly felt that something was wrong, but she couldn’t say where it was wrong for a moment. On the other side, in Jiang Ping’s private room. “Liu’er, what’s wrong?” Jiang Ping suddenly grabbed Liu’er’s small arm and asked nervously. Just now, he felt that Liu’er’s aura had suddenly become very unstable. He had a vague feeling that she had broken through! However, in the past half a month, these three girls hadn’t cultivated much, and Liv’er’s aura had just stabilized at the early stage of the tempering realm. How could there be a sign that she had broken through to the intermediate stage all of a sudden? Liv’er was confused by Jiang Ping’s sudden action. She widened her unusually bright eyes, shook her head in confusion, and said, “Dad, I am fine. Why do you ask?” “Liu’er, are you really fine?” Jiang Ping was sure that his perception was not wrong, and asked repeatedly, “Liu’er, do you feel any sudden discomfort or something wrong with your body?” “No, I feel very comfortable. I want to sleep!” Liu’er smiled, and she had a simple smile. “Comfortable?” Jiang Ping’s brows suddenly furrowed even more tightly. The tempering realm, as the name implied, was a stage of body forging. Every breakthrough in the tempering realm was a remodeling of the body. He had never heard of anyone who felt comfortable instead of pain during the process of breaking through to the tempering realm. Back then, even Wan’er couldn’t help but grit her teeth and persevere when she broke through to the intermediate and advanced stages. However, Liv’er’s faint smile didn’t seem to be faking it. Then what exactly was going on? <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio “Whoosh!” An invisible airwave suddenly swept up beside Liver. Jiang Ping was already 100% sure that Liu’er had broken through! “Dad, L…1!” Liver also sensed that something was wrong with her body and called out anxiously. “Liu’er, don’t be afraid. You’ve broken through. It’s okay. I am here. Don’t be afraid!” Jiang Ping quickly grabbed Liu’er’s small arm and comforted her gently. Yan‘er and Wan’er were shocked and asked in unison, “Dad, you said Liu’er is going to break through?” “Yes, she is going to break through,” Jiang Ping answered calmly, but he didn’t dare to relax. Liver’s way of breaking through was too strange. Even he didn’t know what the reason was, so he couldn’t help but feel nervous. He believed that Liu’er must have awakened some unknown physique. But during this period of time, Liu’er’s performance was no different from an ordinary little girl’s. Unexpectedly, Wan’er, who had awakened the ancient divine physique, had a body strength that far exceeded the norm of the tempering realm. She was also not like Yan’er, who had the spiritual chaos sword physique. When she used all kinds of weapons, she was like a fish in water. This made Jiang Ping waver a little. Could it be that Liu’er really did not awaken any physique? But now, that waver had completely disappeared. Liver’s strange breakthrough must have something to do with her mysterious physique! This might be a chance for him to find out Liv’er’s physique! However, Wan’er and Yan’er did not think as much as he did. The things in their minds were much simpler. “Yeah, Liu’er is about to break through!” ‘Wan’er was stunned for a moment before she clapped happily. “Then Liu’er is now in the intermediate stage of the tempering realm. When Liu’er reaches the advanced stage of the tempering realm, we will be in the same realm.” “Dad said that we cannot bully the weak and the young. When the time comes, Liu’er and I will be in the same realm. If we fight with her…uh, no, if we spar with her, it will be a fair fight!” Unlike Wan’er’s excitement, Yan’er was like a deflated balloon in an instant. “Boo-hoo, I am so pitiful!” She was the second sister! She should be the one to break through before Liu’er. Why did she become the person with the weakest cultivation now? Yan’er didn’t want to be at the bottom. Her father would be disappointed, and she didn’t want that. She also wanted to break through! Unfortunately, her wish didn’t come true. Under her depressed gaze, Liver finally succeeded in breaking through and became an intermediate stage tempering realm cultivator. “Dad, have I succeeded in breaking through?” Liu’er asked with a confused expression, as she felt the warmth on her body slowly dissipating. Jiang Ping was silent for a long time before he helplessly let out a long sigh. He nodded heavily and said, “That’s right. You are already an intermediate stage tempering realm cultivator!” It was really too unbearable and depressing! Jiang Ping had never expected that Liv’er’s breakthrough would not only come so suddenly, but it would also end so suddenly! He did not detect any changes in Liv’er’s expression or her body. However, he could clearly sense that Liu’er had indeed broken through to the intermediate stage of the tempering realm. ‘Was there any easier way to break through in this world than this? It was as easy as drinking a glass of water! ‘When most people broke through to the tempering realm, they would be in excruciating pain. They would grit their teeth and persevere. There were also many people who didn’t persevere and were simply crippled. If these people knew about Liv’er’s breakthrough method, they would probably be so angry that they would spit out a mouthful of blood. Jiang Ping could finally heave a sigh of relief now. Unfortunately, he still couldn’t figure out what kind of physique Liu’er had. However, this wasn’t important for the time being because Jiang Ping knew that this was definitely some kind of heaven-defying physique! This kind of breakthrough method was absolutely unheard of. If this kind of physique wasn’t heaven- defying, then there was probably no physique that could be called heaven-defying. After allowing Liu’er to be excited for a while, Jiang Ping asked in a deep voice, “Liver, do you know what happened just now?” “Why did you suddenly break through?” “Why?” Hearing her father’s question, Liu’er immediately thought about it. After thinking hard for a while, Liu’er, who could not think of an answer, spread out her small hands and said with a bitter face, “I don’t know either. I was staring at the flower on the stage just now.” “That flower is very beautiful. I was fascinated by it, then my whole body felt warm, as if I was taking a hot bath. Then, you suddenly grabbed my arm and asked what happened to me. After that, there was nothing else.” Flower?! Jiang Ping instantly grasped the key point. He suddenly looked at the strange stone on the auction stage. That stone amber was indeed very strange. Even as a nascent soul realm cultivator, if he stared at it for a long time, he would feel a trace of discomfort. At first, he thought that this item had a bit of evil nature. But now, it seemed that this “evil” item could actually help Liu’er cultivate! Since he couldn’t figure out what kind of physique Liu’er had from her body, then he might as well start with this mysterious stone amber! Thinking of this, Jiang Ping immediately became interested. He picked Liver up and asked, “Liver, is it the little red flower that’s inside the stone on the stage now?” “Yes, yes, it’s that little red flower!” Liu’er nodded affirmatively. Jiang Ping was no longer doubtful. He smiled and said, “Then Liu’er, I will bid for that stone and give it to you. Do you want it?” “Yes!” Liv’er replied excitedly as she immediately widened her eyes. For some reason, she just wanted to stare at the little red flower in the stone. That would make her feel very comfortable and warm… At this moment, the bidding price had just been raised to five low-quality spirit stones by Zi Yue. The venue became much quieter instantly. If it was only a few low-quality spirit stones, many people could still afford it. After all, the people who participated in the auction today had some financial means. Even if this item was actually worthless, losing two or three low-quality spirit stones was actually not a big deal. However, one had to consider carefully when it was raised to five low-quality spirit stones. Just as everyone was curious who was so magnanimous, they raised their heads and saw that it was Golden Door Sect’s private room. It was fine then. Golden Door Sect was extremely wealthy and powerful. As it was just five spirit stones, even if they were to lose all of them, they wouldn’t even frown. Seeing that Golden Door Sect had made their move, the others didn’t have any intention to raise their bids. Thus, their bids stopped at five low-quality spirit stones. Just as Zi Yue thought that she had easily won the bid, a voice suddenly sounded, breaking the silence. “Six low-quality spirit stones!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio When she heard the voice, Zi Yue instinctively raised her eyebrows. Feng Dan was a little hot-tempered, and couldn’t help but spit out in anger, “Did I hear that correctly? Someone actually dares to raise the price?” “Does this person think nothing of our Golden Door Sect and your Mayor’s Mansion?” Zi Yue briefly glanced at her and calmly replied, “Let me remind you, this private room is exclusive to Golden Door Sect. No one else can enter. So everyone will assume that the only one bidding in this room is Golden Door Sect.” “If anything, it is your Golden Door Sect that they don’t think much of. Nothing to do with our Mayor’s Mansion.” Feng Dan’s jaw dropped as she looked at Zi Yue in disbelief, “Yue’er, no wonder I felt that something was wrong. If you hadn’t mentioned it, I would still be thinking. “You’ve been bidding in this room, but the one footing the bill is actually me!” Zi Yue chuckled. Feng Dan had only just come to her senses. If she had not reminded her, Feng Dan would be none the wiser even if Zi Yue had sold her away! “Well done, Yue’er. You tricked me? I must teach you a lesson today!” Feng Dan pouted and pretended to look fierce. She was about to make her move and ‘teach’ Zi Yue a lesson. Zi Yue immediately distanced herself from Feng Dan and hurriedly said, “All right, we’re in the midst of bidding now. You better not mess around.” “Now you want to beg for mercy? Too late. Today, I must…” Feng Dan was still not willing to let Zi Yue off. She was about to grab Zi Yue’s tiny waist when suddenly, she heard Fei Cai’s voice come from the auction stage. “The guest in Room 2 has raised the price, six low grade spirit stones! Does any other guest wish to raise the price further?” Room 2?! On hearing this, Zi Yue and Feng Dan froze. Those able to enter the private rooms of the Hundred Treasures House had always been wealthy or noble. There were even a few special private rooms reserved for the major forces in Fusheng City. Room 1 was reserved for Mayor’s Mansion, while Room 2 was reserved for Blood Fang Gang. As for the private room that Zi Yue and Feng Dan were in, it was Room 3 reserved for Golden Door Sect. “Blood Fang Gang. It was that brood of disgusting fellows!” Feng Dan said with disdain, her eyes not concealing her hatred. Zi Yue also had a dark expression as she said in an even tone, “I didn’t expect Blood Fang Gang to also fancy this item.” “Hmph!” Feng Dan snorted, scrunched up her nose and said with disdain, “So what if they take a fancy to it? I have long wanted to teach those disgusting fellows of Blood Fang Gang a lesson. Today, no matter what Blood Fang Gang takes a liking to, I’ll pay a higher price to take it!” “I want to make Blood Fang Gang return in utter defeat this time!” “Dan’er, maybe you should first…” Zi Yue was about to persuade Feng Dan to calm down a little, but before she could finish, Feng Dan had already made her bid. “Seven low grade spirit stones!” Fei Cai was stunned for a moment, then immediately and correctly discerned where the voice had come from. She quickly shouted, “Room 3 has bid seven low grade spirit stones!” Oh ho! Instantly, a clamor arose from the hall on the first floor. ‘These were all regulars at the Hundred Treasures House who naturally understood the rules of the place. Room 2, Blood Fang Gang. Room 3, Golden Door Sect. They were indisputably the top two forces of Fusheng City! If there was any group in Fusheng City that could suppress them, it would be Mayor’s Mansion, which had been lying low for a long time. This was a popular topic of discussion among many privately. Without the involvement of Mayor’s Mansion, who between Blood Fang Gang and Golden Door Sect would be superior! It was just that the two factions had never been in major conflict, so that question remained unanswered. But who would have thought that Blood Fang Gang and Golden Door Sect would actually be fighting over an auction item! Could it be that they would be able to see a good fight between two major powers that day? In Room 2. Seeing everything that had happened in the venue, the corners of Xue Ying’s mouth curled up into a sneer. Fang Shen frowned and thought hard for a long time. At the end, he could not hold back and asked, “Young Lord, didn’t you say earlier that something wasn’t quite right with this item? Why did you bid for it again?” Xue Ying glanced at him indifferently and calmly replied, “There is something wrong with this item, and I am not thinking of winning the bid for it.” “Then what you’re doing now i the words had just left Fang Shen’s mouth when he suddenly realized. Xue Ying was not bidding to compete, but to raise the price! He had no intention of winning the item at all. It was just that he had heard Golden Door Sect making the first move in Room 3, and so he deliberately raised the price. He was simply a repulsive person! Xue Ying disregarded his opinion, and suddenly declared, “Ten low grade spirit stones!” Boom! Those words felt like a huge rock smashing the surface of a calm lake. The spectators in the hall burst into a frenzy of discussion. “Blood Fang Gang is truly rich and overbearing. They actually forcefully increased the price of an item from an unknown source ten-fold!” “In my opinion, Blood Fang Gang is trying to intimidate Golden Door Sect to make them retreat in fear!” Even Fei Cai, who was on stage, was stunned. For a moment, she could not even react. However, she quickly regained alertness and hastily shouted, “Room 2 bids ten low grade spirit stones!” How could a bright person like her fail to see that Blood Fang Gang and Golden Door Sect were practically at war? But she actually liked the current situation better. The fiercer they fought, the more Hundred Treasures House would earn. Why not? She had originally forecast only three low grade spirit stones for the auction item. Unexpectedly, once Blood Fang Gang and Golden Door Sect started trading blows, they pushed past her anticipated price by three times! “D*mn it!” In the private room, Feng Dan gritted her teeth, her eyes spewing fire. “Blood Fang Gang, do you think that I will admit defeat if you do this?” “Ten low grade spirit stones is nothing!” Zi Yue wanted to advise her to calm down first, but before she could say anything, she heard Feng Dan shout again. “Ibid twelve low grade spirit stones!” Instantly, another wave of exclamations rose in the auction venue. “Interesting.” In the private room, Xue Ying licked his lips, his eyes revealing the excitement of a wild beast looking at its prey. ‘When he saw this, Fang Shen’s heart suddenly thumped, and he had a bad feeling. ‘As expected, in the next moment, Xue Ying’s cold voice rang in his ears. “Fifteen low grade spirit stones!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Fang Shen stared at Xue Ying in disbelief. After a long while, he opened his mouth with difficulty and asked tentatively, “My lord, you’ve raised it to fifteen low-grade spirit stones. What if the Golden Door Sect decides not to follow?” “Keke!” Xue Ying sneered and said contemptuously, “Do you think that the Golden Door Sect is the same as your Fang family?” “A mere fifteen low-grade spirit stones is considered a huge sum of money to your Fang family, but to the Golden Door Sect, it’s insignificant.” “Ifa mere fifteen low-grade spirit stones can scare the people of the Golden Door Sect, then they are not worthy to be our Blood Fang Gang’s opponent!” Hearing this, Fang Shen’s face instantly turned green and red. After all, their Fang family were following the Blood Fang Gang blindly, and they would not dare to disobey. But who would have thought that when Xue Ying spoke, he actually did not care about his feelings at all? It was as if their Fang family was a dog without a temper! Xue Ying also did not pay attention to Fang Shen’s inner thoughts, instead, he continued to talk. “This item was first auctioned by the Golden Door Sect. If they really decided not to follow, and our Blood Fang Gang were to obtain it at the end.” “It would be like the Golden Door Sect were to receive a tight slap by our Blood Fang Gang. If we exchange over ten low-grade spirit stones for Golden Door Sect’s tarnished reputation, our Blood Fang Gang will still be able to make a good profit without any losses!” “If they continue to raise the price, then I will make them pay several times more.” “at that time, everyone will be able to see that the Golden Door Sect has been played by our Blood Fang Gang!” “Actually, from the moment the Golden Door Sect made their move, they were already destined to lose!” After Xue Ying finished speaking, he immediately laughed out loud without any restraint. It was obvious that he felt that victory was already in his grasp. Fang Shen might be angry, but he had long seen through this point and could not help but reveal a smug smile. Their Fang family had long defected to the Blood Fang Gang. If they could suppress the Golden Door Sect, it would greatly increase the Blood Fang Gang’s deterrence. At that time, the Fang family would also be able to rise up and take another step forward. “Yue’er, don’t stop me. I want to go out and kill those fellows from the Blood Fang Gang!” Feng Dan flew into a rage and acted as if she was about to rush out of the private room. “Tm not stopping you. If you want to go out, then go out,” Zi Yue said with a calm expression. “Yue’er, you…” Feng Dan was stunned. Seeing that Zi Yue’s expression did not change in the slightest, she put on a wronged expression and directly hugged Zi Yue. “Yue’er, you’re not cooperating with me anymore. Boohoo.” Actually, both of them knew that Feng Dan was too angry just now and could not help but make a joke. The Hundred Treasures House had strict rules. How could they allow guests to fight in private during the auction? The reason why Feng Dan said that was because she was too furious with the people of the Blood Fang Gang! “The Blood Fang Gang is too hateful. I think they are targeting our Golden Door Sect!” Feng Dan said fiercely, “There were so many people bidding at the beginning, but they refused to bid.” “When it was our Golden Door Sect’s turn to make a bid, they decided to follow suit. They always want to suppress us. I think they are treating us as fools and trying to scam us!” “No, I will directly bid twenty low-grade spirit stones this time. Let’s see if the Blood Fang Gang will continue to raise the price!” Hearing this, Zi Yue immediately said unhappily, “You already know what the Blood Fang Gang is planning, and you still want to jump into the trap?” “How can I not jump?” Feng Dan curled her lips and said angrily, “If I just let it go, everyone will think that our Golden Door Sect is no match for the Blood Fang Gang.” “Could it be that the reputation of the Golden Door Sect is not worth more than ten or twenty low-grade spirit stones?” “Besides, Yue’er, don’t you want this thing? Wouldn’t it be great if I bid for it and give it to you?” “You, sigh!” Zi Yue was moved, amused, and a little angry. In the end, she could only sigh helplessly. She really understood Feng Dan’s character too well. She would never admit defeat. Most importantly, she was very kind to her friends. If she hadn’t revealed her thoughts on this thing, she might have stopped. But now, it was probably difficult to persuade her to stop. However, Zi Yue really did not want Feng Dan to continue bidding. This was clearly a trap set by the Blood Fang Gang, waiting for her to fall into it! Although a dozen low-grade spirit stones were not considered a serious loss to the Golden Door Sect and the Blood Fang Gang, they were definitely not insignificant! Based on Zi Yue’s understanding, a dozen low-grade spirit stones were probably the cultivation resources that the Golden Door Sect had given Feng Dan for several years! Now that Feng Dan had just entered the refinement realm, it was the time when she needed low-grade spirit stones the most. If she wanted to bid for something and give it to her, she would definitely not stretch out her hand to ask for spirit stones from her family. In the end, she could only take it from her own private vault! Zi Yue did not want to see her good friend wasting her cultivation resources and delaying the advancement of her realm for an item that has an unknown origin and usage. Thus, she quickly consoled, “Dan‘er, let’s just forget about it.” “It’s still alright now. It’s only fifteen low-grade spirit stones. Who doesn’t know that fifteen low-grade spirit stones are like a drop in the ocean to the Golden Door Sect?” “If you stop now, everyone will know that we are not paying too much attention to that thing. No one will think that the Golden Door Sect is showing weakness to the Blood Fang Gang.” Hearing that, Feng Dan immediately calmed down a lot. It seemed reasonable… but she immediately shook her head and said, “But, Yue’er, don’t you want that thing?” Zi Yue immediately waved her hand and interrupted her, “Actually, I don’t really want that thing. I just feel that it’s a little strange and want to study it.” “But, no matter how you look at it, the value of that thing should be far less than fifteen low-grade spirit stones, right?” “Since that’s the case, why don’t we give it to the Blood Fang Gang and let them know what it means to shoot oneself in the foot!” “Think about it, isn’t it much more interesting to let the Blood Fang Gang suffer a loss in silence?” “Oh, indeed, that’s a little interesting.” Feng Dan thought for a moment, and it seemed to be the case. She immediately lost the intention to continue bidding, but she still said proudly, “Humph, then this time, I’ll watch how the Blood Fang Gang make a fool of themselves!” On the other side. Everyone was staring at Room 2, but they didn’t see the slightest movement coming from inside. Xue Ying shook his head and said with a disdainful smile, “I didn’t expect the Golden Door Sect to be so useless.” “Just fifteen low-grade spirit stones and they were so scared that they backed out.” “Sigh, it’s really boring to bid without an opponent!” However, just as everyone thought that the Golden Door Sect had already withered and no one dared to raise the bid, and the items were about to fall into the hands of the Blood Fang Gang, a sudden voice sounded. “bid two middle-grade spirit stones!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Suddenly, a calm and magnetic male voice came from Room 12. In an instant, the entire auction venue fell into a dead silence like a wild storm. Two middle-grade spirit stones! Oh my God, someone actually offered two middle-grade spirit stones? Although the exchange ratio between middle-grade spirit stones and low-grade spirit stones was one to ten. All the cultivators knew that very few people would trade one middle-grade spirit stone for ten low-grade spirit stones. That was because middle-grade spirit stones were much rarer than low-grade spirit stones! Moreover, middle-grade spirit stones could even affect the training at the nascent soul stage. Low-grade spirit stones were only useful to people in the refinement realm. At the nascent soul realm, absorbing the spiritual Qi from the low-grade spirit stones might even affect one’s own strength. Therefore, anyone who had some common sense in cultivation would only treat this exchange rate as a joke. If someone really used a middle-grade spirit stone to exchange for ten low-grade spirit stones, they would definitely be treated as a fool! In fact, even if the Blood Fang Gang had called out the price of fifteen low-grade spirit stones, everyone was only a little surprised. However, when they heard the words “middle-grade spirit stones”, they were completely shocked. Middle-grade and low-grade were two completely different grades. The difference between these two gave people the feeling that it was very difficult to make up for it with quantity. Just like a force that was only at the refinement realm, no matter how many refinement realms there were, they were at most a first-rate force in Fusheng City. Only the strong ones with the origin core realm would be publicly recognized as a top force! There was a barrier between Qi refinement and the origin core, a barrier that could separate tens of millions of people! Even Fei Cai couldn’t help but open her red lips slightly. Her beautiful eyes flickered with a strange light as she stared intently at Room 12, where Jiang Ping was. Ever since she knew that an honored guest who owned a high-grade spirit stone had arrived, Fei Cai’s gaze would unconsciously fall on Room 12, trying to find out as much information as possible about the honored guest in that room. However, the auction was already halfway through, and Room 12 had yet to make a single bid. Although Fei Cai knew that the items auctioned earlier weren’t anything good and that it was impossible to attract the other party’s interest, she still couldn’t help but feel disappointed. Now, she finally saw that the person in Room 12 had made a bid, and the first bid was two middle-grade spirit stones. Naturally, she was overjoyed and excited. As expected, she didn’t guess wrong. The other party was really a big shot! Not only did he carry a high-grade spirit stone with him, but he also threw two middle-grade spirit stones for an auction item that might not even be worth a penny! If she could grasp hold of such a person, the value of the Hundred Treasures House would be immeasurable! Fei Cai suppressed her excitement and said with a smile, “The honored guest in Room 12 has bid with two middle-grade spirit stones. Are there other guests with a higher bid?” “Two middle-grade spirit stones? Who is the person in Room 12? How can he be so imposing?” “Idon’t know. In my impression, Room 12 is not a private room reserved for any forces. In other words, we have no way of knowing who is inside.” “To be able to offer a high price of two middle-grade spirit stones, the other party must be some big shot, right?” “Aren’t you spouting nonsense! How many factions in the entire Fusheng City were able to casually take out two middle-grade spirit stones? Don’t look at those first-rate factions that have an unconvinced look on their faces. However, after emptying their pockets, they might be able to come up with a few middle-grade spirit stones!” “That’s not necessarily the case. However, to be able to bid with two middle-grade spirit stones for an item that we don’t even know what it is used for is definitely an extraordinary person or faction. I’m afraid that even the Blood Fang Gang will have to regretfully stop this time!” All kinds of discussions were incessantly heard. In the private room, Xue Ying could not help but raise his eyebrows. He originally thought that the Blood Fang Gang’s greatest opponent was the Golden Door Sect. He did not expect that a ruthless character would suddenly appear out of thin air! To the extent that everyone’s attention now fell on the mysterious figure in Room 12, and the Blood Fang Gang had instead become the backdrop! “Who exactly is in Room 12?” Xue Ying asked coldly. Fang Shen immediately recovered from his shock and hurriedly bowed and replied, “My lord, I… don’t know.” “Then hurry up and investigate!” Xue Ying suddenly raised his voice and said sternly. Fang Shen was so frightened that he broke out in cold sweat, he hurriedly bent his waist even more. “My lord, according to the rules of the Hundred Treasures House, we don’t have the right to know who exactly is in Room 12. If we forcefully investigate, we might offend both the Hundred Treasures House and the people in Room 12.” “Why don’t we stop first?” “Hmph, useless thing!” Xue Ying cursed, but he didn’t continue to dwell on this topic. He wasn’t a boorish man, so he naturally understood that Fang Shen was right. At this critical moment, it was best not to provoke too many powerful enemies for the Blood Fang Gang. “However, it’s only two middle-grade spirit stones, and you want to scare me off? You must be daydreaming!” Xue Ying muttered in a low voice. Hearing this, Fang Shen was immediately shocked and hurriedly advised, “My lord, to bid for such an item with two middle-grade spirit stones, it’s not worth it. Please don’t. He was trying to persuade Xue Ying to calm down. Not to mention two middle-grade spirit stones, it was also not a small amount for the Blood Fang Gang. More importantly, they had originally raised the price to cheat the members of the Golden Door Sect. Now that the members of the Golden Door Sect had not been cheated, it was already not worth it. It was not easy for someone to come out and help them block it. This was a good thing! At the very least, they wouldn’t have to waste fifteen low-grade spirit stones. But why did Xue Ying suddenly want to gain the upper hand? It seemed that he was planning to continue raising the price and compete with the people in Room 12? But before he could finish his words, Xue Ying snapped, “Shut up, this is not your place to speak.” Fang Shen was immediately shocked and quickly shut his mouth, not daring to make any more movements. Xue Ying said coldly, “Only two middle-grade spirit stones, and the Blood Fang Gang is already scared to the point that they don’t dare to bid anymore. If word of this gets out, do you think our Blood Fang Gang will still be able to survive in Fusheng City!” Seeing that Fang Shen didn’t dare to answer anymore, Xue Ying snorted and said in a clear voice. “Toffer two middle-grade spirit stones and five low-grade spirit stones!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio “Room 2 bids with two middle-grade spirit stones and five low-grade spirit stones!” “Is there anyone else who wants to raise the price?” Only Fei Cai’s excited voice echoed in the air of the auction venue. Everyone was shocked by the Blood Fang Gang’s move. In the private room, Feng Dan couldn’t help but reveal a complicated expression. She ridiculed angrily, “Is there something wrong with these people of the Blood Fang Gang? The price has already been raised to two middle-grade spirit stones, yet they are still increasing the price!” “Yue’er, I suddenly feel that we shouldn’t have stopped at only fifteen low-grade spirit stones. We should at least raise the price to three or four middle-grade spirit stones!” “Since we want to let the people of the Blood Fang Gang be rich, foolish suckers, then we should let them suffer even more!” Zi Yue was still immersed in the two middle-grade spirit stones when she heard Feng Dan’s words and came back to her senses. She rolled her eyes and said indifferently, “Don’t mess around. I feel that we have already gone too far.” “You might get bitten by the snake even if you had accidentally missed hitting it.” “Alright then. Let’s listen to our Yue’er.” Feng Dan spread out her hands and curled her lips. Actually, she was just saying it. Only a fool would bid a few middle-grade spirit stones for an unknown item. Since Zi Yue said so, then she should just follow her words and stop. Feng Dan’s large eyes rolled. She thought of something, and excitedly hugged Zi Yue’s arm and asked, “Yue’er, who do you think is in Room 12? He can directly bid with two middle-grade spirit stones. He must not have an ordinary background, right?” “Based on my impression, other than our few families, there are no other forces that can make such a high bid.” Hearing this, Zi Yue’s black brows furrowed. She pondered for a long while before slowly saying, “I can’t guess it either.” “Busheng City is neither big nor small. Other than our few families, there are also some hidden influential families. Their power and background aren’t weak either. Perhaps the person in Room 12 is from a reclusive family.” “Of course, it’s also possible that he is from another city.” “However, no matter what, to be able to offer two middle-grade spirit stones for an unknown item, this person’s background is definitely not simple. Unless…” “Unless what?” Feng Dan shook Zi Yue’s fair arm and asked anxiously. “Unless this thing is really a treasure, and he knows what this thing is used for!” Zi Yue said with certainty. Feng Dan nodded and praised, “Yes, Yue’er, what you said makes sense. Actually, I think so too.” Then, she suddenly thought of something and immediately became excited. She hurriedly said, “Yue’er, you said that the people in Room 12 are now fighting for something with the Blood Fang Gang. Do they have a grudge against each other now?” “What if, in the name of the Golden Door Sect, I invite him to fight with us against the Blood Fang Gang? What do you think?” Feng Dan was completely convinced by her genius-like idea. She was so excited that she almost rushed straight to Room 12. “You’d better be quiet!” Zi Yue quickly pulled Feng Dan, who was cheering, and said helplessly, “It’s a good idea, but don’t think it will be this simple!” “You don’t even know who he is. Who would agree to such an invitation if you were to invite without any consideration?” “The Blood Fang Gang is not some regular gangster. How could they risk their lives to form an alliance with us if they were not prepared?” ‘These words were like a bucket of cold water that calmed Feng Dan down in an instant. However, she was still a little unwilling to give up. She asked tentatively, “How could we just forget about it? This is a rare opportunity!” “Obviously, we won’t let it go just like that. As long as it’s an opportunity, we have to seize it well!” Zi Yue said firmly, “We definitely have to seize the opportunity. The key is that we have to turn this opportunity into a boost. This requires us to make good preparations first.” She did not completely deny Feng Dan’s thoughts. Because Zi Yue knew that Feng Dan was actually a very hot-blooded girl. She had disliked the Blood Fang Gang for a long time. Not only was the Blood Fang Gang secretly targeting the Golden Door Sect, but the Blood Fang Gang was also very heartless that they would do anything! In both public and private, Feng Dan wanted to completely wipe out the Blood Fang Gang! However, she also knew that if they really fought, the Golden Door Sect might not be a match for the Blood Fang Gang as the gang was filled with ruthless characters who did not care about their lives! If the mayor’s mansion could join forces with the Golden Door Sect, it would naturally be easy for them to eradicate the Blood Fang Gang. However, the problem was that the mayor’s mansion had been turning a blind eye to the signals released by the Golden Door Sect. There had been no response at all! Even Zi Yue, who was the eldest daughter of the mayor’s mansion, did not know what her father was thinking. Why didn’t he join forces with the Golden Door Sect? Because of this, she had a big fight with her father and hadn’t spoken to him for a long time. Therefore, although the mayor’s mansion had received an invitation to the auction, she came with Feng Dan. Zi Yue thought for a long time and said, “The Hundred Treasures House has its rules. We definitely wouldn’t be able to know anything about Room 12 right now, so we might as well see how the situation will develop.” “First, let’s see if the people in Room 12 will continue to bid higher and what kind of price they will stop at. Then we will determine whether they would be worth inviting.” “Also, after the auction, we can go to Room 12 and wait outside. If we can’t get there, we can also go to Fei Cai’s place and ask for information.” “Okay, we’ll do as you say!” Feng Dan thought for a while and felt that there was nothing wrong with what Zi Yue said, so she could only suppress her excitement temporarily. “Okay, now let’s see if the people in Room 12 will continue to make a move!” Zi Yue looked outside and said softly. At this moment, most people had the same thoughts as her. They couldn’t wait to know if the people in Room 12 would continue to bid higher. Even Fei Cai couldn’t help but stare at Room 12, her beautiful eyes filled with anticipation. Inside Room 12. How would Jiang Ping know that his bid would cause such a huge commotion? “Daddy, keep shouting, keep shouting!” Wan’er waved her small fists and shouted excitedly. She actually didn’t quite understand what Jiang Ping was doing. However, when Jiang Ping shouted “two middle-grade spirit stones” just now, the entire auction venue exploded! This scene piqued her interest, so she quickly shouted excitedly. Seeing her cute little appearance, Jiang Ping was also feeling happy in his heart. He definitely had to bid higher. Just based on the effect of this thing on Liver’s cultivation, even if he increased it to ten or even a hundred top-grade spirit stones, he wouldn’t even blink his eyes! After all, he had many of these things, but he only had three precious daughters. For his precious daughter, no matter how much he sacrificed, it was still worth it! He smiled dotingly and said, “Okay, Daddy will call out now.” Then, he said in a clear voice, “Three middle-grade spirit stones!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Fei Cai felt that she almost couldn’t hold back her laughter. Ever since the Blood Fang Gang made their bid, she had been keeping an eye on Room 12. For some reason, she had a vague feeling that two middle-grade spirit stones were definitely not the upper limit of Room 12! Now that her guess had been verified, she could not help but feel proud and excited. ‘The reason why she was so excited was naturally not because of the three middle-grade spirit stones. The Hundred Treasures House could be considered a big business after all. A few middle-grade spirit stones were not considered a big deal. ‘The reason why she was so excited was that she had not misjudged the person in Room 12. The person definitely did not have an ordinary background! Acustomer like that might become a noble of the Hundred Treasures House. She was a person who planned meticulously, so of course, she wouldn’t let him off so easily! “The honored guest in Room 12 bids three middle-grade spirit stones!” Fei Cai shouted excitedly. This time, she didn’t ask if anyone else planned to continue bidding. Because she knew that three middle-grade spirit stones weren’t a small amount to most of the forces in Fusheng City. Although the Blood Fang Gang would definitely be able to afford this price, they weren’t fools. Would they even bid such a high price for something that had an unknown usage? To be honest, she had also suspected that the person in Room 12 knew what this item was used for. Otherwise, how could he be so bold as to raise the price by one middle-grade spirit stone? However, this had nothing to do with her. If the auction house managed to make a one-time deal, even if this item was very valuable, then their auction house would have no choice but to accept it. After all, it was their fault for not being able to detect the use of this item. “Three middle-grade spirit stones, did I hear wrong?” “It’s fine if you’re the only one who’s deaf, but it can’t be that everyone is deaf, right? It’s three middle-grade spirit stones!” “Oh my God, three middle-grade spirit stones can be exchanged for forty low-grade spirit stones! In other words, it’s almost enough to buy two low-grade spiritual treasures from before!” “Yeah, who would have thought that a little object with unknown uses would be able to sell at the value of two low-grade spiritual treasures when it had a starting price of one low-grade spirit stone? Isn’t that a sky-high price?” “Tm even more curious now. Just what kind of person is in Room 12? Not only does he dare to fight with the Blood Fang Gang for the item, but he also even dares to bid with middle-grade spirit stones!” “Damn it!” Xue Ying couldn’t hold it in any longer and fiercely cursed, “Is this fellow brainless?” “He actually bid three middle-grade spirit stones for such a damn thing?” “My lord, let’s forget about it!” Fang Shen quickly advised, “This thing is really not worth that many spirit stones!” “But how can I put up with this!” Xue Ying said sternly. “This damn thing is not worth so many spirit stones, but my Blood Fang Gang’s reputation is much more valuable than these few spirit stones!” “No, I have to bid higher!” Xue Ying suddenly stood up and walked out of the private room, shouting, “I offer three middle-grade spirit stones and five low-grade spirit stones!” Wow! Seeing Xue Ying who suddenly appeared, the people in the hall on the first floor began to discuss. “Isn’t that the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang? I didn’t expect that it would be him!” “It’s him. I heard that he’s only 25 or 26 this year, and he’s already a late-stage Qi refinement expert. The aura he’s giving off can’t be wrong!” “I didn’t expect that the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang would be such a figure. It seems that in a few more decades, the biggest force in Fusheng City will fall to the hands of Blood Fang Gang!” “Do you think that the people in Room 12 will continue to bid, or will they be frightened by Xue Ying?” “I think Xue Ying has shown up in person to intimidate the people in Room 12.” Because of the appearance of Xue Ying, there was another round of discussion. Xue Ying was like a king looking down at an ant. He snorted contemptuously and said to Room 12, “Friend, may I know who are you? Would you mind revealing yourself?” Instantly, everyone was extremely excited. Their gaze landed on Room 12. Xue Ying was clearly challenging the person in Room 12! How could they miss such a good show of a strong battle? They were also full of curiosity about the person in Room 12. “Yue’er, I’m so excited!” Feng Dan held Zi Yue’s arm and smiled excitedly. “Do you think the person in Room 12 will show up?” “How would I know?” Zi Yue shook her head. “I think he will show up. After all, Xue Ying has been so provocative. But I didn’t expect that even Xue Ying would come personally this time.” “But this is also good. According to Xue Ying’s arrogant attitude, if the two of them meet, they will definitely fight on the spot!” “The grudge between them will be completely formed. When we invite them to fight against the Blood Fang Gang, they will definitely agree without hesitation!” “Alright, stop guessing, Continue watching,” Zi Yue said expressionlessly. She was not as optimistic as Feng Dan. Of course, in her heart, she was also filled with curiosity about the people in Room 12. Under everyone’s expectant gazes, there wasn’t the slightest movement from Room 12. The big guys in the auction house also started to become impatient. Just as everyone started to discuss, a magnetic voice suddenly came from Room 12. “There’s no need for me to reveal myself, I’m here to auction things, not to make friends.” “Of course, the highest bidder will win the auction. If you think that you can scare me away by showing yourself, then I can only give you two words: wishful thinking!” How sensitive were Jiang Ping’s perceptions and hearing? Although he didn’t know much about the Blood Fang Gang before, he had already guessed his intentions clearly after hearing the discussions of the people present and combining them with Xue Ying’s methods. However, in his eyes, Xue Ying was just a laughable ant. He could crush a mere late-stage refinement realm and also a nascent soul realm cultivator with a single finger. Yet Xue Ying was still ignorant and arrogant, thinking that he could scare him off with the Blood Fang Gang’s deterrence. Not to mention a single Xue Ying, even if the entire Blood Fang Gang attacked together, they wouldn’t be able to stop his determination to get this thing for his precious daughter! Hearing Jiang Ping’s words, Xue Ying’s expression abruptly changed. How many years had it been? No one in Fusheng City had ever dared to speak to him like that! But before he could get angry, he heard another sentence, and his expression instantly became even gloomier. “I offer five middle-grade spirit stones!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Five middle-grade spirit stones! Everyone was shocked speechless by Jiang Ping’s series of bids. No one would doubt that five middle-grade spirit stones could even cause an origin core realm expert to get into a big fight! Because if one was lucky, five middle-grade spirit stones could even help an origin core initial stage expert take a step forward and become an origin core middle stage expert! Of course, it was also possible that even if dozens of middle-grade spirit stones were thrown down, they wouldn’t be able to achieve a breakthrough. But no matter what, middle-grade spirit stones were an indispensable treasure to an origin core realm expert! Currently, the strongest expert in the entire Fusheng City was only at the origin core realm, so middle-grade spirit stones were even more precious. No one would be willing to take out middle-grade spirit stones as a transaction currency. Everyone was still used to using low-grade spirit stones as currency because there were more low-grade spirit stones. It was also because middle-grade spirit stones could definitely be exchanged for low-grade spirit stones, but low-grade spirit stones might not be able to be exchanged for middle-grade spirit stones. Because of this, even Xue Ying did not dare to raise the price like Jiang Ping did, increasing the bid by one middle-grade spirit stone at a time. Instead, he only raised the price by five low-grade spirit stones. Therefore, when they heard Jiang Ping raise the price to five middle-grade spirit stones, everyone felt numb! They couldn’t help but want to grab the person in Room 12 and ask, “Are middle-grade spirit stones so worthless?” That was a whole five middle-grade spirit stones, and you didn’t even know what was this thing?1 “Honored guest in Room 12 has bid five middle-grade spirit stones!” Fei Cai bit her lip, and after confirming that she didn’t mishear, she straightforwardly shouted. Right now, she was extremely curious about Jiang Ping’s identity! However, she wasn’t the slightest bit interested in whether Jiang Ping would show up or not. If Jiang Ping showed up, it would only be a confrontation with the Blood Fang Gang. It wouldn’t benefit her Hundred Treasures House at all. On the contrary, even if Jiang Ping didn’t show up, she could use the advantage of the organizers to make contact with Jiang Ping immediately afterward. Perhaps, while everyone was still guessing Jiang Ping’s identity, she had successfully established a friendly relationship with Jiang Ping! At that time, the reputation of the Hundred Treasures House would rise to another level! Not only was he insulted publicly, but the other party had also directly raised the price to an unimaginable level. It was needless to say how furious Xue Ying was. If it were not for the fact that this was still the territory of the Hundred Treasures House, he would have made a bold move. The other party clearly looked down on him and the entire Blood Fang Gang. This was simply a blatant humiliation to the Blood Fang Gang! “Young Master Xue Ying, would you like to continue raising the price?” Just as Xue Ying was itching to tear down Room 12, Fei Cai’s voice suddenly rang out. After hearing Fei Cai’s words clearly, Xue Ying’s expression couldn’t help but become even uglier. He wanted to continue bidding higher! But now, the price had already been raised to five middle-grade spirit stones, could he still afford it? It wasn’t that the Blood Fang Gang couldn’t take out five middle-grade spirit stones, but to a force like the Blood Fang Gang, which had an origin core realm expert overseeing it, middle-grade spirit stones were even more precious. If his father knew that he had taken out five middle-grade spirit stones just to bid for something that had no value, perhaps the enraged Blood Fang Gang leader would directly tear his bones apart! When did Fei Cai, this woman, become so blind? She clearly knew that such a price was ridiculously high, yet she still deliberately said this to him. Wasn’t this forcing him to be embarrassed! Right now, Xue Ying wished that he could kill all the people present so that no one would know his current predicament. Of course, he was only thinking about it. If he really did this, he was afraid that before he could make a move, he would have to stay in the Hundred Treasures House forever. For so many years, the Hundred Treasures House had been able to maintain a neutral stance and stand firm in Fusheng City. If it was said that the Hundred Treasures House didn’t have any strength, no one would believe it! “Sir, although the item is good, you still have to be alive to use it!” Xue Ying didn’t reply to Fei Cai’s words. Instead, he looked at Room 12 and said in a threatening tone. “You don’t have to worry about that. However, it seems that you don’t intend to increase the price. I thought that the Blood Fang Gang had a big business and wouldn’t care about five middle-grade spirit stones.” Jiang Ping’s voice was emotionless as he replied. Immediately, Xue Ying was so angry that his entire body was trembling. Seeing that he was at risk of going berserk at any moment, Fang Shen hurriedly said in a low voice, “My lord, calm down. The main event hasn’t started yet!” “We’re here today for the real treasure. Don’t try to save a little and lose out a lot!” “Phew!” Xue Ying closed his eyes and let out a fierce breath. His body also slowly calmed down. ‘When he opened his eyes again, the anger in his eyes had almost disappeared, leaving only endless coldness. “Humph!” Xue Ying snorted and didn’t say any more nonsense. He directly turned around and entered the private room. He knew that at this time, the more he said, the more ridiculous it would be. In the auction, it was a competition of personal wealth. If one couldn’t win against the other party in the auction, then it was useless to say any harsh words. Therefore, he did not plan to say anything harsh. He planned to directly make a move! “Fang Shen, I don’t care what method you use. You must find out the background of that fellow in Room 12!” “Lwant these fellows to know what kind of outcome they will have if they dare to go against my Blood Fang Gang. If he walks out of the Hundred Treasures House, I want him to walk into hell!” 1 Fang Shen opened his mouth but didn’t say anything. He nodded and then turned around to leave the private room. He knew that Xue Ying wouldn’t listen to anything at this time. Going against his will would only bring him trouble. “If that’s the case, Miss Fei Cai, does that mean I’ve won this auction?” Seeing Xue Ying walk into the private room, everyone didn’t understand what he meant. It wasn’t until Jiang Ping’s voice sounded that they came to their senses. ‘The Blood Fang Gang was terrified! ‘They didn’t expect that someone could actually snatch the item from the hands of the Blood Fang Gang. This was simply pulling teeth from the jaws of a tiger. Those who were skilled were bold! Fei Cai paused for a moment, then immediately put on a smile and hurriedly said, “Since no one continues to bid, then I announce that the ninth item will be auctioned off to the honored guest in Room 12!” Clang! The hammer fell without regret. “Yeah! Daddy, that thing is ours!” ‘Wan’er immediately danced and jumped around in the private room excitedly. Liver pouted and said unhappily, “Big sister, this is clearly daddy’s gift to me. It’s mine, not ours!” “aiya!” Wan’er hugged Liu’er and said slyly, “Since it belongs to Liver, isn’t it ours?” “That belongs to me, so why is it ours?” Liu’er asked, puzzled. “Because what belongs to Yan‘er, it’s also ours!” As soon as she finished speaking, the intelligent Yan’er immediately added, “Most importantly, what belongs to Wan’er, is also ours!”1 <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Room 12. Knock, knock! Suddenly, there was a series of knocks on the door. Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows. After hesitating for a moment, he said, “Come in!” Then, the steward who had led Jiang Ping and the others in opened the door gently. He said to Jiang Ping respectfully, “Mr. Jiang, I’m sorry to disturb you.” “The auction item number nine that you bought has been prepared. However, our director has something to discuss with you. She hopes to meet you and hand over the auction item number nine to you personally.” “I wonder if you can wait until the auction is over and go backstage to meet our director?” Hearing this, Jiang Ping was stunned. He narrowed his eyes and pondered for a moment before he slowly said, “Meet me? There’s no need for that. Why don’t you just hand over the item to me? I can also pass over the spirit stones to you right now.” He paused and continued, “I don’t really want to expose my identity. Do you know what I mean?” ‘The steward immediately bowed and replied, “Sir, please rest assured. Our director absolutely has no ill intentions. We only hope to get to know you. Moreover, we will definitely keep the meeting with you a secret. We will definitely not reveal to anyone else!” “Besides, the transaction of the five middle-grade spirit stones may be a drop in the ocean for you, but it is not a small business for the Hundred Treasures House. Naturally, we hope that we can do it more meticulously to prevent any accidents from happening.” ‘The manager replied “earnestly”. He had received a death order from Fei Cai. No matter what, he had to think of a way to get Jiang Ping to agree to meet her without arousing Jiang Ping’s annoyance. Otherwise, if Jiang Ping won the item and left, wouldn’t the Hundred Treasures House miss out on a good opportunity? After listening to him nagging for so long, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but feel a little impatient. He hurriedly waved his hand and said, “Alright, there’s no need to say anymore. I agree.” “When the auction is over, come and look for me again.” ‘The steward was delighted and quickly replied, “Yes, then I won’t disturb you. Please make yourself at home, Mr. Jiang!” With that, he nodded and smiled at the three little girls before respectfully leaving. How could Jiang Ping not guess what the Hundred Treasures House was planning? It was said that in order to ensure the safety of the auction items, she had to personally hand them over to him. However, the Hundred Treasures House was heavily guarded. How could there be a robbery? It was obvious that the woman wanted to take the opportunity to get to know him. Of course, Jiang Ping didn’t resist too much. Because he also wanted to know how the Hundred Treasures House obtained this item. If he could learn more about this item, he might be able to more accurately deduce Liv’er’s constitution. This was the most important thing that he was concerned about! He didn’t expect that he would accidentally get news about Liu’er’s constitution after entering an auction. Jiang Ping naturally wouldn’t let this opportunity slip by. He wasn’t worried that the Hundred Treasures House would have other thoughts. After all, he was a nascent soul realm cultivator. He could do whatever he wanted in the entire Fusheng City, let alone the Hundred Treasures House! “Daddy, where’s Liu‘er’s gift?” Liver came up to him, pouting her small mouth and asking with a bit of grievance. When someone knocked on the door just now, she thought it was the gift that her father had bought for her arrived. For a moment, she was a bit excited. But unexpectedly, the person who came was empty-handed, and her mood instantly collapsed. “Liver, be good. Daddy has already bought Liu’er’s gift. Let’s wait for the sister on the stage to personally bring the gift to us, okay?” Jiang Ping hurriedly hugged Liu’er and comforted her. “The sister on the stage?” Liv’er looked at Fei Cai on the stage, pouted, and then whispered, “Daddy, that is an auntie, not a sister.” Jiang Ping was stunned and couldn’t help but sigh. Liu’er’s train of thought was really strange! She was clearly talking about the auction item, but why was her attention on how to address Fei Cai? However, Jiang Ping carefully looked at Fei Cai and couldn’t help but nod. “Our Liu’er is right. It’s auntie, not sister.” Although Fei Cai was indeed sexy and charming, she was probably around twenty-seven or twenty-eight years old. She should be around the same age as Li Sushang. On the other side, in the private room of the Golden Door Sect. ‘The person Feng Dan and Zi Yue were talking about was naturally the one from the mysterious Room 12. “Yue’er, who do you think the person in Room 12 is?” Feng Dan pinched her delicate chin and pondered. “He dares to go against the Blood Fang Gang so directly. He must have a powerful background.” “Since when did such a powerful person appear in Fusheng City?” Zi Yue was also confused, “That’s right. If there is a faction in Fusheng City that can challenge the Blood Fang Gang, we will know about it. Maybe this guy is from another city and has just arrived in Fusheng City.” “It’s possible, but is it possible that he is from the Open City Sect?” Feng Dan suggested another possibility. However, Zi Yue immediately denied it. “Impossible. Open City Sect has been silent for so many years. Moreover, they have always been neutral. It’s impossible for them to openly oppose the Blood Fang Gang.” “Then, does that mean that the person in Room 12 is not from Fusheng City?” Feng Dan said excitedly, “Yue’er, then we must seize this opportunity. Since he can take out five middle-grade spirit stones just for a useless thing, the force behind him might be even stronger than we imagined!” “If we can get him to join us and fight against the Blood Fang Gang together with u Zi Yue was not as optimistic as she was. She interrupted, “Don’t think of this so simply. If he really came from another place, he might have just passed by Fusheng City. Why would he recklessly intervene in the struggle in Fusheng City?” “This is up to us!” Feng Dan shook her head and said with a firm expression, “Even if he won’t agree for the time being, as long as we persevere, I believe he will definitely agree to help.” “After all, this is a good thing for the country and the people!” “If that’s the case, let’s wait for the auction to end and find out more information about this guy.” Zi Yue paused and continued, “But I think that the people of the Blood Fang Gang are already doing their best to find out more about him. We might be able to help a little.” “Mm, you’re the most thoughtful one, Yue’er!” Feng Dan was instantly overjoyed and felt much more relaxed. Yue’er could not help but sigh inwardly when she saw her appearance. This girl was really too… kind and naive. There were all kinds of people in the cultivation world, but not everyone would harbor good intentions to enforce justice on behalf of the heavens.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Compared to the mysterious ninth item, the following items were much more common. After experiencing the twists and turns of the ninth item, the monotonous bidding didn’t attract the interest of the crowd at all. Everyone was looking forward to the last item to be auctioned. What kind of treasure would it be? Almost everyone present had received an invitation from the Hundred Treasures House. Only a few people, like Jiang Ping, had used other methods to enter, so almost everyone knew. The Hundred Treasures House must have obtained some extraordinary treasure to hold this auction in such a grand manner. As for this extraordinary treasure, it would naturally be placed at the end of the auction. Therefore, looking at the items on the stage that didn’t arouse any interest, everyone’s heart was itching. They couldn’t wait to find out what the ultimate treasure was. Fei Cai naturally sensed the impatience of the crowd, so she sped up the process. However, she wasn’t dissatisfied. To be honest, the gains from today’s auction had greatly exceeded her expectations. Most importantly, how could she not be excited to be acquainted with someone with a powerful background? In fact, she could not wait to end the auction as soon as possible so that she could interact with Jiang Ping. Finally, under everyone’s expectant gazes, Fei Cai slowly said. “Next is auction item twenty-one, and the last auction item of this auction!” Before she could finish her sentence, a few transparent covers suddenly fell in front of her, enveloping her within it. Everyone was stunned for a moment. Then, they heard Fei Cai explain unhurriedly, “Because the last item is too precious, in order to avoid arousing the ill intentions of some people, I had no choice but to use the thousand walls of the Hundred Treasures House.” “believe that everyone knows that these thousand walls were forged from an extremely special material. Not only is it transparent as if it’s nothing, but it’s also exceptionally hard. Even if an initial stage origin core realm cultivator were to make a move, it would still take quite a while before it could be pierced through.” “It’s not that I don’t trust everyone, but the last item is too precious, so this was the only way. I hope that everyone can be magnanimous.” Everyone suddenly realized what was going on! However, they couldn’t help but become even more curious. What was this last item that could make the Hundred Treasures House so vigilant? “Miss Fei Cai, what is this last item? Quickly take it out!” “Yeah, if this last item isn’t a real treasure, our Qingyang Sect won’t agree!” “Tve long heard that the thousand walls are the true treasure of the Hundred Treasures House. It’s transparent as if there’s nothing there, and as hard as a thick shield. Seeing it today, it really lives up to its reputation!” Hearing their heckling, Fei Cai laughed softly. With a flip of her palm, an item appeared in her hand. Inan instant, the auction became quiet. Everyone’s eyes were completely glued to that item. ‘The item was the size of a fist. It was exquisite and translucent, emitting green-blue light. There was also faint spiritual energy lingering around it as if it was something from the heavens. This was a high-grade spirit stone? A shocking thought flashed through everyone’s mind. After a long while, someone suddenly spoke, breaking the silence, “Miss Fei Cai, this thing in your hand, could it be a high-grade spirit stone?” Fei Cai glanced at the crowd, who were staring at her nervously with shocked expressions. She nodded her head lightly and said with a light smile, “That’s right, this is a high-grade spirit stone. As everyone knows, spirit stones are divided into several grades.” “Low-grade spirit stones are light green, middle-grade spirit stones are green, and high-grade spirit stones are green-blue. As for top-grade spirit stones, they are green-pink. I believe that everyone can see that this spirit stone is green-blue in color!” “At the same time, this high-grade spirit stone is also the final item of this auction. After our Hundred Treasures House’s appraisal, this high-grade spirit stone is well-preserved and of high quality. It is a rare high-grade spirit stone, and its value is priceless!” Boom! Fei Cai’s words were like a huge rock crashing into the calm surface of a lake, instantly raising a storm. Although spirit stones were commonly used as a transaction currency in the cultivation world, they had a wide range of uses, and almost every cultivator would need spirit stones. Therefore, although spirit stones were used as currency, they were also the most marketable treasure. As for high-grade spirit stones, they were even more precious! “So, the last item for auction is actually a high-grade spirit stone. I finally understand why the Hundred Treasures House is so cautious.” “an excellent high-grade spirit stone. Not to mention us, even a nascent soul realm expert would probably be jealous, right? It’s only right for the Hundred Treasures House to be a little more cautious. I even feel that having these thousand walls isn’t enough!” “How many years has it been since a high-grade spirit stone appeared in Fusheng City? I didn’t expect that the Hundred Treasures House would have such a wild way to actually obtain a high-grade spirit stone!” Everyone was sighing with emotion. The impact this high-grade spirit stone had brought to them was simply too great. Of course, they were just saying it. Everyone in the hall on the first floor knew that they could only take a look at this high-grade spirit stone. With their background and strength, not to mention not being able to bid for a high-grade spirit stone, even if they managed to bid for it, it would only be a hot potato for them! This thing, only the big shots in the private room on the second floor had the possibility of snatching it. Inside Room 2. Xue Ying looked at the high-grade spirit stone in Fei Cai’s hand, and his entire body could not help but freeze. After a long while, he came back to his senses and repeatedly exclaimed, “High-grade spirit stone, I didn’t expect it to be a high-grade spirit stone!” Compared to those people below who had only heard of it and could determine the grade of the spirit stone based on the light it emitted, Xue Ying was someone who had actually seen a high-grade spirit stone, so he was even more excited. He was 100% sure that it was a high-grade spirit stone! High-grade spirit stone, this was a treasure that even their Blood Fang Gang had never obtained before! The strongest person in the Blood Fang Gang right now was naturally his father, the leader of the Blood Fang Gang, Xue Yu, with the cultivation of the origin core realm. And in order to absorb the spiritual energy in a high-grade spirit stone, one had to have at least the cultivation of the nascent soul realm. But if one obtained a high-grade spirit stone, then it would still be a great thing for the Blood Fang Gang! Because even if he didn’t leave it for his father to absorb in the future, he could return the favor by offering this high-grade spirit stone to some large sects with nascent soul realm experts in exchange for their support. At that time, not to mention Fusheng City, even the dozen or so cities around Fusheng City would be completely annexed by the Blood Fang Gang! Looking at the spirit stone that was emitting a green-blue light, a grand blueprint seemed to appear in the eyes of Xue Ying. “I must get this high-grade spirit stone!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios<strong>Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Wallace won, and he used a crushing method to slap Horace in the face! ‘When Horace saw Wallace waiting for him at the finish line, he went crazy. What is going on? When did the BMW 520’s configuration exceed my car’s? It’s obvious that it is impossible. The more Horace thought about it, the angrier he became. He felt even more certain that Wallace had used a modified car to cheat him. Damn it! Horace got out of the car indignantly and saw his opponent standing next to Sharon with a smile. All the students present were dumbfounded. They still couldn’t figure out why Wallace could win. “Damn it, b*tch! Did you modify your car? Did you drive it here to trick me?” Jenna looked at him and sneered. “Didn’t you say that the most important thing about racing is skill and that it has nothing to do with cars? Why did your words change after you lost? I didn’t expect you to be so shameless!” “I didn’t!” Panic flashed across Horace’s face, and he immediately defended himself. “You guys were the ones who set a trap for me in advance. I didn’t cheat!” Jenna replied disdainfully, “You don’t keep your word and make people despise you. Don’t forget that you were the one who stated the terms of the bet. You can’t go back on your promise in front of so many of us!” “That’s right! He bullied Sharon just now, but it seems like he’s not a good person.” The classmate who was waiting to see Wallace and Sharon make a fool of themselves now disliked Horace a little too. He’s an adult, yet he can’t admit defeat. He’s the one who started the fight, and now, he isn’t going to honor it. Hence, someone said, “Horace, I didn’t expect you to be so boring. You just said that you could do whatever you wanted with her and that you still wanted to compete with Sharon. Why are you acting shamelessly now?” “I think it’s because Sharon didn’t agree to him back then, so Horace still feels a little unfair now. Haha!” “That’s right!” A girl said, “Horace, I used to think that you were quite manly and always kept your word. I didn’t expect you to go back on your words now. Tsk tsk, I really look down on you!” “I finally understand what kind of person he is. This behavior is that so-called ‘double standard dog!” If Wallace lost, he would definitely shamelessly ask for Sharon from him. Now that he has lost, he’s acting shamelessly. This is really trash behavior.” Hearing the discussions around him, Horace’s face darkened. “Idon’t ask for anything else—I just want to destroy your car. I will also not work with you anymore.” “What… What did you say?!” Horace was dumbfounded. To be honest, he had only owned this car for two months, and the insurance had cost him more than 800,000 dollars. Why did he have to destroy it now? This is my beloved car. Usually, I wouldn’t even let a tiny scratch or dust stain the car. I definitely can’t bear to destroy it. I didn’t expect Wallace to be so ruthless. He even wants to make my small companies unable to operate… Damn it! Doesn’t he hate Sharon? Horace looked at his classmates and didn’t know what to do. I’ve already lost my prestige among my old classmates. If I continue to persevere… I’m afraid that there won’t be a good ending between us in the future. They will even go around saying that I won’t fulfill my promises if I lose. Also, if Wallace really blocks all my partnerships, these classmates won’t help me anymore! At the thought of this, Horace felt depressed, and his heart wavered. If I don’t destroy this car today, Wallace might really do what he said. By then… How am I going to explain this to the old man at home? At this moment, Sharon suddenly said, “Horace, we’re all friends. Let’s just treat some things as a joke. Your car isn’t cheap either. If you can’t bear to part with it, then forget about this matter.” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio After suppressing everyone’s voices, Fei Cai explained unhurriedly. “According to the auction item owner’s request, this item is not to be auctioned with spirit stones. Only those who satisfy the requirements set by the owner have the qualifications to compete for this item.” “The first requirement set by the owner is that the bidder’s force must have an expert at the origin core realm or above!” “wal” As soon as these words were said, the hall immediately exploded into a commotion. Originally, many people thought that if they didn’t bid with spirit stones, they might even have the qualifications to compete with those big shots in the private rooms on the second floor. Now, they knew that there was no such thing as a free lunch in this world. The first requirement set by the owner of the auction item directly extinguished most people’s thoughts of fighting for it! After all, there were only a handful of forces in Fusheng City that had origin core realm experts. Of course, although everyone was a little disappointed and sighed, they weren’t too dissatisfied. In the cultivation world, the strong were always respected. They didn’t have such strength. Even if they really obtained this high-grade spirit stone, it might only bring them trouble. Most of the people lost the qualification to bid, and they switched back to the mentality of watching a show. “Why do you think the owner of this item set the threshold at the origin core realm?” “Maybe, the owner of this auction item hasn’t reached the origin core realm yet, so he wants to meet an origin core realm expert through this auction?” “That makes sense, but an origin core realm expert might not be able to absorb the spiritual energy contained in this high-grade spirit stone. Do you think an origin core realm expert will bid?” “Nonsense, don’t you know what it means to hoard rare goods? An origin core realm expert can’t absorb the spiritual energy contained in a high-grade spirit stone now. It doesn’t mean that they won’t be able to break through to the nascent soul realm in the future, right? They could also gift the spirit stone to some nascent soul realm seniors to form a good relationship with them, right?” “That’s right. In short, this high-grade spirit stone will definitely attract all the origin core realm experts in Fusheng City to rush to it like a flock of ducks and fight for it like crazy!” Inside Room 2. After listening to everyone’s discussion, Xue Ying couldn’t help but smile smugly. He thought to himself, “This should be the case!” “How could a high-grade spirit stone be a treasure that ants like you can covet?” “This way, it would save me a lot of trouble. Now, I’ll only need to focus on dealing with those people from the Golden Door Sect.” Xue Ying’s brows suddenly raised as he looked solemnly at Room 12. Although the Golden Door Sect was the Blood Fang Gang’s main enemy, they still had to guard against that mysterious guy in Room 12! However, after losing to him once, he would not lose a second time! Xue Ying suddenly stood up and said in a clear voice, “Miss Fei Cai, I wonder if my Blood Fang Gang has the qualifications to participate in the bidding?” “Since it’s the Blood Fang Gang, you naturally have the qualifications.” Fei Cai smiled and nodded as she replied. “Then our Golden Door Sect should also have the qualifications to bid, right?” Feng Dan’s crisp and melodious voice, which was loud and clear, was also heard from Room 3. “The Golden Door Sect naturally has the qualifications as well.” Fei Cai also answered repeatedly. Following that, a few more forces had passed the verification and had the qualifications to bid. Although these forces couldn’t compare to the three major ones, they could still be considered as the top forces in Fusheng City. And all of them had origin core realm experts overseeing it. However, whether it was in terms of manpower, financial resources, or foundation, these forces were far inferior to the three major ones. Naturally, their reputation couldn’t be compared to them as well. Fei Cai continued to speak unhurriedly, “After being verified, a total of seven forces have attended this auction. They are qualified to compete for this auction item. They are the Blood Fang Gang, Golden Door Sect, Astrology Union…” The people in the hall on the first floor were not surprised to hear the names of these forces. These forces were well-deserved ceilings in the cultivation world of Fusheng City. Among the three major forces, only the Open City Sect did not attend this auction. However, everyone had expected it. After all, the Open City Sect had been silent in recent years, so much so that the Open City Sect’s shadow was rarely seen in Fusheng City. Although no one knew the reason, not many people talked about it. This force, just like its name, was the oldest faction in the entire Fusheng City. It also made great contributions towards Fusheng City’s establishment. Therefore, no one wanted to talk about this force too much. Fei Cai paused and continued, “Next, I’ll talk about the specific auction method.” “As everyone knows, there are two cities in Fusheng City. Each city has twenty-four subdivisions, and they belong to different forces.” “The owner of this auction item said that if anyone could take out the Light Carriage Workshop and the Superior Jade Workshop of Western City and hand them over to the owner of the auction item and help him manage these two marketplaces for three years, to prevent anyone from causing trouble, they would be able to obtain this auction item.” Before she could finish her words, the entire auction venue instantly erupted into a commotion. “Damn, what kind of strange auction method is this? I’ve never heard of it before!” “Don’t say that you’ve never heard of it. I don’t think even Miss Fei Cai has heard it before, right?” “Light Carriage Workshop, Superior Jade Workshop… if I remember correctly, they all belong to the Fang family, right?” “That’s right, they belong to the Fang family. This Superior Jade Workshop was originally the territory of the Sky Wolf Sect, but a few months ago, the Fang family acted forcefully and annexed the Superior Jade Workshop. Therefore, the Light Carriage Workshop and the Superior Jade Workshop now belong to the Fang family.” “The Fang family owns two workshops, and their power is growing. I heard that they are preparing to attack the first-rate forces!” “So, the Light Carriage Workshop and the Superior Jade Workshop are the Fang family’s lifeblood. Do you think the owner of this high-grade spirit stone has a grudge with the Fang family, so he deliberately made such an auction request?” “I think the possibility is very high!” Without a doubt, the person who took out this auction item was Qiu Chi. Ever since he obtained this high-grade spirit stone from Jiang Ping yesterday, he had been thinking about how he could take revenge on the Fang family. At first, he had thought that it would be better to directly use this spirit stone to bribe an origin core realm expert and help him directly destroy the Fang family. However, this method was too risky. If he rashly approached an origin core realm expert, perhaps after hearing his intentions, he would directly take action to subdue him and then interrogate him about the whereabouts of the spirit stone. Moreover, he wouldn’t be happy even if he destroyed the Fang family using somebody else. As for exchanging this high-grade spirit stone for a low-grade spirit stone, recruiting troops and buying horses wouldn’t work either. Because he showed up yesterday to teach Fang Hui a lesson, now the people of the Fang family definitely knew that he had returned, and they might be looking for him all over the streets! In the end, he chose the Hundred Treasures House. Using territory to exchange for spirit stones was essentially a barter, and it didn’t count as breaking the Hundred Treasures House’s rules. So, Fei Cai thought about it and agreed.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Almost everyone present could tell that the owner of this high-grade spirit stone was definitely targeting the Fang family. Otherwise, why would he choose the Fang family’s Light Carriage Workshop and Superior Jade Workshop? After all, Fusheng City was further split up into two cities which were the western and the eastern cities. Within these two cities consists of 48 workshops. If the Fang family lost these two workshops, it would be equivalent to cutting off their source of resources. Cultivation relied heavily on resources, and without a stable source of resources, the Fang family would be unable to recover and would gradually decline! After the spearhead was pointed at the Fang family, everyone suddenly understood why the qualifications to bid were origin core realm experts. Because the strongest person in the Fang family was Patriarch Fang Shen, who was at the late-stage refinement realm! Without the help of someone in the origin core realm, they might not be able to take down the Fang family. As for whether the Fang family would take out these two workshops to exchange for this high-grade spirit stone, everyone felt that it was impossible. After all, the members of the Fang family were still far from reaching the nascent soul realm. If they did not have the strength, even if they obtained this high-grade spirit stone, they would incur a large loss for a small gain. It was not worth it. “Interesting!” Xue Ying narrowed his eyes and snorted. “Fang Shen, say, what kind of big shot did your Fang family offend that someone had to take out a high-grade spirit stone to sever your Fang family’s lifeline?” At this moment, Fang Shen, who was standing behind him, had an extremely gloomy expression. When he heard Fei Cai’s words just now, he couldn’t help but be shocked. ‘Was there even a need to ask? It was obvious that the person was targeting the Fang family! It wasn’t a big deal to target the Fang family. In the process of their rise, the Fang family had naturally offended many people. However, he had always been vicious and merciless in his actions. To those who had already offended him, he would choose to eliminate the root of the problem! Even if there were a few fish that had slipped through the net, it was impossible for them to take out a high-grade spirit stone to intentionally target the Fang family. Could it be… Fang Shen suddenly thought of a name. Qiu Chi! Could it be that he was behind this? Logically speaking, it was impossible because Qiu Chi would be alone sooner or later. How could he have a high-grade spirit stone? However, other than Qiu Chi, Fang Shen could not think of anyone else for the time being. Sensing the change in his expression, Xue Ying immediately asked, “From the looks of it, you already have an answer in your heart?” Fang Shen hesitated for a moment and replied, “I already have a guess.” “Tell me.” Fang Shen took a deep breath and slowly spat out two words, “Qiu Chi!” “Qiu Chi? This name sounds familiar.” Xue Ying frowned and pondered for a moment, then asked with uncertainty, “It seems to be the sect master of the Sky Wolf Sect that you destroyed, right?” “Lremember that he was only in the middle stage of the Qi refinement. The Sky Wolf Sect could barely be considered a second-rate force. How could a remnant of a second-rate force take out a high-grade spirit stone?” After listening to Xue Ying’s analysis, Fang Shen immediately said, “That doesn’t sound very reasonable, but I can confirm that this remnant Qiu Chi has already returned to Fusheng City. Yesterday, he even fought with my confidant.” “Besides him, I really can’t think of anyone else at this moment.” Xue Ying calmly nodded and suddenly shouted sternly, “Then what are you waiting for? Hurry up and send people to catch this stray dog!” “Please rest assured, young lord. I have already sent people. I believe there will be a result soon.” Upon hearing this, Xue Ying did not speak any further. His gaze once again turned towards the auction stage. His heart was already beginning to faintly look forward to it. If this high-grade spirit stone really belonged to Qiu Chi, then would he still be able to escape? This was equivalent to giving them a high-grade spirit stone for free. To their Blood Fang Gang, this was a great thing! Fei Cai scanned across the crowd that was engaged in a heated discussion, and a faint aura emanated from her body. She said in a deep voice, “Everyone, please calm down!” Only then did the crowd gradually quieten down. Fei Cai continued, “Due to the special auction method of this auction item, the owner has proposed a limit of seven days.” “In other words, within seven days, whoever obtains the ownership of the Light Carriage Workshop and the Superior Jade Workshop first will be able to obtain this high-grade spirit stone.” “Within seven days, this high-grade spirit stone will be temporarily kept in the Hundred Treasures House. Everyone, if anyone obtains the ownership of the Light Carriage Workshop and the Superior Jade Workshop, just head over to the Hundred Treasures House.” Inside Room 3. Feng Dan excitedly said, “The Fang family seems to be a second-rate force in Fusheng City, it’s not worth worrying about.” “[heard that the Fang family oppressed people, committing all kinds of evil. It’s just right, we can use this opportunity to teach the Fang family a lesson, and at the same time, we can also obtain a high-grade spirit stone. The heavens are really helping me!” “Yue’er, let’s go back and dispatch our men right now. We’ll charge straight to their door. I want to see if the Fang family dares to oppose our Golden Door Sect!” ‘As she spoke, she pulled Zi Yue’s hand and really wanted to walk out. However, she did not manage to make Zi Yue move. When she turned around, she saw Zi Yue’s black brows slightly furrow as she said thoughtfully, “Although the Fang family is nothing to worry about, and they have committed many evil deeds, it’s also destined that someone will take revenge.” “However, I seem to have heard that the Fang family has some unclear relationship with the Blood Fang Gang. The Fang family may rise abruptly during this period. It is all because of the support of the Blood Fang Gang!” “Blood Fang Gang?” Feng Dan was stunned. She pondered for a moment and then asked, “There are so many forces in Fusheng City that are dependent on the Blood Fang Gang. It is not impossible for there to be an additional Fang family.” “However, if the Blood Fang Gang is really backing the Fang family, I’m afraid they will join forces to take down this high-grade spirit stone!” “No, the high-grade spirit stone must not be taken by the Blood Fang Gang!” Feng Dan anxiously held Zi Yue’s hand and hurriedly asked, “Yue’er, do you have any good ideas? You must have some good ideas, right?” “Sigh!” Zi Yue shook her head lightly under Feng Dan’s gaze. What good ideas could she have in such a situation? It was far from enough for them to snatch from the Blood Fang Gang! Her gaze unconsciously fell on Room 12 again. No one knew what she was thinking about. “Alright, I now announce that this auction has concluded successfully!” Fei Cai’s face was filled with a brilliant smile as she said, “I would like to thank everyone for your support! The items that you have bid for have already been sent over.” “If everyone doesn’t mind, please take a look around the Hundred Treasures House.” Before she finished speaking, everyone in the auction venue stood up one after another, complimented Fei Cai a few times, and then left. Among them, there were naturally people who had obtained the treasure that they desired, and they were all beaming with joy. However, most of them had returned empty-handed. Of course, there were also no regretful expressions on their faces. This was because this auction was simply too exciting. The last item, the high-grade spirit stone, had opened the eyes of many people. Not to mention that Jiang Ping had used five middle-grade spirit stones to bid for an unknown treasure, and that situation was filled with twists and turns, and also that confrontation with Xue Ying… It was considered an eye-opener to everyone! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The auction came to an end. Jiang Ping didn’t leave immediately. Instead, he was led by the manager to a certain place in the Hundred Treasures House. “Mr. Jiang, Director Fei Cai is already waiting for you inside. Please come in.” The manager pointed at the door and said respectfully to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping nodded and was about to enter with the three girls. Suddenly, he was stopped by the manager. Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows. Seeing Jiang Ping’s unhappy expression, the manager panicked and quickly explained. “Mr. Jiang, please don’t misunderstand. I don’t mean any harm. I just think that I should help you take care of your three daughters first. You and Director Fei Cai might have a long discussion. Your three daughters might be bored.” ‘As soon as these words were said and before Jiang Ping could say anything, the three little girls rushed to speak, “No, we want to follow daddy. Wan’er will go wherever daddy goes!” “Yan’er also doesn’t want to be separated from daddy!” “Daddy!” Liv’er directly hugged Jiang Ping. She tightly held onto Jiang Ping’s sleeve as if she was afraid that Jiang Ping would abandon them. Jiang Ping quickly put on a smile and comforted, “Liver, be good, and don’t worry. I won’t let you leave daddy. No matter where daddy goes, I will bring Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er!” After saying that, he turned to look at the manager and said in a deep voice, “As you can see, my three girls are very clingy. If you are not willing to let them follow me, then you should just bring the item over.” “Lwill wait for you here!” “This…” Hearing that, the manager was at a loss. He naturally did not dare to offend Jiang Ping, and he did not want to offend Jiang Ping because of a small matter. However, this was a discussion with the director. The two of them would definitely discuss some important topics. The three girls were young. Who knows, they might hear something, and one day, they might expose it. Therefore, he did not dare to let the three little girls follow Jiang Ping into the room. For a moment, he was in a dilemma. He did not know what to do. “Manager Li, let the few distinguished guests in!” Just as he was in a dilemma, Fei Cai’s cold and sweet voice suddenly came from the room. ‘The manager was stunned, then he quickly bowed and said to Jiang Ping, “I have offended you earlier. Please forgive me. Mr. Jiang, please enter with your three daughters.” “Let’s go. Let’s go in and get the gift for Liver!” Jiang Ping said to the three little girls with a smile. “Yes, let’s get the gifts!” Wan’er immediately shouted excitedly. Liver pouted and quickly said, “That’s a gift from daddy to Liver!” “What’s given to Liu’er is given to all of us! Yan’er, don’t you think so?” Wan’er still refused to give up and said. Just as the few little girls were quarreling, the door in front of Jiang Ping actually slowly opened by itself. ‘The manager was left alone, and he was stunned on the spot. He wondered if he had heard wrongly just now. The thing that he spent five middle-grade spirit stones to get was actually just a gift for his daughter? Just what kind of background did Mr. Jiang have? He was so heroic. He was probably far superior to the Blood Fang Gang or the Golden Door Sect! In the room. Jiang Ping and Fei Cai’s gazes met in the air. Alook of surprise flashed across Fei Cai’s eyes. Actually, through the introduction of the management, she had already imagined Jiang Ping’s appearance in her heart. But when she saw Jiang Ping with her own eyes, she couldn’t help but be greatly shocked. She didn’t expect that the man in front of her was actually so handsome. Just one look at him gave her a sinking feeling. He should be very young, at most slightly less than thirty years old. In the cultivation world, only if one’s cultivation was high enough, eternal youth, and even rejuvenation was nothing. Fei Cai did not think that Jiang Ping was that kind of old monster because the vitality that Jiang Ping emitted was definitely something that only young people had! Of course, what surprised her the most was the unpredictable temperament on Jiang Ping. ‘This temperament made Fei Cai feel that the man in front of her seemed to be somewhat unfathomable, like a peerless expert! Even Fei Cai couldn’t help but be shocked by this feeling that she didn’t know where it came from. After so many years of treating and contacting people, she had developed an ability to see through people at a glance, so she trusted her intuition — this man in front of her was definitely not simple! Inan instant, she became even more curious about this man in front of her. She retracted her gaze and replaced it with a smile that was as refreshing as the spring breeze. She walked up to Jiang Ping and said, “This is Mr. Jiang?” “Hello, Miss Fei Cai.” Jiang Ping nodded indifferently as a form of greeting to Fei Cai. “Mr. Jiang is too polite. Please take a seat!” Fei Cai led Jiang Ping to sit down and asked again, “These three cute little girls, could they be Mr. Jiang’s daughters?” “That’s right,” Jiang Ping replied with a smile. Hearing others praise his precious daughters for being cute, Jiang Ping felt happy in his heart. He said to the three little girls, “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liv’er, didn’t daddy say that you must greet people when you see them?” “Hello, Auntie!” The three little girls immediately called out in unison. Auntie? Hearing this address, Fei Cai was stunned at first. After she reacted, she forced out a bitter smile and said, “Hello, hello.” However, she could not help but feel a little angry in her heart. Come on, she was only twenty-eight years old this year, and she was only twenty-plus years older than them! Even if they had to address her, they should address her as elder sister and not auntie, okay? However, she suddenly remembered that some people had children in their twenties. It seemed that there was nothing wrong with them addressing her as auntie? Jiang Ping did not know that the three girls’ address had caused Fei Cai to have such wild thoughts, and he asked expressionlessly, “Miss Fei Cai, I heard from the manager that you wanted to personally hand that stone over to me. Is there anything else that you want to discuss with me?” Getting back to the main topic, Fei Cai also threw away her little girl mentality. With a serious expression, she said with a faint smile, “That’s right Mr. Jiang. I want to hand this stone personally to you.” With that, she flipped her palm, and the stone that Jiang Ping had bid for appeared on the table. She continued, “Mr. Jiang, you can bid for this stone at the price of five middle-grade spirit stones. This is really an eye-opener for me!” “But Mr. Jiang, since you are willing to pay such a high price, there must be a reason. May I ask if Mr. Jiang knows the purpose of this stone?” “Of course, if it is not convenient to reveal it, just pretend that I did not ask..” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio After hearing Fei Cai’s words, Jiang Ping smiled. Fei Cai was stunned. She gave a forced laugh and asked, “Mr. Jiang, did I say something wrong?” “Miss Fei Cai, you’ve misunderstood.” Jiang Ping stopped laughing and waved his hand. “I’m not laughing at you. I just suddenly thought of something interesting.” “Since Miss Fei Cai asked, there’s nothing I can’t tell you directly. In fact, I don’t know what the use of this stone is. It’s just that my third daughter likes this stone, so I bid for it and gave it to her.” As he spoke, he picked up the stone on the table and handed it to Liu’er. He smiled and asked, “Liu’er, how is it? Do you like this gift?” “Like it!” Liv’er hugged the stone. ‘When the stone was in her arms, a warm current flowed through her body. Liu’er could not help but feel happy. She tiptoed and kissed Jiang Ping’s cheek. She smiled and said, “Daddy is the best!” “Liv’er, show it to me quickly!” Yan’er quickly came up and wanted to take the stone from Liu’er’s hand. Liv’er was unwilling to let go and held the stone tightly. She quickly took a few steps back and said with vigilance, “No, this is a gift from daddy to me. I haven’t played enough yet!” “Ah, Liu’er, don’t be so stingy!” Wan’er also came up and teamed up with Yan’er. She smiled and said to Liver, “Liu’er, let us take a look. In the future, if daddy gives us any gift, we will show it to you first. What do you think?” “No, haven’t even seen them!” Liu’er chose to refuse. Wan’er chuckled and said, “Then we’ll have to do it ourselves!” Before she finished speaking, she pounced on Liver. The three little girls instantly became a mess. Fei Cai was stunned again. She couldn’t help but doubt her own ears. Just now, Jiang Ping seemed to have said that he didn’t bid for this stone because he knew what it was for, nor because it was priceless, nor because he wanted to deliberately go against the Blood Fang Gang. Instead, it was for a simple reason. He wanted to give it to his daughter as a gift! In other words, the handsome young man in front of him had spent five middle-grade spirit stones just to give his daughter a gift? Fei Cai couldn’t help but grumble in her heart, “Is your daughter a princess?” Five middle-grade spirit stones was a fortune that could bankrupt countless cultivation worlds. In the end, it wasn’t for anything serious, but it was only to give your daughter a present. You are really inhumane! Jiang Ping also noticed that something was wrong with Fei Cai’s expression. He couldn’t help but ask, “Miss Fei Cai, what’s wrong? Are you not feeling well?” “Since it’s inconvenient for you, we’ll take our leave first.” He waved his hand, and five high-quality middle-grade spirit stones suddenly flew out of his sleeve and landed steadily on the table. Upon seeing this, Fei Cai merely glanced at the few spirit stones without leaving a trace. She then looked at Jiang Ping flirtatiously and said in a soft and numb voice, “Mr. Jiang, do you think I will eat people?” Jiang Ping could not help but be stunned. Eat people? What did this mean? In the end, Wan’er, who was at the side, also heard Fei Cai’s words and suddenly said loudly, “Daddy said that vixens can eat people!” Inan instant, Fei Cai’s body froze. She covered her mouth and chuckled, “Don’t worry, Wan’er. Sister Fei Cai is not a fox. I won’t eat people.” Then, she said to Jiang Ping in a delicate voice, “Mr. Jiang, Fei Cai doesn’t know how to eat people. Why are you in such a hurry to leave?” “Didn’t I say that I’m looking for you to discuss something important? It’s not idle talk.” Jiang Ping sat down and said calmly, “Then let’s talk about it.” “Then I’ll be frank.” Fei Cai put on a serious expression and said seriously, “Actually, what I want to talk about is related to the high-grade spirit stone in Mr. Jiang’s hand.” After the test just now, Fei Cai felt that she had a little understanding of this man in front of her. This man was serious and liked to be straightforward. He didn’t like to beat around the bush. In fact, she felt very comfortable dealing with this kind of person. Hearing Fei Cai directly mention a high-grade spirit stone, Jiang Ping wasn’t too surprised. After all, the value of a high-grade spirit stone could be seen from the scene at the auction just now. How could the Hundred Treasures House not have thoughts about the high-grade spirit stone in his hands? Jiang Ping’s expression was normal as he said, “Miss Fei Cai, could it be that you’ve taken a fancy to my high-grade spirit stone?” “won’t hide it from Mr. Jiang. I do have the intention.” After being exposed by Jiang Ping’s words, Fei Cai wasn’t surprised at all and directly admitted it. Then she said, “I’m sure Mr. Jiang has also seen the value of the high-grade spirit stone today.” “One high-grade spirit stone is enough to cause the entire Fusheng City’s cultivation world to go crazy. If Mr. Jiang entrusts this high-grade spirit stone to our Hundred Treasures House for auction, I can guarantee that Mr. Jiang will definitely obtain unexpected gains!” Jiang Ping smiled, his eyes flashing with wisdom that had seen through everything. He slowly said, “It’s just a high-grade spirit stone. Whether or not it can bring me any unexpected gains, I don’t know. But I know how much the Hundred Treasures House will benefit from auctioning two high-grade spirit stones consecutively.” Upon hearing this, Fei Cai immediately became a little anxious and smiled embarrassedly. Just as Jiang Ping had said, auctioning two high-grade spirit stones consecutively would definitely bring the Hundred Treasures House a very considerable gain. This kind of gain was naturally not just the handling fee from the auction, but more importantly, the increase in popularity. Because at that time, the entire Fusheng City would know that the Hundred Treasures House’s connections were still very wide, it could actually auction two high-grade spirit stones consecutively! It had been a long time since their Hundred Treasures House entered Fusheng City. However, in recent years, the Hundred Treasures House hadn’t been able to take out anything decent to auction. Although they could occasionally rely on their remaining fame to hold a few auctions, the number of people supporting them was decreasing. It was only until today that they had once again aroused the confidence of the various major forces in the Hundred Treasures House. If she could strike while the iron was hot and auction off another high-grade spirit stone at this time, the Hundred Treasures House’s reputation would definitely return to its peak state! This was also the reason why she had to meet Jiang Ping. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Business was business. Fei Cai felt that her thoughts were not wrong. This was a win-win business, so she directly and openly admitted it. “Mr. Jiang, as you said, if you can really entrust the high-grade spirit stone in your hands to our Hundred Treasures House for auction, it will indeed bring great benefits to our Hundred Treasures House,” Fei Cai said without hesitation. “However, we will also try our best to strive for the greatest benefits for you, Mr. Jiang.” “Moreover, I can make the decision and charge the lowest handling fee. You will also become our Hundred Treasures House’s forever and most respected friend. Mr. Jiang, what do you think of my proposal?” Fei Cai stared at Jiang Ping with anticipation. She felt that she had already given her utmost sincerity, so it was impossible for Jiang Ping not to be tempted at all. As long as Jiang Ping was even the slightest bit tempted, she would be able to… Before she could finish feeling smug, she heard Jiang Ping say with a calm expression, “I think, it’s nothing much.” “What?” Fei Cai’s eyes instantly widened as she stared at Jiang Ping in disbelief. She asked in puzzlement, “Mr. Jiang, don’t you have any thoughts at all?” “Exchanging a high-grade spirit stone for such a generous reward and our Hundred Treasures House’s friendship, do you want to reconsider?” “There’s no need. I really don’t have any intention of auctioning spirit stones,” Jiang Ping replied without hesitation. “Tm afraid that a mere Fusheng City won’t be able to bring out anything that can move my heart. Since that’s the case, why should I waste my efforts?” This wasn’t Jiang Ping’s arrogance. Through signing in every day and obtaining the system’s rewards, Jiang Ping had long accumulated a large pile of heavenly and earthly treasures that were rare and precious. He had long since become tired of aesthetics. He didn’t even want to take a second look at the treasures in the eyes of ordinary people. He didn’t believe that a small Fusheng City would be able to bring out anything that could move his heart. Moreover, although he could request the Hundred Treasures House to keep his identity a secret. However, if the Hundred Treasures House really brought out a second high-grade spirit stone, it would definitely arouse the curiosity of many people. Perhaps they would think that the person who auctioned off the two high-grade spirit stones was the same, and then they would crazily inquire about him. There was nothing a determined person couldn’t accomplish. It was only a matter of time before his identity was exposed if he was really was being pursued by others. Jiang Ping had just moved to Fusheng City, and he hadn’t even familiarized himself with the house yet. He didn’t want to move again so soon. Fei Cai opened her mouth. Her complicated expression was obvious, but in the end, it turned into a helpless sigh. She opened her red lips slightly and said, “In that case, I will not force you anymore.” “Even though the business deal did not go through, we could still be friends. Judging from Mr. Jiang’s words, you should not be a local of Fusheng City, right? I wonder where did you come from. Would you be willing to be my friend?” From Jiang Ping’s tone and the content of his words, Fei Cai knew that this deal was destined to fail. However, she was also more convinced that Jiang Ping was definitely not a local of Fusheng City. Moreover, he must be a young master from a top-tier force! After all, none of the treasures in Fusheng City had caught his eye. Wasn’t this the best proof? Fei Cai didn’t know why, but even though Jiang Ping’s words sounded arrogant, she inexplicably believed that it was the truth. Therefore, she turned her focus to inquiring about Jiang Ping’s background. Although the deal wasn’t going to happen, it wouldn’t be a loss if she could obtain the friendship of such a mysterious person. Hearing this, Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows and said seriously, “From where I came.” “Uh. Fei Cai gently patted her forehead, feeling helpless. From where I came? Isn’t this just nonsense? You couldn’t have fallen from the sky, right! However, she didn’t dare to say these words out loud. If she accidentally offended this person in front of her… She forced a smile and said, “Mr. Jiang, I sincerely hope to befriend you. You don’t have to fool me like this, right?” “Tm not fooling you.” Jiang Ping shook his finger and said slowly, “It’s just that there are some things that are not convenient for outsiders to talk about. I believe that Miss Fei Cai should be a sensible person.” ‘After saying that, he even sighed earnestly. Fei Cai’s heart was immediately shocked. She had heard that some of the established successors from large clans would be sent to other places by their elders. Moreover, they would be required to conceal their names and true identities. And only after they had cultivated to a certain realm, then they could return to the clan and take charge. The reason for this was to improve their ability through their own capabilities and talent in the absence of outside help. Could it be that Jiang Ping was the heir of a big clan? Fei Cai was overjoyed. She had made the right bet! Being able to get to know such a person is definitely a great benefit to the Hundred Treasures House! Fei Cai immediately revealed an understanding expression. She made a hand gesture and said, “Mr. Jiang, I understand. I will definitely help you to keep this a secret.” “L know that although this situation is a form of training for you, it is also a kind of predicament. If Mr. Jiang needs any help, feel free to come to the Hundred Treasures House and look for me. I will definitely be your friend!” “Oh right, may I know your name, Mr. Jiang?” “Jiang Ping.” Jiang Ping replied calmly. Although he didn’t seem to understand what Fei Cai was saying, he knew that Fei Cai had already given him a reasonable explanation. This way, he didn’t have to explain too much. “Oh right, Miss Fei Cai, may I know how much the person who entrusted you with the auction of that high-grade spirit stone paid you?” Jiang Ping suddenly asked again. Hearing this question, Fei Cai narrowed her eyes, and a crafty expression flashed in her eyes. She softly spat out three words, “Light Carriage Workshop!” Good heavens! Jiang Ping couldn’t help but be stunned. The entire high-grade spirit stone was only exchanged for two workshops, the Light Carriage Workshop and Superior Jade Workshop. In the end, the Hundred Treasures House directly took half of it! Fei Cai seemed to have seen through Jiang Ping’s thoughts. She smiled and explained, “Mr. Jiang, don’t think that our Hundred Treasures House is asking for too much. This was proposed by the owner of the auction item.” “At that time, even I was shocked! So, I think that perhaps that person didn’t care about any worldly possessions and only wanted to deal with the Fang family.” Fei Cai suddenly thought of something and asked again, “Oh right, Mr. Jiang, I heard that the Fang family will hold a banquet for their young lord who has become a core disciple of the Chuanyun Sect tomorrow.” “However, after what happened today, I’m afraid that the Fang family will be very lively tomorrow!” “Lwonder if Mr. Jiang will go and take a look?” “Tm not interested.” Jiang Ping answered straightforwardly. ‘What relationship did the Fang family have with him? Why would he go and join in the fun? He didn’t want to expose himself in front of cultivators! However, sometimes the development of things was often contrary to people’s wishes.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Fei Cai personally sent Jiang Ping and the others out of the back door. “Miss Fei Cai, please wait.” Jiang Ping waved his hand and said to the three little girls, “Wan‘er, Yan’er, Liu’er, say goodbye to auntie.” “Goodbye, Auntie!” The three little girls immediately said obediently. “Goodbye, goodbye.” Fei Cai waved her hand at them speechlessly. She could not help but ridicule in her heart. Can’t they just change the way they addressed her? Did they have to call her auntie? What if she became older from the way they addressed her? At this moment, a cold and piercing voice suddenly sounded. “Kid, I’ve finally caught you!” Jiang Ping could not help but pause. Why did this voice sound a little familiar? He looked in the direction of the voice, and sure enough, in the next moment, he saw that person. It was the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang, Xue Ying! At this moment, Xue Ying was sneering and staring at him with a playful look. Their gazes met. “are you talking to me?” Jiang Ping asked without changing his expression. “That’s right. You were the one who didn’t dare to show your true face in there just now, right?” Xue Ying sneered and said with a proud expression, “However, you were still caught by me in the end!” “I thought what kind of character dared to snatch from our Blood Fang Gang. Turns out you’re just a pretty boy, and it makes me very disappointed.” Xue Ying didn’t know why. He had always been a character who didn’t say many ruthless words. But after seeing Jiang Ping, he couldn’t help but make sarcastic remarks and mock him. He might have never suffered at the hands of others, so his desire for revenge was formed. Or it could be that Jiang Ping’s handsome appearance made him feel unusually uncomfortable… “Daddy, this person’s words are so unpleasant. Let’s ignore him and hurry home?” Liu’er suddenly hid behind Jiang Ping, pulled the corner of Jiang Ping’s clothes, and said with a grievance. It was not that she hated what Xue Ying said, but because she did not understand what Xue Ying meant at all. She simply felt that Xue Ying’s voice was very unpleasant, like the wailing of ghosts and howling of wolves. It made her feel a little uncomfortable. Jiang Ping hurriedly caressed her head and comforted her gently, “Liu’er, don’t be afraid. Let’s go home now.” After saying that, he looked at Xue Ying and said calmly, “I don’t know what you’re talking about. If there’s nothing else, please move aside.” “What? You dare to do it, but you don’t dare to admit it?” Xue Ying’s gaze turned fierce. He pointed at Wan’er and said fiercely, “If you weren’t the one who fought with our Blood Fang Gang in Room 12 just now, then where did the item in this little girl’s hand come from?” Jiang Ping couldn’t help but raise his eyebrows and thought that this was bad. He had almost forgotten that the stone that had been auctioned just now was now in Wan’er’s hands! Of course, Jiang Ping wasn’t afraid of Xue Ying. Not to mention a mere Xue Ying, even if the entire Blood Fang Gang attacked him together, it would be nothing to him. After all, his true strength was a mighty figure in the nascent soul realm! However, if he took care of this guy in public, his name would spread like wildfire in the entire Fusheng City tomorrow! His wish to conceal his identity and try his best to let the three girls grow up in a peaceful environment would be completely ruined. “Nothing to say, right?” Seeing Jiang Ping’s slightly ugly expression, Xue Ying’s confidence grew even more. He thought that Jiang Ping was afraid. The fear that he had felt because he couldn’t figure out who Jiang Ping was, had gone completely. He immediately said coldly, “Since you won’t say it, then I’ll say it. What I’m saying is not only for you to hear but also for the entire Fusheng City. I want all of you to remember that anyone who dares to go against our Blood Fang Gang in Fusheng City will have an extremely miserable ending!” Jiang Ping’s gaze turned stern. Just as he was about to speak, he heard Fei Cai, who was beside him, suddenly shout sternly. “Young Lord Xue Ying, this is the Hundred Treasures House, not your Blood Fang Gang! If you want to flaunt your might, you’d better think twice before you offend someone you shouldn’t have!” “Keke!” Xue Ying suddenly laughed impudently. He looked coldly at Fei Cai and replied indifferently, “Director Fei Cai, please take a closer look.” “Now that you have left the Hundred Treasures House, strictly speaking, this is not your Hundred Treasures House, but Fusheng City!” “In Fusheng City, no one has ever dared to stop our Blood Fang Gang from doing anything!” “You!” Fei Cai was instantly infuriated, and her gaze turned cold. Allalong, the Hundred Treasures House had always maintained a neutral stance and never meddled in the struggles of the various major forces in Fusheng City. In addition to the Hundred Treasure House’s unique role, the various large factions in Fusheng City would more or less respect the Hundred Treasures House. Which of the leaders of those factions would not treat Fei Cai with respect when they saw her? When had she ever suffered such humiliation? ‘The Blood Fang Gang was truly becoming more and more arrogant. They had completely disregarded her Hundred Treasures House! Not far away. Feng Dan and Zi Yue had also been secretly observing this scene. “Yue’er, do you think this person is the person from Room 12?” Feng Dan couldn’t help but ask. “It should be him.” Zi Yue stared at Jiang Ping as if she wanted to see through him. Without turning her head, she said, “We’ve been waiting outside for so long, and only this person looks very unfamiliar.” “Besides, other than the person in Room 12, who else would Fei Cai personally send off?” “The most important thing is, look at the thing in that little girl’s hand. Isn’t it the ninth auction item that he had just snatched from Xue Ying?” “But…” Actually, Feng Dan also knew that Jiang Ping was definitely the person in Room 12 just now. There was no doubt about it. However, this overly handsome man in front of her had truly exceeded her expectations. She had originally thought that those who dared to challenge the Blood Fang Gang would most likely be seniors with extraordinary cultivation. They might even have white hair and white beards. She had never thought that he would actually be so young. He actually looked similar to her in age! Moreover, this man was exuding a calm and composed aura. She couldn’t help but feel that he was somewhat unfathomable. “Yue’er, don’t you think that this guy is a little too young?” The guy Feng Dan was talking about was naturally Jiang Ping. Zi Yue paused and asked curiously, “What’s wrong with being young?” “He’s so young. His cultivation is definitely not that high!” “So?” “ah, Yue’er, you’re such a smart person. How could you be so muddle-headed?” Feng Dan explained anxiously. “This person is so young, and he has three little girls by his side. He is definitely not a match for Xue Ying!” “So, you want to save him?” Zi Yue frowned slightly and asked. “What else? Didn’t we agree to rope him in to deal with the Blood Fang Gang together?” Feng Dan quickly said, “Isn’t this the best opportunity for us?” “As long as we save this guy and invite him personally, I don’t believe that he will reject two beauties like us!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Zi Yue suddenly felt that there was something wrong with Feng Dan. With a thought, she suddenly smiled and said, “I get it. So, you want to put on a show of a beauty saving a hero!” “Yue’er knows me well!” Feng Dan smiled with satisfaction and said, “As long as we owe him a life-saving favor, we are not afraid…” “Not afraid that he won’t give us his body?” Zi Yue suddenly interrupted. Hearing this, Feng Dan was immediately shocked. She stared at Zi Yue in a daze, and her small face gradually turned red. After a long while, she came back to her senses and directly snorted. She said angrily, “Yue’er, what nonsense are you talking about!” “What? Am I wrong?” Zi Yue originally just wanted to crack a joke. She knew that in Fusheng City, there were at least eight hundred young handsome men who proposed to Feng Dan every year. However, Feng Dan had never taken a fancy to anyone, which was why she had been single. In fact, she often used this matter to joke with Feng Dan. However, every time she made these jokes, Feng Dan would be disdained by her and ignore her. This time, Zi Yue also noticed that something was wrong with Feng Dan, so she casually made a joke. However, she didn’t expect that Feng Dan’s reaction this time was completely different from before, and her face even blushed for the first time. This also made Zi Yue suddenly suspect if Feng Dan had taken a liking to Jiang Ping. Speaking of which, this wasn’t possible, right? Zi Yue couldn’t help but look carefully at Jiang Ping again. He looked very handsome, his figure was tall and straight, and his bearing was extraordinary… It seemed that every kind of external condition was a rare excellence. But Feng Dan was not this kind of person who only looked at appearance, right! Zi Yue asked tentatively, “Dan’er, don’t tell me you have taken a liking to this guy?” “What are you talking about!” Feng Dan acted coquettishly. She wanted to fish in troubled waters but was forced to admit it because of Zi Yue’s pressing gaze. She could only hurriedly explain, “Alright, alright, don’t look at me with that scrutinizing gaze!” “Ladmit that I have a good impression of this guy. Actually, I don’t know why either. I just feel that the temperament on his body is very attractive to me. It’s very mysterious, you know?” Alright! Feng Dan was interested in this guy. It was real! Zi Yue sighed and said, “Dan’er, don’t do anything reckless!” “This is the first time you’re seeing him. You don’t even know what kind of person this guy is. I “Ah, why are you getting more and more ridiculous?” Feng Dan stomped her feet and said angrily, “I already said that I just have a good impression of him. Why would I do anything rash!” “By the way, it’s true that we should help him now. Otherwise, I think this guy will be taken care of by Xue Ying.” Zi Yue tumed her head to look. As expected, the confrontation between Xue Ying and Jiang Ping was extremely tense. “Kid, I’ll give you a chance. Kowtow to me and admit your mistake.” Xue Ying’s eyes were indifferent as he looked at Jiang Ping condescendingly. Even with Jiang Ping’s extraordinary endurance, he couldn’t help but raise his eyebrows when he heard this. If it weren’t for the fact that he didn’t want to expose his strength, he would have crushed Xue Ying to death long ago. ‘An ant in the late stage of the refinement realm dared to speak rudely in front of him. He probably didn’t know how to write the word ‘death’! “Daddy, this guy’s words are so unpleasant. Tell him to shut up!” ‘Wan’er hurriedly covered her ears and said loudly with an aggrieved expression. Before Jiang Ping could answer, Xue Ying sneered, “These are all your daughters, right?” “Very good. I’ll ask you again. Do you want to kowtow to me and admit your mistake? If you refuse, I’m afraid I can only let these cute little girls…” Before he could finish his words, he suddenly felt his whole body tremble, as if he was being targeted by an extremely dangerous beast. ‘That feeling felt like if he dared to say another word, he would be torn into pieces immediately, leaving no bones behind! Xue Ying was immediately frightened by this feeling. He could not help but break out in cold sweat. He could not help but feel suspicious. What was going on? Why did I suddenly have this feeling of danger? Who gave me this feeling? Could it be this guy? He looked at Jiang Ping with a complicated expression, but coincidentally met Jiang Ping’s cold gaze. His entire person instantly felt as if he had fallen into an ice cave. A chill rose from the bottom of his feet and completely drowned him in an instant. “You, you actually…” Xue Ying stuttered. He didn’t know why Jiang Ping would give him such a feeling. But he understood that he had to overcome this feeling. However, this feeling lingered around him all the time. How could he know that Jiang Ping was actually a nascent soul realm expert! At Jiang Ping’s level, although he was still unable to use his thoughts to kill people, a single glance was enough to put great pressure on an origin core realm expert like him. Not to mention him, even his father, the leader of the Blood Fang Gang, could only prostrate under this kind of pressure! Previously, Jiang Ping didn’t deal with Xue Ying because he didn’t want to stir up a pile of trouble. But if Xue Ying wanted to badmouth about his three girls, then Jiang Ping would be merciless! He would not allow anyone to harm his precious daughters, even verbally! “Young lord of the Blood Fang Gang, Xue Ying, right?” Jiang Ping said coldly. “Ladvise you to try your best to watch your mouth and not go around stirring up trouble. Otherwise, you might get into trouble with your mouth.” ‘As soon as he finished speaking, in an instant, a fierce aura charged straight at Xue Ying! He felt that under the impact of this aura, he was like a small boat in a stormy sea with nowhere to rely on. He was in danger of being destroyed at any time! His entire body could not help but tremble. However, the others did not feel this aura at all. In their eyes, Xue Ying seemed to have suddenly become ill. His entire body trembled non-stop! Fei Cai frowned and could not help but ask sternly, “Xue Ying, what are you trying to do? I advise you to leave now. Otherwise, I won’t hold back!” ‘These words instantly made Xue Ying sober up quite a bit. He gritted his teeth, and his eyes were wide open. He forcefully endured the oppressive aura. Originally, he had a pained expression on his face, but it looked like he wanted to swallow Jiang Ping up. Just as Fei Cai thought he was going to make a move. Suddenly, a clear and melodious cry came from not far away. “Xue Ying, what are you trying to do!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Two figures, one red and one purple, suddenly appeared in front of Jiang Ping. Before Jiang Ping could take a closer look, the red figure took a step towards Xue Ying and shouted, “Xue Ying, what are you trying to do?” “The highest bidder always wins the auction. You can’t afford such a high price, and now you want to block the way and rob?” Feng Dan pressed her hands on her waist and snorted contemptuously. She continued, “The Blood Fang Gang is indeed a group of shameless people!” “You usually oppressed people, and I have long disliked you. Since I bump into you today, I will definitely teach you a good lesson!” Feng Dan’s cold but very pleasant voice echoed in the surroundings. “Daddy, who is this auntie?” Liu’er suddenly tugged at the corner of Jiang Ping’s clothes and asked in a low voice. “Uh…” Jiang Ping was suddenly at a loss for words. How would he know who this woman who immediately scolded Xue Ying was? He could only send a pleading look to Fei Cai who was beside him. Fei Cai immediately understood, she hurriedly explained in a low voice, “This red-clothed lady who is cursing is the Golden Door Sect’s sect master’s daughter, Feng Dan. As for the purple-clothed lady beside her, she is the daughter of the mayor from the mayor’s mansion, Zi Yue.” “The two of them should have been in Room 3.” Hearing this, Liver didn’t have any reaction, but Jiang Ping couldn’t help but pause. He had been in Fusheng City for almost half a month, so he naturally had some understanding of the various major forces in Fusheng City. The mayor’s mansion was a well-deserved overlord force, but it had become much quieter in recent years. Next was the Blood Fang Gang, the Golden Door Sect, and the Open City Sect. Among them, the Open City Sect was unusually low-key and rarely appeared in public. Therefore, the two most popular factions were the Blood Fang Gang and the Golden Door Sect. Unexpectedly, not only the Blood Fang Gang but the people from Golden Door Sect and the mayor’s mansion had appeared. Moreover, according to Fei Cai, their appearance should not have been a coincidence. They had been waiting for him on purpose! Sigh, if he had known earlier, he would have just slipped away after obtaining that item. How could there be so much trouble now? “Feng Dan, I didn’t expect that the person from Golden Door Sect would be you!” When Xue Ying saw Feng Dan, his eyes couldn’t help but flash with an ominous glint. In the next moment, his gaze swept past Feng Dan and landed on Zi Yue who was behind her. The ominous glint instantly turned into a ray of greed as he laughed sinisterly. “And the daughter of our mayor, Miss Zi Yue, has also come!” His gaze immediately made Zi Yue feel uncomfortable. Her black brows could not help but furrow. Just as she was about to speak, Feng Dan blocked her from his view. She sternly said to Xue Ying, “Take back that disgusting gaze of yours!” “Tm telling you since you’ve bumped into me today. Your doomsday has arrived!” “Ladvise you to quickly surrender. Otherwise, I won’t be polite!” Looking at Feng Dan’s “aggressive” look, Jiang Ping could not help but shake his head indifferently. The girl was not rude at all. She was obviously putting on a show! With his sharp senses, he could naturally tell that Zi Yue and Feng Dan were both in the middle stage of the refinement realm! In fact, they were already considered geniuses to have such a cultivation at their age, but in the end, they were still not as good as Xue Ying. But don’t underestimate this slight gap. Jiang Ping could clearly sense that if the two ladies in front of him really fought with Xue Ying, they would definitely be completely defeated in less than thirty rounds! “Feng Dan, do you really think that a middle-stage refinement realm cultivator like you can be my opponent?” Xue Ying stared at Feng Dan and said in an extremely cold tone. “Do you think that you’re so great just because your realm is higher than mine?” Feng Dan was very unhappy with Xue Ying’s tone, and she said angrily, “Not to mention that you’re only a small realm higher than me, even if you’re a big realm higher than me, you might not be my opponent!” “How can the cultivation techniques and martial techniques of our Golden Door Sect be compared to a mere Blood Fang Gang?” Hearing Feng Dan’s incessant confrontation with Xue Ying, Zi Yue could not help but feel a headache coming on. This girl was good at everything, but she liked to boast and was absolutely unwilling to let others win. That wasn’t enough. If the opponent was Xue Ying, then she really could not give in the slightest! “Daddy, this auntie is so talkative!” Wan’er was a little impatient, and she stared with her big innocent eyes as she ridiculed. “Does she want to fight with that guy who talks badly? Then just fight him directly. Why does she have to talk so much nonsense? If I want to fight with someone, I will just fight him directly. I won’t talk so much!” Jiang Ping couldn’t help but be stunned. How should he explain this situation to his precious daughter? He couldn’t say that Feng Dan was bluffing. No matter what, she was helping him out! He hesitated for a moment before slowly saying, “Wan’er, do you still remember what daddy told you? Daddy said…” “Lremember, I remember!” Before he could say anything, Wan’er cried out excitedly, as if she was taking credit. “Daddy said that a dog that barks won’t bite, and a dog that bites won’t bark!” Jiang Ping really wanted to tell Wan’er that what he wanted to say was to have peaceful measures and if the other party doesn’t listen, then act with force. It really wasn’t what she had just said! However, when he felt Feng Dan’s sudden murderous gaze, he consciously didn’t say anything. He could only turn to Feng Dan with a helpless and complicated smile. “Hmph!” Feng Dan snorted. She was so angry that her cheeks puffed up and she turned her head back. Actually, she had already heard what Wan’er said. There was nothing much in the beginning. Wan’er was still young and did not understand why she had said so much. She did not blame her, but the last sentence was a little hurtful. This was called a tactic, alright? It was different from what she said. It was rare to see her acting so childish. Zi Yue and Fei Cai could not help but secretly laugh in their hearts. Of course, they did not dare to laugh out loud at this time, as it would be adding fuel to the fire. Feng Dan naturally scattered this fire on Xue Ying and said fiercely, “Xue Ying, I’m warning you one last time. Your Blood Fang Gang’s crimes have long been unpardonable!” “Do you think that your Blood Fang Gang has the final say in Fusheng City? Let me tell you, that’s because you did not bump into me. Now that you have met me, I’m going to cut you open!” Before she finished speaking, she suddenly pulled out a fiery red long whip from her waist and whipped it in the air. “slap!” Immediately, a clear cracking sound erupted. Xue Ying’s gaze also completely tured cold. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Feng Dan’s actions had completely infuriated Xue Ying. He stared intently at Feng Dan. His gaze filled with danger like a wild beast that had seen its prey. “Hmph, don’t think that you can scare me like this!” Xue Ying’s threatening gaze caused Feng Dan’s heart to tremble. However, she did not dare to show the slightest bit of fear as she forced herself to speak calmly. Zi Yue seemed to have noticed Feng Dan’s slight change. She raised her eyebrows and took a step forward as well. She stood side by side with Feng Dan as she stared vigilantly at Xue Ying. Both parties were staring at each other nervously. It was as if they were about to fight if they disagreed. However, Fei Cai’s attention was not on them. She secretly glanced at Jiang Ping, wanting to see what kind of reaction Jiang Ping would have. However, she discovered that Jiang Ping was calmly watching this scene. His expression was relaxed, and there was no trace of nervousness or fear. In an instant, the image of Jiang Ping in her heart suddenly rose a few notches. Although she could not see Jiang Ping’s cultivation level and did not know what kind of background Jiang Ping had, there was only one reason why he could remain calm under such circumstances. That was because he didn’t care about Xue Ying, or rather, the Blood Fang Gang! After coming to this conclusion, a bright light flashed in her eyes. As if she had made up her mind, she suddenly took a few steps forward and stood beside Feng Dan and Zi Yue. With a cold expression, she sternly shouted at Xue Ying, “Young Lord of the Blood Fang Gang, it seems that you still haven’t given up. Could it be that you want to offend the mayor’s mansion, the Golden Door Sect, and my Hundred Treasures House at the same time?” As soon as she said this, Feng Dan and Zi Yue couldn’t help but cast a surprised look at Fei Cai. Fei Cai’s sudden action had indeed surprised them. They had never expected that she, who had always maintained a neutral stance and never offended any major factions, would actually go against the Blood Fang Gang this time. Moreover, these words had come from Fei Cai’s mouth! What kind of person was Fei Cai? Even though Feng Dan didn’t really like this sexy and charming woman, she had to admit that she was a person with outstanding means as she was smart and nimble. She was even able to handle the competition between the various large factions with ease, and she was someone who was on good terms with them. Her every action represented the attitude of the Hundred Treasures House! In the end, she had even come forward personally. Zi Yue glanced at Jiang Ping, whose expression did not change, and her heart was already in turmoil. For Fei Cai to be able to make such a decisive statement, other than this overly handsome man, she really could not think of any other possibility. She knew that Fei Cai and Jiang Ping had secretly met for at least an hour after the auction ended. Could it be that within this one hour, Fei Cai found out about Jiang Ping’s identity and background? Moreover, Jiang Ping’s identity and background were so powerful that Fei Cai didn’t hesitate to go against the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang for his sake? For a moment, Zi Yue couldn’t help but frown and pondered. She became even more curious about Jiang Ping’s identity and background. “The mayor’s mansion, the Golden Door Sect, and the Hundred Treasures Building?” Xue Ying glanced at them indifferently and said with a sinister smile, “Do you think that our Blood Fang Gang is afraid of you?” “If you want to stand up for this guy, you better be worried about getting yourself into trouble!” “Humph! How boastful!” Feng Dan placed her hands on her hips and looked at Xue Ying arrogantly. “If you’re not afraid, then don’t run away!” Although she didn’t know why the Hundred Treasures House would suddenly stand up, Feng Dan was clear about the Hundred Treasures House’s strength. If Fei Cai could really fight against Xue Ying with her, then Xue Ying would definitely lose. Therefore, her courage suddenly boosted by a lot. “Die!” Before Feng Dan’s voice fell, Xue Ying suddenly attacked. He threw out a few hidden weapons and shot them directly at Feng Dan and the other two. Feng Dan and the others’ expressions immediately changed. They originally thought that under their combined pressure, even if they didn’t teach Xue Ying a lesson today, it would at least scare him that he wouldn’t dare to make a move. However, the result was out of their expectations. Not only did Xue Ying not retreat, but he also even made a bold move, catching them off guard. However, these three people were not weak either. After a moment of shock, they immediately reacted and dodged the hidden weapons at the same time. However, before they could catch their breath, Xue Ying shot straight towards Feng Dan like an arrow. “Be careful!” Fei Cai and Zi Yue were shocked and shouted in unison. At the same time, they rushed towards Feng Dan, trying to save her from the attack range of Xue Ying. However, in this split second, the distance that was not long was as far as a natural moat. “Go to hell!” ‘The comer of Xue Ying’s mouth curled into a cold smile. He looked at Feng Dan calmly as if he was looking at a corpse. By attacking one by one, Xue Ying knew that this was the only way for him to tum defeat into victory. Therefore, the moment he made his move, he attacked Feng Dan with lightning speed! “Oh no, I was careless!” Seeing Xue Ying’s figure continuously enlarging in her eyes, Feng Dan suddenly felt her body relaxing. The thought of death flashed through her mind. Xue Ying’s speed was so fast that she could not dodge it at all. However, just as Feng Dan felt that she could not muster the strength to resist and was prepared to die regretfully. “Whoosh!” An invisible air current suddenly surged towards Xue Ying. “This is bad!” Xue Ying’s pupils suddenly widened. A sense of fatal danger instantly swept through his entire body. He could not see the source of this sense of danger, but he could clearly sense that if he dodged it again, he might be turned into a corpse in the next second! It was too late, and it was too fast. Xue Ying suddenly changed the move in his hand and condensed a thick true Qi shield in front of his chest. At the same time, he dodged to the side. “Plop!” However, he was still too late. Although the invisible airflow did not hit Xue Ying’s body firmly. It still brushed past him. In an instant, Xue Ying felt the insides of his body were in a mess. His Qi and blood surged up, and fresh blood rushed to his throat. He could not help but spit it out. His entire body fell to the ground like a kite with a broken string. This sudden change made everyone’s body freeze, and their faces were filled with astonishment. This… what was going on? 1 This question appeared in the minds of Feng Dan and the other two ladies.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio The sudden tum of events stunned everyone. Xue Ying lay half-dead on the ground, looking frighteningly terrifying. The two Blood Fang Gang members turned pale with fright and hurriedly rushed over to help Xue Ying up from the ground. They asked anxiously, “My lord, what happened to you?” Originally, Fang Shen was also following Xue Ying. However, in order to obtain the high-grade spirit stone from the auction, Xue Ying had no choice but to deliberately conceal the relationship between the Blood Fang Gang and the Fang family. Therefore, after the auction ended, Xue Ying let Fang Shen leave first, leaving only the two attendants by his side. At this moment, seeing that Xue Ying had been beaten unconscious, the two people seemed to have lost their backbone. They were so anxious that they were spinning in circles. As they anxiously called out, Xue Ying slowly opened his eyes. The two attendants were instantly overjoyed as they excitedly called out, “My lord, how are you?” “Go!” Xue Ying crisply spat out a word. He could clearly feel the current condition of his body. Even saying that he was unable to move was considered not enough. This could be said to be the heaviest injury he had ever suffered. The bones in his entire body felt like it was about to fall apart, and extreme pain could be felt from his skin and flesh. Although he still did not understand what exactly was going on with that invisible air current that was attacking him just now. However, he could be sure that this was the work of an expert. Moreover, the cultivation of the person who attacked him was probably not weaker than his father’s cultivation! Right now, he was seriously injured and on the verge of death. It was even challenging for him to speak. Feng Dan and the others across from him were eager to take his life. Right now, there were only two tempering realm attendants by his side. If he didn’t leave now, he would definitely die here today! ‘When the two attendants heard the young lord’s orders, they didn’t dare to delay at all. They hurriedly picked up Xue Ying and were about to leave. Only then did Feng Dan come back to her senses. She hurriedly stopped them and said sternly, “Stop, who allowed you to leave!” Even a fool could see that Xue Ying’s current condition was terrible! Although she did not know what was going on, why Xue Ying, who was about to destroy Feng Dan, suddenly lay on the ground like a dead dog. But she knew that this was definitely the best opportunity to beat up a drowning dog! How could she let Xue Ying leave so easily? “Xue Ying, you have done many evil things in the past. Today, your retribution has finally come!” Although Feng Dan’s face still had a trace of fear and paleness, however, she did not cower as she shouted, “Today, I will execute justice on behalf of the heavens and exterminate you, the devil who has committed all kinds of evil deeds!” Before she finished her words, she was about to make a move. Xue Ying’s heart suddenly trembled. He forcefully endured the fatal pain that came from his body. With a ferocious expression, he said with difficulty, “Feng Dan, have you thought it through? Are you really going to kill me?” “Tam the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang, If you kill me, the Blood Fang Gang and the Golden Door Sect will immediately start a war!” “IE we start a war, so be it. I have long wished that I could kill all the people of your Blood Fang Gang!” Feng Dan shouted without giving in. “Then aren’t you afraid that the Golden Door Sect will be defeated? When that time comes… cough cough!” Xue Ying had only spoken halfway when he could not help but cough violently again. “Humph, you still dare to threaten me at this time? Die!” Feng Dan’s long whip was like a scarlet flame in the air as it suddenly swept towards Xue Ying and the other two. The two attendants immediately turned pale with fright. They hurriedly circulated their true qi and released a thin layer of true Qi shield. However, they were only in the tempering realm after all. Although they could release their true Qi, the true Qi shield they released was very fragile. The moment the whip fell, the shield shattered. Xue Ying and his two attendants were sent flying for a long distance! “Oh!” Wan’er couldn’t help but cry out in surprise when she saw this scene. She pulled Jiang Ping excitedly and shouted, “Daddy, the auntie in red is so powerful! I want a whip too!” “Talso want to send all those bad guys flying with a whoosh!” Jiang Ping was stunned and smiled helplessly. “Wan’er, you haven’t leamed to use a whip. How can you whip people away?” “Idon’t care. I just want a whip!” Wan’er hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh again and begged in a coquettish tone, “Daddy, I will start learning the whip tomorrow. Please buy me a whip, okay?” “sigh!” Jiang Ping sighed helplessly. Who could refuse a little girl that clung to you and acted coquettishly and was so cute? He didn’t know if it was because of Wan’er’s personality, but as long as she saw something that could be used for fighting, she would be very interested. One example was a dart. Even though it wasn’t fum at all, among the three girls, she was the one who loved it the most. And now she wants to play with a whip. But how could a whip be so easy to learn? Jiang Ping felt that he had to force Wan’er to train more. It wasn’t good to always be like this, wanting to learn whatever she saw. It was the Ancient divine physique, so he had to train her body more. A punch could break ten thousand techniques. What kind of weapon did he even need? “Puff!” On the other side, Xue Ying that was sent flying by Feng Dan spat out another mouthful of blood. He stared at Feng Dan, his eyes filled with hatred. “What are you looking at? You’re struggling with your last breath!” Feng Dan raised her eyebrows and shouted unhappily. Xue Ying wanted to kill Feng Dan immediately, but his anger was suppressed by the fear of death in the end. He said angrily, “You took advantage of my situation, yet you are so shameless to say that you’re enforcing justice on behalf of Heaven?” “You!” Feng Dan was furious. She immediately wanted to refute him, but she realized that he did not seem to be wrong. If it was not for the incident just now, then the one lying on the ground right now would not be Xue Ying, but her. Therefore, even if she killed Xue Ying now, it would not be considered her credit. On the contrary, people might even say that she hit someone who was injured! Fora moment, she actually did not know what to do and was stunned on the spot. “If you really want to enforce justice on behalf of Heaven, wait until my injury recovers. Then we can have a fair fight!” Xue Ying could see Feng Dan’s hesitation and said quickly. He had to strike while the iron was hot. “Okay!” Feng Dan agreed without hesitation, “I will let you go today. When your injury recovers, we will fight fair and square to determine who is better. We will also decide on our life and death!” Seeing this scene, Zi Yue immediately sighed helplessly. In fact, when Xue Ying spoke just now, she had already realized that something was wrong. She had wanted to warn Feng Dan not to fall for Xue Ying’s trick, but she was still a step too late. Feng Dan had already agreed before she could even speak. This was clearly a delaying tactic. A normal person would be able to see it. Feng Dan could naturally see through it, but her falling into the trap did not go too far beyond Zi Yue’s expectations. Because Feng Dan had always been a resolute and decisive person. She was open and aboveboard and disdained taking advantage of others’ difficulties. Even though she knew that Xue Ying’s crime was unforgivable and deserved to die, she was not a match for Xue Ying. But she still wanted to rely on her own strength to defeat Xue Ying… <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Upon hearing Feng Dan’s words, Xue Ying did not say another word. He hurriedly called for the two attendants who were rolling on the ground in pain to come over. The three of them supported each other as they fled the scene in a sorry state. Before they left, Xue Ying glared at Jiang Ping. However, he did not dare to say a single word. He was afraid that Feng Dan would suddenly go back on her word and attack. If that happened, he would really lose his life. “It seems that he really won’t repent until he dies.” Jiang Ping naturally read the threat contained in Xue Ying’s expression just now. However, he didn’t take it to heart and only laughed lightly. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, remember this. When you fight with bad people, you must not be merciful.” Jiang Ping lectured the three little girls with a serious face and continued, “Do you still remember what daddy told you? Wildfires cannot be burned out, and it grows again when the breeze blows. You must know that if you didn’t kill the snake when you hit it, you will be bitten by it instead.” “We will remember!” The three little girls answered in unison with a serious look on their faces. “Daddy meant that the auntie in red shouldn’t have let that bad guy go, right?” Wan’er seemed to be taking credit and said excitedly, “If it was me, I definitely wouldn’t have let that bad guy go!” As soon as she said that, before Jiang Ping could answer, a clear voice filled with slight anger sounded in his ear. “What do you mean?” Jiang Ping turned his head and saw Feng Dan staring at him with her hands on her hips. “What do you mean by that?” Jiang Ping was confused. Feng Dan snorted, turned her head, and said angrily, “What do I mean? You’re badmouthing about me!” “When did I badmouth about you?” “The meaning of your words is clearly meant that I shouldn’t have let Xue Ying escape!” Feng Dan said indignantly, “I saved you. It’s fine if you’re not grateful, but you are still badmouthing about me!” She was really a little angry. She just wanted to defeat Xue Ying fair and aboveboard, how was that softhearted? Moreover, forget that he had said it, but he even taught the three little girls seriously, then wouldn’t she become a negative example in the hearts of these three little girls? She, Feng Dan, had always been a role model in the eyes of others. When had she ever been wronged like this? The more Feng Dan thought about it, the angrier she got. She pursed her lips and said angrily, “I don’t care. You must apologize to me!” “Is there something wrong with your brain?” Jiang Ping rolled his eyes at her. He didn’t even bother to say anything. He directly held the hands of the three little girls and said gently, “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liver, let’s go home!” He didn’t take Feng Dan’s words to heart at all, nor did he correct Feng Dan’s wrong words. In fact, Feng Dan wasn’t the one who saved him, but he was the one who saved Feng Dan! If he hadn’t acted in time just now, Feng Dan would have become a corpse by now. In fact, in Jiang Ping’s eyes, Feng Dan really shouldn’t have let Xue Ying go. Not only because of what Xue Ying did to him, but also because Jiang Ping knew that a person like Xue Ying was an evil person that could never be changed. Although Jiang Ping wasn’t a great person and wasn’t afraid of an ant-like Xue Ying, he wasn’t afraid of thieves stealing, but he was afraid of being remembered by thieves. He didn’t want to be constantly targeted by a sinister and ruthless villain. Therefore, after he saw Feng Dan let go of Xue Ying, he felt that he should take the opportunity to teach his three little girls a lesson. Incase they made the same mistake in the future, they would regret it endlessly. Of course, Feng Dan let go of Xue Ying, but Jiang Ping did not show mercy. He secretly left a hidden force on Xue Ying’s body. In less than three days, Xue Ying would explode and die! At that time, no one would notice him, and no one would bother him. From this point of view, Jiang Ping really had to thank Feng Dan and the others for showing up in time to divert the attention away from him. Otherwise, he really didn’t know how he should take care of Xue Ying without exposing himself. However, how would Feng Dan know this? Seeing that Jiang Ping was about to leave, she hurriedly moved to block in front of Jiang Ping. While pouting, she said with a bitter expression, “Stop, I haven’t finished speaking. You can’t leave!” Seeing her fierce appearance, Liu’er hurriedly hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh and said while shivering, “Daddy, this auntie is so fierce. I’m afraid!” “Be good, Liver, don’t be afraid!” Jiang Ping quickly held Liu’er in his arms and comforted her gently, “Liver, don’t be afraid. This auntie is not a bad person.” “ah!” Feng Dan almost went berserk. Auntie? Was there something wrong with her ears? This little girl actually called her an auntie? For god’s sake, with her age, no one would suspect her even if she were her elder sister, okay? She immediately said to Jiang Ping in annoyance, “Hey, why is your daughter calling me that? With my age, I’m considered young that I could even be her elder sister. Since when did I become an auntie?” Then, she pretended to scare a child and angrily said to Liver, “Little girl, I am an elder sister, not an auntie. If you call me by mistake again, I will spank you!” “Come, call me elder sister first!” Liver shrunk her neck and stared at Feng Dan with a little fear. Under Feng Dan’s expectant gaze, she slowly spat out two words, “Auntie.” Boom! Feng Dan felt that she was about to explode from anger. Little girl, you are not sensible at all. So you want to be spanked, right? Liver seemed to feel that this auntie was becoming more and more terrifying. She quickly pointed at Wan’er and Yan’er and said, “They are the elder sisters. Wan’er is the eldest sister, Yan‘er is the second sister!” “Little girl, you!” Although Feng Dan was still choked to the point of being unable to speak, her anger had dissipated quite a bit. There was nothing she could do. When she saw Liu’er’s pitiful and frightened appearance, she really could not throw a tantrum. More importantly, she looked at Wan’er and Yan’er again. Good heavens, they were both five or six-year-old little girls. The gap between her and them seemed to be quite big! “Okay Dan’er, you are old enough. Why are you still angry at a child’s words?” Zi Yue also came forward at this time and patted Feng Dan on the back as she consoled her. Actually, she was feeling overjoyed in her heart! It was really not easy to watch Feng Dan suffer! After consoling Feng Dan half-jokingly, Zi Yue looked at Jiang Ping again. Only until now was she able to observe this man up close. It had to be said that Jiang Ping’s handsome appearance and unique temperament surprised her greatly. She politely extended her fair hands and took the initiative to introduce herself to Jiang Ping, “Zi Yue.” But before Jiang Ping could reply, Liv’er’s words instantly broke her defenses. “Daddy, this auntie’s name Zi Yue? It sounds great!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Seeing Zi Yue’s speechless expression, Fei Cai could not help but laugh out loud. Previously, she had been called an auntie by these three little girls, so it was needless to say how furious she was. After all, time was a beautiful woman’s greatest enemy. The more beautiful a woman was, the more she would be afraid of the traces of time. However, when she saw Zi Yue and Feng Dan being called aunties, the anger in her heart disappeared instantly. She knew that Feng Dan and Zi Yue were four or five years younger than her. Since they were even called aunties, she didn’t have anything to be angry about! In an instant, she felt much more relaxed! Zi Yue and Feng Dan finally came back to their senses. ‘The two of them glared at Fei Cai with threatening eyes. Feng Dan even said in a low voice, “Hmph, you vixen, how dare you laugh at me!” Seeing this, Fei Cai quickly put on an act and shut her mouth, but there was still a playful smiling expression in her eyes. In fact, she didn’t have much interaction with Zi Yue and Feng Dan, but they admired each other’s character and ability. Hence, their relationship was actually quite close. ‘That was why Fei Cai laughed so impudently. If it was someone she wasn’t familiar with, Fei Cai would definitely hold it in even if she wanted to laugh. She could even pretend as if nothing had happened so she wouldn’t appear rude. Feng Dan and Zi Yue were one of the very few friends that could make her feel relaxed and didn’t need to keep up with a pretense. Jiang Ping also noticed that their relationship seemed to be a little special. However, he was not interested in prying into other people’s privacy. Seeing that Zi Yue’s hand was still hanging in the air, he frowned and did not hold Zi Yue’s hand. He only replied indifferently, “Jiang Ping,” Zi Yue suddenly felt awkward. She pulled her hand back and smoothed out the hair beside her ear. She pretended as if nothing had happened and said, “So it’s Young Master Jiang.” The trace of redness on her face could still be seen from her awkwardness just now. However, she still smiled lightly and said, “Young Master Jiang, you bid five middle-grade spirit stones in one go. You are indeed imposing. I admire you.” Jiang Ping shook his head and said calmly, “I don’t deserve it. Just five middle-grade spirit stones are not worth mentioning.” Five middle-grade spirit stones? ‘That was not worth mentioning? Feng Dan could not help but curse in her heart when she heard Jiang Ping’s words. Not to mention her, even her father, the sect master of the Golden Door Sect, had to hesitate for a long time to take out five middle-grade spirit stones. In the end, five middle-grade spirit stones were not even worth mentioning in Jiang Ping’s mouth. “This guy looks quite decent. I didn’t expect him to be so fond of bragging! Tsk!” Zi Yue was also stunned by Jiang Ping’s words for quite a while. She stared at Jiang Ping with a complicated gaze, but she couldn’t see any unnatural feeling from him. She couldn’t help but be surprised. Could it be that five middle-grade spirit stones were really not worth mentioning to him? Zi Yue couldn’t help but ask curiously, “May I ask where Young Master Jiang is from? I have never seen you in Fusheng City.” As the daughter of the mayor’s mansion, she was very well-informed. However, even so, she couldn’t think of any big force with the surname Jiang in Fusheng City. Therefore, she could conclude that Jiang Ping must be an outsider. “Lam indeed not from Fusheng City. I just moved to Fusheng City a few days ago,” Jiang Ping said without changing his expression. There was no need to hide such a thing, and it was impossible to hide it. If the lie was seen through by others, it would backfire. Therefore, Jiang Ping admitted this matter openly. Hearing that Jiang Ping avoided the important matters and didn’t answer her question, Zi Yue continued to ask, “May I ask which sect Young Master Jiang comes from? Since you are so generous, you must have a strong background, right?” “I don’t belong to any sect, nor do I have a strong background. I’m just a small landlord in the mortal world.” Jiang Ping waved his hand. He didn’t want to delay any longer to avoid being remembered. He said, “My three girls are tired after a day of shopping. I’ll take them back first. Let’s meet again another day.” “Young Master Jiang, I…” Zi Yue wanted to say more, but when she saw the tired look on the three little girls’ faces, she couldn’t bear to force Jiang Ping to stay. At this moment, Wan’er, who was holding the auction item with both hands, suddenly staggered, and a delicate and translucent stone that was emitting a light green light fell out of her clothes. This was a low-grade spirit stone? Zi Yue, Feng Dan, and Fei Cai were all stunned. Low-grade spirit stones were naturally nothing in their eyes. But this low-grade spirit stone was dropped from a little girl! Which faction would place a spirit stone in the hands of a five or six-year-old child who was not very sensible? Unless this person was a fool or was rich enough to treat a spirit stone as a toy for a child! It could be said that a low-grade spirit stone that was dropped from Wan’er’s body gave them a shock that was not any lesser than Jiang Ping’s five middle-grade spirit stones! Feng Dan instantly became anxious. She directly flashed in front of Jiang Ping and blurted out, “Wait a minute!” In an instant, Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows and looked at Feng Dan impatiently. “You, don’t look at me like that!” Feng Dan suddenly felt as if she had fallen into an ice cave. She couldn’t figure out why. Why didn’t she feel the slightest bit of fear when Xue Ying stared at her so fiercely? But when Jiang Ping looked at her impatiently, she suddenly felt a chill run down her spine. She stuttered, “I don’t have any other intentions. I just want to get to know you.” “Get to know me?” Jiang Ping snorted lightly and said, “Get to the point!” His tone instantly infuriated Feng Dan again. Come on, she clearly didn’t have any bad intentions. Why did he have to be so fierce! Feng Dan took a deep breath and said everything that she wanted. “I want to discuss with you whether or not you want to cooperate with us to deal with the Blood Fang Gang’s guys!” “You’ve experienced it yourself just now. The members of the Blood Fang Gang are so shameless and cruel.” “The young lord of the Blood Fang Gang couldn’t beat you at the auction, so he came up with such a scheme to rob you. If Yue’er and I hadn’t shown up in time, I’m afraid that you would have been beaten badly by him by now!” “Therefore, if you want to take revenge, you can join us to deal with the Blood Fang Gang together.” “Lknow that you might be rich that even your child has spirit stones on her, but if the Blood Fang Gang finds out about this, they won’t be afraid. They will only plot against you even more!” “Therefore, if you have just moved to Fusheng City and want to protect yourself, you’d better join us..” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Before Feng Dan could finish her sentence, Fei Cai suddenly interrupted her. “Don’t forget, I’m still here!” She was referring to the fact that she had helped Jiang Ping and stopped Xue Ying from attacking. Although she knew that her actions didn’t seem to have changed anything, it was still her own intention! She had to remind Jiang Ping about what she had done for him so that he would remember. That way, she would be able to gain Jiang Ping’s favor faster! Feng Dan’s words were interrupted, and she immediately glared at Fei Cai with dissatisfaction. However, she still said, “Of course, Fei Cai had contributed a lot that we were able to take care of Xue Ying so easily today.” “although I don’t know why Xue Ying suddenly looked like he was seriously injured,” she added. Then, she continued, “However, if you don’t uproot the Blood Fang Gang, they might keep an eye on you forever. You might not be so lucky next time!” Jiang Ping finally understood the intention of Feng Dan and Zi Yue. It seemed that they wanted to rope him in and help them deal with the Blood Fang Gang together! He was going to reject them without second thoughts! Back then, the reason why Jiang Ping had lived in seclusion in Xiaoyu Town and moved to Fusheng City from Xiaoyu Town was because of the same purpose, wasn’t it? It was so that he could avoid the fights and struggles in the cultivation world and give the three little girls a peaceful environment to grow up in! Now, if he got involved in the fight between these forces, he would never have a peaceful life in the future! Therefore, Jiang Ping rejected without hesitation, “I’m sorry, but I refuse!” He paused and slowly said under Feng Dan and the others’ astonished gazes, “I’m just an ordinary person. I have nothing to do with you people in the cultivation world, and I don’t want to get involved in the grudges between you.” “But you’ve already offended the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang. Do you think he’ll let you off so easily?” Feng Dan couldn’t help but interrupt. Hearing this, Jiang Ping smiled and said in an unquestionable tone, “I believe that he won’t.” Nonsense. Xue Ying had already been hit by his hidden force, and now he couldn’t even get out of bed. He might not even live for three days. Even if he didn’t want to let him off, he didn’t have the ability! Hearing this, Feng Dan was instantly stunned. She didn’t know why Jiang Ping would say this with such confidence. However, she still couldn’t help but say, “Don’t think that Xue Ying is a good person. When he makes a move, saying that he’s cruel and merciless will not be enough. Or rather, he’s extremely brutal!” “Ladvise you not to be careless. As long as you help us eliminate the Blood Fang Gang, you can live in peace in Fusheng City in the future.” “Why do you think I have the ability to help you get rid of the Blood Fang Gang?” Jiang Ping suddenly interrupted Feng Dan and asked. Feng Dan was speechless. Yes, why? She suddenly realized this problem. Until now, she still couldn’t figure out Jiang Ping’s cultivation level. But he looked so young. No matter how high his cultivation level was, he was at most in the refinement realm. Could a refinement realm have any effect on the overall situation? Or was it because of his identity and background? However, they still didn’t know Jiang Ping’s identity and background. Logically speaking, for him to be able to take out five middle-grade spirit stones, and for his five or six-year-old daughter to carry low-grade spirit stones with her, he must have a strong background. But for such a person to not have a bodyguard by his side and only bring along a few little girls, this wouldn’t be too reasonable. Taking advantage of her hesitation, Jiang Ping smiled again and said, “How is it? You don’t even know it yourself, right? Actually, you just thought that since I could take out five middle-grade spirit stones, so you guessed that I must be from some big clan, right?” “Actually, I’m really just a small landlord. If you don’t believe me, you can ask these three girls. These three little girls can’t be lying, right?” Hearing this, joy flashed in the eyes of Feng Dan and the other two ladies. Yes, how could they forget that they could start with these three cute little lolis! After all, these three little girls weren’t sensible yet. Naturally, they would say whatever they saw. Zi Yue immediately squatted down and narrowed her eyes. She asked Wan’er, “Little girl, where do you live?” “Home is home. Home is at home,” Wan’er said helplessly as she widened her innocent big eyes. In her mind, Fusheng City was really too big. It was so big that she did not know where it stops. She only knew that home was at home. She did not know anything else. After failing to strike, Zi Yue asked again, “Then who else is in Wan’er’s home?” “There’s Daddy, Auntie, and Grandpa Zhong…” Wan’er counted with her fingers one by one. Each time she counted, Zi Yue and the others looked even more confused. Because from the way Wan’er addressed them, many of them should be servants. Other than Daddy, Auntie, and Grandpa Zhong. Could it be that it was really not a big faction? After all, there were at least 800 people in many big factions. Just like the Golden Door Sect, there were more than 1,200 people! Of course, many of them were peripheral members. Even Feng Dan might not know their names. “Wan’er, how many of these stones do you have?” Zi Yue was still unwilling to give up. She pointed at the low-grade spirit stone in Wan’er’s hand and asked. ‘Wan’er was stunned for a moment and replied, “This one? Wan’er only has one.” Zi Yue and Feng Dan were really starting to waver at this time. From Wan’er’s description, they could feel that Jiang Ping really didn’t seem to come from any big factions. Could it be that they had really guessed wrongly? “Alright, I’ve already said that you’ve misunderstood.” Jiang Ping saw the conflicted expressions on Feng Dan and Zi Yue’s faces. He quickly struck while the iron was hot and said, “Now do you believe me? I’m just an ordinary person.” “Laccidentally obtained a few stones, and in the end, I managed to bid something. Now, only the low-grade spirit stones in the hands of these three girls are left.” “So, I also don’t want to get involved in the grudges between you and the Blood Fang Gang. I’ll take my leave now!” After saying this, he left with the three girls without looking back. Before turning around, he even cast a glance at Fei Cai. Zi Yue and Feng Dan were still wondering if they had guessed wrongly. Jiang Ping was just an ordinary mortal, so how could he have noticed the small movements between Jiang Ping and Fei Cai?1 It was not until Fei Cai’s giggle was heard that Feng Dan said in a bad mood, “Vixen, what are you laughing at?” “Tm not laughing, did you hear wrong?” Fei Cai lied through her teeth, and her face did not tum red, nor did her heartbeat increase. She wouldn’t tell these two girls that Jiang Ping didn’t just have middle-grade and low-grade spirit stones, he also had high-grade spirit stones! High-grade spirit stones? Was that something that an ordinary person could obtain? It was impossible! Therefore, she didn’t take Jiang Ping’s words seriously at all. The look in Jiang Ping’s eyes before he left was also telling her that she must not tell anyone about this matter. Otherwise, these two girls would definitely realize that he was lying! Thinking about it carefully, they had just met for the first time, and they already had a little secret in common.. She was quite happy! <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio On the way back. ‘The events of the past two days flashed through Jiang Ping’s mind one by one, and he couldn’t help but start to worry. He originally thought that after moving out of Xiaoyu Town, he would be able to maintain a period of peace. At the very least, he shouldn’t be involved with the cultivators for a short period of time. But he didn’t expect that the truth was completely out of his expectations. Fusheng City was indeed worthy of being called Fusheng City. It was rare to see tempering realms in Xiaoyu Town, but in Fusheng City, those at that realm could only be servants for those first-rate and second-rate forces. ‘There were only a few refinement realms in the entire Fusheng City. Although there were not many of them in Fusheng City, there were still quite a few of them. More importantly, in Fusheng City, these cultivation forces had a very strong influence on the mortal world! It could even be said that the operation of the entire city was actually in the balance of the forces. But this balance was actually very fragile. Among the cultivation forces, the slightest conflict could turn into a crisis that could affect the entire city! Today, Jiang Ping had preliminary contact with several major forces in Fusheng City. From Xue Ying’s actions, he could tell that the Blood Fang Gang indeed had the ambition to annex other factions and unify the entire Fusheng City. Moreover, it could be said that the Blood Fang Gang already had the strength to do so. This could be inferred from the people’s reverence for Xue Ying in the auction house today, as well as the fact that Xue Ying did not respect the Golden Door Sect or even the mayor’s mansion. If the Blood Fang Gang started to show their teeth, Fusheng City would definitely become a chaotic city! Thinking of this, Jiang Ping couldn’t help but frown deeply. Could it be that they had just moved to Fusheng City and were about to leave again? “Daddy, what are you thinking about?” Liu’er, who was in Jiang Ping’s arms, also felt her father’s unhappiness. As she asked curiously, she used two fingers to caress Jiang Ping’s brows. Jiang Ping was instantly amused by Liver’s action. His daughter was still the most thoughtful! Seeing her father frowning, she knew to help her father ease his mood. Jiang Ping smiled and said gently, “Daddy is thinking that Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er haven’t gone to school for a long time, right?” “Have you forgotten all the things that the teacher had taught you? How could that be okay?” “That’s why daddy has already found a school for Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liv’er. In a few days, you can go to the school to learn new knowledge and make new friends. How about it? Are you happy?” “ah!” ‘The three girls’ expressions formed a sharp contrast with Jiang Ping’s. “No, I don’t want to go to school!” Wan’er hurriedly waved her small hands and protested anxiously. Yan’er also quickly shook her head and expressed her refusal. “I’ve already learned all the knowledge in school. I don’t want to go to school either!” “Daddy, I don’t want to go to school. I don’t want to leave daddy!” Liv’er directly hugged Jiang Ping’s neck and acted cutely. “Sigh!” Looking at the three little girls’ appearance, Jiang Ping could only smile bitterly. It couldn’t be helped. Now that the three girls had gone wild, they definitely wouldn’t be willing to go to school. However, it was so chaotic outside, Jiang Ping didn’t dare to let the three girls run around crazily. Ifhe accidentally got into trouble, it would be really troublesome! On the other side, in the Hundred Treasures House. Fei Cai, Feng Dan, and Zi Yue, the three peerless beauties who each had their own merits, were sitting together. “vixen, what did you talk about with that Jiang guy just now?” Feng Dan asked casually. Fei Cai had long been immune to this title, but she still rolled her eyes at her and said, “What can we talk about? I just asked for his name, where he came from, and where he was going.” “What did he say?” Feng Dan asked quickly. “He said that he’s coming from somewhere and going somewhere,” Fei Cai answered casually. Feng Dan and Zi Yue were stunned when they heard this. Then, Feng Dan burst into loud laughter. “Haha, coming from somewhere and going somewhere. This is so funny. It’s the first time I’ve heard someone make such a good point!” Feng Dan laughed so hard that she covered her aching stomach. After a while, Zi Yue, who couldn’t stand it anymore, pinched her forearm and said, “Alright, enough is enough!” “Idon’t want to either, but it was too funny.” Feng Dan narrowed her eyes and said. “I didn’t expect this serious-looking guy to say something so interesting.” Seeing this, Zi Yue had no choice but to ignore her. Instead, she asked Fei Cai, “Sister Fei Cai, I want to ask you about the high-grade spirit stone at the auction. I don’t know…” Before she could finish her sentence, Fei Cai understood what she meant. She interjected, “Yue’er, the Hundred Treasures House has its rules. There are some things that I really can’t tell you. I hope you can understand.” Zi Yue nodded and didn’t say anything else. However, her expression was a little desolate. Seeing this, Fei Cai sighed and said, “However, since you’ve already called me sister, there’s no need for me to hide some things from you.” Hearing this, Zi Yue’s eyes instantly lit up, and her interest was piqued. Even Feng Dan, who was laughing maniacally at the side, hurriedly stopped laughing and became serious. She was still clear on what was more important. Even if her father came personally, let alone her, he would also treat the information of a high-grade spirit stone seriously. Fei Cai slowly explained, “I really don’t know who the owner of this spirit stone is because he had been covering his face when he was discussing with me.” “However, from the conditions he proposed for the auction, you should be able to deduce that this person definitely has a grudge against the Fang family.” Zi Yue and Feng Dan looked at each other and nodded at the same time. Fei Cai continued, “Although I don’t know who the seller is, I have a conclusion based on the information I obtained.” “Who is it?” Zi Yue and Feng Dan immediately pricked up their ears and stared at Fei Cai nervously. They knew Fei Cai very well. If Fei Cai didn’t have eighty percent confidence in her deduction, she definitely wouldn’t say that. As long as they knew the owner of the spirit stone, they might have a greater chance of obtaining that high-grade spirit stone, or even more high-grade spirit stones! Therefore, how could they not be excited and nervous? Fei Cai paused for a moment, and finally said softly, “Sky Wolf Sect’s sect master, Qiu Chi!” “It’s him?” Hearing this answer, Zi Yue and Feng Dan were greatly shocked, their faces filled with disbelief. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio ‘When they heard the name Qiu Chi, Zi Yue and Feng Dan were both stunned. They naturally knew about the Sky Wolf Sect. Although it was only a second-rate force, it had a good reputation in the cultivation world of Fusheng City. Its sect master Qiu Chi was highly sought after by many people and was extremely famous. Speaking of which, this force had some connections with the Golden Door Sect. However, three months ago, the Fang family suddenly attacked the Sky Wolf Sect and broke through the Sky Wolf Sect’s headquarters in Fusheng City overnight! After that night, the Sky Wolf Sect completely disappeared. Almost all of the territory and forces of the Sky Wolf Sect were taken over by the Fang family. The people of the Sky Wolf Sect were either killed by the Fang family, surrendered to the Fang family, or hid and concealed their identities. Even the sect master of the Sky Wolf Sect, Qiu Chi, was said to have died that night due to his heavy injuries. At that time, many people were puzzled. Although Qiu Chi’s strength could not compare to Fang Shen, who had broken through to the late stage of the refinement realm, there were still quite a number of refinement realms in Sky Wolf Sect. Why was it so easy for the Fang family to destroy them? Only a few big forces like them could recognize something. That was, the Fang family had actually colluded with the Blood Fang Gang long ago. It could even be said that the Fang family had defected to the Blood Fang Gang, which was why they were able to destroy the Sky Wolf Sect so easily. Zi Yue’s expression instantly darkened, she analyzed coldly, “If this person is really Qiu Chi, then that means that he probably doesn’t know that the Fang family had colluded with the Blood Fang Gang long ago. Otherwise, when setting up the conditions for the auction, he should have removed the Blood Fang Gang’s qualifications.” “Tve also tried to worm the truth out of him. In my opinion, he probably doesn’t know about the relationship between the Blood Fang Gang and the Fang family.” Fei Cai knocked her fingers and agreed with Zi Yue’s words. “If that’s the case, then it’ll be very difficult for us to obtain this high-grade spirit stone!” Feng Dan’s reaction wasn’t slow either, and she immediately understood the actual meaning of their words. She hurriedly said, “The Blood Fang Gang will definitely not let go of this opportunity. They might even play a double act with the Fang family and pretend to sell the Fang family, but in reality, they’re just trying to obtain that high-grade spirit stone!” “That’s right, the Blood Fang Gang will definitely do that,” Zi Yue analyzed. “But that’s not what I’m worried about. What I’m more worried about is that if the Fang family and the Blood Fang Gang directly make a move against Qiu Chi, he’ll be in danger.” “That’s true,” Fei Cai agreed. “Qiu Chi’s method of bidding is too obvious. Everyone can see that he’s targeting the Fang family. His identity isn’t that hard to guess.” “Tm afraid that the Fang family and the Blood Fang Gang are already searching for Qiu Chi in Fusheng City.” “Tomorrow is the Fang family’s banquet. Do you think they’ll make use of this banquet to stir up trouble?” Feng Dan quickly asked. “Of course, they will stir up trouble. Isn’t the purpose of the Fang family holding this banquet to flex their muscles and take the opportunity to enter the ranks of the first-rate forces in Fusheng City?” “Originally, we don’t need to go to a banquet hosted by a second-rate force. I’m afraid that there aren’t many top and first-rate forces that will attend. However, with today’s incident, I’m afraid that tomorrow the Fang family will be filled with people.” “Yue’er, then tomorrow we’ll go and join in the fun!” Feng Dan said excitedly. She would never fall behind in such matters. Zi Yue was silent for a moment, then nodded and said, “Now, it seems that we have to make a trip to the Fang family.” “Not to mention other things, even if it’s for that high-grade spirit stone, we should go and give it a try!” “You can go, but you guys have to be careful.” Fei Cai suddenly added, “You guys injured Xue Ying today. With his father’s vengeful character, if he sees you guys, he definitely won’t let you off easily.” “Do you think I’d be afraid of him?” Feng Dan immediately retorted. Although she also knew that even her father might not be a match for the Blood Fang Gang’s leader Xue Yu, she definitely couldn’t lose in terms of imposing manner! “alright, alright. When has our Miss Feng Dan ever been afraid?” Fei Cai could only helplessly agree and teased, “However, if you get beaten until you cry, don’t come and find me to comfort you!” “Hmph, Vixen, who needs your comfort?” Feng Dan immediately said in unhappily. “It’s not enough. I still have one more question.” Zi Yue, who had been silent all this time, suddenly said, “Logically speaking, Qiu Chi has been chased by the Fang family until he has no way out.” “Even before, he was only the sect master of a second-rate force. There are at least dozens of forces like him in Fusheng City, and the Sky Wolf Sect is even one of the last middle-rate forces.” “In that case, how did Qiu Chi get this high-grade spirit stone?” Fei Cai sighed and slowly said, “This is also a question that has been puzzling me for a long time. Perhaps, it was a fortuitous encounter?” “Boohoo, why don’t I have such a fortuitous encounter?” Feng Dan couldn’t help but ridicule. It seemed that only a fortuitous encounter was the only reasonable explanation. “The matter of the Fang family has been settled. What should we do about that guy surnamed Jiang?” Feng Dan suddenly asked again. Fei Cai was stunned and asked, “What do you mean by ‘what should we do’? Could it be that you still want to make a move against Young Master Jiang?” “Who said I’m going to make a move?” Feng Dan explained, “Why would I make a move on him? There’s no movement from his cultivation at all. I just feel that this guy is a little strange.” “He is indeed a little strange!” Zi Yue also agreed. “although there’s no movement from his cultivation, his temperament is excellent. He doesn’t change his expression even when Mount Tai collapses in front of him. I feel that he is definitely not an ordinary person!” Hearing this, Fei Cai’s heart skipped a beat. This girl, Zi Yue, was indeed very meticulous. Her observation was extremely sharp. It was really not easy to hide from this girl. Of course, even if Fei Cai didn’t know that Jiang Ping still had a high-grade spirit stone in his hands, she could also tell that Jiang Ping was definitely not an ordinary person. After all, Jiang Ping’s temperament was exceptional. “alright, what’s the point of caring about all this now?” Fei Cai hurriedly changed the topic. Right now, she had the upper hand. She should have the most understanding of Jiang Ping among the three of them. ‘That was why she didn’t wish for Zi Yue and Feng Dan to catch up and be the first to find out who Jiang Ping really was. She didn’t know why, but she actually had the intention to occupy Jiang Ping… Fei Cai’s pretty face turned slightly red as she said, “Tomorrow is the Fang family’s banquet. Let’s focus on tomorrow. I believe that there will be a big show at the Fang family’s place tomorrow!” Zi Yue and Feng Dan looked at each other and nodded firmly.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Within the Blood Fang Gang. Looking at his son lying on the bed, who had fainted once again, the sect master, Xue Yu’s face was extremely gloomy. “Boom!” Xue Yu suddenly struck out with his palm, and the stone table in front of him was instantly shattered into pieces by him. Fang Shen, who was kneeling on the ground, and Xue Ying’s two personal attendants were all trembling with fear and their bodies trembling non-stop. Suddenly, Xue Yu narrowed his eyes and stared at Fang Shen, shouting sternly, “Fang Shen, where did you go? The two of you went to the Hundred Treasures House together, but my son was injured so badly, and yet you weren’t injured at all?” Fang Shen was scared out of his wits. How could he dare to delay any longer? He quickly told him about the high-grade spirit stone in the auction. He then explained, “Sect Master, the reason why I wasn’t by the young lord’s side was that I was ordered by the young lord to avoid being noticed, and to find Qiu Chi and offer you the high-grade spirit stones!” “Qiu Chi? He’s just an ant in the refinement realm. How could he have high-grade spirit stones?” Xue Yu’s anger subsided a little, but he still had some doubts. “As long as we catch Qiu Chi, we’ll know about this!” Xue Yu snorted and said disdainfully, “Fusheng City is not small. I’m afraid it won’t be so easy to catch a person who is hiding.” “Please rest assured, Sect Master!” Fang Shen suddenly revealed a smile of success, he said, “I have made some arrangements. As long as Qiu Chi is still in the city, within tonight, he will definitely fall into my trap!” “Then why are you still talking nonsense here?” Xue Yu’s voice suddenly tured cold. Fang Shen was immediately shocked and hurriedly begged for mercy, “Yes, I will personally bring people to capture Qiu Chi!” As he said this, he was about to stand up and retreat. “Wait!” Xue Yu’s voice sounded behind him, and Fang Shen could not help but pause. Xue Yu continued, “I want you to ensure that the Fang family’s banquet tomorrow, the few girls from the Golden Door Sect, the mayor’s mansion, and the Hundred Treasures House will all be present!” Fang Shen immediately understood and hurriedly said, “Please rest assured, Sect Master. I believe that they will definitely turn up tomorrow!” Xue Yu impatiently waved his hand, and in an instant, only he and Xue Ying were left in the room. “Ying‘er, don’t worry. Even if I have to carry you, I will bring you to the Fang family. Father will let you see with your own eyes how I deal with those three girls and help you vent your anger!” There was not a trace of anger on his face, but his gaze was extremely cold. It was a quiet and empty night. Somewhere in Fusheng City. Qiu Chi was surrounded by the members of the Fang family who had suddenly appeared. His face was filled with disbelief. He was so angry that he looked like he was about to explode. With a malevolent expression, he shouted, “Lei Dong, I have always treated you well. Why, why did you also betray me!” “Birds die in pursuit of food, and humans die in pursuit of wealth!” The person who spoke was a thin but honest-looking man who stood opposite him. He looked at Qiu Chi who was struggling and said coldly, “The Sky Wolf Sect has long been destroyed. Do you think you can overthrow the Fang family and rebuild the Sky Wolf Sect by yourself?” “That’s wishful thinking!” “Lei Dong, you!” Qiu Chi pointed at the honest-looking man in front of him. He wished he could eat his flesh and drink his blood! In the past, when the Sky Wolf Sect was at its peak, Lei Dong was loyal to him and obeyed his orders. Qiu Chi saw that he was honest and reliable. He didn’t care that he was only in the tempering realm and promoted him to be his trusted aide. In fact, after he entrusted the high-grade spirit stone to the Hundred Treasures House, he went to find Lei Dong first, who had already gone into seclusion. He wanted to give Lei Dong a chance to rise again with him and soar to great heights. However, he did not expect that Lei Dong, who appeared to be extremely excited because of his reunion with him, had actually informed the Fang family long ago. Before he could even react, he was surrounded by the Fang family. “Haha, wishful thinking!” Fang Shen slowly walked out. Seeing him, the members of the Fang family who had surrounded Qiu Chi respectfully made way for him. Fang Shen walked to the front of the group and said with a victorious expression, “Qiu Chi, long time no see.” “However, you are still so stupid! Back then, the Sky Wolf Sect was wiped out by our Fang family in one night. You were also chased out of Fusheng City like a stray dog by me.” “I thought you would learn a lesson, conceal your identity, and hide to survive. At least that way, you would still have a way to live.” “I didn’t expect you to harbor such absurd ideas, and you still want to deal with my Fang family. Could it be that the lesson back then did not leave a deep impression on you?” “Back then?” Qiu Chi was poked in the sore spot, and he immediately shouted coldly, “You still have the nerve to talk about back then!” “The people of your Fang family didn’t dare to openly oppose our Sky Wolf Sect. You only use despicable methods to bribe traitors. What kind of ability is that!” Fang Shen smiled contemptuously. Just as he was about to speak, he heard Lei Dong snort coldly. “Traitors? This is called a good bird choosing a tree to roost in. The destruction of the Sky Wolf Sect has long been destined. I’m only trying to find a way out for myself!” After saying that, Lei Dong looked at Fang Shen and smiled fawningly. “Patriarch Fang, am I right?” “Back then, you promised me that as long as I listen to your orders and report any news about Qiu Chi to you, you would give me 10,000 taels of silver. Now that Qiu Chi has been captured by you, when do you think I can get those silver…” Fang Shen sneered and narrowed his eyes at Lei Dong. He said coldly, “Don’t worry, I can give you that silver anytime!” Hearing this, Lei Dong was immediately overjoyed. He was only in the tempering realm, and the path of cultivation was too difficult for him. Therefore, he had long planned that as long as he got the silver, he would escape from Fusheng City and find a place where no one knew him and become a small landlord with a beautiful woman in his arms… He was indulging in his beautiful fantasy when he suddenly felt a cold light flash before his eyes. “Puff!” A surge of Qi and blood surged up and burst through his throat, spitting out from his mouth like a fountain. Lei Dong looked at the sharp blade on his chest in disbelief and then raised his head with difficulty to meet Fang Shen’s half-smiling eyes. His face was twisted to the extreme! “You should have died a long time ago. I shall send you off first.” Before his voice had faded, Lei Dong’s corpse fell to the ground with a loud bang. Acloud of dust rose up. “Fang Shen, you are really vicious and merciless!” Seeing this scene, Qiu Chi could not help but sneer. He naturally did not feel any pity for this traitor Lei Dong. However, the other party’s insidiousness was also somewhat understood. “Hmph, he’s just a traitor. He should have died the night he destroyed your Sky Wolf Sect. The reason I kept him alive was because of this scene tonight.” Fang Shen paused for a moment before continuing, “Alright, let’s cut the crap. You should obediently follow us first.” “There are some things that I still need to ask you about!” Just as he finished speaking. Dozens of Fang family members attacked him at the same time. Qiu Chi, who was like a cornered beast, immediately had an extremely ugly expression on his face.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Fusheng City. Jiang family. Jiang Ping was playing with the mysterious stone amber that he had won today. He furrowed his eyebrows, and his face was full of doubt. This stone amber was crystal clear and was very different from ordinary stone ambers. It was indeed rare. ‘There was a strange flower inside this stone amber which was even more amazing. As for this flower… Jiang Ping didn’t know why, but he clearly had a familiar feeling, but he couldn’t remember what kind of flower it was. “Liu’er!” Jiang Ping waved to Liu’er. Liver took advantage of the situation and pounced into his arms. “Daddy, why did you call me?” Liu’er’s big eyes flashed and asked in confusion. Jiang Ping touched her little head and asked gently, “Liu’er, do you know what this is?” Liver pouted her little mouth and frowned as she looked at it. After a while, she said helplessly, “Daddy, this is just a stone!” “Daddy, why are you so muddle-headed? Don’t you even know that this is a stone?” Liu’er covered her mouth and laughed as if she had heard a joke. Jiang Ping also laughed. It made sense. Liu’er was just a five or six-year-old little girl. How would she know what this was? He asked again, “Liu’er, do you like this stone?” “I like it!” Liu’er affirmed without hesitation. Then, she directly hugged the stone and let out a melodious laugh. “I like this stone.” “I don’t know why, but when I saw this stone, I felt that it was very beautiful, and I don’t want to see anything else.” “Moreover, when I hug this stone, my body feels warm and comfortable. Oh, Daddy, I feel sleepy all of a sudden!” “Liu’er is so obedient today. Why do you want to sleep so early?” Jiang Ping chuckled. Recently, the three little girls had gone wild. Although Liu’er was the most obedient of the three little girls, she was unwilling to sleep at night. It was impossible for her to lie down quietly until the Moon rose. She even insisted on her father reading her a bedtime story so that she could force herself to sleep. He didn’t expect that this girl would take the initiative to suggest that she wanted to go to bed early today, which surprised Jiang Ping. However, it was certainly a good thing to go to bed early and get up early. Jiang Ping smiled with satisfaction and said, “Okay, since Liu’er is sleepy, then go to bed early.” “Then I must sleep with this stone!” Liu’er said as she lifted the stone amber high up. Jiang Ping paused and said hesitantly, “But, this stone amber might be very dirty. Besides, are you able to sleep well while hugging this thing?” He still hadn’t figured out what kind of stone this was. He couldn’t help but feel worried in his heart. If this stone was something bad that would affect Liu’er negatively, what should he do? After all, Liu’er’s way of breaking through was too strange. If this stone was pushing the seedlings to grow, then it would be extremely disadvantageous for Liu’er’s future! Of course, this possibility was very small. Hearing this, Liu’er immediately hugged the stone amber even tighter. Afraid that Jiang Ping would not agree, she nervously said, “Daddy, this stone is not dirty. I will clean it up before bringing it to the bed!” “Moreover, I feel very comfortable hugging this stone. I will definitely sleep well!” Looking at Liu’er’s nervous look as if she was protecting something she loved, Jiang Ping knew that it would be useless no matter what he said. He could only compromise and say, “Okay, then I’ll listen to Liu’er.” Then, his expression suddenly became serious and he said, “Liver, it’s okay to hug this stone to sleep, but if you feel strange, you must tell daddy, understand?” “Okay!” ‘With her father’s consent, Liu’er jumped from Jiang Ping’s arms to the ground like a little rabbit. Holding the stone amber, she took small steps and ran away without looking back. It was as if she was afraid that her father would go back on his words! At this moment, Li Sushang held Wan’er and Yan’er’s hands and walked in. “Daddy, why is Liu’er running so fast?” Wan’er let go of Li Sushang’s hand and threw herself at Jiang Ping. She asked in puzzlement. “Liu’er went back to sleep!” Jiang Ping hugged Wan’er and laughed. “You must be tired from playing today. Go back and sleep!” “Ah, no!” Wan’er immediately pouted and struggled out of Jiang Ping’s arms. What time was it now? She didn’t want to go to bed so early! “Daddy, I still have to cultivate. I won’t play with you anymore!” Wan’er giggled and ran away. ‘The change was so big that even Jiang Ping couldn’t help but secretly click his tongue. “Yan’er, you…” Jiang Ping was about to ask Yan’er to come over and give him a hug and a kiss. However, Yan’er’s body suddenly froze on the spot. She smiled at Jiang Ping and said, “Daddy, Yan’er will go and find Wan’er for you!” Before she finished her words, she let go of Li Sushang’s small hand and ran out with Wan’er. She didn’t want to go to bed so early! “Sigh, my children have grown up, and they are not obedient anymore!” Jiang Ping sighed helplessly and lay down on the wooden chair. Li Sushang shook her head and went forward to pour him a cup of warm tea. She asked softly, “Liu’er went to bed so early today?” “Yes.” Jiang Ping took the tea and took a sip. He said without even lifting his eyelids, “Maybe she felt tired from playing today.” “Why didn’t you tell me you were going to the auction today?” Li Sushang asked again. Jiang Ping said helplessly, “It was a last-minute decision. The three girls were in the mood, so I brought them in to have a look.” Li Sushang rolled her eyes at him and didn’t continue to dwell on this topic. She asked again, “Did you find out anything about that stone?” “Nothing.” Jiang Ping spread his hands and said with a depressed expression. Li Sushang’s heart instantly tightened. She hurriedly asked, “Will that cause any harm to Liu’er?” When Liu’er came back just now, she had already noticed that Liu’er had broken through. Her heart could not be more excited. In the end, she learned from Jiang Ping that Liu’er’s method of breaking through was very special. Li Sushang immediately became worried again because she had never heard of such a strange method of breaking through. However, even Jiang Ping couldn’t tell what the stone amber was capable of, so what could she do? Jiang Ping waved his hand and replied, “There shouldn’t be any problems.” “However…” He changed the topic and said with a serious face, “During this period of time, you still have to pay more attention to Liver.” “If you notice anything wrong with her, tell me immediately!” “Don’t worry, I know.” Li Sushang nodded lightly.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At night. In Liv’er’s room. To be exact, it should be in the room of the three girls. Actually, this house was very spacious, and there were also a lot of empty rooms. ‘As long as Wan’er and the others wanted to, they could have their own room. Although the three girls usually liked to bicker with each other, they had a great relationship. No one was willing to sleep alone. Jiang Ping also knew that if the three girls slept together, there was no telling how noisy the night would be! However, he was very happy to see the three girls being so intimate. After all, they were his precious daughters. He loved them dearly! Of course, it was quite enjoyable to see them bicker and fight over him! “Lam you, and you are me!” Acertain voice suddenly sounded and broke the silence. If Jiang Ping was here, he would be shocked. Because this voice was very similar to Liu’er’s voice, but it was less soft and coquettish. Instead, it was colder and more mature! At this moment, Liu’er, who was sleeping soundly, suddenly trembled, and a few drops of cold sweat dripped down her forehead. The transparent stone amber in her arms suddenly burst out with a pale red blood light. This pale red blood light enveloped Liv’er’s entire body. In the night, this scene appeared extremely strange! Liver, who was sleeping soundly, also saw an even stranger scene in her mind! She felt as if she had entered a void. Her surroundings were pitch black, and she could not even tell the direction! The environment here was exactly the same as what she had seen when she had just broken through to the tempering realm! Liu’er wandered around in this void. Suddenly, a dazzling scarlet light flashed in front of her eyes. She was shocked and subconsciously covered her eyes. After a while, she slowly moved her small hand away. In the next moment, she froze. Ahuman figure that looked exactly like her appeared in front of her eyes. This human figure was clearly the figure she saw in her consciousness when she broke through to the tempering realm! Since that time, almost a month had passed, and this human figure had never appeared again. Liver slowly forgot that such a thing had happened. Until now, when she saw this human figure that suddenly appeared, Liu’er immediately remembered. She stuttered, “Y-you are that fellow from last time?” “Lam not a fellow!” That human figure laughed lightly, “Why, have you forgotten me? You can’t forget about me!” ‘That human figure paused and suddenly smiled wickedly. “Because you are me, and I am you!” “Lam you, and you are me?” Liu’er frowned slightly and repeated thoughtfully. A moment later, Liu’er seemed to have suddenly thought of something. She pouted and said with certainty, “No, daddy said that I’m his obedient baby. There is only one Liv’er in the world!” “You are not Liu’er!” Liu’er shouted angrily. She did not want another Liu’er! Now her father already had Wan’er, Yan’er, and her. If there was another Liu’er, her father would have less time to read bedtime stories to her, and he would spend less time playing with her in the future! No, Liu’er absolutely would not allow such a thing to happen! Liver said firmly, “Hmph, you are not Liv’er. Daddy said that only I am Liver!” “ah!” The figure did not lose her temper because of Liu’er’s words. Instead, she chuckled and said, “I didn’t expect you to listen to your daddy so well!” “That’s right. I listen to daddy the most. Daddy also loves me the most!” Liu’er placed her hands on her hips and answered with a smug look on her face. “But you still have two older sisters!” The figure said suddenly, “We still have two older sisters. Daddy also loves those two older sisters very much, doesn’t he?” “So what?” Liu’er heard her question and suddenly felt afraid. She couldn’t help but take a few steps back. ‘The figure saw this and immediately said proudly, “Do you know why your daddy loves your two sisters very much even when you listened to him the most?” “Why?” Liv’er originally didn’t want to ask because she knew the answer. ‘The answer was very simple. It was because Wan’er and Yan’er were the same as her. They were also her father’s daughters. However, she didn’t know why she asked this question out of the blue. That figure immediately pressed forward step by step. “Because Wan’er and Yan’er are both very powerful! Wan’er is very good at fighting, her cultivation is the highest, and she can protect you and Yan’er. Daddy feels at ease with her, so he loves her very much.” “yan’er is very smart, just like a little adult. She knows everything. Moreover, she has that, what, spiritual chaos something sword physique. Daddy said that she will cultivate very quickly, so daddy dotes on her very much.” “What about you?” The figure paused and shook her head. “You don’t know anything. In terms of cultivation, you can’t compare to Wan’er. In terms of intelligence, you can’t compare to Yan’er. You only know how to act coquettishly with daddy. Daddy will get sick of it sooner or later!” “He won’t!” Liu ‘er was shocked and immediately blurted out. She clearly felt that what she said was wrong, but she didn’t know why she couldn’t refute her words. The figure said again, “It’s not okay to be in your current state now. Do you want to hide behind Daddy, Wan’er, Yan’er, and the others for the rest of your life and let them protect you?” “No, you have to start to speed up your cultivation. You have to become more powerful. You have to know how to protect yourself, Wan’er, Yan’er, and the others. Only then will daddy love you forever!” “Then… what should I do?” Liu’er asked, minding her own business. She felt very scared now as if her father would be fed up with her one day. ‘Thinking of this, Liv’er’s eyes welled up with tears. ‘The figure was amused and quickly said, “This is very simple. Just get along well with me in the future!” “How are we going to get along well?” Liv’er curled her lips and asked curiously. “It’s very simple. It’s the same as now. When you play with daddy at home, you will talk. When you leave the house, and some bad guys want to bully Wan’er, Yan’er, and the others, just let me speak!” The figure explained. Liu’er hesitated for a moment before she finally nodded her head fiercely. With a determined gaze, she spat out one word. “Alright!” <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio ‘The next day. “ah!” A loud and clear scream broke the silence in the courtyard. Jiang Ping, who was meditating and resting, suddenly opened his eyes, and his heart tightened. With his abnormally sharp perception, he could clearly recognize that it was Wan’er’s scream! He hurriedly flashed out of the room and arrived in Wan’er’s room almost in an instant. “What’s wrong, Wan’er? What happened?” ‘As soon as Jiang Ping entered the room, he saw the three little girls gathered together with worried faces. ‘As soonas he finished speaking, Li Sushang also rushed over. Before she entered the room, she asked, “Wan’er, what’s wrong with you?” ‘The next moment when she saw that Jiang Ping was already in the room, her heart immediately calmed down a lot. Jiang Ping didn’t have the time to pay attention to her at this moment. He hurriedly asked the three little girls, “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liver, what exactly is going on? Why are the three of you frowning?” The three little girls pouted and looked at each other. In the end, Liu’er timidly walked out and said, “Daddy, the gift you gave me, i Hearing this, Jiang Ping suddenly felt shocked in his heart. Could it be that there was something wrong with that stone? “Liu’er, what’s wrong with that stone? Tell daddy quickly!” Jiang Ping asked anxiously. Liver pouted and looked like she was wronged. She opened her mouth and finally said, “Daddy, see it for yourself.” Then, she took out the stone amber in the blanket and raised it in front of Jiang Ping. ‘Then, Jiang Ping and Li Sushang were stunned. ‘There was nothing in the transparent stone amber. The mysterious little red flower from before had disappeared! The stone amber had also undergone some subtle changes and became a little turbid. Although this change was very small, Jiang Ping felt that this special stone amber was gradually turning into an extremely ordinary stone amber. Jiang Ping quickly came back to his senses and hurriedly asked, “Liu’er, what exactly is going on? Where is the little flower in this stone?” “Daddy, I don’t know either!” Liu’er’s little head shook like a rattle-drum. Jiang Ping was silent for a moment, then he asked Wan’er and Yan’er, “Wan’er, Yan’er, do you know what is going on?” Before he could finish, Wan’er’s expression changed, and she quickly denied, “No, I don’t know anything!” “When I woke up early in the morning and saw that the little red flower inside the stone was gone. I was shocke: She would not tell her father and Liu’er that she originally wanted to take advantage of Liu’er’s deep sleep to secretly play with the stone, but only then did she realize that the little red flower inside the stone was gone. Although Jiang Ping noticed that there was something wrong with Wan’er’s expression, he did not have the mood to pay much attention to it now. He looked at Yan’er. Yan’er spread her hands and said helplessly, “I don’t know what happened either. I was woken up by Wan’er. When I woke up, the stone was already like this.” ‘After saying that, she rubbed her eyes and could not open them. Seeing the remaining stains in the corner of Yan’er’s eyes, Jiang Ping knew that this girl definitely didn’t know anything. He could only ask Liver again, “Liver, did you hug this stone to sleep last night?” Liver didn’t have time to say anything before Wan’er continued to complain, “Yes, Daddy. Liv’er not only hugged it for a night but also hugged it very tightly!” “Liver, did you anything strange happen last night?” Jiang Ping asked again. “Strange things? I don’t think so.” Wan’er’s big black eyes rolled around. After thinking for a moment, her eyes suddenly lit up, and she shouted excitedly, “Ah, I remember something!” Jiang Ping wanted to knock Wan’er’s head and ask her, “Are you Liu’er? Daddy is asking Liv’er, not you. Why do you always interrupt!” However, when he heard that Wan’er seemed to have found something, he immediately became interested and quickly asked, “Wanrer, tell me quickly. Have you thought of anything strange?” Under the concerned gazes of her father and auntie, Wan’er suddenly became listless and weakly said, “When I was sleeping, I vaguely hear someone saying something. You are me, and I am you!” “Yes!” Just as Wan’er finished her words, Yan’er suddenly became excited. She quickly said, “Daddy, I seem to have heard it too!” Liver’s small face instantly turned pale, and her body immediately tensed up. Didn’t she say this to the other Liu’er in her dream last night? Oh no, how could Wan’’er and Yan’er hear it! Liu’er didn’t know why, but she felt that the matter between her and the other Liu’er must be kept a secret. She couldn’t tell anyone, including her father! So she quickly pretended to be dumb and said, “Wan’er and Yan’er both heard it, but why didn’t I hear it?” “Liu’er, did you really not hear it?” Jiang Ping raised his eyebrows and asked curiously. Liv’er immediately panicked. She quickly buried her little face into Jiang Ping’s chest and said in a humming voice, “Daddy, I really didn’t hear anything. Can you stop asking me?” This was the first time Liu’er had lied to Jiang Ping, so her heart was filled with panic. She suddenly remembered what her father had said. A liar’s nose would grow longer, so she was feeling even more afraid in her heart. However, this shouldn’t be considered a lie, right? Liver touched her nose. She didn’t feel any changes! Feeling that Liu’er was about to cry, Jiang Ping quickly comforted her gently, “Okay, okay, Daddy understand. Daddy won’t ask you anymore. Liver didn’t hear anything!” “Liu’er, you can pass this stone to daddy first.” Jiang Ping took the stone from Liv’er’s hand, and Liver didn’t stop him. She didn’t know why, but now she felt that this stone wasn’t attractive to her at all. The warm and comfortable feeling while holding this stone was completely gone. Therefore, she didn’t object to her father’s words at all. “Okay, Wan‘er, Yan’er, Liu’er, it’s getting late. Hurry up and wash up and eat something,” Jiang Ping said as he got up and left. “Ah, no, I haven’t slept enough yet!” Hearing Jiang Ping’s words, Yan’er immediately protested. However, in front of Jiang Ping, this kind of protest was naturally ineffective. He picked Yan’er up and said earnestly, “Daddy has told you many times, have you forgotten?” “The early bird gets the worm!” Jiang Ping and Yan‘er said in unison. Yan‘er waved her hand impatiently and said, “I know, I know. I will get up now!” Jiang Ping left with satisfaction, and Li Sushang followed closely behind. After the two of them left, Yan’er said in a whisper, “The worm that gets up early would be eaten by the bird!” With that, she crawled into the bed like a baby silkworm.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping and Li Sushang left the room and walked along the corridor. Li Sushang had been staring at Jiang Ping’s back, thinking about what he would say. However, after a while, Jiang Ping still walked without saying a word. She finally couldn’t help but ask, “Patriarch, what exactly is going on with this stone?” Jiang Ping suddenly stopped moving. He turned around and frowned as if he had thought of something bad. Seeing his expression, Li Sushang immediately became nervous and hurriedly asked, “Patriarch, did you discover something?” “If this stone has gone through such changes, will it be disadvantageous to Liu’er?” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment. He just realized that his expression seemed to be a little too grave, to the extent that it had frightened Li Sushang. He hurriedly explained, “You’ve misunderstood. I’m not worried that this stone will cause any harm to Liu’er. When I came into contact with Liver just now, I had already secretly checked her body.” “Her body is very healthy, and her meridians are also very smooth. Logically speaking, when Liu’er cultivates, her speed should be very fast!” “Is that so?” Li Sushang immediately heaved a sigh of relief but soon realized that something was wrong. She hurriedly asked, “Patriarch, but why did you have such an awful expression just now?” “Actually, it’s because I suddenly thought of a certain possibility!” Jiang Ping’s gaze focused, and he slowly said, “Sushang, have you heard of the resurrection lily physique?” “The resurrection lily physique?” Li Sushang repeated the name as she tried her best to recall the name in her mind. In the end, she realized that she had not gained anything at all. “What does this mean?” She anxiously asked Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping did not answer her. Instead, he stared into the distance in a daze as if he had fallen into some kind of deep thought. Actually, his perception was extremely sharp, and he knew how Liu’er and the other two girls were! As long as there was a slight change in the three girls, he would be able to detect it in an instant. Therefore, he naturally noticed that something was wrong with Liu’er just now. The look in Liu’er’s eyes gave him the feeling that there was something else going on. In addition, he flipped through an extremely ancient book last night and saw an incomplete page. That incomplete page recorded a flower that grew in a stone, the red spider lily! After connecting all the clues, a possibility appeared in Jiang Ping’s mind. The resurrection lily! An extremely strange yet extraordinary powerful physique! A supreme physique that had long disappeared from the vast annals of history and was long forgotten by everyone! Of course, this was only a guess at the moment. Jiang Ping only knew a little about this physique. At the same time, in the Fang family. Two people were sitting on the main seat in the hall. One of them was Fang Shen, while the other was an extremely strange-looking old man with black hair and a white beard. In the crowd below, besides the elders of the Fang family, there was also a familiar face that Jiang Ping knew — Lei Jingyun! In Xiaoyu Town, the eldest uncle of Lei Feiche, the patriarch of the Lei family. At the same time, he was the old man who wanted to poach Wan’er to Chuanyun Sect, but was mercilessly rejected by Jiang Ping! “Elder Gu Jin, please have some tea!” Fang Shen said respectfully to the old man who was sitting with him. Even though he was the patriarch of the Fang family and had the backing of the Blood Fang Gang, he didn’t dare to snub this old man! Because this old man was not only the master of his son, Fang Wuji but also one of the nine elders of Chuanyun Sect! Chuanyun Sect was the most powerful cultivation force in the surrounding hundred cities! It was rumored that the sect master of Chuanyun Sect and the nine elders were all at the origin core realm! In other words, on the surface, the number of origin core realm experts in Chuanyun Sect was more than twice that of Fusheng City! Especially the sect master of Chuanyun Sect, it was said that he had the cultivation at the late-stage origin core realm and was only one step away from the nascent soul realm. He could be considered a first-rate expert in the Tianyun Empire! If it wasn’t for the fact that Fang Wuji was Fang Shen’s son, and he had broken through to the tempering realm at the age of 16 and received his attention and was accepted as his disciple, there was no way he would have spared a second glance at a small clan like the Fang family, especially for a figure like Gu Jin! Gu Jin didn’t reveal the slightest bit of emotion towards Fang Shen’s flattery. He only said calmly, “Leave it.” Seeing this, Fang Shen smiled embarrassedly and didn’t dare to say anything more. He then said to Lei Jingyun, “Elder Lei, please have some tea too!” Lei Jingyun also nodded with a smile and said, “Patriarch Fang, you are too polite.” Fang Shen smiled again and said, “Elder Lei, speaking of which, it’s all thanks to you that my son was able to become Elder Gu Jin’s disciple!” “Lremember that you were the one in charge of recruiting disciples in Fusheng City. If it weren’t for your discerning eyes, I’m afraid my son would have wasted all his talent in Fusheng City!” As he spoke, he revealed an extremely grateful expression, as if he wished he could kowtow to Lei Jingyun a few times. Lei Jingyun was also a sophisticated person. Of course, he could tell that Fang Shen’s words were not meant for him to listen, they were clearly meant for Gu Jin to hear! He wanted to take the opportunity to praise his son Fang Wuji’s talent, but he was worried that Gu Jin would think that he was shameless, so he thought of such a roundabout way. Lei Jingyun said courteously on the surface, “Patriarch Fang, you flatter me. Wuji is talented. Otherwise, even if he could pass my test, he wouldn’t be able to become Elder Gu Jin’s disciple.” Although he was smiling, he couldn’t help but snort in his heart. Actually, during that time, the one in charge of recruiting students wasn’t him at all. It was just a few young disciples from the sect. At that time, he was clearly in Xiaoyu Town, teaching Wan’er to cultivate! He sneaked a glance at Fang Wuji, who was sitting across from him looking very proud, feeling even more disdainful in his heart. A sixteen-year-old in the tempering realm, and he had the nerve to be called a genius? Compared to that little girl, Wan’er, this guy could not even be considered a fool! Now that Gu Jin had become old, his foresight was getting worse and worse. He even took a fancy to a guy like Fang Wuji! “Cough cough!” At this moment, Gu Jin suddenly coughed dryly and said unhurriedly, “Wuji, this kid, although he is not the best among my disciples, his talent is still very good.” “Now that he has broken through to the tempering realm at the age of sixteen, it is considered rare in Chuanyun Sect. As long as he has my guidance, he might be able to break through to the refinement realm in three to five years.” Hearing this, Fang Shen was immediately overjoyed and hurriedly said respectfully. “Elder Gu Jin, thank you for your training!” While everyone was talking, there was a sudden commotion outside. Gu Jin frowned and asked unhappily, “Patriarch Fang, what’s the commotion outside?” “Apologies for the commotion. Please forgive me. It’s like this,” Fang Shen quickly explained. “Last night, we caught an irreconcilable enemy of the Fang family. Now we’re preparing to lock him at the main door and expose him publicly!” The mortal enemy he was talking about was naturally Qiu Chi. “Expose him publicly?” Gu Jin was stunned and immediately felt a bit displeased. Then, he said, “Since he is an irreconcilable enemy, you can just kill him with one slash. Why do you still want to expose him to the public?” Parading prisoners on the street could serve as a warning to everyone, but this was a method only used by mortal dynasties. People from cultivation forces either killed their enemies directly or were killed by their enemies. If it wasn’t out of anger, they would rarely do such a thing. Seeing Gu Jin’s reaction, Fang Shen’s heart skipped a beat. He quickly said, “Elder Gu Jin, you’ve misunderstood. This person is not only our enemy but also the former leader of a force in Fusheng City.” “This person has always broken the law and committed crimes. He has done many evil deeds. Everyone in Fusheng City must punish him! Our Fang family is doing this not only for revenge but also to vent our anger for the people in Fusheng City!” re Hearing this, Gu Jin chuckled and shook his head. “It’s just some guys who can’t even cultivate. How angry could they be? Even if they have a grudge in their hearts, so what?” “They have no cultivation, so they are destined to live like ants. If they are killed by cultivators, they can only blame their misfortune. Why do you have to stand up for them?” “I understand. Thank you for your guidance, Elder Gu Jin!” Hearing Gu Jin’s words, Fang Shen was overjoyed. This was also what he had always thought! In this world, the strong were respected. Ordinary people who couldn’t cultivate were destined to be trash! There was no need to show the slightest mercy to such a person, let alone be softhearted! He didn’t expect that Elder Gu Jin’s views were so similar to his own. If he hadn’t misunderstood Gu Jin’s words and replied in a dignified manner, he would have regretted not meeting Gu Jin earlier! When everyone present heard Gu Jin’s words, they all revealed a smile of agreement. Only Lei Jingyun’s expression became a little ugly, making him seem exceptionally different. He had long heard that the nine great elders of the sect had different temperaments. Elder Gu Jin had always believed in the survival principle of survival of the fittest, which made him feel extremely disgusted. If he wasn’t in charge of recruiting students in Fusheng City, he wouldn’t have come here with Gu Jin. However, as soon as he arrived at Fusheng City, he thought of that little girl, Wan’er. Sigh, he didn’t know if that little girl’s current cultivation had improved or not. A five or six-year-old in the tempering realm, this was a true monster! However, immediately after, he thought of Jiang Ping’s terrifying strength, as well as that gaze that could kill people, and couldn’t help but shudder again. As expected, if they weren’t similar, they wouldn’t become a family. The whole family was filled with terrifying fellows! Fang Shen naturally didn’t notice the change in Lei Jingyun’s expression. All his attention was on Gu Jin. Gu Jin was already his son’s master, but this kind of relationship was far from enough for cultivation forces like them! He had to invest more to show the Fang family’s value in order to further strengthen the relationship between them. Only then would Gu Jin support the Fang family when they needed help. As one of the nine great elders of Chuanyun Sect, Gu Jin’s attitude often represented Chuanyun Sect. In other words, if the Fang family could get Gu Jin’s support, it would be the same as getting the support of the Chuanyun Sect! At that time, the Fang family would truly be able to reach the heavens in a single step. Even the Blood Fang Gang would no longer dare to treat them like dogs! After coming to this realization, Fang Shen made up his mind. He lowered his voice and said to Gu Jin, “Elder Gu Jin, there’s a scandal in the Fang family that shouldn’t be publicized. However, since you’re my son’s master, then you’re one of us.” “I shall take the liberty as I have another matter that I’d like to ask for Elder Gu Jin’s help!” Hearing this, Gu Jin’s heart sank. Naturally, it wasn’t impossible for him to lend a hand. However, he had just arrived, and the Fang family had yet to express anything. Yet, they wanted him to help them. This was a little too much! However, before he could decline, Fang Shen continued, “This matter is still related to that irreconcilable enemy of the Fang family.” “Our Fang family originally had a high-grade spirit stone. This matter is top secret, and only I know about it.” “But a few days ago, this enemy found out about this matter from who knows where and stole this high-grade spirit stone when I wasn’t paying attention!” “Not only that, but he also entrusted this high-grade spirit stone to an auction house in Fusheng City. He threatened to give the high-grade spirit stone to whoever could take out two of our Fang family’s marketplaces!” “Now that the high-grade spirit stone has been seized by the auction house’s people, don’t you think it’s infuriating?” Fang Shen deliberately pretended to be furious. Gu Jin did not pay attention to him. Ever since he heard the words “high-grade spirit stone”, all his attention had been on it! At this moment, he completely lost his indifferent state from before and immediately said, “As expected, it’s infuriating!” Fang Shen was instantly delighted, he continued, “I originally wanted to take advantage of this opportunity to gift this high-grade spirit stone to you. In the end, this thing has fallen into the hands of the auction house and has even caused many people to have designs on our Fang family. Sigh!” “Outrageous!” Gu Jin immediately bellowed, “Please rest assured, Patriarch Fang. Since this high-grade spirit stone originally belonged to your Fang family, I will naturally help you to get it back! As for those fellows who want to attack the Fang family, let’s see if they have the ability to do so!” “If that’s the case, thank you Elder Gu Jin!” Fang Shen’s face displayed an extremely grateful expression as he bowed and thanked Gu Jin. Actually, after capturing Qiu Chi last night and interrogating him, he knew that the high-grade spirit stone must have been auctioned off by Qiu Chi. Although he did not know where Qiu Chi had gotten the high-grade spirit stone, he suddenly realized that this was a good opportunity. With the enticement of the high-grade spirit stone, many people had their eyes on the Fang family. The Blood Fang Gang said that they wanted to play a double act with him, first swindling the high-grade spirit stone, then returning the two workshops to him. But with the Blood Fang Gang’s style of doing things, they might take the opportunity to annex the Fang family! Instead of being devoured by the Blood Fang Gang, it would be better to use this opportunity to win favor by using the high-grade spirit stone. Not only could Gu Jin appear on his behalf to dispel many people’s restless thoughts, slightly intimidate the Blood Fang Gang, and also build a closer relationship with Gu Jin. It was killing three birds with one stone! Gu Jin naturally did not know what he was thinking, and he did not want to know either. He didn’t even want to know if Fang Shen’s words were true or false. All he needed was for Fang Shen to say so and give him a reason to act. That was a high-grade spirit stone. If he gave it to the sect master, wouldn’t his status in the sect move up a little? At the same time, in Fusheng City, all the cultivation forces were rushing towards the Fang family. Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er went out to play as usual. But today, Jiang Ping, who had nothing to do, also quietly followed behind the three girls. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio On the street of Fusheng City, three little girls held hands and hopped around aimlessly. Wan’er held the hands of her two younger sisters and said confidently, “I will definitely hit the bull’s eye today.” The youngest Liu’er was a little helpless, and her little face drooped. “Sister Wan’er, I don’t want to play darts anymore. I’m already tired of it.” Yan’er covered her mouth and giggled. “With Wan’er’s level, I’m afraid that she wouldn’t be able to hit the target even if she practices every day.” At this moment, Wan’er, who really wanted to prove herself, was a little angry when she heard Yan’er’s words. She let go of her two younger sisters’ hands. “Then let’s make a bet. If I can hit the bull’s eye today, you have to call me elder sister.” “Humph, let’s make a bet. You can’t hit the bull’s eye anyway,” Yan’er said, unwilling to be outdone. Liu’er, who never really had the right to speak, watched her two elder sisters going to the shooting target stall. She could only tag along. “Eh, I remember it’s here. Why did the boss disappear?” When they arrived at the light carriage workshop and saw that the place where the shooting target stall should have been was now empty, Wan’er scratched her head and said in puzzlement. Yan’er secretly smiled and said, “Did Wan’er lead the wrong way?” Wan’er placed her hands on her hips and said to her two younger sisters, “It’s here. If you don’t believe me, you can ask Liu’er. Liu’er, do you think it’s here?” Liu’er also scratched her head. She also remembered that the original stall was at this location. Why did it disappear? “Yes, yes. Sister Wan’er did not lead us to the wrong place. I remember that it’s here.” Wan’er immediately nodded her head. Then, she said with some frustration, “Could it be that the boss is resting? It seems that we won’t be able to play darts today.” Yan’er, who was at the side, continued the topic, “It looks like I won before the bet even started. You still want me to call Wan’’er elder sister? Hmph.” As she spoke, Yan’er crossed her arms in front of her chest, and her face revealed a somewhat arrogant expression. The three little girls didn’t know that after the conflict they had with the Fang family’s eldest daughter some time ago. The boss, who was subservient to the Fang family, didn’t dare to go out and set up his stall. If he did, he would be provoking the Fang family. Therefore, after that incident, the boss hurriedly moved his stall to another location in Fusheng City. At this time, the entrance of the Fang family was crowded with people. It was very noisy and bustling. It just so happened that the light carriage workshop was not far from the Fang family. The three little girls also heard the commotion. Yan’er, who had the spiritual chaos sword physique, was the most sensitive to the surroundings. She was the first to hear the noise coming from the direction of the Fang family. “Wan’er, Liu’er, did you hear something?” Wan’er and Liu’er shook their heads, indicating that they did not hear anything. Yan’er did not explain further. She pulled the two of them and ran to the place where the noise was coming from. As they got closer and closer, Wan’er and Liu’er also heard the noise not far away. When they were about to reach the gate of the Fang family, the three little girls saw a group of people surrounding the gate. Liu’er was the most curious, so she was the first to speak. “What are they doing? Why are there so many people surrounding here and making so much noise?” Wan’er was bold, so she told her two younger sisters, “Let’s go in and take a look.” Then, she brought Yan’er and Liu’er into the crowd. Although they were surrounded by adults, most of them were ordinary people who had not cultivated. Moreover, these three little girls were all tempering realm cultivators. They easily passed through the crowd and arrived at the front row. The three little girls stood at the front and raised their heads in unison to look. They saw a person covered in injuries hanging on the gate of the Fang family. This person was Qiu Chi, who had been caught by the Fang family’s trap last night. Liu’er, who was the youngest, could not bear to see such a scene. She immediately covered her eyes with her two small hands. Wan’er looked carefully for a while and then excitedly pointed at Qiu Chi, who was hanging on the gate beam. “Yan’er, Liu’er, look. Does this person look like the person we met at the shooting target stall that night?” Yan’er pinched her chin and focused her gaze. “It seems to be him.” Liu’er, who was originally covering her eyes with her hands, opened her fingers and looked through the gap. After realizing that it really seemed to be the uncle they met that night, she put down her hands that were covering her eyes and nodded at Wan’er. That night, after the three little girls had a conflict with the Fang sisters, Fang Chun Chun returned home and asked for help. She wanted to harm the three little girls. Wan’er was already eager to make a move that night, but Qiu Chi suddenly appeared out of nowhere, causing the little girl to lose her opponent even if she wanted to fight. Although Qiu Chi had beaten the little girl’s opponent away, when she thought of Qiu Chi’s action, she felt that the person in front of her who was hanging wasn’t that bad, so she told her two sisters. “Yan’er, Liu’er, | don’t think this uncle is a bad person. Why don’t we save him?” Yan’er and Liu’er nodded and did as they were told. Yan’er looked around to see if any tools could be used. Then, her gaze locked onto a man carrying a wicker basket and holding a sickle. Yan’er walked up to the man and said to him with a smile. “Uncle, can I borrow something from you?” Before the man with the wicker basket could react, the sickle in his hand was “borrowed” by the little girl. After the little girl took the sickle, she spun around on the spot and threw the sickle out. The sickle just happened to cut off the rope that was hanging Qiu Chi, and he fell freely. When Wan’er saw this, with a small leap, she arrived at the bottom of Qiu Chi. Then, she stretched out her hands to support Qiu Chi who was about to fall to the ground. Liu’er clapped her hands and cheered from the side. “Good, good! Eldest sister and second sister are mighty!” The people surrounding the Fang family’s gate were shocked by the actions of these two little girls. In an instant, the originally noisy crowd became deathly silent. The middle-aged man carrying a wicker basket and having his sickle snatched away by Yan’er was the first to react and shouted at the three little girls. “Run quickly. You’ve offended the Fang family!” After everyone reacted, they looked at the three cute little girls in front of them, and they kindly persuaded them to leave as soon as possible. “Yeah, hurry up and leave. You won’t be able to leave when the people from the Fang family come out later.” “That’s right. The Fang family is vicious, and they are merciless.” “Whose family do these three reckless young girls belong to? Are there any adults following them? Hurry up and take these little girls away.” “Right, right, right, hurry up and take them away. Otherwise, it’ll be too late when the Fang family comes out.” Meanwhile, Jiang Ping, who had been hiding in the dark while following the three little fellows, couldn’t help but hold his forehead as he thought to himself. His three little darlings are great at getting into trouble. It seemed that he would be involved with the cultivators this time. However, Jiang Ping didn’t show up and take the three little fellows away. He had another motive for following his three daughters besides safeguarding them…. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At the Fang family’s main gate, Wan’er let Qiu Chi rest on the steps in front of the gate after saving him. The people in front of the gate were trying to persuade the three of them to leave, but the three little girls were indifferent as if they did not hear it. “Yan’er, Liu’er, come and take a look. This uncle isn’t dead, is he?” When Liu’er heard her eldest sister’s words, she rushed forward. At this moment, Yan’er was returning the sickle she had picked up back to the man carrying the wicker basket. She even said something strange to the man, “My daddy said that it’s easy to borrow again if one returns the borrowed things on time. Uncle, thank you.” Without even waiting for the man to reply, she turned around and walked to Wan’er, as she left the man standing there in confusion while he held the sickle. Yan’er squatted down beside Qiu Chi and felt his heartbeat. “He’s not dead yet. He just fainted.” Liu’er could not bear to see Qiu Chi in this state of blood and gore. “What should we do next? This uncle has sustained such heavy injuries, he might die later.” Wan’er gently patted Liu’er’s little head. “Bah bah bah! Liu’er, don’t talk nonsense. This uncle is a good man, so he won’t die easily. Just like what daddy said…” Halfway through her words, Wan’er couldn’t recall what her father had said. She could not utter a single word even when her brows furrowed from concentrating hard. Liuer, who was at the side, questioned, “What did daddy say?” “Heaven helps a good man!” Yan’er answered from the side. “Yes, that’s right. That’s the phrase. I just couldn’t remember it for a brief moment.” Wan’er gave her a light pat on her head and said. “Yan’er, you are the brightest with the most tricks. What do you think we should do in this situation?” Wan’er added on. Unconvinced, Yan’er said, “What do you mean by I have the most tricks. It is always your fault when we get in trouble.” As she said that, Yan’er looked away, feeling a little upset. Liu’er persuaded them at the side, “Sisters, stop bickering. If you delay any longer, this uncle might really end up dying.” Qiu Chi would definitely not die. Because Jiang Ping was following his daughters secretly and seeing how his three little girls saved Qiu Chi, his heart was filled with empathy. As he saw that his girls had acted heroically, he secretly used his Qi to seal Qiu Chi’s blood vessels, preventing his wounds from bleeding. “Why don’t we let Wan’er carry this uncle back home and hand him over to daddy? Daddy is omnipotent and will definitely be able to save him.” Yan’er said as she habitually held her chin. Wan’er said hesitantly, “If I carry him home, Will daddy get angry at me for causing trouble outside again?” “Are you stupid? Out of the three of us, you have the most strength. If you don’t carry him, Liu’er and I won’t be able to lift him. Moreover, we’re saving someone’s life this time. Daddy will definitely not scold us.” Yan’er said to dispel her worries. Liu’er also nodded. “That’s right. I believe daddy will not bear to scold us.” The three little girls looked at each other with their minds made up and got to work. Wan’er had decent strength. However, she had the body frame of a five or six-year-old. Qiu Chi was already an adult, and he was three times taller than her. Rather than carrying him, they were more like dragging him. If Qiu Chi’s blood vessels were not sealed by Jiang Ping, he would have bled profusely. Then, the three little girls might have ended up causing more harm than good. Not only did the little girls not run away first, but they had also even wanted to bring the person away with them. This unusual idea of theirs was witnessed by the crowd at the door. Soon, everyone began to discuss the identities of the three little girls. Wan’er dragged Qiu Chi no further than two steps when the Fang family’s butler happened to come out of the door and saw the actions of the three girls. “Stop! Where did you brats come from! Do you know that this is the Fang family’s mansion!” The butler pointed right at the three little girls and shouted in anger. The three little girls who were about to head home turned around and looked at the butler, who was shouting at them ferociously. Yan’er raised her head and glanced at the plaque on the Fang family’s door, then said to the butler. “I know. The two big words on this plaque say ‘Fang Mansion’ right?” The butler was taken aback by the little girl’s words. “If you know this is the Fang Mansion, do you know what you’re doing?” Liu’er stared at the butler. “We’re saving lives. Why are you so dumb, old man? Can’t you see it with your eyes?” Then Liu’er turned to her two elder sisters and said, “Sister Wan’er, Sister Yan’er, is there something wrong with the old man?” As she spoke, she gestured at her head with her index finger. Wan’er and Yan’er examined the old butler, and both of them nodded in agreement. The butler was stunned. It appeared as though these three little girls had just remarked that there was something wrong with his brain. After being insulted, the old butler became angrier. There was a saying among the people, “In front of the Prime Minister’s door stands a seventh-grade official.” The Fang family was a cultivation family, one that even those secular dynasties would not even dare to offend. To be humiliated by some little girls and witnessed by so many people gathered outside the door was a huge embarrassment to him. Following that, the butler yelled and assembled the attendants in the courtyard. The sound of pattering footsteps could be heard from the Fang family’s courtyard. Thereafter, more than a dozen young men walked out from the Fang family’s door holding wooden clubs. Wan’er was the most excited when she saw this scene. After putting Qiu Chi down, she walked forward, laughed, and exclaimed loudly, “Wow, there’s going to be a fight!” Yan’er sighed and ran to the man who was carrying a wicker basket and holding a sickle. “My daddy said that it’s easy to borrow again if one returns the borrowed things on time, Uncle, please lend me your sickle once again.” Before the man could react, the sickle in his hand was swiftly taken away from him. Yan’er trotted back and stood side by side with Wan’er. She turned around and said to Liu’er, “Liu’er, don’t be afraid. Wan’er and I will protect you.” Liu’er nodded obediently. Jiang Ping, who was hiding in the shadows, had no worries at all. Although there were many opponents, they were all low-level cultivators who had not reached the tempering realm. These people would probably have to train for a few more years before they could do any harm to his three precious daughters. If the butler was there when the three little girls had a conflict with the four Fang sisters that night, he might not have looked down on these three little girls. At this moment, he was only thinking that these three harmless young little girls were a little quick-witted and eloquent, and from their outfits, they seemed to be from a wealthy family. He wanted to take down these young girls as soon as possible and then extort a sum of money out of them when their parents came to take them back. He had done many of these dirty things anyway, it didn’t matter to him if he were to do it again. The old butler coughed and said to the attendant, “Capture these three little girls.” These attendants noticed that the two little girls at the front had no fear. They were a little taken aback, but still followed through with the butler’s order. They could care less about these things, in this day and age, it was all about making a living. Wan’er held up a fist and punched the attendant who was leading the way, hitting him right on the chin. The attendant was sent flying backward and landed on the stairs in front of the Fang family’s entrance with a huge impact. She then switched her attention to the few people who had rushed up to her from behind. No matter how many people came up, Wan’er held her ground, stood there, and punched them back. Yan’er was not willing to be outdone. Instead of standing in one place like Wan’er, she held the sickle and rushed in the direction of the attendants. She shuttled back and forth freely under the siege of a few attendants. Her footsteps were quick and light, and none of the attendants were able to lay a finger on Yan’er. Then, she used the back of her sickle to hit the attendants’ arms consecutively. Those who were hit dropped the wooden clubs that they were holding. Soon, they were all kneeling on the ground wailing in pain as they looked at their red and swollen arms.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Ina short while, more than ten strong, young attendants were sprawled on the ground. The two young girls acted in unison. They clapped their hands and placed their hands on their waists. Wan’er shouted, “Is there anyone else!” When the old butler of the Fang family saw this scene, he was completely stunned. After being called back to his senses by Wan’er’s voice, he said while trembling. “All of you… just you wait. If you have the ability, don’t leave!” After saying that, he staggered towards the Fang family’s main hall. In the Fang family’s main hall, Fang Shen was chatting and laughing with Elder Gu Jin and Lei Jingyun of the Chuanyun Sect. “Elder Gu, I believe that the various forces in Fusheng City are about to arrive. Our banquet is about to begin.” Gu Jin stroked his beard and said with a dissatisfied expression, “The forces in Fusheng City are really arrogant. They came even later than me?” Fang Shen immediately added, “Our Fang family is holding a banquet. These forces have to spend some time preparing some small gifts. When the time comes, our Fang family will give these gifts to you as Wuji had acknowledged you as his master.” After hearing these words, Gu Jin revealed a slight smile on his face and nodded at Fang Shen. “Patriarch! Patriarch! Something bad has happened!” The old butler rushed in and shouted. “You have no manners, Fang Ming. Can’t you see that Elder Gu, Elder Lei, and I are having a discussion? Why don’t you know the rules after being in the Fang family for so long?” Patriarch Fang Shen scolded the old butler angrily. The old butler was panting heavily after running in, but he could no longer care about the rules and continued to speak. “Patriarch, there are three little girls outside our door. They want to take Qiu Chi away.” Fang Chun Chun, who had a conflict with Wan’er and the other two girls previously, said, “Tell us what the three little girls look like.” Then, the old butler described the three of them and told them about what they had done outside the door. Fang Chun Chun complained to her father with a sobbing tone after listening, “Daddy, it’s these three little girls. It was because of them that Uncle Hui was seriously injured by Qiu Chi.” The old butler was also adding fuel to the fire at the side. “They also said that the Fang family is just a dog that relies on others. If we get rid of the forces that are backing us, we are just weaklings.” “What!” Fang Shen roared. If it weren’t for the two elders of Chuanyun Sect, the teacup in Fang Shen’s hand would have been shattered. Fang Shen stood up, turned around, and cupped his hands to Gu Jin and Lei Jingyun, “Elders, I have to deal with some family matters, apologies for neglecting the two of you…” Gu Jin did not even raise his head. He only cared about drinking tea and waved his hand to signal Fang Shen to leave. Lei Jingyun nodded his head indifferently. Fang Shen retreated out of the hall and asked the butler to lead the way. He wanted to personally meet these three little girls. At the Fang family’s main gate. Wan’er patted the dust off her body and was about to leave with her two younger sisters and the injured Qiu Chi. However, an evil laugh came from the crowd. “Heh heh! Are you trying to escape after beating someone up?” The commoners who were watching the commotion quickly moved aside and fled when they saw the person who spoke. The person who spoke was the sect master of the Blood Fang Gang, Xue Yu. His name was taboo in Fusheng City. Nobody dared to mention him, afraid that the Blood Fang Gang would use their power to kill their entire family. Looking at the fleeing crowd, Xue Yu didn’t mind. Instead, he called the attendant behind him to come forward. “It’s them. That day, it was the man beside them, along with the people from the Hundred Treasures House, the Golden Door Sect, and the mayor’s mansion, who were confronting each other in front of the Hundred Treasures House.” “And they even called that man daddy.” That attendant was the personal attendant of the young lord of the Blood Fang Gang, Xue Ying, and he was following him that day. At this moment, Xue Yu’s eyes were bloodshot, and he had a ferocious expression. Thinking about how his son was still lying on the bed and his injuries had worsened that he might even die tomorrow. Just as he was worried about where to vent his anger, he bumped into these three little girls. Although he did not know who exactly injured Xue Ying, if his precious son were to die, these people would not be able to escape the fate of being buried together with his son. The order was to capture the three little girls. The Blood Fang Gang was vicious and merciless. They never underestimated their enemies. Even when they faced the three little girls, they still sent out a total of five late-stage tempering realms and a refinement realm attendant. This was also the reason why the Blood Fang Gang could survive in Fusheng City for so long. Wan’er stared at the few guards in front of her who were dressed in black and red clothes, and their bodies were still emitting the smell of blood. “All of you are so ugly, so you are definitely not good people. I will catch all of you in one go!” Yan’er, who was still holding the sickle in her hand, turned around and said to Liu’er who was behind, “Liu’er, when Wan’er and I fight later, you should stay far away. As your elder sisters, we will protect you!” Liu’er saw the group of people who appeared on the opposite side. The aura on their bodies was even more vigorous than the guards of the Fang family. She wanted to join the battle with her two elder sisters and share the burden with them. However, after hearing Yan’er’s words, she could only obediently nod and retreat to the side. After retreating a few steps, Liu’er’s eyes flashed with a touch of redness. A cold voice suddenly sounded in her heart. “Didn’t we agree? When there are bad people, let me speak. Why have you forgotten our agreement?” Liu’er looked around and asked, “It’s you? Where are you?” “I told you, I am you, you are me!” “| am in your body. As long as you agree, I can protect Wan’er and Yan’er!” Liu’er was afraid that others would hear her, so she opened her mouth slightly and said in a small voice, “But Yan’er said that she doesn’t need my help. She only wants me to stay still.” “That’s because they don’t know how powerful you are, so we have to show them that we can also protect them and Daddy!” Liu’er was a little hesitant. After thinking for a moment, she stammered, “Alright.” The refinement realm guard led by the Blood Fang Gang rushed towards Wan’er. He raised his fist and was about to smash Wan’er’s head. Wan’er crossed her hands above her head in an attempt to block the incoming attack. However, a red figure suddenly flashed in front of her eyes. When she looked up, she found that Liu’er, who had been hiding behind her, had already arrived in front of her. Moreover, the originally green dress had unknowingly turned bright red. Liu’er’s small hand blocked the refinement realm attendant’s fist. The attendant wanted to withdraw his fist and throw another punch. However, when he exerted his strength, he realized that no matter how hard he tried, he could not withdraw his hand. Not only his arm, but even other parts of his body could not move. Xue Yu immediately shouted, “Xue Cheng, what are you doing? Why aren’t you attacking?” Xue Cheng was the refinement realm attendant who was currently unable to move. He wanted to reply, but his entire body could not move, and he could not make a sound at all. Xue Cheng looked at Liu’er’s crimson eyes, and he suddenly felt fearful from the bottom of his heart. Then, Liu’er smiled wickedly. The refinement realm attendant discovered that the spiritual Qi that he had cultivated for more than ten years was slowly flowing out of his meridians of the arm with which he waved his fist.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping saw everything. If he hadn’t seen Liu’er’s constitution awaken, he would have appeared the moment Xue Cheng made his move. After all, he wouldn’t let his precious daughter suffer even the slightest bit of harm, even if it was just a superficial injury. As the spiritual Qi in Xue Cheng’s body slowly drained away, his body began to shrivel at a speed visible to the naked eye. The other attendants behind him who were about to attack did not dare to step forward after seeing Xue Cheng’s fate. Wan’er and Yan’er also widened their eyes. “Liu’er, when did you change your clothes?” Wan’er’s focus was only on the changes in Liu’er’s clothes. Yan’er, on the other hand, observed more carefully and asked. “And why did your eyes turn red? You even caught this big guy’s fist.” After Liu’er finished absorbing the spiritual Qi from Xue Cheng’s body, she turned her head and giggled at her two sisters. “Because I also want to protect Wan’er, Yan’er, and Daddy!” The attentive Yan’er immediately realized that something was wrong after listening. She frowned and said, “No, you’re not Liu’er. Liu’er will not call us by our names.” After hearing this, Wan’er also reacted. “Yes, yes. Liu’er usually calls me and Yan’er sister. Who are you? Why do you look so similar to Liu’er?” “I’m Liu’er. Sisters, the two of you don’t know who | am?” Liu’er, who was dressed in red, was forcing a sad expression as she spoke. Wan’er put up her fists and faced Liu ‘er. “You’re not my sister. Quickly tell me where you hid my sister!” Yan’er also held a sickle in her hand and stood behind Wan’er. “Boohoo. My two sisters, don’t you want me anymore? How can you bear to hit me?” Liu’er put on a pretense and raised her small hand to pretend to wipe away her tears. The remaining two sisters stood rooted to the ground, not knowing what to do. Xue Yu, who was standing at the side, witnessed his attendant dying in such a way, and he was even dealt with by a little girl. His face was filled with disbelief. Then, after he carefully observed the changes in Liu’er’s body, he guessed in his heart, could this be a special constitution? Could it be a special constitution that could absorb the spiritual Qi of a person’s cultivation method? Xue Yu, who was originally surprised, began to feel secretly excited because one of the sect masters of the Blood Fang Gang had obtained a cultivation method by chance. This cultivation method could control people’s hearts, but the prerequisite was that the person who controlled it had to be a cultivator with a special constitution, and this special constitution had to be close to evil for it to be effective. Because they hadn’t encountered a cultivator with a special constitution, so no one had ever tried this cultivation method before. It wasn’t until Xue Yu saw the little girl in front of him that he remembered. Although he couldn’t see the little girl’s constitution, judging from the way she killed, it must be in line with the cultivation method that could control a person’s heart. With such a special constitution, her mind would be at its weakest. He thought that if he took this little girl under his wing and nurtured her well, he could use the cultivation method in the gang to control her. When she grew up, who in the entire Fusheng City, and even the entire cultivation world, would dare to disrespect him? On the way to the Fang family’s banquet. Zi Yue and Feng Dan were walking side by side. “This time, the Fang family is really in the limelight,” Feng Dan muttered. Zi Yue joined in the conversation. “Yeah, it’s said that the young master of the Fang family has become a core disciple after acknowledging an elder of the Chuanyun Sect as his master. Moreover, after the commotion caused by the high-grade spirit stones two days ago, “I’m afraid that there will only be more people coming today, not less. Speaking of which, this young master of the Fang family is indeed a fine-looking man. I wonder if the eldest miss of the Golden Door Sect has any thoughts.” Feng Dan glanced at Zi Yue. “Yue’er, don’t bother me. If you are interested in him, I’ll help you talk to the Fang family about matchmaking. Who knows, when the Fang family hears that the eldest miss of the mayor’s mansion is going to marry their young master, the corners of their lips might even curl up to their eyebrows.” As she spoke, she pinched Zi Yue’s slender waist. The two of them were just walking along, and they just happened to bump into the onlookers who were gathered in front of the Fang family’s gate. Seeing the crowd of people fleeing, the two of them were puzzled. Thus, Zi Yue grabbed a person and asked, “Brother, what’s wrong? Why are you running so fast?” The man who was grabbed was carrying a basket on his back. He panted as he pointed at the Fang family’s main gate. “The Blood Fang Gang came and fought with three little girls in front of the Fang family’s main gate.” After saying that, he continued to run away. Feng Dan was indignant. “Hmph! The Blood Fang Gang is really notorious. They usually do evil things, and now they wouldn’t even let the common people off.” Zi Yue was evidently calmer. She frowned. “Do you think the three little girls that the man mentioned just now are…” Without thinking, the two of them ran in the direction of the Fang family. When Xue Yu thought of taking down Lier, this little girl, it would only be beneficial to him, an evil smile hung on his face, and his tongue could not help but lick his lips. “Heh heh, little girl, I’ll give you two choices. Either you come with me.” “Or I’ll personally kill your two sisters!” Hearing this, Liu’er only sneered and did not reply further. Seeing the little girl in front of him react in such a manner, looking down on him, the sect master of the Blood Fang Gang, Xue Yu’s expression became stiff. At this moment, the patriarch of the Fang family happened to come out with a group of trusted attendants. “Fang Shen, you came at the right time. Quickly help me take down these little girls.” Fang Shen had just come out of the hall when he saw the Blood Fang Gang members confronting the three little girls. Wasn’t this what he wanted. He was coming out to settle the trouble, so Fang Shen immediately agreed with Xue Yu. Then, Fang Shen, Xue Yu, and the others surrounded the three little girls. Feng Dan and Zi Yue, who had hurried over, saw the scene in front of them and immediately shouted. “Stop! Does the Blood Fang Gang only bully the weak because you have more people?” “And the Fang family, you’ve arranged a family banquet but now it had become a battle. Are you not afraid that you will make a fool of yourself in the cultivation world?” Hearing this, Xue Yu turned around. “So it’s the daughters of the Golden Door Sect and the mayor’s mansion. You’ve come at the right time. I’ve been coveting you two for a long time.” Zi Yue snorted. “Sect Master Xue, if you were to act like this, aren’t you afraid that the mayor’s mansion and the Golden Door Sect will join hands to take revenge?” “Hahaha!” Xue Yu laughed out loud as if he had just heard the funniest joke in the world. “Let’s not talk about whether the Golden Door Sect is a match for our Blood Fang Gang. Go back and ask your mayor why he didn’t intervene when I, Xue Yu, was stirring up trouble in Fusheng City.” Zi Yue had actually asked her father many times why he didn’t intervene to stop the Blood Fang Gang. If the Blood Fang Gang continued to develop like this, Fusheng City would definitely fall into chaos. However, every time she asked, her father would remain silent. Therefore, at this moment, Zi Yue was dumbfounded by Xue Yu’s question. Feng Dan had a fiery temper. When she heard Xue Yu’s words, she was instantly enraged. “Your Blood Fang Gang is amazing. Even if I die today, I will drag the Blood Fang Gang and the Fang family down with me.” “Die with you? Not to mention you, even your father is not confident in saying these words when he arrives.” “Fang Shen, stop these two women and wait for me to capture these children first.” After Xue Yu finished speaking, he began to move and walked towards Liu’er. Fang Shen did not intend to make enemies with the mayor’s mansion and the Golden Door Sect, but his Fang family was a subsidiary force of the Blood Fang Gang. He had seen the methods of the Blood Fang Gang before. In fact, he had long wanted to break away from the control of the Blood Fang Gang. Moreover, after his son became Chuanyun Sect’s sect elder’s disciple, his desire to break away from the Blood Fang Gang was even stronger. However, before his son had truly grown up, that elder of the Chuanyun Sect would not even look at their Fang family. Therefore, at this moment, he could only stand in front of the two women and block their path. Xue Yu had already walked up to Liu’er and was about to attack. At this moment, a voice came from an unknown corner. “Let me see which scoundrel dares to hurt my precious daughter?”. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Jiang Ping slowly walked out from the side. Wan’er and Yan’er were overjoyed when they saw him. They didn’t care about the Blood Fang Gang or the Fang family and ran over to hug him. “Daddy, these uncles look like bad people. Yan’er is afraid.” “Yes, yes, Daddy. Wan’er too. Quickly go and reason with these uncles.” Jiang Ping squatted down and held his two daughters as he said with a smile. “Wan’er, Yan’er, don’t be afraid. Daddy is here.” Then, he turned his gaze to Liu’er who was still in the crowd. “Liu’er! Come back quickly!” Wan’er whispered in Jiang Ping’s ear, “Daddy, this isn’t Liu’er.” Yan’er also added, “That’s right. Just now, Wan’er and I could tell that she isn’t Liu’er. Liu’er wouldn’t talk to us like that.” Jiang Ping touched the two little girls’ heads. “Okay, okay. Daddy understands.” Then he shouted at Liu’er in a deep voice, “Liu’er!” This time, Jiang Ping’s voice was mixed with some spiritual energy. His voice traveled into Liu’er’s ears along with the spiritual energy. Liu’er’s body trembled. The red color on her eyes slowly faded away, and her clothes turned from dark red to the original green color. Hearing her father’s voice, Liu’er turned her head and called out happily, “Daddy, why are you here?” Then, like the two little girls, she escaped from the Blood Fang Gang’s encirclement and pounced into Jiang Ping’s arms. “Daddy, I missed you so much.” Jiang Ping also took the opportunity to stop this little girl. “It’s only been half a day, and you already miss me.” Liu’er blinked her big eyes and said, “Half a day? But I feel like it’s been a long time.” When Jiang Ping heard this, he thought to himself, could this be a side effect of the resurrection lily? “Alright, we’ll talk about it when we get back. Daddy still has to reason with the uncles.” The three little fellows nodded one after another. After letting his three daughters hide behind him, Jiang Ping stood up and faced the crowd. Just as he was about to speak, Xue Yu spoke first. “Are you the mysterious person who was present in Room 12 when my son was injured that day?” Jiang Ping extended his thumb and pointed at himself. “Yes, that’s right.” Xue Yu pressed, “Then let me ask you, did you have anything to do with my son’s injury that day?” Jiang Ping nodded. “It really is you. I knew that the person who could afford so many middle-grade spirit stones would definitely not be an ordinary person.” “I didn’t think that you would really dare to admit it. Then, I can only kill you and abduct your daughter. Otherwise, it would be difficult to resolve the hatred in my heart!” Jiang Ping spread out his hands. “Oh? You want to kill me and abduct my daughter? Come and try and see if you can do it.” Xue Yu was certainly not a stupid person since he could become the sect master of the Blood Fang Gang. Seeing Jiang Ping’s calm and composed manner, he felt strange. However, he also noticed that the man in front of him, his cultivation was at most in the core building realm. He was still far from being comparable to him, who was in the middle stage origin core realm. Therefore, Xue Yu was weighing the pros and cons. He was also guessing whether Jiang Ping was really calm or just bluffing. The corners of Jiang Ping’s mouth curled up slightly. This was because when he first appeared, Jiang Ping had already lowered his cultivation realm. He wanted to tease these idiots who wanted to attack his daughter. Xue Yu couldn’t make up his mind. He decided to find someone to test him out first. “Fang Shen, this person’s cultivation is only at the initial stage of the core building realm. After you finish him off, you can treat it as a practice session.” Hearing this, Fang Shen’s heart was filled with joy. Firstly, after changing targets, he wouldn’t have to offend the Golden Door Sect and the mayor’s mansion. Secondly, once he heard that the other party was only at the initial stage of the core building realm, compared to him who was already at the late stage of the core building realm, it would be easy. With an evil smile on his face, he charged towards Jiang Ping. However, before he could reach Jiang Ping, his entire body seemed to have hit a huge barrier, and he was sent flying backward. Bang! With a loud bang, he crashed into the pillar at the entrance. Crackling sounds could be heard on the pillar, and soon after, numerous cracks appeared. When Zi Yue and Feng Dan saw this scene, their eyes were wide open. They completely didn’t expect that the man they had saved two days ago was actually so strong. Even Fang Shen’s core building realm strength couldn’t touch him at all. Thinking of how the two of them had tried to draw their swords to help Jiang Ping in exchange for a good impression on them was so childish. It made Feng Dan blush at this moment. Xue Yu was a little surprised in his heart, but he didn’t show it too much. After all, he had planned to let Fang Shen test the truth. It seemed that he was right to be cautious. This person must have hidden his strength, but it was hard to say what exactly his realm was. Gu Jin and Lei Jingyun, who were drinking tea in the hall, heard the loud bang outside the door. They put down the teacups in their hands and wanted to go to the door to check. The two elders of the Chuanyun Sect flew through the air. When they arrived at the Fang family’s gate, they saw the wailing figure lying on the ground. Gu Jin flew into a rage. Did these people not know that the Fang family’s banquet was held because of him? He was a core elder of the Chuanyun Sect. This was a slap to his own face, not just the Fang family. Ignoring Fang Shen’s anguished wail, Gu Jin angrily rebuked the other party. “Fang Shen, what’s going on? Don’t these people know that today’s banquet is to welcome me?” As he spoke, Gu Jin took the opportunity to inspect the crowd. Lei Jingyun also followed Gu Jin’s gaze and glanced at the crowd. When Lei Jingyun glanced around, it frightened him. The first few girls he saw were Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er. Then he looked at the adult beside them. It was Jiang Ping. The fear of being dominated in Xiaoyu Town surged in his heart. He had thought that he would never see them again in this lifetime. It was fine if they were to see each other again, but why did it have to be in such a manner! “Old Uncle Lei! Why are you here? Look at me. I’m Wan’er!” Wan’er stuck her head out from behind Jiang Ping and jumped up high while raising her small hands. When Lei Jingyun was under house arrest in the Jiang Mansion, he often secretly taught Wan’er martial arts techniques. Later, when Jiang Ping found out about it, he chased him out of the Jiang Mansion. Although he had always been concerned about Wan’er’s talent and wanted to take her in as a disciple, now that Jiang Ping was here, Lei Jingyun’s old face instantly turned red. He could only wave at Wan’er awkwardly as a greeting. When Jiang Ping saw Lei Jingyun, his reaction was also stunned. Then, he patted his forehead and muttered. “Why is it related to the Chuanyun Sect again?” Originally, he had moved his family to Fusheng City because he didn’t want to be involved with cultivators. He was afraid that the people of the Chuanyun Sect would think about his daughter’s talent and have evil thoughts. Who would have thought that Fusheng City would still be related to this lousy sect? As acore elder of the Chuanyun Sect, Gu Jin frowned. “Lei Jingyun, do you know these people?” Lei Jingyun was only an outer sect elder of the Chuanyun Sect. He was more than one rank lower than Gu Jin, so he quickly bowed. “I’ve interacted with them in Xiaoyu Town. I hope Elder Gu won’t make things difficult for them.” Actually, when Lei Jingyun said that Gu Jin shouldn’t make things difficult for Jiang Ping and the others, in his heart, he was thinking, “You mustn’t provoke this person. I don’t want to die here with you.” Although he didn’t know Jiang Ping’s current cultivation, he was subdued by him with just one move in Xiaoyu Town. Therefore, he believed that Gu Jin was no match for Jiang Ping. Gu Jin snorted coldly and flicked his sleeves. “Then, how should I explain today’s matter?” “If word gets out that our Chuanyun Sect was humiliated by the cultivators of Fusheng City, and we didn’t do anything about it, the sect’s reputation would be ruined. Are you going to receive the punishment from the sect master?” After saying this, Gu Jin pointed at Fang Shen, who was still lying on the ground.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Lei Jingyun couldn’t think of any good countermeasures at the moment. He bowed even lower. Jiang Ping was getting impatient. “Is Chuanyun Sect always so long-winded? If there’s nothing else, I’ll take my daughters and leave first.” He never wanted to have anything to do with cultivators. Fortunately, judging from Lei Jingyun’s words just now, he didn’t tell the sect about Wan’er’s matter. Otherwise, Lei Jingyun would not be bending over, but lying down. Xue Yu was stirring up trouble by the side. “You still want to leave? You clearly don’t take Elder Gu’s words seriously.” Jiang Ping’s eyes coldly glanced at Xue Yu. Xue Yu’s heart suddenly trembled, and he did not dare to look directly into Jiang Ping’s eyes. Because Xue Yu was adding fuel to the fire by the side, Gu Jin’s already ugly expression became even uglier. “If you want to leave, that’s fine. Since you’re Elder Lei’s friend, I won’t make things difficult for you, but you have to be reasonable in everything. After what you’ve done today, my reputation is definitely affected.” “How about this? Just leave that little girl’s hand behind.” Then, he extended his hand and pointed at Wan’er. Wan’er was originally in a good mood when she saw Lei Jingyun. But when she heard this weird old man in front of her say that he wanted to chop off one of her hands, she spoke to her father in a sobbing tone. “Daddy, I don’t want to turn into a monster with one hand.” Jiang Ping patted Wan’er’s head and said, “It’s okay. I’m here. No one can bully you.” The little girl nodded with reddened eyes and bit her lips. “Elder Gu, please don’t…” Lei Jingyun tried to persuade him by the side. But he was interrupted by Gu Jin, who reached out his hand to interrupt him. Since Gu Jin’s rank was higher than his, so Lei Jingyun had no choice but to keep quiet. Xue Yu laughed in his heart. His plan has succeeded. When they start fighting, he will quietly take the girl with the special constitution away and hide. By the time they realize it, he would have become the biggest beneficiary. Jiang Ping’s expression didn’t change much as he said to Zi Yue and Feng Dan. “Miss Zi, Miss Feng, can you promise me something?” The two girls were originally just spectators, and they were stunned when they were suddenly called. “Ah… what is it?” Zi Yue replied to Jiang Ping. “Help me bring these little girls and Qiu Chi further away. Protect them well, and you will be heavily rewarded afterward.” As Jiang Ping spoke, he kicked the unconscious Qiu Chi. “Mm… okay.” Jiang Ping squatted down and said to his three daughters. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, why don’t you guys go play with these two aunties first?” “Daddy, you’re not going to fight, right? Wan’er can help daddy.” “Yan’er can help too.” “Liu’er, Liu’er should be able to do that too.” He smiled at the three little girls and said, “Okay, okay. Daddy knows that the three of you are great, but I’m not going to fight. I’m going to reason with the uncles and grandpas.” “Do you remember what daddy had said?” Yan’er nodded and answered. “Yes, Daddy said that when you have a conflict with someone, you have to reason with them first.” Wan’er waved her little fists at the side. “If you can’t reason with them, then beat him up!” This last sentence was made up by Wan’er. Jiang Ping had never encouraged them to fight with others since they were young. Jiang Ping stretched out his finger and gently tapped Wan’er’s forehead. Then, he waved his hand and asked Zi Yue and Feng Dan to come over. The two women ran to Jiang Ping’s side. Jiang Ping handed his three daughters over to them. Then, he took out the Heavenly treasure concealment plate from his storage space and handed it to Feng Dan. Feng Dan held the Heavenly treasure concealment plate in her hand with a puzzled expression. “This is?” “This is the Heavenly treasure concealment plate. It can hide the aura of cultivators and has a certain defensive function. Help me keep it for now. When I’m done, you can return it to me.” Feng Dan nodded. Jiang Ping had the two women leave with his daughters first. While leaving, Feng Dan looked at the other party’s lineup with a hint of worry in her eyes. When she looked at Jiang Ping again, she found that he always had a smile on his face. He had always been calm and composed. Only then did her eyes lit up. When Feng Dan and Zi Yue left with Qiu Chi and the three little girls, Jiang Ping’s expression began to change. His expression changed from a smiling face to a cold expression. Gu Jin was about to speak when Jiang Ping jumped up from where he was and arrived in front of him in an instant. Slap! A loud slap landed on Gu Jin’s face. Gu Jin was caught off guard. He covered his left cheek and stared at the young man in front of him with his eyes wide open. He… he… how dare he! “There was too much nonsense just now. There’s no need to say it now. I’m just going to beat you up.” Jiang Ping raised his hand and was about to slap him again. As acore elder of the Chuanyun Sect, Gu Jin still had the willpower. After he reacted, he dodged Jiang Ping’s slap. After dodging Jiang Ping’s slap, Gu Jin took three steps back. After stabilizing his body, he was about to launch an attack. Gu Jin stretched out his right hand, and a long sword appeared in his hand. After injecting his spiritual energy into the sword, he swung the sword at Jiang Ping. The blade, which was flashing with purple light, was about to fall on Jiang Ping’s head, but Jiang Ping dodged it by turning his body sideways. After dodging Gu Jin’s attack, Jiang Ping took the opportunity to throw a punch. It hit Gu Jin in the abdomen, and then Gu Jin flew backward and crashed into the Fang family’s courtyard wall. With a boom, the courtyard wall collapsed, and dust filled the air. Lei Jingyun, who was hiding far away, quietly watched the fight between the two. This wasn’t the stance of reasoning with others. This was purely beating someone up for fun. At this time, Xue Yu was about to sneak away, wanting to catch up with Zi Yue and the others and then take Liu’er away. When he wanted to raise his legs, he realized that his feet seemed to be firmly nailed to the ground. Jiang Ping shouted at the broken courtyard wall, “Old man, I didn’t use any strength. Don’t pretend to be dead.” Dust was still flying in the air, and Gu Jin’s figure couldn’t be seen clearly. Seeing this, Jiang Ping couldn’t be bothered with him. He turned around and faced Xue Yu and the others. Xue Yu summoned all the spiritual energy in his body and instilled it into his legs, but he still couldn’t move. Jiang Ping raised his palm and clenched his fist. Xue Yu and his guards became pools of blood. In fact, Jiang Ping had long seen through Xue Yu’s intentions, and Jiang Ping wasn’t a soft-hearted person. Of all people, he had to target his daughter. Then he could only go to hell. A white figure dashed out from the collapsed courtyard wall of the Fang family. Gu Jin was worthy of being a core elder. He was ruthless and hid in the rubble, waiting for an opportunity. When he saw that Jiang Ping’s back was facing him, he seized the opportunity to attack. Gu Jin held his sword with both hands. The tip of the sword was in front of him, and he dashed towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping didn’t even turn his head. He only curled the corners of his mouth slightly and sneered. He raised his palm behind him. Gu Jin bounced back before he could touch Jiang Ping. He was flung into the rubble again. At this time, Jiang Ping slowly turned around. “Do you think I’m stupid that you’re still trying to play tricks on me? Do you think you’re worthy?” Gu Jin’s clothes were tattered, and blood was oozing out from his forehead. He spat out a mouthful of blood and said to Jiang Ping through gritted teeth. “Aren’t you afraid of receiving our Chuanyun Sect’s revenge?” Jiang Ping smiled slightly. “Chuanyun Sect? I’ve never even heard of such a small third-rate sect. How can I be afraid?” “I’m worried that you won’t dare to come after me.” After saying that, Jiang Ping raised his hand and wanted to kill him off. If he kept such a person alive, he would be very annoying, but he would definitely not pose a problem to him in the future.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Seeing that Jiang Ping was going to kill him, Gu Jin took out a pill from his back. He opened his mouth and stuffed the pill into his mouth. Gu Jin knew that he was going to die for sure. The pill he took out was a soul-guarding pill given by the sect master to a core elder of the Chuanyun Sect who had been in the sect for more than 20 years or who had made significant contributions to the sect. After eating the soul-guarding pill, when one received a fatal attack, the pill would exert its medicinal effect to protect a wisp of one’s soul and allow one to escape. Moreover, the remaining wisp of a person’s soul could be reincarnated by possessing a new body through a secret method. Although one’s strength would be greatly reduced after being reincarnated, one could slowly recover their original realm through cultivation in the future. Jiang Ping raised his hand and clenched his fist. Gu Jin’s body exploded like Xue Yu, turning into a pool of blood. However, a wisp of Gu Jin’s remnant soul left his body before his body exploded. Then, it flew up into the sky at an extremely fast speed. “Soul-guarding pill? This thing is interesting. A soul can fly so fast. It seems that I miscalculated and let him escape.” Jiang Ping muttered to himself as he looked at the wisp of soul that had escaped. “Patriarch Jiang, I’m still here. If you don’t have any instructions, I’ll take my leave first.” Lei Jingyun rubbed his hands together as he walked towards Jiang Ping with a smile. He had experienced Jiang Ping’s methods before, so at this moment, he was very respectful towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping looked at Lei Jingyun with a look of disdain. “Do you think we have a grudge in our past lives? How could I encounter you even after I moved? If I had known earlier, I would have finished you off directly, sparing me from feeling troubled when I look at you now.” “Hehe, isn’t this fate? Moreover, I also stopped that old man Gu Jin from making a move on Wan’er. Unfortunately, my cultivation is not as high as his. Otherwise, I wouldn’t have needed Patriarch Jiang to make a move.” He knew Jiang Ping’s temperament. As long as he didn’t cross Jiang Ping’s bottom line, he wouldn’t die. However, if Jiang Ping was triggered, he would be injured even if he didn’t die. Therefore, Lei Jingyun could only smile and talk to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping waved his hand. “You’re lucky, old man. Wan’er likes you, and you kept your promise and didn’t report Wan’er’s matter to the sect, so I won’t kill you for now.” “But if I find out that you still have evil thoughts about my daughter, then you will be lucky. I’m afraid the entire Chuanyun Sect will be buried with you.” Lei Jingyun beamed with joy. Jiang Ping’s words implied that he could leave safely. Just as he was about to bid farewell to Jiang Ping, Jiang Ping looked at the mess around him and said. “Wait, I’ll have to trouble Elder Lei to deal with this mess.” He pointed at Fang Shen, who was still lying unconscious on the ground. “I won’t kill him. Just help me break one or two of his tendons and bones and reduce his realm.” “Such a big project needs a helper, right?” Lei Jingyun immediately understood what Jiang Ping meant and nodded repeatedly, saying that he would take care of it. In the end, Jiang Ping told the old man to move faster and directly walked over to catch up with his daughters. After Jiang Ping walked far away, Lei Jingyun squatted down beside Fang Shen and gave him two tight slaps. Seeing that the unconscious Fang Shen showed no signs of waking up, he wanted to take off his pants and wash Fang Shen’s hair. Before he could finish taking off his belt, Fang Shen opened his eyes in a daze. The moment he opened his eyes, he saw Lei Jingyun was about to take off his pants, and he was so scared that he instantly became alert. This old man wanted to do something to him. He couldn’t just do whatever he wanted just because he was an elder of the Chuanyun Sect, right. Lei Jingyun saw Fang Shen’s shocked expression and seemed to have read his mind. He immediately went up and gave him a kick. “You’re thinking too much. I was trying to wake you up.” After that, he blocked some of Fang Shen’s meridians and told him the ins and outs of the situation, asking him to clean up the mess from now on. Meanwhile, Lei Jingyun was watching from the side and acting like a boss. Jiang Ping never used the ability to fly in front of his daughters because he was afraid that his three little daughters would ask questions. Therefore, Jiang Ping ran all the way to catch up with Zi Yue and Feng Dan. The two adults and three little ones walked side by side. Wan’er was still dragging the unconscious Qiu Chi. “Do you want me to help you carry Uncle Qiu Chi?” Feng Dan, who was holding the Heavenly treasure concealment plate, bent down and said to Wan’er. Wan’er shook her head. “I’m not tired. I’m very strong.” Zi Yue and Feng Dan looked at Qiu Chi, who was being dragged like this. They thought to themselves, “Even if he didn’t die, he would be dragged to death by you.” From the beginning, the two of them wanted to help Wan’er carry Qiu Chi, but this little girl refused. She said that she would carry him back on her own. When her daddy finds out, he would definitely praise her. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, Daddy is back.” Jiang Ping shouted from behind them. When the little girls heard Jiang Ping’s voice, they quickly turned around to look. After Wan’er let go of her hand, Qiu Chi fell to the ground again. She didn’t care about Qiu Chi anymore and ran straight to Jiang Ping. The other two little girls also did the same. They let go of Zi Yue and Feng Dan’s hands and quickly ran away. Only Zi Yue and Feng Dan were left standing where they were, checking Qiu Chis injuries. “Eh, strange. He’s heavily injured. Logically speaking, he shouldn’t be able to live for long.” “Why does it look like his breathing is stable now, and his meridians don’t seem to be damaged?” Feng Dan bent down and used her spiritual energy to check Qiu Chi’s injuries as she spoke. Zi Yue used her chin to point in the direction of Jiang Ping. Feng Dan had an answer to the doubts in her heart. The man in front of her didn’t look old at all. It was really hard to guess. Jiang Ping squatted down as usual and opened his arms to embrace the little cuties. Wan’er raised her little head and said to Jiang Ping. “Daddy, have you reasoned with them?” “Yes, I had a great chat with the uncles and grandpas. They even want me to stay over there to eat.” “Did you have dinner with them, Daddy?” “No, I have to come back to accompany Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er.” “Wan’er knows that Daddy likes us the most.” Jiang Ping put the youngest Liu’er on his shoulder. Then, he held Wan’er with one hand and Yan’er with the other. “Come, let’s go home.” Liu’er was riding on Jiang Ping’s neck. She grabbed Jiang Ping’s hair with one hand, afraid that she would fall off, and waved her small fists with the other. “Let’s go. Liu’er is going home with daddy and her sisters.” Jiang Ping said with a smile when he walked to Zi Yue and Feng Dan’s side. “If you don’t mind, come to my residence to have dinner. I also want to thank you for taking care of my daughters today.” Because she had only met the man in front of her twice, Zi Yue felt that it was somewhat inappropriate. Just as she was about to decline politely, she felt Feng Dan’s grip on her arm tighten. She immediately understood and agreed to Jiang Ping’s invitation. Then, Feng Dan pointed at Qiu Chi who was lying on the ground. Jiang Ping lowered his head to look at Qiu Chi, who was sleeping like the dead and thought to himself. How could he have forgotten about this fellow? Then, he gave Wan’er a look. Wan’er immediately understood and dragged Qiu Chi along with her to follow Jiang Ping home. Zi Yue and Feng Dan followed behind and suddenly felt that this family seemed a little… interesting?. <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio<strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio At dusk, the setting sun shone brightly in the Jiang Mansion, making it look like an immortal’s mansion. It was no wonder that he had spent one high-grade spirit stone to exchange for this mansion. “We’re home. You little rascals, go look for auntie first, okay?” Jiang Ping put Liu’er down and said to his three daughters. “Daddy won’t accompany Wan’er anymore? I want daddy.” “Yan’er too.” “Liu’er misses daddy so much. I want daddy to play with me.” Liu’er said while hugging Jiang Ping’s thigh. “Be good. Go wash up with auntie first. After daddy settles this injured uncle, I’ll cook something delicious for you, okay?” When they heard that their father was going to cook, the three little greedy cats were very excited. They repeatedly said yes and then ran to Li Sushang’s room. Jiang Ping lifted Qiu Chi and said to Zi Yue and Feng Dan. “Come with me to the study first. I have to settle this guy first.” The two girls followed Jiang Ping to the study. When they reached the study, Jiang Ping placed Qiu Chi on the chair. Then, he flipped his hand and took out the high-quality healing medicine that he had received as a reward from the system for signing. He fed it to Qiu Chi. Jiang Ping looked at Qiu Chi and muttered softly. “It’s a waste to give such good medicine to you. Not only are you stupid, but you’re also brave. Do you think you can exact revenge with your current state?” After feeding Qiu Chi the medicine, Qiu Chi was still sleeping soundly. Jiang Ping sat in the middle of the study room and pointed at the two empty seats, letting Zi Yue and Feng Dan sit down. Zi Yue saw that Jiang Ping ignored Qiu Chi after feeding him the medicine and asked. “That’s all? There’s no need to inject spiritual Qi to help him heal?” Jiang Ping waved his hand and said, “Don’t worry. He’ll wake up soon. You guys take a seat first.” Zi Yue followed Jiang Ping’s words and sat down. Feng Dan handed the Heavenly treasure concealment plate back to Jiang Ping before sitting down next to Zi Yue. Jiang Ping nodded and took the Heavenly treasure concealment plate. “Thank you both for taking care of my three daughters today. As promised, I will give you some compensation.” After saying that, he took out two high-grade spirit stones from his storage space and placed them on the table. “These two spirit stones will be given to you as a thank-you gift.” Zi Yue and Feng Dan’s mouths were wide open in shock. No matter how much they thought about it, they would never have thought that the thank-you gift that Jiang Ping had promised was actually two high-grade spirit stones. Moreover, Jiang Ping had given them away so casually. “Mr. Jiang, this is just a small matter. We didn’t help you very much. Therefore, I’m afraid that we won’t feel at ease taking these two high-grade spirit stones,” Zi Yue said after careful consideration. Jiang Ping dug his fingers into his ears. “Alright, alright, enough with the pleasantries. I know how much benefit these two spirit stones will bring to your sect, so just accept them.” “Also, I have another request. After you accept these two spirit stones, you will no longer have anything to do with our Jiang family.” “Of course, you two can still stay for a meal later.” The reason he said this was because he wanted to put aside his relationship with the cultivator sects, because he really hated dealing with those high and mighty cultivators. Although Zi Yue said she wouldn’t take it, she had a burning gaze when she looked at the two stones that were emitting green and blue light. Feng Dan, on the other hand, was a bit hesitant, sitting on the stool in a somewhat awkward position. Originally, she was also very interested in this stone. But when Jiang Ping said that they would no longer have anything to do with the Jiang family after they accept this stone, she suddenly felt that the stone wasn’t as valuable as before. Suddenly, the stone that could allow her sect to become a first-class sect didn’t seem to be that valuable anymore. Jiang Ping took the initiative and handed the stone to them. “It’s settled then. Take it, take it.” Zi Yue took the stone and carefully put it into her storage space. Feng Dan was in a daze while holding the stone. Just as she was about to refuse Jiang Ping to return the stone, Qiu Chi woke up. “This is… this is my home?” Qiu Chi, who had just opened his eyes, said in a daze. Jiang Ping replied, “This isn’t your home. Your home has already been sold to me. This is my home now.” “I remember now. I sold my house to seek revenge against the Fang family.” “I was going to seek revenge against the Fang family… then why am I here?” Jiang Ping held his forehead and sighed as he said to the two ladies. “You two explain to him. I’m going to cook for my precious daughters. I’ll let the servants inform you when it’s time to eat.” With that said, he walked out of the door, rolled up his sleeves, and headed to the kitchen. The Sun had already set. When it was time to eat, Jiang Ping placed the cutlery neatly on the dining table. “Uncle Chen, go to the study and call the few of them over to eat. As well as Sushang and the little ones.” The butler, Chen Zhong, replied and left to inform the others. Soon, Zi Yue and the other two walked out of the study. When they saw Jiang Ping, Qiu Chi immediately knelt down and hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh while crying. The two women at the side saw this scene and felt that it was a little comical. Qiu Chi hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh. Snot and tears dripped from his chin to the ground as he choked. “Mr. Jiang, you are my savior!” Jiang Ping wanted to push him away, but this fellow hugged him too tightly. No matter how hard he tried, he was stuck to his leg. Feeling helpless, Jiang Ping could only speak. “Believe it or not, if you continue like this, I will beat you until you’re half dead and throw you on the street. Let’s see if anyone will save you this time.” Qiu Chi had no choice but to let go of Jiang Ping’s thigh and said while wiping his tears. “I heard from Miss Zi and Miss Feng that Mr. Jiang fought with those people at the Fang family’s entrance. I want to ask, is my enemy, Fang Shen, still there?” still have to take revenge personally. If I don’t kill him myself, I won’t be able to face my fallen brothers from the Sky Wolf Sect.” Jiang Ping patted his robe with some disdain. “He’s still there. And if nothing unexpected happens, killing him right now would be as easy as flipping your hand. If you’re not hungry, you can rush to the Fang family right now.” Qiu Chi was a little confused. Killing him would be easy? Why didn’t the two ladies mention this just now. The two ladies had already left after the battle started. They didn’t know the details, so they didn’t know that Fang Shen’s meridians had been blocked by Lei Jingyun. ow that Fang Shen’s cultivation had fallen to the tempering realm, he was tidying up his own house’s entrance with tears in his eyes. Lei Jingyun also took a chair and sat down to supervise him. Jiang Ping didn’t explain further. He let the three of them sit down and prepared to eat. Li Sushang arrived with Wan’er and Yan’er. “Why aren’t we seeing Liu’er? Where’s Liu’er?” Li Sushang asked Jiang Ping. “Liu’er said earlier that she was sleepy and wanted me to bring her back to sleep. That little girl fell asleep as soon as she touched the bed.” “I was wondering the same thing. Usually, these little fellows don’t want to go to bed until it was on the dot.” Jiang Ping thought in his heart that could this be due to the resurrection lily? “It’s okay. I’ll watch Liu’er later. If she wakes up in the middle of the night, I’ll heat up some dishes for her.” He knew that it was useless to think too much now. It was better to eat first and then check on Liu’er later.. Wan’er sat on the stool with her mouth wide open. She picked up the chopsticks on the table and put some food into her bowl. “Daddy, I can’t reach that braised pork. Daddy, help me.” Jiang Ping straightened his body and said to Wan’er. “Wan’er, didn’t daddy tell you to pay attention to dining etiquette? The guests haven’t even started, and you’re already rushing.” Wan’er’s small face drooped as she replied softly, “I understand.” Yan’er, who was at the side, covered her small mouth and snickered when she saw Wan’er being scolded. Jiang Ping nodded his head in satisfaction and then gestured for the three of them to start eating. Qiu Chi, who had been unconscious for an entire day, had an empty stomach. He moved so quickly that he couldn’t care less about his table manners. He stuffed the food into his mouth without bothering to taste the food. Feng Dan and Zi Yue looked at the table full of dishes. Not to mention trying it, they had never even seen it before. They picked up a small piece with their chopsticks and tasted it carefully. Both of them had surprised expressions on their faces. In the end, the two of them picked up the food faster and faster. Jiang Ping saw it and expected that. He had spent a lot of effort to become good at cooking that he had “destroyed” the kitchen several times in his previous life. The food was unique in this world. Wan’er and Yan’er started to get anxious when they saw Qiu Chi wolfing down his food. They hadn’t eaten much, so there wouldn’t be any food left after this weird uncle ate all of it. Thus, a strange scene appeared at the dining table. The three adults and two children seemed to be on a battlefield at the dining table. The excitement was no less than the battle that Jiang Ping had at the Fang family’s entrance today. After dinner, Jiang Ping sent the three of them out of the door. “Everyone, once you leave this door, I hope you won’t have any unnecessary interactions with our Jiang family.” “Benefactor, where should I go?” Qiu Chi said in a low voice. “You can go wherever you want. This is my home now. Don’t you want revenge? Go and take revenge.” Feng Dan was about to speak. Jiang Ping interrupted them, not letting them speak. “Hurry up and leave. I really don’t want to have anything to do with cultivators.” After saying this, he closed the door. Qiu Chi lowered his head and pondered for a moment, then left. Zi Yue and Feng Dan walked leisurely on the street. “Yo, it seems like Miss Feng has something on her mind too.” “Yue’er, don’t talk nonsense. I don’t have anything on my mind.” Zi Yue smile and said while putting her hands on her waist. “Then why aren’t you happy? You have a high-grade spirit stone in your pocket, but there’s not a trace of joy on your face. Instead, your brows are tightly knitted together. You looked very much like a woman who was disappointed when she parted with her beloved husband.” Feng Dan grumbled to Zi Yue. “I don’t like what you’re saying today.” Zi Yue placed both hands on Feng Dan’s shoulders and whispered behind her ears. “Because I was right.” Feng Dan shook her shoulders and shrug off Zi Yue’s hand. “Don’t talk nonsense. I just feel a little… a little uncomfortable.” Zi Yue held Feng Dan’s hand. “I know that you wanted to return the spirit stone to him at the door just now, but think about it carefully. Even if you don’t accept this spirit stone, will that person associate with you?” Feng Dan bit her lips without saying a word. Zi Yue sighed and patted Feng Dan’s head. “Hey, let’s go home. I haven’t slept with you for a long time. I won’t go home tonight, so I’ll stay with you.” Then, Zi Yue pulled Feng Dan and walked over. After Jiang Ping coaxed Wan’er and Yan’er to sleep, he quietly carried Liu’er to his room. After placing Liu’er safely on his bed, Jiang Ping summoned the system with a thought. Then, he signed in today. [Signing Reward: Lingering Colorful Dress] [Effect: After wearing it, you can suppress the demons in your mind, and you can change the color of your clothes at will. It also has a certain defensive effect.] Wasn’t this too much of a coincidence? He was still having a headache about the resurrection lily matter, and this signing reward has directly resolved for him? One had to know that in the past, the signing rewards were either spirit stones or medicinal pills. They were all things that Jiang Ping currently didn’t need. Could it be that this system would follow its master’s heart? Actually, Jiang Ping didn’t know what was going on with the resurrection lily constitution. During this period of time, he had checked all the ancient books in this world, but there were no records of it. And there were only a few sayings in the system that introduced this constitution. “A twin body, with both good and bad coexisting.” Jiang Ping understood a little about the twin body saying. It was similar to the dual personality in his previous life, but the existence of both good and bad made Jiang Ping a little worried. Could it be that this constitution would bring harm to his daughter? He couldn’t care less. Since he had no clue now, he might as well directly put on the Lingering Colorful Dress on Liu’er. If he could temporarily suppress the other side of Liu’er, that would also be a solution. After making up his mind, he took the dress and tried to put them on Liu’er. However, when he approached Liu’er, he hadn’t put them on yet. Liu’er’s green clothes turned red again, and then she slowly sat up. “Daddy, are you going to lock Liu’er up?” “Daddy, how can you be so cruel?” Liu’er’s voice was not as childish as usual, and there was a trace of evil charm. “You are not Liu’er, you will hurt her.” Jiang Ping calmly spoke to the other Liu’er who was in her body. “How am I not Liu’er? I am Liu’er, Liu’er is me.” When she said this, there was a slight sobbing tone in her voice. Jiang Ping repeated a sentence in his heart. This is not Liu’er! After repeating it more than ten times, Jiang Ping finally struck Liu’er unconscious. Then, he put on the Lingering Colorful Dress on her. The Lingering Colorful Dress would change in size according to its owner’s body. Jiang Ping looked at the originally large dress that had suddenly shrunk to fit Liu’er’s body. He smiled and nodded. It was a good thing, so Liu’er didn’t need to buy new clothes in the future. After putting on the clothes, Liu’er rubbed her eyes and said in a childish voice. “Where is this place?” “This is daddy’s room.” “Daddy, why am I in your room?” “Eh, why am I wearing a new set of clothes?” “That is the new dress that daddy bought for you. Promise daddy that you will wear this set of clothes in the future except for bathing, is that okay?” Liu’er looked down at her new clothes. “Since it’s a gift from daddy, I will definitely follow your instructions.” Jiang Ping stroked his little daughter’s head and asked gently. “Are you hungry? Daddy will make you some delicious food.” The little girl yawned. “I’m not hungry. I’m still very sleepy. I want to continue sleeping.” “Okay, then you can sleep in daddy’s room tonight. Daddy will accompany you.” Liu’er nodded her head hard and obediently covered herself with the quilt before falling asleep. Ah! Early in the morning, the entire Jiang Mansion was woken up by Wan’er’s loud cry. Then, the little girl ran barefoot to Jiang Ping’s room and shouted. “Daddy, Liu’er is gone!” Wan’er pushed open the door of Jiang Ping’s room and saw Jiang Ping sitting by the bed. Liu’er asked while looking drowsy. “Sister Wan’er, what’s wrong? Why are you shouting so loudly? You woke me up.” The little girl was a little embarrassed when she saw Liu’er. She scratched her head and smiled. “Hehe, nothing, nothing.” Yan’er also ran to Jiang Ping’s room after she was woken up. She went into the room and complained to Wan’er after making a round of inspection. “Isn’t Liu’er here? Wan’er, why are you making a fuss?” Wan’er was even more embarrassed. “How would I know that Liu’er ran to daddy’s room? I became worried when I saw that Liu’er wasn’t there when I opened my eyes.” “Alright, alright. Since all of you are awake, it saves me the trouble of calling you one by one. You girls have to go to school today. Hurry up and eat breakfast. I’ll ask auntie to send you there.” Jiang Ping helped Wan’er out of the predicament. Wan’er immediately became listless when she heard that they had to go to school. “Daddy, can I not go to school? I feel that the old teachers in the school are all so boring.” Jiang Ping said seriously. “No, hurry up and bring your younger sister. Go and wash up. I’ll wait for you in the hall for breakfast.” Every time Jiang Ping spoke in this tone, the three little girls had to be obedient as they didn’t dare to make their father angry. The three little girls could only obediently find Li Sushang and wash up. After breakfast, the three little girls held hands and were led to school by Li Sushang. In the classroom, the old man with a white beard was lecturing. Wan’er rested her face on her hands, feeling drowsy. Yan’er listened the most attentively. Even though she didn’t like going to school, Jiang Ping had said that reading was useful to her, so Yan’er carefully took notes when the teacher was lecturing Although Liu’er didn’t understand what the teacher was talking about, she also imitated Yan’er and pretended to write and draw with a pen. Half a head popped out from the window of the school. That half a head belonged to Qiu Chi. After Qiu Chi left the Jiang Mansion last night, he immediately rushed to the Fang family. When he arrived at the Fang family, Fang Shen had already tidied up his front door and was sitting on the stairs at the door, feeling sad. Qiu Chi, who had a deep blood feud with the Fang family, realized that Fang Shen’s cultivation was only in the tempering realm. When he thought of the tragic deaths of his brothers from the Sky Wolf Sect, Qiu Chi was filled with grief and indignation. He rushed forward and cut off Fang Shen’s head. Although he could now wipe out the Fang family, when he saw the guards and servants hired by the Fang family running away, the entire Fang family knelt on the ground and wept. He turned around. He carried Fang Shen’s head and went to the outskirts alone. He drank wine for the whole night in front of the graves of his brothers from the Sky Wolf Sect. Qiu Chi, who had nowhere to go after daybreak, waited in front of the Jiang Mansion. When he saw Li Sushang leaving with the three little girls, Qiu Chi quietly followed her. He thought to himself that begging Jiang Ping directly would not work, so he could only use the three little girls as an opening. He wanted to see if he could beg Jiang Ping to take him in. After the teacher ended the lesson, Wan’er was the first to rush out of school and was about to run home. However, someone grabbed her clothes the moment she reached the door. Wan’er took a closer look and realized that it was Qiu Chi whom she had saved yesterday. “Uncle, why are you holding me back? I have to rush home.” After all, it was his first time begging such a young child, so Qiu Chi stuttered. “Miss Wan’er, I have nowhere to go now, so…” Wan’er was puzzled. “So what? Go on.” At this moment, Yan’er held Liu’er’s hand and walked out of the school hall. “So uncle, you want us to beg daddy for you to stay in our house, right?” Qiu Chi nodded with a smile. Wan’er quickly waved her hand. “No, no, if you want to do it, do it by yourself.” Thinking of how Qiu Chi wolfed down his food last night, the little girl quickly rejected Qiu Chi. If he were to snatch her food every day, she would be in trouble. She would not be able to eat her fill every day. “If it’s useful for me to go, I don’t need to look for you.” “Help me put in a few good words in front of your daddy. I’ll secretly buy you delicious food in the future.” Yan’er shook her head. “Uncle, you should find another place to go.” “Since daddy has already rejected you, and if we tried to persuade him, daddy might get angry and blame us.” Liu’er also nodded. “Mr. Jiang will not be angry with you. Please help me.” Qiu Chi’s tone was a little anxious because if he could not repay the favor to the Jiang family, he would feel bad in his heart. When Jiang Ping had bought the house, he had decided to return to repay the favor after taking revenge. Now, Jiang Ping had saved his life. If he left just like that, Qiu Chi wouldn’t be able to eat or sleep well for the rest of his life. The three little girls didn’t say anything. They held hands and directly walked home. Qiu Chi was left alone in a wretched state. On the way to the Jiang Mansion, Lei Jingyun walked with a sad face. After urging Fang Shen to clean up the mess yesterday, he wanted to return to the sect and continue to be the outer sect’s first elder. Before he even got close to the sect, his trusted disciple blocked him on the way. Then, he hurriedly said something to him. The general meaning was that after Gu Jin’s escaped wisp of soul returned to the sect, it had reported what happened in Fusheng City. Moreover, Gu Jin, this old thief, even added fuel to the fire by saying that he was a traitor who had colluded with the enemy. If he returned to the sect at this moment, he would fall into a trap. The result would be that he would be captured and tortured. At that time, whether he lived or died would only be a matter of the sect master’s words. There were many cultivation sects like this. As long as you were not of much use, even if you died, no one would care. Therefore, Lei Jingyun had nowhere to go. He wandered around Fusheng City and arrived at the gate of the Jiang family. As soon as he arrived at the gate, he saw Qiu Chi kneeling on the ground. Although Qiu Chi had long passed out on the ground after Lei Jingyun came out yesterday, he recognized Qiu Chi so he went up to him, and chatted with him. Only then did he know that he had arrived at the Fang family’s mansion. Seeing that Qiu Chi had nowhere else to go, he knelt at the Fang family’s gate and cried loudly. Lei Jingyun hardened his heart and imitated Qiu Chi, and he knelt on the ground. The Fang family’s gate was pulled open, and Jiang Ping stuck out half of his body. “The two of you, one at the age of a father and the other at the age of a grandfather, aren’t you ashamed of crying at my door?” “Benefactor, please give me a chance, give me a chance to repay your kindness.” Qiu Chi raised his arm to wipe away his tears as he spoke. Lei Jingyun also joined in. “Patriarch Jiang, after yesterday’s incident, I can’t even return to the sect now. I’m old and have no children. If I return to my old home, I’ll be alone.” “I really don’t know where to go.” Jiang Ping sighed. “With your cultivation, you can totally go somewhere else to start afresh. Why do you have to rely on our siang family?” Qiu Chi quickly said. “I don’t want to live the rest of my life feeling guilty. I just want to repay my kindness.” <b>1 acco</b>  Compared to Qiu Chi, Lei Jingyun’s reason was more convincing. “I’ve been accompanying Wan’er to practice martial arts every morning. We’ve already gotten along well. Although I don’t know what Wan’er thinks of me, I really treated Wan’er as my own granddaughter during that period of time.” “So, since I have nowhere to go now, why don’t you let me help you to take care of Wan’er and the other two young ladies?” What Lei Jingyun had said was the truth. When they were in Xiaoyu Town, Lei Jingyun initially wanted to teach Wan’er martial arts behind Jiang Ping’s back and take her in as a disciple, and then bring her back to the sect. However, every time Wan’er practiced martial arts, he would pay special attention to Wan’er, afraid that she would lose her temper during her practice and hurt herself. Jiang Ping was in a bit of a dilemma. After all, with two more cultivators in the family, there might be more trouble in the future. However, he couldn’t let them kneel all the time. Therefore, Jiang Ping hesitated… <strong>Translator: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio <strong>Editor: </strong>Nyoi-Bo Studio Just as Jiang Ping was still hesitating, a small head popped out from the door. “Daddy, why don’t we let Old Uncle Lei and Uncle Qiu come to our house? This way, they can play with the three of us.” The person who spoke was Wan’er. Yan’er and Liu’er’s voices sounded behind them. “Yes, daddy. We can let them sweep the floor for us.” “Yes, yes, yes. They can even send us to school.” Since his three daughters had spoken, Jiang Ping no longer hesitated. He spoke to Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. “Let’s make things clear. You must abide by the rules here. You are not allowed to go out and stir up trouble. Otherwise, I will execute you on the spot before your enemies arrive.” When the two of them heard this, their originally mournful faces looked as if the weather had turned sunny in an instant. Instead of kneeling on the ground, the two of them looked at each other and stood up to face the young man in front of them. They bowed deeply. After that, Wan’er hopped out. She held a person in each hand and walked into the mansion. As they walked, she asked Qiu Chi if he was going to fulfill his promise of secretly buying them delicious food. Then, she turned around and asked Lei Jingyun if he could continue to teach her martial arts. Both of them smiled and nodded. After they walked into the distance, Lei Jingyun suddenly thought of something and stopped. Wan’er, who was holding their hands, also stopped. “01d Uncle Lei, what’s wrong?” Lei Jingyun turned around and did a fist and palm salute to Jiang Ping. “There’s one more thing that I have to inform you, Patriarch.” Jiang Ping nodded and signaled Lei Jingyun to continue. Lei Jingyun then explained again what his disciple had told him about the changes within the sect. After he finished speaking, he added another sentence. “Chuanyun Sect is used to being arrogant and despotic. This time, their reputation has been damaged. I’m afraid they won’t be able to sit still.” Jiang Ping waved his hand, indicating that he knew, and told them not to worry. Seeing that Jiang Ping didn’t care, the stone in Lei Jingyun’s heart finally fell to the ground. He turned around and taught Wan’er and the other two girls how to make paper lovebirds, the kind that could fly in the sky with a rope attached to them. The three little girls had never heard of such a thing in Xiaoyu Town before, so they quickly dragged Lei Jingyun and said that they want to learn immediately. Qiu Chi also followed behind the three girls. Jiang Ping returned to his room alone and summoned the system with a thought. [Signing Reward: High-Grade Spirit Stone] Jiang Ping casually threw the high-grade spirit stone into his storage space. Many people in the cultivation world treated money like dirt, but there weren’t many people like Jiang Ping who didn’t take spirit stones seriously. He sat by the bed and sighed. It seemed that he could forget about trying to avoid cultivators and living in seclusion in this world. Moreover, with the growth of the cultivation of the three little girls, they might encounter more trouble in the future. There were too many retarded sects that couldn’t be chased away. Today was Chuanyun Sect, and tomorrow, there might be another Sheyun Sect and Feiyun Sect. After throwing the high-grade spirit stone into the storage space, Jiang Ping flipped his wrist and took out two top-grade spirit stones from the storage space. There were two ways for a cultivator to improve their cultivation. One was to absorb the spiritual Qi of Heaven and earth for their own use and convert it into cultivation. However, the spiritual Qi of Heaven and earth was scattered, so cultivation progress would be slow. The other way was to rely on the essence of the spiritual Qi in the spirit stones. Although this method was fast, the number and grade of the spirit stones needed to raise one’s cultivation level would increase. Ordinary cultivators simply couldn’t afford it. However, Jiang Ping didn’t need to worry about cultivation resources at all. He had a lot of top-grade spirit stones like this in his storage space. They were all obtained through signing. He decided to advance at this time because he had remained in his current realm for a long time. Jiang Ping crushed two spirit stones with his hand, and two drops of liquid emitting green light shot out of the spirit stones. Jiang Ping slowly opened his mouth and swallowed the water droplets into his body. Then, he sat cross-legged on the bed and refined the two drops of spiritual energy essence. After about the time it takes for an incense stick to burn, Jiang Ping finished refining the spiritual energy essence and slowly opened his eyes. He observed the changes in his body, and the corners of his mouth rose slightly. He was still in the initial stage of the nascent soul realm, but he had already passed the initial stage of the sleeping baby to the late-stage divine baby. Looking at the baby whose body was filled with golden light from the sea of Qi in his body, Jiang Ping was very satisfied. The next time his realm was raised, he would be able to step into the earth immortal realm. His lips moved slightly, and he murmured. “Chuanyun Sect, right? Since you are trying to court death, then go and die.” Jiang Ping walked out of the room and called Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun. He told the two of them that he was going out, and the two of them shall take care of the house. He would also leave the Heavenly treasure concealment plate for the two of them to operate. Qiu Chi agreed and used his life to guarantee that there would be no accidents. Lei Jingyun guessed what Jiang Ping was going out for and asked. “Is it because of the Chuanyun Sect?” Jiang Ping nodded and then rose up from the ground. He leaped into the air and flew in the direction of the Chuanyun Sect. Lei Jingyun looked at the young man who had gone far away and touched his white beard. He sighed in his heart. If only he had half of his heroic spirit when he was young. Within Chuanyun Sect. Sect Master Yun Lan was seated in the main hall. A young man with a delicate and pretty face, dressed in the attire of an elder, opened his mouth to speak. “Sect Master, Lei Jingyun has not returned to the sect for a long time. You should believe the fact that Lei Jingyun has betrayed the sect just as I said, right?” The voice that came out of this young man’s mouth did not sound like the voice of a normal young man. Instead, it was a little hoarse and old-fashioned. If Jiang Ping was here, he would be able to tell that it was Gu Jin’s voice. Before Gu Jin’s wisp of soul returned to Chuanyun Sect, it had seized a body on its way back. Moreover, this body’s cultivation talent was fine, and its appearance was decent. Gu Jin immediately drilled into the young man’s body and used a secret method to squeeze out the original soul of this person. Blue veins popped up on Yun Lan’s forehead, and his palm heavily slapped the armrest of the stool. “Hmph, pass down the order to capture Lei Jingyun and inform the few elders that we will head to Fusheng City right now to salvage our reputation!” Everyone in the hall withdrew from the main hall one after another and went to carry out their orders. In the sky above Chuanyun Sect, Jiang Ping was floating in the air with his hands behind his back, looking at Chuanyun Sect busy gathering manpower. The corners of Jiang Yun’s mouth curled up slightly. He used his spiritual energy to transmit his voice to the people below. “There’s no need to go to Fusheng City. Your grandfather, Jiang Ping, has come to exterminate the sect!” His voice spread throughout the entire Chuanyun Sect. VVhen the disciples and elders of the Chuanyun Sect heard his voice, they all raised their heads in unison. They saw a man in green standing in the sky above their own sect. That man shouted again. “Is there anyone who can speak to me? Get out and meet your grandfather.” The people in the sect discussed animatedly. “Who is this person? He’s so arrogant.” “Didn’t you hear that person just now? His name is Jiang Ping.” “Jiang Ping? Wasn’t he the one who beat Elder Gu Jin to the point that only a wisp of his soul was left?” “Quickly inform the elders and the sect master that Jiang Ping is here to cause trouble!”. However, before anyone could inform, the sect master of the Chuanyun Sect, Yun Lan, had already walked out of the main hall. Because Jiang Ping had deliberately wrapped his voice with spiritual energy, every word he said would be transmitted to every corner of the Chuanyun Sect. It would be difficult for the sect master, Yun Lan, not to hear it. Yun Lan leaped lightly and also arrived in the air. He stood in the air on the same level as Jiang Ping. “You are Jiang Ping?” Jiang Ping covered his mouth with his hand and yawned. “Didn’t I say just now that your grandfather, which is me, Jiang Ping, is here to exterminate your sect?” “Hmph, you don’t look old, but your tone is very arrogant. That’s good too since I won’t have to dig three feet into the ground to find you when the time comes because you’re going to be hiding underground.” Jiang Ping replied disapprovingly. “With just a few of you, I wouldn’t go so far as to hide. I just want to exercise my muscles and bones. So, I thought that it would be good if your Chuanyun Sect was exterminated so that you wouldn’t bother others. At the same time, I can get some exercise.” Yun Lan only treated Jiang Ping’s words as a joke because he had already broken through to the nascent soul realm. Although he wasn’t stable yet, he was quite confident in his own abilities. He smiled contemptuously and said to Jiang Ping. “Did you forget that this is Chuanyun Sect before you started spouting nonsense?” As soon as he finished speaking, a few figures appeared behind Yun Lan. They were all old men with white beards and hair. There were a total of eight of them, and all of them were above the origin core realm. “After I kill you, I will go and drag out your entire family. The women will be thrown into a brothel, while the men will be beheaded and left on display at Fusheng City’s gate!” Jiang Ping raised both arms to stretch and said in a calm tone. “Let’s attack together.” Yun Lan did not stand on ceremony. He waved to the people behind him, and the eight elders flew out. Each of them summoned their own weapons. Some held sabers, some carried hammers that were almost taller than a person, some held hidden weapons in their palms, and some did not use anything and were bare-handed. All of them headed in the direction of Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping only extended his right hand, and an invisible barrier that was faintly visible appeared in front of him. The attacks of the Chuanyun Sect elders landed on the barrier, but they didn’t even cause a ripple. The spiritual energy that was shot out seemed to have blended into the barrier, and it was silent. Yun Lan arrived above Jiang Ping’s head in the blink of an eye. Yun Lan’s body was upside down. The fingers of his two hands were bent in the shape of claws, and he clawed towards Jiang Ping’s head. Jiang Ping did not even raise his head. His right hand continued to resist the attacks of the eight elders, and his left hand was raised to the top of his head. He grabbed one of Yun Lan’s wrists, withdrew the barrier with his right hand, and grabbed Yun Lan’s other hand. He turned around on the spot and threw Yun Lan in the direction of the eight elders. The eight elders hurriedly withdrew their attacks when they saw this and were about to catch their sect master. However, Jiang Ping used too much strength when he threw him. After Yun Lan collided with the eight white-bearded old men head-on, they were all sent flying in all directions. A smile appeared on Jiang Ping’s face as he said something strange. “It’s been a long time since I’ve played bowling. The feel of it is pretty good.” Yun Lan and the eight old men quickly stabilized their bodies after they were sent flying. Yun Lan clenched his teeth and looked at the young man in front of him at this moment. He did not expect that the person in front of him was actually so strong. He originally thought that at this age, he would at most be on par with him. Looks like he had underestimated his opponent. However, it was not too late for him to react. Yun Lan spoke to the eight elders. “Everyone, the Chuanyun Sect is in trouble today. Although there are losses, we have no choice but to activate the sect protecting formation.” The few old men looked at each other with consternation. A moment later, they helplessly nodded their heads. After which, the eight of them flew behind Yun Lan and formed a semicircle. Yun Lan chuckled. “I admit that we are unable to contend against you because your realm is high. However, I still have to repeat what I said just now.” “Did you forget that this place is Chuanyun Sect when you were spouting nonsense?” Soon after, purple light pillars appeared within the sect and rose into the sky. There were a total of ten pillars, which corresponded to the eight elders, and Sect Master Yun Lan. The disciples of the Chuanyun Sect whispered to each other. “Even the sect protecting formation is activated. Looks like Jiang Ping is very strong.” “What do you know? Our sect master is seeking stability. I feel that Jiang Ping is just bluffing.” This sect protection formation was given to Chuanyun Sect’s ancestor after he saved an old man out of kindness. This formation was made up of nine spirit drivers and one formation eye. When the formation was activated, the person standing at the formation eye would receive the nine spirit drivers’ cultivation support who was standing behind. From there, the cultivation of the person standing at the formation eye would increase and be maintained for a period of time. During that period of time, the person at the spirit driver spot would temporarily lose the ability to fight due to the loss of their own spiritual energy. When the sect protecting formation lit up, Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes and looked over. Formation? This thing was not bad. He would give it a try some other day. Yun Lan, who was at the area of the formation eye was submerged by the purple light pillar, laughed wantonly. As for the other eight elders, their expressions were slightly pained due to the loss of their spiritual energy. Very quickly, the light from the light pillars gradually dimmed until it disappeared. as The eight elders, whose spiritual energy was about to be drained, slowly descended from the sky. Yun Lan clenched his fists and felt the growth in his cultivation. This was the first time he had used a sect protecting formation. He felt that his cultivation had already risen to the third stage of the nascent soul realm, the divine baby. If he had to train painstakingly, with his talent, he would need at least ten more years. However, Yun Lan was somewhat resentful at this moment. This was because the sect protecting formation was supposed to form by nine spirit drivers and one formation eye. However, they only had eight elders. The remaining spirit driver position should have been driven by Gu Jin. However, because Gu Jin was beaten until only a wisp of his soul was left, his cultivation had yet to recover. Otherwise, perhaps with Gu Jin, the complete sect protecting formation might be able to raise Yun Lan’s cultivation directly to the earth immortal realm. “Old bastard, are you still going to fight or not? I’ve been waiting here for you for so long because I want to try that trashy sect-protecting formation.” “Now that your formation has been activated, if you don’t hurry up and kill me, what are you standing there in a daze for?” Jiang Ping provoked. Yun Lan sneered. “Hmph, you brat, just watch closely. My formation will definitely not let you down.” After saying that, he took the initiative to launch an attack and clenched his fists as he charged toward Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping also threw out his fists to meet Yun Lan’s. When the two fists collided, a dull, loud sound rang out between the heavens and the earth. Both Jiang Ping and Yun Lan were forced back two steps. The formation had a time limit, and Yun Lan would not waste time giving Jiang Ping a chance. After stabilizing his body, Yun Lan charged forward once again. His two fists smashed down on Jiang Ping, and he was on the offensive with his continuous fists attacks. Jiang Ping crossed his hands in front of his chest and then used his spiritual energy to create a barrier that was able to withstand the attacks of the eight elders. Yun Lan waved at the barrier, causing Jiang Ping to retreat repeatedly. The barrier in front of him also emitted cracking sounds as if it was about to shatter. Taking advantage of the moment when the barrier was about to shatter, he took a step back and found an opportunity to raise his leg to kick Yun Lan’s abdomen. Yun Lan was still in a punching stance and did not have the time to dodge. He was kicked in the abdomen and was pushed back by a hundred steps. After he was sent flying backward, Yun Lan patted the area of the robe that had been kicked. He snorted coldly and flashed behind Jiang Ping. Taking advantage of Jiang Ping’s inattentiveness, he used his elbow to forcefully knock Jiang Ping down, causing him to fall to the ground. A large crater was formed on Chuanyun Sect’s ground. Dust filled the air, and Jiang Ping’s figure couldn’t be seen clearly. The Chuanyun Sect disciples who were observing the battle cheered in secret. Some even shouted to the sky. “The Sect Master is mighty! Sect Master beat him up!” Yun Lan slowly descended from the sky. After his feet landed on the ground, he waved both of his arms. He infused spiritual energy from his body into his palms and formed two fist-sized balls of light. One of the light balls was purple, while the other was milky white. Although the balls of light were only the size of two fists, if a cultivator below the nascent soul realm touched them lightly, they would turn into ashes. Yun Lan threw the light balls in his hands towards the large pit that Jiang Ping had smashed into. Suddenly, the two light balls flashed out a huge wave of light. The brightness was comparable to the sun, and it was still getting brighter. As the light became brighter and brighter, the two balls of light exploded. The huge wave of the explosion swept out in all directions along with the pit. With the pit as the center, the flowers, plants, and trees within a radius of two hundred meters were swept up by the huge wave, leaving bare land behind. Yun Lan shouted towards that huge pit. “The martial technique, Yin-Yang Mother Ball, that our Chuanyun Sect doesn’t impart to outsiders isn’t bad, right?” “It’s just average!” A voice sounded from the bottom of the pit, and Jiang Ping slowly rose up from that huge <b>OS</b>  pit. At this moment, he was still calm and composed, and even the clothes on his body weren’t stained by a single speck of dust. Yun Lan was slightly surprised when he saw Jiang Ping’s appearance. He imagined if he were the one to receive that move, Yin-Yang Mother Ball. Although he wouldn’t be in a sorry state, it would be impossible for him to be like this young man in front of him, completely unharmed. Jiang Ping said with a smile. “Old bastard, it seems like you’re very disappointed with the martial technique of your sect. Why don’t you try mine?” Then, Jiang Ping brought his index and middle fingers together and pointed in the direction where Yun Lan was. Spiritual energy gathered at the tip of his finger and agglomerated into flying swords in front of him. Each flying sword was only the size of two fingers, but there were over a thousand flying swords densely packed in front of Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping’s hand, which had his fingers together, waved his wrist forward. Thousands of flying swords shot towards Yun Lan. Seeing the swarm of flying swords shooting towards him, Yun Lan’s face was filled with fear. He hurriedly took out a shield from his storage space. The shield blocked the flying swords formed from spiritual energy in front of him. However, there were so many flying swords that this low-grade spiritual artifact in Yun Lan’s hand could not block them. Hence, the shield did not last long before it shattered and fell to the ground. Seeing this, Yun Lan hurriedly protected his fatal parts and the weak points on his body. The other parts that he could not care about could only be scratched or penetrated by the flying swords. Jiang Ping chuckled in his heart. “You dare to fight me with all your might?” “I have an inexhaustible system. What do you have?” After the flying swords finished their attack, other than the parts that were protected earlier, there was not a single unharmed spot on Yun Lan’s body. His entire body was covered in blood. Some of the elders within the Chuanyun Sect were worried about this. After all, their lives were currently in Yun Lan’s hands. If Yun Lan were to fall, they would not be able to escape. According to what this young man had said earlier, “I’m here to exterminate the entire sect.” Then, no one within the sect would be able to escape today. Some of the disciples of the Chuanyun Sect were cheering for the sect master, while others were complaining about why this old man Gu Jin had to provoke this god of plagues. It was noisy. Yun Lan did not care about the injuries on his body at all. He used his spiritual energy to seal his wounds so that they would not bleed. It could be seen that Yun Lan was intelligent. He knew that he would not be able to dodge Jiang Ping’s move, so he abandoned his horse to protect the carriage and protect his vital parts. Otherwise, it was uncertain whether he would still be able to stand and talk to Jiang Ping at this moment. Jiang Ping looked at Yun Lan’s current condition and guessed that he had not used his full strength. He must have a trump card. “Hey! Old bastard, looking at how calm you are, you definitely have a trump card. Why don’t you use it now and let me experience it?” Yun Lan laughed coldly. “Ha, you better watch carefully.” Yun Lan extended his right hand. A long blade emitted a buzz in a secret room behind the main hall of the Chuanyun Sect. After that, the long blade broke out of the secret room, passed through the main hall of the Chuanyun Sect, and came to Yun Lan’s side. When Chuanyun Sect’s disciples and elders saw the long blade flash out, they all cried out in surprise. “This is the top-grade spiritual artifact in the sect!” “How domineering! This is the first time I’ve seen it!” “It’s said that this top-grade spiritual artifact is just a hair’s breadth away from becoming an immortal artifact.” Yun Lan immediately used both hands to hold the hilt of the blade. However, no matter how much strength Yun Lan used, the blade was trembling non-stop, as if it was a little brat who was not willing to be disciplined. Jiang Ping carefully examined the long blade and discovered that the aura of this long blade was not much weaker than the Heavenly treasure concealment plate that he possessed. “Old bastard, it seems that you are still unable to fully control this blade. Why don’t I wait for you?” “You should first train it properly before we start fighting.” Just as Jiang Ping had said, the main reason why Yun Lan had not summoned this long blade previously was that he was temporarily unable to control this long blade called Sky Piercer. Moreover, if he were to forcefully use it, it would also leave behind quite a few hidden dangers for himself. This long blade was different from Jiang Ping’s Heavenly treasure concealment plate. Because the Heavenly treasure concealment plate was an auxiliary type of spiritual artifact, and it was also a product of the system that would not develop intelligence, so as long as Jiang Ping was willing, he could let anyone operate it. And once a spiritual artifact developed intelligence, it meant that this spiritual artifact had the possibility of evolving into an immortal artifact. This Sky Piercer blade had already gained a trace of sentience. If it was given another hundred and eighty years, it would truly become an immortal artifact. However, the already sentient Sky Piercer was currently held in Yun Lan’s hand. The blade trembled intensely. It was clear that it was unwilling to let Yun Lan use it. The hand that Yun Lan held the hilt of the blade tightened. The veins on his forehead and arm bulged. He was still trying to communicate with Sky Piercer using his inner voice. “Chuanyun Sect is in imminent danger. You are just a broken weapon. Why aren’t you willing to fight with me.” The blade trembled even more intensely. “Don’t tell me that you want to see the inheritance left behind by your ancestor be destroyed just because you aren’t willing to fight with me?” The Sky Piercer let out a humming sound. After a series of humming sounds, it returned to its calm state. It no longer trembled. Instead, it allowed Yun Lan to hold it in his hand. Yun Lan’s original strained expression turned into a smile. Without saying a word to Jiang Ping, he directly raised his blade and charged forward. Yun Lan waved the long blade in his hand, attempting to find Jiang Ping’s weakness. At this moment, Jiang Ping’s calm expression finally changed slightly, but he only frowned a little. Yun Lan saw the change in Jiang Ping’s expression and thought that he was just bluffing. Yun Lan, who was already filled with anger, made up his mind to kill all of Jiang Ping’s family. He did not stop hacking and taunting Jiang Ping. “Even now, it’s useless for you to apologize to me. Not just you, even your entire family will die.” “I heard from Gu Jin that you still have three cute little daughters, right? When the time comes, I will definitely not kill them directly. I will slowly torture them to death.” As he said this, he laughed loudly. Jiang Ping’s slightly furrowed brows immediately furrowed deeply when he heard Yun Lan mention his daughters. After dodging Yun Lan’s slash, he clenched his fist and directly smashed it towards Yun Lan’s face. Yun Lan, who originally thought that Jiang Ping no longer had the strength to fight back, was careless and did not dodge. His face was hammered by Jiang Ping’s fist, causing intense pain. After being hit, Yun Lan stopped his attack and distanced himself from Jiang Ping. With one hand covering his face and the other holding the long blade, he stood on the ground. Jiang Ping retracted his fist and flexed his wrist. “Old bastard, do you dare to repeat what you just said?” Yun Lan covered his nose and mouth, but bright red blood still flowed out from the gaps between his fingers. He wiped his nose and spat out a mouthful of blood. He forcefully used his spiritual energy to stop his injuries. At this moment, he was already close to madness. He did not know pain at all. All he wanted to do was to kill this young man in front of him to vent his anger. “Hahaha, why are you upset after I said a few words?” “I told you to come and kill me if you have the ability.” Yun Lan’s eyes were red as he shouted at Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping sighed helplessly and shook his head as he thought to himself. These cultivators were really used to being high and mighty. They hid in a small place just to help the evil. They purposely picked the soft persimmon and pinched it. They could no longer tell which one was the persimmon and which one was the rock just by pinching. Jiang Ping put his two fingers together and used the sword rain martial technique just now. He waved his wrist and thousands of swords rushed towards Yun Lan just like before. However, at this moment, Yun Lan’s face revealed a contemptuous expression. This was because the long blade in his hand, called the Sky Piercer, gave him a lot of confidence. Yun Lan held the blade and slashed forward. As the action fell, a huge ray of light burst out from the blade. The ray of light crashed toward the rain of swords and directly vaporized thousands of flying swords made of spiritual energy. Then, the ray of light didn’t slow down or dim at all and continued to slash towards Jiang Ping. Facing the powerful attack, Jiang Ping didn’t dodge, because he knew it was too late to dodge now, so he might as well use all his strength to defend. Jiang Ping took out the medicinal pill from his storage space, which he got from signing in. He put it in his mouth, and the medicinal pill instantly melted. Immediately after, his body, which had already used up more than half of his spiritual energy during the previous fight, was instantly recharged. He used his spiritual energy to transform and form a defense around himself. When the light engulfed Jiang Ping, he used all his strength to defend himself, but he still bounced away. After the light dissipated, Jiang Ping slowly stood up from the ground. The green robe on his body was dirtied by the soil, and the two sleeves on his arms had also become tattered. He wiped away the bright red color at the corner of his mouth and looked at Yun Lan with a determined gaze. “Old bastard, do you still have a way to use that move from before? If you don’t, then you will die today!” Jiang Ping even gritted his teeth and said the last two words. This was because when Yun Lan spoke of his daughters, he had already touched Jiang Ping’s bottom line, the bottom line that no one was allowed to cross. At this moment, Yun Lan was already exhausted and was practically half-kneeling on the ground. He also took out a medicinal pill to recover his spiritual energy from his storage space. Only after eating it did he feel slightly better. But after all, Jiang Ping’s medicinal pill was produced by the system. Therefore, the medicinal pill that Yun Lan had just eaten had a recovery ability that was far inferior to Jiang Ping’s medicinal pill. In fact, it had only recovered less than half of his spiritual energy. Yun Lan definitely would not be able to use that move a second time. However, at this moment, Yun Lan felt that the young man in front of him was just like him. He was already at the end of his rope. “Even if I did not use that move just now, killing you would be as easy as flipping my hand.” Jiang Ping smiled slightly and said. “Oh?” “Is that so.” Before his voice had faded, Jiang Ping had already rushed in front of Yun Lan. Yun Lan immediately held his sword with both hands and raised it upwards. However, Yun Lan’s movement had missed. Jiang Ping, who was originally in front of him, had unknowingly flashed behind him. Yun Lan was just about to turn around, but before he could move, his back had already been pierced by Jiang Ping. Yun Lan lowered his head to look at his own chest. Jiang Ping’s hand, which had pierced through his body, was slowly pulled out. Following that, Yun Lan knelt on the ground and tightly held his long blade, Sky Piercer. His eyes were wide open, and he slowly stopped breathing. Jiang Ping directly picked up the long blade from Yun Lan’s hand. He held the long blade in his hand, and the long blade trembled like before. Then, Jiang Ping exerted a little strength, and Sky Piercer did not react. It was as docile as a cat. Although this long blade was not as powerful as the weapon given by the system, it would be a waste not to take it. In the future, it could be given to someone as a gift, so he casually threw it into the storage space. After that, Jiang Ping grabbed Yun Lan’s collar and slowly rose into the air, then walked towards Chuanyun Sect’s main hall. The eight elders of the Chuanyun Sect could no longer sense the presence of their sect master at this time. One after another, they began to order the entire sect to pack up their things and quickly flee for their lives. Jiang Ping, who was in the sky, felt that it was laughable when he saw the people under him in a hurry. When he first arrived at the Chuanyun Sect, the scene was the same. However, at that time, they were preparing to kill him. Now, they were trying to flee for their lives. What a useless sect that bullied the weak and feared the strong. Jiang Ping slowly descended from the sky. Before he even reached the ground, he directly threw Yun Lan’s corpse down. Following that, the corpse landed with a bang. The people from Chuanyun Sect all looked over. When they saw their sect master die tragically in front of them, they were all filled with terror. Most of the people knelt on the ground in order to survive, begging Jiang Ping to let them off. Of course, there were also a small number of people who held weapons in their hands, and their expressions seemed to be filled with grief and indignation. Although they didn’t make a sound, the weapons in their hands were enough to let Jiang Ping know that even if they died, they would still fight to the death until the very last <b>moment.</b>  The eight elders had long fled and disappeared without a trace. Jiang Ping looked at the people kneeling in front of him and said. “You don’t have to beg me. Although I, Jiang Ping, am ruthless, I don’t kill innocent people. When I said that I was going to exterminate the whole sect, it was to force this old bastard to come out.” “If you want to leave, then leave.” The kneeling disciples of the Chuanyun Sect shouted their thanks one after another. Then, afraid that Jiang Ping would go back on his words, they quickly got up and ran out of the sect. Then, Jiang Ping looked at the small group of people holding weapons. These people were mostly young men, full of vigor. “I just said, if you want to leave, then leave.” “If you don’t leave, then do you want to die?” “Then come!” Jiang Ping extended his hand to these people, indicating that they could take action. However, no one came forward for a long time, and there were even some people who threw their weapons and left after Jiang Ping finished speaking There were only a few dozen people left. They stood more than ten steps away from Jiang Ping with their weapons. Seeing that they didn’t fight or leave, Jiang Ping seemed to understand their thoughts. He turned around and walked to the main hall, then found a chair and sat down. These people also moved with Jiang Ping, but the distance between them was still more than ten steps away from him. After sitting down, Jiang Ping asked the crowd. “Are you the trusted aides or descendants of this old bastard?” The crowd didn’t say anything, and the atmosphere was a little strange. “If you don’t say anything, I’ll take it as you admit it.” “Are you looking for revenge?” At this time, someone in the crowd said yes. Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes and looked at the crowd, trying to find the person who had just spoken. He found that it was a child, holding a wooden sword in his hand. “Do you think you can kill me with your current strength?” After hearing this, the eyes of the dozen or so people began to dim. Jiang Ping observed their expressions. He sighed, shook his head, and said, “I can give you a chance.” “In the future, if any of you feel that you are capable enough, you can come to me if you want to seek revenge.” “But you only have one chance. Because the outcome will only be determined by the winner staying alive, and the loser shall die.” And we will have an agreement that when the time comes, they will be like me today. No matter who dies, only one person will be killed, and no one’s wife, children, or old people will be affected.” “If you still have some guts, go back and cultivate well. I will wait. You can come.” The child who had spoken in the crowd earlier slowly walked out of the crowd. There were a few older youths who wanted to stop him. He stood up resolutely and asked, “Do your words count?” Jiang Ping nodded, “Yes.” “And that long blade of your sect. If any of you feel that you can wield it, then you can take it back from me.” “There’s no need to fight to the death with me for it. I’ll hand it over to you directly.” The little boy replied yes with a crisp voice. Then he turned around and walked out of the sect. The rest of the people also left, leaving Jiang Ping alone in the main hall. Before coming to Chuanyun Sect, Jiang Ping had already realized that it wasn’t very realistic to go into seclusion. Since he couldn’t resist the onslaught of trouble, he might as well calmly deal with it. If Jiang Ping followed his previous practice, he would have killed those people just now. Then, he wouldn’t have to worry about someone seeking revenge. Since he had decided to calmly deal with it, Jiang Ping should be more generous. It wouldn’t be fair that he could seek revenge, but not these children who hadn’t grown up. This was the reason why Jiang Ping had spoken these words to these young people just now. Jiang Ping used his spiritual energy to inspect the main hall. He walked to the wall behind the main hall, knocked on the wall with his hand, and then pushed it open with force. The wall was a secret door. As Jiang Ping exerted force, the secret door slowly opened. Jiang Ping walked into the secret room. He saw that all the money that Chuanyun Sect had received since its establishment was kept in this secret room. Jiang Ping casually picked up a tattered book. On it was the arrangement of the sect protecting formation that Yun Lan had activated previously. Of course, he did not care about these things. However, it was a waste not to take it. Everyone agreed with the principle that a thief should not leave empty-handed. With a wave of his hand, he stored all the treasures, spirit stones, and money in the room into his storage space. Jiang Ping stretched lazily and then looked at his appearance. The clothes on his body were torn and tattered. He couldn’t go back to see his three little darlings like this. Therefore, he took out a new set of clothes from his storage space and put them on, then flew home. Fusheng City. In the Jiang Mansion, Lei Jingyun was carefully teaching Yan’er and Liu’er how to make paper kites. As long as it wasn’t studying, Wan’er could learn anything quickly. She held the rope in one hand and the paper kite in the other hand and mocked Yan’er. “Hahaha, Yan’er is so stupid. You even have to spend half a day learning how to make a paper kite.” However, Yan’er, who was unable to do it in the first place and was still fiddling with the bamboo in her hand, was even more furious. “Liu’er didn’t make it either. What right do you have to criticize me?” Wan’er snickered and said, “Liu’er is the youngest, and look, Liu’er is almost done.” Yan’er followed Wan’er’s line of sight and saw that Liu’er’s paper kite had already taken shape. She was just short of applying oil and tying the rope. Yan’er, who didn’t know where to vent her anger, directly slapped Lei Jingyun on the head. “Old Man Lei, do you know how to teach or not? You didn’t do it on purpose, did you?” Lei Jingyun, whose head had been slapped, smiled awkwardly. “How about I make one for Miss Yan’er myself?” Yan’er placed her hands on her waist and said to Lei Jingyun aggressively. “Then hurry up and make one bigger than the ones Wan’er and Liu’er made.” Lei Jingyun could only do as he was told. When Jiang Ping landed at the door, he saw Qiu Chi standing upright at the door with a knife in his hand. He asked in puzzlement, “Brat, why are you standing here?” Qiu Chi answered respectfully, “I’m protecting the young ladies. Don’t worry, Patriarch. I won’t let anyone in, not even flies.” Jiang Ping raised his leg and kicked Qiu Chi. “Are you stupid? Shouldn’t you be protecting the young ladies by their side all the time?” “You’re standing at the door like a dog. You won’t even know if the backyard has been bombed.” Qiu Chi scratched his head awkwardly after hearing that. Jiang Ping covered his face with one hand and was speechless. “Hurry up and open the door.” Qiu Chi, who was laughing mischievously, quickly ran to the door and opened it for Jiang Ping. He learned from Qiu Chi that the three little girls were in the backyard with Lei Jingyun. Jiang Ping walked straight to the backyard. was Yan’er was carefully supervising the paper kites that Lei Jingyun made for her. She looked at them and reminded him. “It must be bigger than Wan’er’s and Liu’er’s, about this size.” The little girl stretched out her arm and gestured. Lei Jingyun nodded repeatedly. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, Daddy is back.” As Jiang Ping’s voice rang out, the three little girls darted towards Jiang Ping. Wan’er immediately hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh. “Daddy, where did you go today? Why didn’t you tell me?” Yan’er also ran to Jiang Ping’s side and stretched out her arms to hug Jiang Ping. “Daddy, did you go out to play secretly behind my back?” Liu’er, who was the youngest, ran slowly and was panting heavily when she arrived in front of Jiang Ping. “That’s right, that’s right. In the future, when daddy goes out, you have to let us know.” “The three of us had to stay with Old Man Lei, and it was very boring!” The three little girls asked one after another. When Lei Jingyun heard these words, he really wanted to cry but had no tears. Before Jiang Ping came back, they were the ones who had the most fun and kept calling him Old Uncle Lei. When Jiang Ping came back, they started calling him Old Man Lei. Jiang Ping brushed off the questions from the three girls and planned to take the three girls somewhere else to play. When he passed by Lei Jingyun, Jiang Ping stopped in his tracks. “I think it’s necessary to tell you that there won’t be any Chuanyun Sect in this world in the future.” Although Lei Jingyun had already guessed the result when he heard it with his ears when it was spoken lightly from Jiang Ping’s mouth, the smile on his face became stiff, and then his head slowly drooped down. Although he didn’t like the behavior of many people in the sect, it was still a place where he had lived for most of his life, so he couldn’t help but feel a little sad. He was silent for a long time before he spoke. “What about those children…” He was referring to the disciples of the Chuanyun Sect. Jiang Ping said to Lei Jingyun with a smile, “I only killed one person.”. After saying that, he left with the three little girls, leaving Lei Jingyun standing alone. Hearing Jiang Ping’s reply, Lei Jingyun’s eyes gradually became bright, and then his eyes gradually became moist. Within the Golden Door Sect. Feng Dan’s hand was tightly clutching the spirit stone that Jiang Ping had given her. Normally speaking, if someone didn’t need it, they would have thrown this hot potato away long ago. If it was someone from a registered sect, they would definitely hand it over to the sect. Not only would he be able to get rid of this hot potato, but he would also be able to raise his status within the sect. If it was a secular rogue cultivator, most of them would give this spirit stone to a big shot who could absorb it that was above the nascent soul realm. Since she wouldn’t be able to absorb it, keeping it with her would be a hidden danger for her. By giving it away, she would be able to make a nascent soul realm cultivator owe her a favor, and the benefits wouldn’t be any less than absorbing a high-grade spirit stone. After Feng Dan obtained it, other than the person who gave it away, as well as Zi Yue, no one knew that she still had a high-grade spirit stone in her hand. Feng Dan sat quietly in her room, clutching the spirit stone with both hands and holding it close to her chest. As the door creaked open, Zi Yue walked in. Feng Dan immediately hid the spirit stone that was in her hand. Zi Yue shook her head helplessly. “Don’t hide anymore, I know what you’re holding in your hand.” “Why are you so disobedient? Even if you return the spirit stone, he won’t interact much with you.” Feng Dan stammered, “I know… but…” Zi Yue came to Feng Dan’s bedside and sat down next to her. She held Feng Dan’s shoulders with both hands. “Do you really like him that much?” Feng Dan glanced at Zi Yue and shook her head. “I don’t know what it means to like him. I’m just a little disappointed.” Zi Yue sighed and sat down beside her without saying a word. After a long time, Feng Dan suddenly stood up. “Let’s go. We’ll give this spirit stone to my father.” Zi Yue stood up and smiled. The woman who was still holding the spirit stone tightly also smiled bitterly. The two of them came to the Golden Door Sect’s main study, and Feng Dan gently knocked on the door. After getting her father’s permission, she pushed the door open and walked in. Zi Yue also followed in. “What’s wrong, my precious daughter? It’s rare for you to take the initiative to enter the study.” The sect master of the Golden Door Sect, Feng Chenghan, saw his daughter walk in and chuckled. Feng Dan didn’t answer her father’s question. Instead, she walked forward, placed the high-grade spirit stone on the table, and turned around to leave. Before Zi Yue had the time to react, she saw Feng Dan walking out. She could only hurriedly greet Uncle Feng before trotting behind Feng Dan. In the study, only Feng Chenghan was left dumbstruck staring at the high-grade spirit stone that was glowing with green light on the table. The servant of the Golden Door Sect was about to report something to the sect master when he happened to bump into Zi Yue and Feng Dan walking out of the study. The servant bowed and greeted his young miss and the daughter of the mayor’s mansion. However, the two of them ignored him and walked past him. The servant didn’t think much of it. After all, he thought that it was normal for these young misses to have strange tempers. After the two girls walked past, the servant walked into the study. Seeing that the study door wasn’t closed, he bowed and walked in. “Master, ever since the Blood Fang Gang was wiped out for no reason, the other forces in Fusheng City have been snatching the Blood Fang Gang’s properties.” “According to your instructions, after our Golden Door Sect interfered, those unrated forces have become more well-behaved.” After saying that, the servant bowed and slowly stood up. After standing up straight, his gaze was instantly attracted by the stone on the table that was shimmering with a green light. was The servant’s eyes also widened, and his expression was the same as Feng Chenghan’s. Feng Chenghan was called back from his shock by the servant’s voice. Seeing that there was an outsider in front of him, Feng Chenghan hurriedly put away the spirit stone. Straightening his body, he said to the servant. “Ahem, Zhou Zheng, when did you come in?” The servant named Zhou Zheng immediately restrained the shock on his face and replied to Feng Chenghan that he had entered the study since the door wasn’t closed. Then, he repeated to Feng Chenghan what he had just reported. Feng Chenghan nodded and replied. “Great. I’ll leave this matter to you. You’ll be rewarded handsomely if it’s done well.” “If there’s nothing else, you can leave first.” Zhou Zheng bowed to Feng Chenghan again and then retreated out of the study. After walking out of the study, Zhou Zheng’s mind was filled with the high-grade spirit stone that was placed on the desk just now. It would be a lie to say that he didn’t covet it. After all, one high-grade spirit stone was enough for him to establish his own force in Fusheng City. Although according to his late-stage core building cultivation, this faction could not even be considered third-rate. But at least it was better than being a servant who had to bow and scrape every day. Zhou Zheng shook his head and no longer thought about these illusory things. After all, he was only a servant. After Feng Dan and Zi Yue left the Golden Door Sect, they directly left Fusheng City and came to a lake called Yingri Lake outside the city. The two of them liked to play in this area since they were young. The scenery was pretty good, and during each autumn harvest, the crabs in the lake grew very big. The people in Fusheng City loved to eat crabs, and cultivators were no exception. There were many ways to cook them, and they could satisfy anyone’s taste. Therefore, every autumn, there would be many people surrounding Yingri Lake to catch crabs. Ever since the two girls started cultivating, they relied on the fact that cultivators held their breath longer than ordinary people, so they often went down to the bottom of the lake to catch crabs. At that time, no matter how long the two girls stayed at the bottom of the lake, their catches were not as fruitful as those ordinary people. These ordinary people, who could not cultivate, used tools to weave crab cages out of bamboo. The crab cages were tied with ropes, and there were pig livers placed inside. They were thrown to the bottom of the lake and left overnight. When the cages were pulled up the next day, the pig livers inside were replaced with fat crabs. It was already autumn. Just like in previous years, Yingri Lake was surrounded by many people. Some of them were there to put crab cages, some were collecting the crab cages, while others were just there to watch the fun. Along the way, the two people who had nothing to say came to the lakeside one after another. Zi Yue teased Feng Dan. “What? Does Sister Feng want to catch crabs? It’s a pity that we’re not like how we were when we were younger.” “Now that our Golden Door Sect’s young miss is so slender and elegant, jumping into the water to catch crabs, I’m afraid that you’ll attract the attention of many handsome young men.” “Maybe those handsome young men will be dazed when they see Sister Feng’s graceful, drenched figure, and they won’t be able to stop salivating.” Zi Yue said as she chuckled. Feng Dan squeezed out a smile forcefully and said to Zi Yue. “Yue’er, you don’t have to put in the effort to make me happy. Do I look sad to you?” Zi Yue rolled her eyes at Feng Dan. “Yes, yes, yes. Our Miss Feng is the most open-minded.” Feng Dan pointed to a place where there were fewer people, where one could see the full view of Yingri Lake. “Let’s go over there. Yue’er, sit with me.” After saying that, she walked directly to the place she pointed to just now. Zi Yue responded with an “oh” and followed obediently. Inside the Jiang Mansion. The three little girls were dragging Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi towards Jiang Ping’s bedroom. “Daddy, I’m going to catch crabs. Come out quickly and accompany me.” Wan’er, who had always been carefree, shouted before she reached Jiang Ping’s door. Jiang Ping opened the door and saw the three little girls with Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. “What’s wrong? What are you three little rascals trying to do today?” Yan’er pointed at Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi and said. “Old Uncle Lei and Uncle Qiu said that there is a big lake outside the city. There are many crabs inside, and they are very delicious after being steamed.” Liu’er also said with a smile. “Yes, yes, and the school is closed today. Daddy, please take us there.” Before Jiang Ping could say anything, the three little girls immediately came up and hugged him. They used their coquettish ways to rub against him and kiss him. Jiang Ping had no choice but to agree with them with a smile. After the three little girls saw that Jiang Ping had agreed, they were so happy that they danced with joy. Without waiting for Jiang Ping to say anything else, they also pulled him out. Qiu Chi was originally from Fusheng City, so he led the way in front. Lei Jingyun, Jiang Ping, and the three little girls followed behind him. During the journey, Wan’er felt that Qiu Chi was walking too slowly, so she went up and kicked him, asking him to lead the way faster. Otherwise, she would not let him eat crabs tonight. The helpless Qiu Chi could only obediently agree with the eldest young miss, and then quickly walked towards Yingri Lake. On the side of Yingri Lake, there were all kinds of people. As soon as the three little girls reached the place, they planned to jump into the lake. Wan’er had already taken off her shoes and was eager to give it a try. Now that the sun was high in the sky, the lake was shimmering. Looking at the bottom of the lake, the water was shallow, and the grass was swaying. Evergreen trees were planted around the lakeside. The shadow of the trees was reflected on the lake water. It looked like a natural gem that made people feel comfortable physically and mentally. When Jiang Ping saw this scene, he recalled that he had never really appreciated the scenery here since he came to this world. He told Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun to look after the three little girls carefully and walked along the lake. “Sister Feng, do you think that’s Jiang Ping and the three little girls?” Zi Yue pointed at Jiang Ping and the others and said to Feng Dan. Feng Dan looked in the direction Zi Yue pointed and saw that it was Jiang Ping and the others. She was just about to get up when she sat down again. Zi Yue noticed this subtle movement, but she didn’t say anything. After carefully looking at where Jiang Ping and the three little girls were, she suddenly said to Feng Dan beside her. “Look at the two next to them. Aren’t they Qiu Chi and Old Man Lei who was at the Fang family’s gate that day?” “Didn’t Jiang Ping say that he wouldn’t have anything to do with cultivators? Why did he bring them with him?” Zi Yue complained. Feng Dan looked over and found that it was true. Yes, didn’t he say that he didn’t like to deal with cultivators? How could it be… Or perhaps he just didn’t want to deal with women. Zi Yue didn’t know what Feng Dan was thinking at the moment. However, seeing that Feng Dan was silent, she also didn’t say anything. From the two women’s view, Jiang Ping said something to Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun before leaving. Then, he slowly walked along the lakeside with his hands behind his back. The lake was round. No matter which direction Jiang Ping walked in, he would pass by where the two of them were. A moment later, Feng Dan watched as Jiang Ping got closer and closer to her. Feng Dan grabbed her sleeve tightly. When they were only twenty steps away, the woman wanted to say hello, but she didn’t know how to open her mouth. Zi Yue, who was beside her, sighed and waved in Jiang Ping’s direction. “Mr. Jiang, what a coincidence. You’re here too.” Jiang Ping heard the voice and looked over. When he saw the two of them, he revealed his signature smile. He nodded and waved his hand as a greeting. Then, he didn’t stop and continued walking. When she saw that Jiang Ping was getting further and further away from her, Feng Dan’s hand that was gripping her sleeve slowly loosened. It was as if he treated everyone like this except for his three daughters. He had a smile on his face, but he didn’t get close to anyone. At this moment, Jiang Ping did not think too much about it. He just treated it as a greeting from someone he knew, but he would not have too much contact with the two girls. After all, he had taken in Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi back then because they had already cut off all ties with the outside world and would not cause any more trouble. Zi Yue and Feng Dan were, after all, the daughters of two first-rate forces in Fusheng City. Who knew if they would drag their family into another fight. Although Jiang Ping wasn’t afraid, he was still very clear about the principle that it was better to avoid trouble. As for the three little girls, Lei Jingyun told the three little girls about the cultivators holding their breaths and some things to take note of. He also explained the situation at the bottom of the lake and told them where the crabs liked to hide. After saying that, the three girls rushed to the bottom of the lake. Lei Jingyun was helpless, but in order to ensure the safety of the three girls, he could only follow obediently. Before entering the water, Lei Jingyun also told Qiu Chi to fish for more crabs. These three girls were only intrigued by the idea and came here to play. If they really wanted to eat crabs, they had to do it themselves. After diving into the water, although the three girls couldn’t swim, because they held their breaths for a long time, they didn’t panic in the water. Lei Jingyun used his spiritual energy to transmit his voice to the three of them, asking them to look at him. Then, he showed the three little girls how to swim. After Wan’er finished watching, she puffed up her cheeks and waved her arms in the water, indicating that she had learned it. Then, she imitated Lei Jingyun’s movements and swam forward. Yan’er and Wan’er also learned it after Lei Jingyun demonstrated it two more times. Then, they swam to the bottom of the lake. According to Old Man Lei, the three little girls grabbed a rock from the bottom of the lake so that they could sink and walk. Then, they began to search for the big crab at the bottom of the lake. Lei Jingyun told the three little girls to try not to stray too far away so that he could take care of them. Wan’er held the rock in one hand and flipped the seaweed in the other. After searching for a while, she did not find any trace of the crab. She suspected that Old Man Lei was lying to her. After working for half a day, she didn’t manage to catch the crab. She was even pecked twice when a school of small fish swam past. Wan’er puffed up her cheeks and turned around to glare at Lei Jingyun with her small eyes. Although the little girl was still in the tempering realm, she didn’t know how to transmit spiritual energy. However, judging from her fierce expression, Lei Jingyun knew that he would be slapped in the head again. Wan’er walked towards Lei Jingyun with spitting anger. When she was halfway there, she stopped, and her face turned red. Then, many small blisters appeared around her, along with waves of blue smoke. Seeing this, Lei Jingyun quickly went forward to check. Lei Jingyun almost shot out like a bow and arrow. He came to Wan’er’s side and used his spiritual energy to check Wan’er’s body carefully. His nervous expression was eased, and a smile appeared on his face. Then, he used his spiritual energy to ask Wan’er to sit cross-legged under the water, telling her not to panic. It was a sign that her realm was going to break. He told her to absorb as much spiritual energy as possible from the water after she sat down. Wan’er obediently did as he said. She held the stone, pressed her small body down, and sat cross-legged under the water. Lei Jingyun guarded Wan’er and then used his spiritual energy to check Jiang Ping’s location on the lake surface. He sent a telepathic transmission to inform Jiang Ping about Wan’er breaking through. When Jiang Ping received Lei Jingyun’s telepathic transmission, he arrived at the bottom of the lake in a flash. Seeing Wan’er sitting cross-legged at the bottom of the lake with her face flushed red, Jiang Ping asked Lei Jingyun to bring Yan’er and Liu’er over first, and he could just stand guard here. Lei Jingyun did as he was told and then brought Yan’er and Liu’er over. The two little girls saw Wan’er sitting at the bottom of the lake with green smoke bubbles constantly emerging from her body. They felt that it was strange, so they widened their eyes and looked at Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping told the two little girls that Wan’er was breaking through, and he wanted the two of them to watch from the side as it might be helpful for their cultivation. Yan’er and Liu’er finally understood and nodded. Then, they listened to their father’s words and stared at Wan’er carefully. Wan’er maintained the same posture. The other two little girls were not impatient. Instead, they were a little fascinated. Then, Yan’er also pressed her body down and sat cross-legged next to Wan’er. Gradually, her small face began to flush red. Jiang Ping nodded with a smile when he saw it. Lei Jingyun was a little surprised. He thought that Wan’er had the best talent among the three little girls, but he did not expect that Yan’er also seemed to have a special constitution that was not inferior to Wan’er’s. She actually relied on comprehending Wan’er’s breakthrough, and the threshold of her realm was loosened. Then, she followed Wan’er and broke through It must be known that most ordinary cultivators who broke through relied on piled-up spirit stones and medicinal pills. Wan’er and Yan’er, who relied on chance to breakthrough, were all blessed by the heavens without exception. The whole family wasn’t ordinary. Liu’er, the youngest, suddenly made a move. She imitated the movements of her eldest sister and second sister and sat down. Jiang Ping had a smile on his face as if he had expected this. Although he didn’t know much about the resurrection lily constitution, he would never be disappointed. Lei Jingyun had already forgotten that he was still at the bottom of the lake. He opened his mouth wide and almost choked on water. If he remembered correctly, Liu’er’s cultivation was only in the middle stage of the tempering realm. This was too abnormal. At this moment, he only had one sentence in his heart. “What kind of people are they?” The three little girls broke through together. If there were other cultivators present, they would definitely notice that the spiritual energy in this area was all drifting towards the bottom of the lake. A moment later, Wan’er opened her eyes. She waved her two small hands and felt her own spiritual energy. Then, she happily waved her hands towards her father and gestured something Jiang Ping nodded and pointed at Yan’er and Liu’er. Wan’er looked in the direction of his fingers and saw that her two sisters looked the same as she did just now. Then, she turned around and gestured to Jiang Ping happily. Jiang Ping patted Wan’er’s head and sent a telepathic transmission to calm her down. Then, she obediently watched her two younger sisters’ breakthrough. After Yan’er and Liu’er broke through one after another, Jiang Ping held the three little girls with both hands and gestured for Lei Jingyun to follow. Then, he floated to the surface of the water. When they reached the surface of the water, he brought them to the shore. After they got to the shore, Jiang Ping used his spiritual energy to dry the three little girls’ soaked clothes. Wan’er stretched her body and said to Jiang Ping. “Daddy, did Yan’er and Liu’er breakthrough like me?” After Jiang Ping dried his clothes, he said to his three daughters. “Yes, Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er broke through together.” Liu’er blinked her big eyes and asked with slightly trembling eyelashes. “Then, what realm are we in now?” Lei Jingyun answered for Jiang Ping. “Refinement realm is above the tempering realm. The three young ladies are now in the initial stage of the refinement realm.” After hearing that, Wan’er jumped up and shouted while holding the hands of her two sisters. “Good! Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er are all masters of the refinement realm!” Yan’er and Liu’er also jumped up happily with Wan’er. Jiang Ping revealed a fatherly smile. Although these three little rascals usually fought with each other on the surface, they were still very united. “It’s getting late. It’s time to go home.” Jiang Ping bent down and said to the three little girls. Yan’er said reluctantly. “But we haven’t caught the crab yet.” “Yeah, yeah. Wan’er didn’t catch it either. I want to eat crab.” Liu’er raised her hand and said with a little disappointment. “I didn’t catch it either.” Jiang Ping was amused by the words of the three girls and then looked at Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun smiled knowingly, turned around, and shouted Qiu Chi’s name at the surface of the lake. Then, one head emerged from the center of the lake. After Qiu Chi emerged from the water, he first shook his head left and right to shake off the water droplets on his head. His two feet kicked hard at the bottom of the water, and his two hands reached out to the surface of the water. In his hands, he was still holding more than a dozen crabs tied with hemp ropes that were as big as Wan’er’s face. The three little girls clapped and cheered when they saw him, shouting that Uncle Qiu was mighty. After Qiu Chi came ashore, Jiang Ping patted Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun’s shoulders to signal that they had done well. Then, he said to them. “Let’s go back. Tonight, I’ll be making dinner. I’ll let you have a taste of the crab’s different cooking methods.” <b>er</b>  Zi Yue and Feng Dan were still sitting on the shore. Seeing Jiang Ping and the others leave, Zi Yue stood up. “Let’s go. We should go back too.” Feng Dan shook her head and said to Zi Yue. “There’s no rush. We’ll go back after they go further away.” Zi Yue glanced at Jiang Ping and the others who had left, then turned back to look at Feng Dan. She could only shake her head helplessly. It seemed that this sister of hers who had been widowed for so many years had someone in her heart. Zi Yue muttered to herself, “It’s hard to express my melancholy.” Inside the Jiang Mansion, Jiang Ping brought a large basin full of crab meat to the table. He clapped his hands and nodded in satisfaction. When Li Sushang brought the three little girls to the dining table, the three little gluttonous cats couldn’t wait to start eating. Just as they were about to make a move, they were stopped by Jiang Ping. “Wait, you three little gluttonous cats go and call Old Uncle Lei and Qiu Chi over first.” Wan’er was the first to disagree. She knew Qiu Chi’s appetite. If he were to eat with them, she might not even get a crab leg. “Daddy, why don’t we call them after we finish eating? Don’t worry, we won’t eat too much!” After Jiang Ping heard that, he could only teach her carefully and pat Wan’er’s little head. “Without Old Uncle Lei and Uncle Qiu, you won’t even be able to eat crabs today. We have to be grateful.” Wan’er thought for a moment, and it seemed to make sense. Then, she nodded with a smile and ran over to look for Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. When Wan’er pulled the two of them over, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi swallowed their saliva before they even reached the table. Lei Jingyun asked, “Patriarch, what is the name of this dish? This is the first time I’ve seen crabs being cooked this way.” Jiang Ping answered proudly. “This dish is called spicy crab. It’s a dish from my hometown. You won’t be able to taste it in ordinary places.” “Later, Qiu Chi will go to the market and buy some more. I’ll teach you how to cook it. You can cook it for the others in our residence so that they can have a taste too.” “Now, sit down and eat.” As soon as he finished speaking, everyone found a good seat and sat down. Then, everyone at the dining table wolfed down their food. Regardless of age, no one gave way to anyone. It all depended on whose appetite was bigger and whose movements were faster. Even Li Sushang, who was usually more reserved, ate heartily today. From then on, there was an additional rule in the Jiang Mansion. At the dining table, there was no difference in age or status. In a small wine stall in Fusheng City, a few burly men were drunk. “Everyone listen to me. Two days ago, when I went to the sect master’s study, guess what I saw?” “This can be considered a shocking secret.” The one who was talking was the servant of the Golden Door Sect, Zhou Zheng. At this moment, he was toasting and chatting with his scoundrel friends. “Enough, enough. What big secret can the Golden Door Sect have? I have a piece of information that can be considered an earth-shattering secret!” Zhou Zheng’s words were interrupted by a burly man beside him. Then, that burly man continued to speak to the other two people. “It’s said that the mayor’s mansion’s daughter, Zi Yue, recently obtained a high-grade spirit stone!” “She even gave that spirit stone to the mayor.” Another burly man held a wine cup in his hand and said while shaking his head. “Previously, didn’t the Hundred Treasures House also auction off a high-grade spirit stone?” “The one you said that was given to the mayor, could it be the one being auctioned off?” The burly man who had spoken earlier had his head resting on his arm as he shook his head. “No, no. Didn’t the Hundred Treasures House’s previous auction request was in exchange for the Fang family’s two marketplaces?” “The next day, the patriarch of the Fang family died, but the mayor’s mansion didn’t get the two marketplaces, so it couldn’t have been the one from the Hundred Treasures House.” Actually, the spirit stone that the Hundred Treasures House had auctioned previously had been given to the Jiang Mansion the day after Jiang Ping had stood in front of the Fang Mansion, and Jiang Ping had casually accepted it. However, those who had the strength to fight for the Fang family’s two marketplaces didn’t make a move to fight for it. Since the Golden Door Sect and the mayor’s mansion were old friends, they didn’t participate too. And now, each of them had a high-grade spirit stone in their hands, so they wouldn’t destroy the relationship between the two families for the sake of the spirit stone at the Hundred Treasures House. As long as these two great Buddhas didn’t make a move, the other small factions naturally didn’t dare to make a move either. It wasn’t until not long ago that the Hundred Treasures House announced that the spirit stone had been auctioned off, and it had been auctioned off in a way that the owner was satisfied with. When Zhou Zheng heard his two friends’ words, he instantly sobered up. Three high-grade spirit stones had suddenly appeared in Fusheng City, which was enough to shock people. <b>as er</b>  Then, the burly man said that the mayor’s mansion had an additional spirit stone continued to speak. “Right now, the city is in an uproar because of this high-grade spirit stone. Some people say that there is a spirit stone mine under the jurisdiction of Fusheng City.” “Which led to the frequent appearance of high-grade spirit stones in Fusheng City recently.” Zhou Zheng rubbed his chin with his fingers. Spirit stone mine? This made sense. Otherwise, there was no way to explain the fact that three high-grade spirit stones had appeared in Fusheng City, which was considered a very poor place in the cultivation world. “By the way, Brother Zhou, what secret did you want to talk about just now?” Zhou Zheng came back to his senses from his thoughts. When he heard that the burly man who was about to pass out from getting drunk asked him, he hurriedly picked up his wine and played dumb. “It’s nothing, it’s nothing. Come, let’s drink.” The next day, Zhou Zheng informed the Golden Door Sect that he was going back to his hometown. Then, he packed his luggage and went to an immortal mansion called Giant Dragon Mountain Inside Giant Dragon Mountain, there was a sect. At the entrance of the sect, there were three big words written on the plaque, Tianyuan Sect. Tianyuan Sect was considered a first-rate sect within a thousand miles of Fusheng City. Unlike other sects, there were no elder seats in the sect. The backbone of the sect was mostly itinerant cultivators. Voluntary itinerant cultivators either had a request from Tianyuan Sect, or they had a weakness that they were forced to work for the sect. Therefore, they volunteered to be the guest elders in Tianyuan Sect. Itinerant cultivators were guest elders, so Tianyuan Sect had no shortage of people to use, and they did not feel sorry for them if they were used. Those itinerant cultivators who were forced to work for Tianyuan Sect were pushed to the front line like cannon fodder. They died unjustly, but they did not dare to say anything bad about Tianyuan Sect even before they died. Tianyuan Sect’s sect master, Liu Fang, had relied on this method to slowly rise from a sect that was not even considered a third-rate force to a position that was admired by tens of thousands of people. Zhou Zheng had come here this time to look for an old senior whom he had met by chance many years ago. At that time, Zhou Zheng was still in his teens and did not know martial arts. He had never cultivated before. It was because of that old senior who had taught him the cultivation method that he had the core building realm cultivation today. Although his cultivation was not considered high, it had at least allowed Zhou Zheng to grow up from a farm boy in the village to someone that was still relatively well off. Zhou Zheng’s cultivation was at the core building realm, so he couldn’t fly. He could only run all the way to the Giant Dragon Mountain. When he arrived at Tianyuan Sect, the guards at the gate stopped him. “Tianyuan Sect doesn’t allow strangers to enter.” Zhou Zheng smiled and said. “I’m here to find Xu Shi, Senior Xu. I’ll have to trouble you to be accommodating.” “Or you can inform him. Just tell him a kid surnamed Zhou from Fusheng City from back then has something important to discuss with him.” The guard at the door didn’t immediately turn around to inform Zhou Zheng. Instead, he made a money gesture by rubbing his index finger and thumb. Zhou Zheng had also been in the Golden Door Sect for quite some time. When he saw this gesture, he immediately understood. He took out three low-grade spirit stones from his pocket and handed them to the guard. After the guard took them, he felt a little disgusted, as if he felt that they were too little. However, looking at this person before him, three low-grade spirit stones should be all he could take out. Then, he coldly said to Zhou Zheng. “Wait here, I’ll go and inform him.” Seeing the guard leave, Zhou Zheng couldn’t help but curse in a low voice. Those three spirit stones were already worth more than half a year’s worth of his savings, yet this person still felt that it was too little. The people from large sects were really snobbish. The person, Xu Shi, that Zhou Zheng had mentioned was also one of the guest elders in Tianyuan Sect, and he was also one of those who were forced. Because Xu Shi had accidentally offended a certain big shot in the sect in his early years, his entire family had been taken to the sect and was under house arrest. In order to protect the lives of his entire family, Xu Shi could only run to Tianyuan Sect, where everyone wanted to beat them up. He became a bandit and helped the vicious sect to do evil. The guard ran to the room where Xu Shi was and passed on Zhou Zheng’s message. Then, he directly turned around and left. Xu Shi sat on the stool, his fingers stroking his beard. Kid Zhou? He seemed to have some impression of him. Back in Fusheng City, he had taught him some cultivation methods. However, after he had taught him the cultivation method, he could tell that the highest realm that Zhou Zheng could reach in his life was only the core building realm. The furthest he could go was the late-stage core building realm. Therefore, he didn’t pay too much attention to this person. After teaching him the cultivation method, he left hastily. Meanwhile, Zhou Zheng only knew that Xu Shi was a guest elder in Tianyuan Sect. Xu Shi didn’t feel much emotion in his heart, but he was curious. What exactly was Zhou Zheng’s urgent matter? Therefore, Xu Shi decided to visit Zhou Zheng. If Zhou Zheng’s urgent matter was because he encountered trouble and wanted to ask him for help, then he would directly send him away. After all, a nobody in the core building realm wasn’t worth his effort. Xu Shi flew to the front of the mountain gate. When he saw Zhou Zheng, he landed on the ground. He first exchanged some pleasantries with Zhou Zheng. He could tell that Zhou Zheng was not here because he was in trouble. That was why Xu Shi continued to chat with him. “Kid, you still remember me. You can be considered as someone who values friendship.” “Tell me, why are you here this time? Did you run into some difficulties? Is there anything I can help you with?” Zhou Zheng was touched when he heard Xu Shi’s words. He did not expect that after not seeing this old senior for more than ten years, he would still take the initiative to care about him. He was certain that he had come to the right person this time. “Senior, I am not here to ask for your help. I am here to repay your kindness.” “Repay my kindness?” “What do you mean?” Xu Shi looked at the person in front of him with a playful expression. Zhou Zheng told Xu Shi about the three high-grade spirit stones that appeared in Fusheng City at once. Xu Shi was also a little surprised when he heard that. Three high-grade spirit stones appeared at once? According to his understanding, the number of high-grade spirit stones in Tianyuan Sect could be counted with two hands. “So, what are you trying to say?” Xu Shi didn’t understand what Zhou Zheng was trying to say, so he asked Zhou Zheng. Zhou Zheng looked around and then said in a low voice. “I’m guessing that there might be a spirit stone mine in the jurisdiction of Fusheng City.” “Spirit stone mine!” Xu Shi shouted. Zhou Zheng, who was beside him, hurriedly signaled him to keep his voice down. Xu Shi coughed twice and calmed down. “Are you sure there’s a spirit stone mine? Do you know what a spirit stone mine means?” Of course, Zhou Zheng knew what a spirit stone mine meant. If a sect owned a spirit stone mine, then the sect would either have a meteoric rise or be targeted by someone with ulterior motives, and the sect would be exterminated overnight. This was enough to explain the rarity of a spirit stone mine. He said to Xu Shi. “The possibility is very high. Otherwise, how do you explain the three spirit stones appearing in Fusheng City in such a short period of time?” Xu Shi was silent for a long time as if he was carefully considering the possibility that Zhou Zheng had mentioned. If it was really as Zhou Zheng had said, then not only could he use this matter to exchange for the safety of his wife and children, but he could also receive the attention of the sect. When that time came, would he still need to work for the sect? He would just have to cross his legs and wait for someone to serve him. Thus, he said to Zhou Zheng. “Go to my residence first, and then tell me in detail about these three high-grade spirit stones that you know of.” Zhou Zheng followed Xu Shi to his residence in the sect. Xu Shi was the only one who lived in this room. After his family members were placed under house arrest, they were all arranged to different places within the sect, not to mention meeting them. He could not even get close to them. If it was not for his origin core realm cultivation that was still useful to the Tianyuan Sect, his family members would have been dragged out and killed long ago. After that, Zhou Zheng recounted what he had said earlier in greater detail. Xu Shi patted Zhou Zheng’s shoulder. “I will go and report to the sect master directly. We have to see how the sect master will react first. If it is really as we have guessed in the end.” “It’s not just me. When the time comes, you brat, just wait to enjoy your life.” After saying that, he asked Zhou Zheng to stay in his room while he went to find the sect master himself. Xu Shi arrived at Tianyuan Sect’s sect master’s room. He asked the guards to go in and deliver the message. After entering the room, he began to talk to Liu Fang. “What? A spirit stone mine!” The Tianyuan Sect’s sect master was so excited that he almost shouted. Xu Shi was indeed an experienced person. It was clearly Zhou Zheng who brought the news, but Xu Shi did not mention Zhou Zheng at all. All the credit went to him. After a short moment of shock, Liu Fang immediately laughed heartily. “Well done, Xu Shi. I knew I didn’t misjudge you. You are indeed the pillar of our sect.” At this moment, Xu Shi only felt that this sect master in front of him was hypocritical. Every time the sect had conflicts with other forces, he would always be the one pushed to the front. Just because he was easy to order around, and he didn’t need to sacrifice. Of course, he certainly didn’t dare to say these words in front of Liu Fang. He struck while the iron was hot and said to Liu Fang with a smile. “Then sect master, about my family…” Liu Fang waved his hand and said. “If the matter is true, your little matter is nothing. Don’t worry, your family’s quality of life in the sect is pretty good. Now they are living even more comfortably than you.” When Xu Shi heard this, his face lit up with joy. “Then sect master, why don’t we send someone to investigate first?” Liu Fang nodded. “Why don’t we leave this matter to you. Then, I’ll write you a warrant. You can take this and find Feng Qingye. The two of you will go together.” After hearing this, Xu Shi was secretly relieved. He could guess that Liu Fang would want to send him to investigate this matter. However, he only had the cultivation at the origin core realm. Although Fusheng City was small, it wasn’t like there weren’t any origin core realm cultivators in the city. And the Feng Qingye that Liu Fang mentioned, besides being an elder who had stayed in the sect for a long time, was also a mighty figure in the nascent soul realm. Feng Qingye followed Liu Fang’s orders obediently as Liu Fang was said to be his savior. Therefore, with Feng Qingye accompanying Xu Shi, he wouldn’t have too many worries on this trip. Holding the warrant given by Liu Fang, Xu Shi immediately went to find Feng Qingye. “What do you want?” Feng Qingye looked Xu Shi up and down and asked. Xu Shi explained the mission to Feng Qingye. At first, he did not believe it because, in Feng Qingye’s eyes, a person like Xu Shi was only fit to be the scapegoat for Tianyuan Sect. It was not until Xu Shi took out the token in his hand that Feng Qingye’s attitude towards him eased up. Xu Shi brought Feng Qingye back to his residence and brought Zhou Zheng with him. The three of them didn’t stop for a moment and headed directly towards Fusheng City. On the way, Feng Qingye asked Xu Shi. “What’s the point of bringing this core building realm cultivator burden with us for our sect’s mission?” Xu Shi pulled Feng Qingye aside and whispered to him. “This is my spy in Fusheng City. Most of the information about this matter was provided by my spy.” Feng Qingye nodded as if he understood. Then, he asked Xu Shi. “For our trip to Fusheng City, how do you plan to start the investigation?” Xu Shi thought for a moment and then analyzed. “If there really is a mine, it should have already been occupied by someone. Otherwise, why would there be so many spirit stones?” “Then, we’ll start with investigating the Hundred Treasures House. As long as we can find out who the person who auctioned the high-grade spirit stone is, it shouldn’t be too difficult to follow the clues.” Feng Qingye frowned and said. “An auction house like the Hundred Treasures House usually won’t reveal the owner’s information, right? Why wouldn’t it be too difficult like what you said?” Xu Shi smiled meaningfully. “This is why the sect master wants you to come with me. If bribery doesn’t work, we can threaten them.” Feng Qingye only responded with an “oh” with a calm expression, as if he was already used to this kind of thing. Xu Shi turned around and said to Zhou Zheng. “Since we are in a hurry, I’ll fly you. Our first target of this trip is Fusheng City’s Hundred Treasures House!” In the Hundred Treasures House, Fei Cai was preparing for the upcoming auction in two days. Ever since the last time the Hundred Treasures House auctioned off a rare item like high-grade spirit stones, the Hundred Treasures House’s reputation had risen to the highest level. Therefore, the Hundred Treasures House had also obtained many sellers. These people were all willing to hand over their goods to the Hundred Treasures House. No matter what kind of item it was, it could be auctioned off at a satisfactory price. If Jiang Ping wasn’t included, the Hundred Treasures House could be considered the richest in Fusheng City. Fei Cai sat on the sofa, crossed her legs, and said to the management of the Hundred Treasures House in her sexy and charming voice. “Old Zhao, how is the matter of inviting Mr. Jiang to the auction in two days coming along?” Because the Hundred Treasures House struck while the iron was hot, it announced to the public that a rare item would appear in the auction in two days. This made the cultivators of Fusheng City curious. Although it was a rare item, it was only a low-grade spiritual artifact. It was far inferior to the high-grade spirit stone from before. But for those second-rate forces in Fusheng City, a low-grade spiritual artifact was enough to make them fight over it. Fei Cai had sent people to invite Jiang Ping because she actually hoped that he would be able to come to the auction that day. After all, many people were curious about Jiang Ping’s Room 12. This would give their Hundred Treasures House a better promotion. Moreover, Fei Cai hadn’t given up on the idea of building a good relationship with the Jiang family. The steward, Old Zhao, looked somewhat hesitant. He didn’t dare to look straight at Fei Cai. “Director, I’m to blame for not doing a good job. Not to mention Mr. Jiang, as soon as I arrived at the gate of the Jiang Mansion, their butler said that their master wasn’t willing to deal with cultivators, so he told me to leave.” After saying this, Old Zhao sighed. It must be known that their Hundred Treasures House had never suffered such grievances. If it were any other forces, not to mention personally inviting them, before the letter of invitation arrived, the person would have already arrived at the Hundred Treasures House. Although Fei Cai had already expected this, she was also a little disappointed. “It’s fine. It would be best if Mr. Jiang can come. If he doesn’t come, then let him be. You can leave first.” After Old Zhao left, Fei Cai picked up the account book on the table and sat down on the sofa. She held the account book with both hands and flipped through it. Old Zhao had just returned to the entrance of the Hundred Treasures House when he saw three people descending from the sky. The three people were Xu Shi, Feng Qingye, and Zhou Zheng. Xu Shi held Zhou Zheng’s armpits with both hands while Feng Qingye followed by the side and slowly descended to the entrance of the Hundred Treasures House. Old Zhao had been a butler in the Hundred Treasures House for many years, so he had good eyesight. Those who could fly were at least at the origin core realm. The three of them had just landed and had yet to stand properly when Old Zhao greeted them with a smile. “Dear guests, are you here for the auction the day after tomorrow?” Xu Shi cupped his fists and said to Old Zhao. “We are from Tianyuan Sect. We are here to discuss something with your director. Please help us to inform.” Old Zhao felt as if he had been struck by lightning when he heard the words, Tianyuan Sect. Although he had never been to the Tianyuan Sect and did not know much about it, he had heard Fei Cai mention it before. Tianyuan Sect was the center of Fusheng City. It was one of the top sects within a thousand miles radius. The sect master was said to be in the earth immortal realm, and there were countless origin core realm cultivators in the sect. Just the earth immortal realm alone was enough to shock Old Zhao. He did not dare to be negligent. He quickly replied to Xu Shi, brought the few of them to the living room, and then immediately went to inform the director. In the living room, the butler, Old Zhao, was already on his way to find Fei Cai. Only Xu Shi and the other two were left in the living room. Feng Qingye said to Xu Shi with a look of disdain. “Why were you so polite to the butler just now? You should have followed my method to beat them up, then force them to speak.” Xu Shi put on an act and replied. “Don’t you know that this is called diplomacy before violence? Unlike you nascent soul experts, who often oppress people with your realm.” Feng Qingye glared at Xu Shi and didn’t say anything else. After the butler Old Zhao ran to inform Fei Cai, Fei Cai rushed to the living room. After Fei Cai arrived in the living room, she ordered the servants to make tea. After she introduced herself, she said to the three people. “Dear distinguished guests of the Tianyuan Sect, may I know why you are here to see me?” Xu Shi smiled and asked Fei Cai to sit down first. “It’s a pleasure to meet you. We are here to ask Director Fei Cai if the Hundred Treasures House sold a high-grade spirit stone some time ago.” Fei Cai had just sat down when her heart skipped a beat when she heard Xu Shi’s words. She answered with a guilty expression. “There is such a thing.” Xu Shi quickly went on with the topic “Then, is it convenient for Director Fei Cai to tell us who the owner is and where they live?” “If Director Fei Cai cooperates with us, then our Tianyuan Sect will be eternally grateful.” When he mentioned Tianyuan Sect, Xu Shi deliberately emphasized the word. Fei Cai said with a troubled look on her face. “Of course, I want to cooperate with the three of you, but our Hundred Treasures House has a rule…” Xu Shi shook his head. “Rules are rigid, but people are flexible. Why don’t you consider it, Director Fei Cai?” The woman’s expression became more and more unsightly, and she was a little hesitant. That high-grade spirit stone was given to the Hundred Treasure House by Qiu Chi for auction. If Qiu Chi was still alone, she would have said it, but now that Qiu Chi was in the Jiang Mansion… If she were to expose Qiu Chi, then it was hard to say whether Jiang Ping would come and find trouble with her in the future. Fei Cai was very conflicted. She couldn’t afford to offend Jiang Ping, and she couldn’t afford to offend Tianyuan Sect which was behind the three people in front of her. Seeing this, Xu Shi gave Feng Qingye a look. Feng Qingye immediately understood. Then, he activated his spiritual energy and revealed his origin core realm cultivation. Fei Cai, who was only in the late stage of the core building realm, was somewhat suffocated by Feng Qingye’s realm. Fei Cai could only stretch out her hand, indicating that she could tell them. She told them the whole story of Qiu Chi handing over the spirit stone to the Hundred Treasures House for auction. After Xu Shi heard it, he asked with a smile. “Then where is this Qiu Chi now?” Fei Cai shook her head and said. “Since that day, I haven’t seen this person again, and I don’t know where he is now.” A woman who could become a director of the Hundred Treasures House was indeed cunning, and when she lied, there was no flaw at all. Seeing that Fei Cai didn’t seem to be lying, Xu Shi took Zhou Zheng and Feng Qingye and left. After they had walked far away, Fei Cai covered her chest with her hand. Her heart was still beating violently. After she calmed down, she hurriedly walked out of the Hundred Treasures House and headed towards the Jiang Mansion. Fei Cai’s palm slammed hard on the Jiang Mansion’s door. Jiang family’s butler, Chen Zhong, opened the door. “Director Fei Cai? Are you here for your Hundred Treasures House’s auction again?” “If it is, please go back. Our patriarch has said that he will not come into contact with the sects and forces of Fusheng City.” Fei Cai shook her head violently. “It’s not about the auction. I’m here because I have something important to discuss. Old Chen, please inform your patriarch immediately!” Chen Zhong saw that Fei Cai was speaking in such a hurry. It seemed that she really had something urgent to discuss. He did not inform Ping and directly brought Fei Cai to see Jiang Ping. In the living room, Chen Zhong said after bowing to Jiang Ping. “I acted on my own initiative. Just now, I saw that Director Fei Cai was in a hurry to see you, so I brought her here without informing you.” Jiang Ping wasn’t bothered. He let Chen Zhong leave first and then asked Fei Cai. “Director Fei Cai, what’s the matter? Why are you in such a hurry to see me?” Fei Cai didn’t care whether Jiang Ping agreed or not. She picked up the tea on the table and took a sip. Rushing from the Hundred Treasures House just now had made her thirsty and breathless. After drinking the tea, Fei Cai told Jiang Ping what had happened in the Hundred Treasures House today. Jiang Ping frowned after listening. “Are they looking for the source of this spirit stone?” Fei Cai nodded and said. “And they even brought a nascent soul realm expert with them.” Jiang Ping tapped the table with his index finger. He was very puzzled. He didn’t know why the Tianyuan Sect had come to Fusheng City to make such a fuss this time. After thinking for a moment, Jiang Ping stopped his finger movements. Since he couldn’t guess it, then he would go and take a look. He first called Qiu Chi over and told him not to go out for the next few days. Qiu Chi nodded his head in confusion. Then he told Fei Cai that he would go and investigate and told her to go back first. After leaving the Hundred Treasures House, Xu Shi’s group found a tavern nearby and discussed their next plan. “Kid, aren’t you from Fusheng City? Do you know Qiu Chi?” Xu Shi asked Zhou Zheng. Zhou Zheng said with an awkward expression. “I know him. Qiu Chi used to be the sect master of a small sect called Sky Wolf Sect, but I haven’t seen him since the destruction of Sky Wolf Sect by the Fang family.” “Speaking of which, I even drank with him before.” Xu Shi slapped the back of Zhou Zheng’s head. “Trash!” Zhou Zheng covered his head and said. “I don’t know where Qiu Chi went, but after the death of the Fang family’s patriarch, he must still be in Fusheng City. We can still find him if we take our time.” Jiang Ping searched the city for the three people mentioned by Fei Cai. Then, he found that they were chatting in a small tavern. Jiang Ping walked into the tavern. “Waiter, give me a pot of your best wine and a plate of peanuts.” After saying that, he sat down. Xu Shi even glanced at Jiang Ping when he heard that, but he didn’t care and slapped the back of Zhou Zheng’s head again. “Take our time? You have time, but I don’t have the time.” Feng Qingye didn’t speak from the beginning to the end and only drank by himself. Xu Shi picked up a peanut with his hand and said after thinking for a moment. “Then Feng Qingye and I will go directly to the Golden Door Sect and the mayor’s mansion to ask about the origin of the other two spirit stones.” Then, he turned his head and pointed at Zhou Zheng. “You are a servant of the Golden Door Sect, to begin with. If it’s inconvenient, you will be responsible for investigating Qiu Chi’s whereabouts.” “We must find the location of this spirit stone mine by tonight at the latest.” After saying that, the three of them finished the wine in their cups and threw a few silver coins, and left the tavern. Jiang Ping, who was listening by the side, seemed to have understood the purpose of the Tianyuan Sect’s trip based on their words. He found it a little funny, but he also felt a little helpless. Could it be that these three fools thought that there was a spirit stone mine just because three spirit stones had appeared in Fusheng City? Although the spirit stones in Jiang Ping’s storage space added up to more than just a spirit stone mine… Jiang Ping thought for a moment and decided to follow them and find an opportunity to explain things clearly to them. After all, this was just a misunderstanding. He did not want to kill people rashly. After all, even if these three people were killed, then so be it. However, there was still a Tianyuan Sect behind them. Just as Xu Shi was about to step in, Feng Qingye called out to him. “If you ask me, we should be more straightforward. We should just attack them directly, find their leader, and question them.” “We could skip your troublesome diplomacy before violence strategy that doesn’t even work.” Before Xu Shi could react, Feng Qingye had already made his move. His right foot stomped on the ground, and the Golden Door Sect’s gate was shattered. A group of guards instantly surged out from Golden Door Sect. Feng Qingye didn’t waste any time and directly shouted at these guards. “Tell your leader to come out, or else I will exterminate the sect today.” At this moment, Jiang Ping quietly followed the two of them to the Golden Door Sect. Hearing Feng Qingye’s words, Jiang Ping was somewhat speechless. Wasn’t this the line that he said when he went to Chuanyun Sect? Jiang Ping secretly cursed Feng Qingye for being rude. The sect master of the Golden Door Sect, Feng Chenghan, quickly ran out in a huff. Feng Dan also followed behind him. When he came out, he found that the person who came to challenge the sect was actually a nascent soul realm big shot. Feng Chenghan’s originally angry expression turned into a guilty one. “You two, I am the sect master of the Golden Door Sect. May I ask what business do you have with us?” Taking advantage of the fact that this devil had yet to destroy his entire family, Feng Chenghan could only smile and say to the two of them. Feng Qingye nudged Xu Shi, indicating for him to speak. He was good at fighting, but when it came to negotiations, he was born with a dumb mouth. It was better to use fists and kicks. Xu Shi understood, coughed twice, straightened his body, and pretended to speak. “Ahem, let me ask you, did your sect get a high-grade spirit stone?” “Then how did you obtain the spirit stone?” “You better answer honestly, or else your entire sect will die.” Feng Chenghan was so scared that he was covered in a cold sweat. He looked at his daughter guiltily. Feng Dan was also a little nervous. She kept wiping the sweat off her palm with her skirt. Xu Shi saw this and seemed to have guessed something. He pointed at Feng Dan and said. “You obtained that spirit stone?” The woman in the red dress didn’t say anything. She just lowered her head. “If you don’t say anything, you are admitting it.” <b>1 an</b>  Feng Dan bit her lips tightly. “Little girl, tell me, where did you get that spirit stone?” “If you don’t tell me, then I’ll kill your entire family. I won’t even let go of the mosquitoes in your house.” Feng Chenghan saw this and kept hinting at his daughter with his eyes. However, his daughter still didn’t move. He was so anxious that he gritted his teeth. Suddenly, Feng Dan spoke. “I can’t say. Can you just kill me alone?” Xu Shi laughed. “Little girl, you’re quite naive!” Then, he gestured to Feng Qingye behind him. Feng Qingye stood out and punched Feng Chenghan across the air. Feng Chenghan was sent flying Then, Xu Shi asked again. “You can consider it. Do you want to say it or not?” Jiang Ping, who was hiding in the dark, sighed. In fact, it didn’t matter if Feng Dan said it. After all, he was going to talk to Xu Shi and the other two. But now that Feng Qingye had made his move, if he continued to ask, people might die. Jiang Ping had to step forward. Feng Dan gritted her teeth and clenched her fists. Her whole body trembled, but she still didn’t say anything. Feng Qingye raised his hand and wanted to punch Feng Chenghan, who had just stood up. Jiang Ping appeared in front of them. He reached out and grabbed Feng Qingye’s arm, saying with a slightly smiling expression. “There’s no need to ask. That person is me, and the spirit stone in Qiu Chi’s hand that you’re looking for also came from me.” Xu Shi was frightened by this young man who suddenly appeared in front of him. When Feng Dan heard Jiang Ping’s voice, her tensed body suddenly went limp, and she collapsed onto the ground. Feng Qingye narrowed his eyes and carefully stared at the person in front of him. At this time, Jiang Ping was still holding his arm. “He’s also in the nascent soul realm?” Although he didn’t sense any cultivator’s aura from Jiang Ping’s body, judging from Jiang Ping’s intuition that he could block his punch, this person’s strength was at least on par with his. Jiang Ping immediately let go of Xu Shi’s hand with a smile. “I’m not here to fight with you, I’m here to explain.” Feng Qingye asked in confusion. “Explain?” Jiang Ping nodded and said with a smile. “Yes, it’s about you guys investigating the spirit stone mine.” Xu Shi immediately came to a realization. Did he follow them? He had seen him before in the tavern. No wonder he looked familiar. Jiang Ping smiled and cupped his hands in apology, then said. “Isn’t this to solve the doubts in your hearts?” “Is it convenient to talk in private?” Xu Shi looked at Feng Qingye, who nodded. Jiang Ping extended his hand. “Please.” Then, the three of them went to the tavern and sat down. After sitting down, Jiang Ping ordered the waiter to serve the wine and dishes, then said to Feng Qingye and Xu Shi. “Actually, there is no spirit stone mine in Fusheng City.” Feng Qingye didn’t like to talk. After the food and wine were served, he picked up the wine pot and glass and poured himself a cup. Xu Shi asked Jiang Ping. “Then how did you get those three spirit stones?” Jiang Ping lowered his voice and pretended to be afraid that others would hear him. “Actually, I saved up those three spirit stones. I spent a lot of effort.” “You spent a lot of effort to save up those spirit stones, and now you’re giving them away?” Xu Shi asked. Jiang Ping sighed. “Sigh, it’s also because I’ve just arrived at Fusheng City. As a stranger here, I have to spend some money to bribe. In order to reduce the trouble in the future, I have to be more generous with my money.” Deep down, Xu Shi didn’t believe what Jiang Ping said. Three high-grade spirit stones and he was giving them away one after another in order to be more stable in Fusheng City? Did he have a mine at home? Thus, he stared at Jiang Ping with a puzzled gaze. Seeing that the two of them weren’t easy to fool, Jiang Ping could only speak again. “Fusheng City really doesn’t have any spirit stone mines. I can guarantee with my life. If you don’t believe me, you can send people to investigate inch by inch.” Listening to Jiang Ping’s words, Xu Shi’s heart wavered a little. He wasn’t too sure, to begin with, which was why he came to investigate. With a somewhat disappointed expression, he said to Jiang Ping. “Then it seems like I came here for nothing. However, I will continue to send people to search the area under the jurisdiction of Fusheng City. If I find out that you are lying…” “Although my cultivation is inferior to yours, Tianyun Sect is not easy to deal with.” After hearing this, Jiang Ping felt that he had already fooled Xu Shi. Even if the Tianyuan Sect sent people to search Fusheng City thoroughly and found that there was indeed no such thing as a spirit stone mine, it would have nothing to do with him. All he had to do was to make himself clean. Then, he raised his glass and let the two of them drink. After drinking a few glasses, Jiang Ping laughed and said, “I still have three daughters to take care of, so I’ll go back first.” Xu Shi and Feng Qingye did not stop him and let Jiang Ping leave. After Jiang Ping walked out of the tavern, he actually did not go home. Instead, he hid somewhere nearby the tavern and eavesdropped on the conversation between Feng Qingye and Xu Shi. “What should we do now? It seems that there really isn’t any spirit stone mine in Fusheng City,” Xu Shi said to Feng Qingye. Feng Qingye sipped his liquor and shook his head. “I don’t know. Go back and report to the sect master. This time, you might have to suffer.” Xu Shi was a little depressed, so he suddenly gulped down a glass of wine. “This is great. I came all this way for nothing, and now I have to be punished when I go back.” Then, he poured another glass of wine and took another sip. After listening to the conversation between the two, Jiang Ping completely let go of the worries in his heart, and then he turned around to go home for real. After Jiang Ping left, Xu Shi gave Feng Qingye a look. Feng Qingye held the glass of wine and said lightly. “He really left this time.” “Do you doubt the authenticity of what Jiang Ping said?” Xu Shi shook his head and said. “I was going to believe him, but when you played along with me, I knew there was something fishy about Jiang Ping.” “I didn’t expect you to be so smart. I thought your cultivation was higher than mine, and you did not have any outstanding qualities.” Feng Qingye’s face darkened, and he stared at Xu Shi coldly. Xu Shi felt a chill down his spine as he laughed. “It was just a joke. Brother Feng, don’t mind it.” Feng Qingye then turned his head away from him and poured a glass of wine into his cup. “Then what do you plan to do?” Xu Shi said with an evil smile. “I left some marks on that kid’s body just now. Did you bring a magical artifact that can shield your breath when you go out this time?” Feng Qingye understood and nodded. He took out a small mirror from his storage space. After Jiang Ping returned home, he first went to look for the three little girls. The three little girls had classes in school for the whole day. Other than Yan’er, the other two looked a little absent-minded. It was as if they had exhausted their energy. But when they saw Jiang Ping coming over, their small eyes instantly lit up. They dragged Jiang Ping into their room. Liu’er asked Jiang Ping. “Daddy, you haven’t played with us for a long time. Does daddy not love us anymore?” Jiang Ping patted Liu’er’s head and answered. “How can daddy not love you?” “Daddy has been quite busy these few days.” Wan’er crossed her arms in front of her chest and said angrily. “Hmph, I don’t care. Daddy will play with us tomorrow.” Yan’er also echoed. “Yes, yes. If daddy doesn’t accompany us tomorrow, we will ignore daddy.” Jiang Ping, who was feeling helpless by Yan’er’s words, comforted the three little girls. “Okay, okay, okay. Daddy will accompany Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er to play tomorrow. Have you thought about where to play?” The three little girls’ eyes rolled around. They were all thinking, but none of them could answer for a moment. They only wanted their father to accompany them. They didn’t care what they did. Lei Jingyun said from the side. “Why don’t we fly kites?” “The young ladies haven’t flown the paper kites since they made them. We can try them out.” Qiu Chi, who was standing straight on the side, nodded. “I happen to know an open space near Fusheng City. It’s very big and full of grass. It’s the best place to fly kites.” The three little girls nodded. Jiang Ping nodded as well. “Okay, then it’s decided. We’ll fly kites tomorrow.” The three little girls jumped up and clapped. At this time, Li Sushang walked over and said. “Even if you want to fly a kite, you have to eat first.” Jiang Ping asked, “What time is it? Wan’er and the others haven’t eaten yet?” Li Sushang shook her head. “It’s always like this. They say that they want to wait for their father to come back, or else they won’t eat. I’m forced to follow the three stubborn donkeys and wait for you in hunger.” Jiang Ping reached out his hand and gently patted their little heads one by one. “You’re not allowed to do this in the future. You’re still growing. How can you not eat?” “Let’s go and eat first.” The three girls knew that Jiang Ping was not really angry. They made a face at him and ran to the living room. Jiang Ping was so angry that he slapped his forehead and smiled helplessly. In the living room of the Jiang family, after the dining table became a mess, Jiang Ping let Li Sushang take the three little girls to take a bath. After washing up, Jiang Ping spent a lot of effort coaxing the three little girls to bed. Then, he returned to his room and summoned the system with a thought. [Cultivation Completion Signing System) [Name]: Jiang Ping (Cultivation Realm): Late-Stage Nascent Soul Realm (Cultivation Method): Great Void Celestial Technique [Technique]: Nirvana Palm, Wind Spirit Sword Technique [System Version]: 1.0 [Today’s Signing Reward: Middle-Grade Immortal Artifact, Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk] Jiang Ping complained in his heart that the random rewards given out by the system were too random when he signed in. More than ten days ago, it had been giving out spirit stones. But today, it had given him an immortal artifact. The difference was too big. He looked at the introduction of the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. (Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk: After using spiritual energy to activate it, you can control the five elements, eight gates, and eight trigrams to fight. Moreover, the eight trigrams disk has the effect of setting up formations and casting spells. It can set up to a thousand formations…] Feeling that it was a good thing, Jiang Ping put the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk away into his storage space. Just as he was about to shut down the system, a notification popped up. (Continuous Signing Reward: Cultivation Method Category (Ancient Divine Technique, Spiritual Chaos Sword Technique, Resurrection Lily Technique)] Damn it! Jiang Ping was shocked. This was his precious system, and it was simply spoon-feeding him. Ever since the three little girls had entered the refinement realm, Jiang Ping had not found a suitable cultivation method, so he did not bring them along to cultivate. This time, not only did he receive cultivation methods, but it was also customized by the system. This was too considerate. It seemed that he had to find time to impart the cultivation methods to the little girls. After Jiang Ping put away the three cultivation methods, he took out three top-grade spirit stones from his storage space. After putting them on the table, Jiang Ping pondered for a while and took out another top-grade spirit stone. His daughters’ progress was so fast. As their father, he had to work harder. Otherwise, how could he protect his daughters? Therefore, Jiang Ping planned to directly absorb four top-grade spirit stones to see if he could breakthrough in one fell swoop. Because the cultivation method that Jiang Ping cultivated was quite special, he could absorb several times more spiritual energy than ordinary cultivators. The spiritual energy in Fusheng City was considered thin for Jiang Ping, and relying on absorbing the spiritual energy of Heaven and earth, his progress was very slow. Therefore, ever since he was in the origin core realm, Jiang Ping had started to cultivate by absorbing top-grade spirit stones. High-grade spirit stones simply couldn’t satisfy the bottomless pit of his cultivation method. There were four top-grade spirit stones on the table, and Jiang Ping was adjusting his breathing with his eyes closed. At this time, on the roof of the Jiang Mansion, Xu Shi and Feng Qingye were quietly approaching the tiles on top of Jiang Ping’s house by relying on the magical artifact that shielded heaven’s secrets. Jiang Ping raised his wrist, and the four spirit stones on the table floated in the air. Then, he sat cross-legged, and the spiritual energy of the four spirit stones materialized and surged into Jiang Ping’s body. Feng Qingye and Xu Shi arrived on the roof of Jiang Ping’s house like thieves and gently flipped open a tile. They just happened to witness the scene of Jiang Ping refining spirit stones. Xu Shi was so shocked that he almost shouted. Even Feng Qingye could not help but gape. Those four sparkling spirit stones were not high-grade spirit stones. Judging from their color, they were top-grade spirit stones. Top-grade spirit stones! Xu Shi thought to himself that he knew this kid was not telling the truth at all. What did he say about painstakingly saving up three high-grade spirit stones? What nonsense! This kid was great. So high-grade spirit stones needed to be saved when he was treating top-grade spirit stones as if they were snacks? Then, he used telepathic transmission to ask Feng Qingye. “What do you think? Are you able to beat him?” Because Jiang Ping was cultivating and had removed the spell that concealed his cultivation, Feng Qingye was now able to clearly sense Jiang Ping’s actual cultivation. Feng Qingye didn’t use his spiritual energy to reply. He only looked at Xu Shi and slowly shook his head. Xu Shi thought for a moment and then said to Feng Qingye. “Then we’ll leave first. We’ll go back to the sect and bring some people over.” Now, they had no other way. Feng Qingye agreed with Xu Shi and quietly put back the tile. Then, the two of them returned the way they came and left the Jiang Mansion. After Jiang Ping absorbed the spiritual energy of the four top-grade spirit stones, he didn’t break through to the earth immortal realm. He just reached the perfect divine baby of the nascent soul realm. However, Jiang Ping was not disappointed. Based on this speed, he believed that he would be able to break through very soon. Then, he stood up and stretched. He walked to the bedside and lay down. He thought to himself that he would bring those girls to fly kites the next day, so he smiled and went to sleep. After sneaking out of the Jiang Mansion, Xu Shi first invited Zhou Zheng out. Then, he told him to keep an eye on Jiang Ping’s family tonight. If there was anything unusual, he would inform them immediately. After saying that, he handed Zhou Zheng a piece of jade and told him that he could contact him once he directly crushed it. He and Feng Qingye went back to call for reinforcements and would arrive at noon at the latest tomorrow. Zhou Zheng nodded, and then Xu Shi and Feng Qingye flew off. On the way to the Jiang Mansion, Zhou Zheng was in a good mood. From what Senior Xu Shi had told him. Fusheng City definitely has a spirit stone mine. If they were to take over the spirit stone mine for the Tianyuan Sect, it would be enough for him to live a few lifetimes if he could get some small benefits. The last task at hand was to keep an eye on the Jiang Mansion. Since he didn’t need to be cannon fodder, he was naturally in a good mood. As he walked, Zhou Zheng suddenly felt a flash of red in front of his eyes. When he focused on it, he realized that Feng Dan was already standing in front of him. Zhou Zheng said guiltily. “M-Miss, why are you here so late at night?” Feng Dan asked him coldly. “The Golden Door Sect’s gate was demolished today, and you weren’t around. I asked the guards who were inside, and only then did I know that you went back to your hometown.” “I should be the one asking why you are here.” Zhou Zheng chuckled. “Didn’t I come back?” Feng Dan’s expression did not change as she asked again. “Your hometown is not in this direction.” Zhou Zheng was stumped by the question and answered somewhat hesitantly. “Then did I go the wrong way? Yes, my house is over there. Miss, I’ll go home first.” After saying that, Zhou Zheng turned around and was about to leave. Feng Dan continued. “That day, when I came out from my father’s study, I happened to bump into you.” “I also saw that you, Xu Shi, and Feng Qingye were plotting something just now.” “So you were the one who told Xu Shi and the others that the Golden Door Sect obtained a spirit stone, right?” Zhou Zheng stopped in his tracks and did not answer. With a flick of his wrist, he was about to crush the jade that Xu Shi had given to him. Feng Dan saw Zhou Zheng’s actions and immediately took out her God Striking Whip without a word, whipping at Zhou Zheng. The whip drew a streak of lightning in the air with crackling sounds. Zhou Zheng didn’t have time to react before the whip ruthlessly hit his head. Then, fresh blood flowed from his head, and his entire body trembled as if he had been electrocuted. Then, Feng Dan kicked him, completely cutting off Zhou Zheng’s life force. Feng Dan put away this low-grade spiritual artifact called the God Striking Whip. This whip was given to her by her father when she was eighteen years old. If it weren’t for this whip, even if Feng Dan had the perfect late-stage core building realm cultivation, it wouldn’t be easy for her to kill Zhou Zheng, who was in the middle stage of the core building realm. Feng Dan pried open Zhou Zheng’s hand, picked up the jade, and walked towards the Jiang Mansion. Feng Dan patted the door lightly. As Qiu Chi’s room was the closest to the Jiang family’s entrance, Qiu Chi opened the door. “I want to see your patriarch.” Qiu Chi yawned and said. “Our patriarch is already asleep. Miss Feng, why don’t you come back tomorrow?” Feng Dan pushed Qiu Chi away and was about to enter. Qiu Chi tried to stop her while persuading her. “Why don’t you come back tomorrow? Master is really asleep.” “Miss Feng, hey, don’t push me. It’s easy for a young lady to be gossiped about when she enters someone else’s room in the middle of the night.” “Why don’t you wait here, and I’ll go in and help you to inform him?” Qiu Chi couldn’t stop Feng Dan, and it wasn’t good for him to lay his hands on a woman, so Feng Dan quickly arrived at the door of Jiang Ping’s room. Feng Dan raised her hand and was about to knock on the door, but she paused. Then she took a step back and gave Qiu Chi a look, indicating for him to knock on the door. Qiu Chi had no choice. After all, he was already at the door, so he could only force himself to knock and shout. “Knock knock knock.” “Master?” “Patriarch?” The door was opened, and Jiang Ping asked impatiently. “Qiu Chi, do you want to die? It’s the middle of the night.” Then Qiu Chi pointed at Feng Dan beside him with his chin helplessly. Jiang Ping let Qiu Chi leave first and then lit the oil lamp in the room. After blowing out the matches, Jiang Ping asked. “Why are you looking for me so late at night?” Feng Dan walked over and placed the jade that she had just taken from Zhou Zheng on the table. She then told Jiang Ping about Zhou Zheng, Xu Shi, and Feng Qingye having a conversation when she accidentally bumped into them. After that, Feng Dan found a stool and sat down, waiting for Jiang Ping’s reply. Jiang Ping did not expect Xu Shi and Feng Qingye to harbor evil intentions and even sent people to keep an eye on him. Feng Dan added. “Oh right, when I saw the three of them talking, I was too far away. I only heard a little.” “Xu Shi seemed to have said that he would go back to the sect to get reinforcements and then come back to deal with you.” Jiang Ping asked. “If I remember correctly, I think I heard that the sect master of Tianyuan Sect is at the earth immortal realm.” Feng Dan nodded. Then, Jiang Ping found a stool and sat down. His brain was thinking quickly, and his fingers knocked on the handrail of the stool out of habit. A moment later, Jiang Ping seemed to have thought of something. His furrowed brows were relaxed, and he hurriedly picked up his coat and put it on. He said to Feng Dan. “Thank you, Miss Feng. I’ve thought of a way to deal with it. If there’s nothing else, you can go back first.” Feng Dan said with a hesitant expression. “There’s one more thing.” Jiang Ping, who had already put on his clothes and was about to leave, turned his head and asked when he heard Feng Dan’s words. “What else?” Feng Dan stood up and slowly walked out of Jiang Ping’s room. After stepping out of the door, she turned her head and said. “Thank you for what happened during the day today.” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment before he nodded. “It’s okay.” Feng Dan hummed and left. Jiang Ping didn’t pay much attention to it and went to find Qiu Chi. Qiu Chi was already sleeping soundly on the bed. He patted Qiu Chi’s cheek and woke him up. “Get up and bring me to the empty space outside Fusheng City that you mentioned today.” Qiu Chi slowly sat up and was immediately dragged up by Jiang Ping to put on his clothes and leave the house. Inside Tianyuan Sect. “What? Are you sure you didn’t see wrongly?” Tianyuan Sect’s sect master Liu Fang asked Xu Shi. Xu Shi answered affirmatively. “It’s absolutely true. After we sneaked into the Jiang Mansion, we saw Jiang Ping absorbing four top-grade spirit stones.” Liu Fang doubted the authenticity of the matter. After all, even Tianyuan Sect didn’t have a single top-grade spirit stone. Xu Shi saw Liu Fang’s concern and continued. “If I didn’t see it with my own eyes, I wouldn’t believe it. It was top-grade spirit stones, and there were four of them.” “Sect Master, you can ask Feng Qingye. He was with me.” Liu Fang glanced at Feng Qingye. Feng Qingye didn’t say anything and nodded. Then, Liu Fang fell into deep thought. Xu Shi saw that Liu Fang was silent and continued to speak. “Sect Master, we can’t delay this matter. If that kid Jiang Ping reacts, it will be too late.” “Qingye, can you tell what cultivation Jiang Ping has?” Feng Qingye replied. “He’s stronger than me. He should be in the nascent soul realm.” After receiving Feng Qingye’s reply, Liu Fang decided to go to Fusheng City in person. “Pass down the order. Xu Shi, Feng Qingye, call Meng Qiang and He Shiyuan.” “Come with me to Fusheng City.” Early in the morning, in the Jiang Mansion. It was rare for the three little girls to get up early. Before they went to bed, the three little girls had agreed that no one was allowed to stay in bed because they were going to fly kites with their father today. In the end, Yan’er and Liu’er both woke up, but Wan’er was still drooling and dreaming. The two younger sisters dragged Wan’er for a long time before they woke her up from her dream. After Li Sushang finished washing up the three girls, they skipped to Jiang Ping’s room. Because Jiang Ping had such a rough night last night, he didn’t sleep well because he rushed back before dawn. Although sleep was not essential to cultivators, who didn’t like to sleep in? Therefore, Jiang Ping woke up later than usual today. The three little girls pushed open the door and saw that their father hadn’t woken up yet, so they shouted. “Daddy wake up!” “Daddy, Liu’er is hungry. Let’s get up quickly to eat breakfast and fly kites!” “Wan’er is already up, why is daddy still sleeping?” “Hurry up and get up!” Although the little girls were very noisy, Jiang Ping was still unmoved and was in a deep sleep. Seeing that Jiang Ping didn’t wake up despite her calling him so loudly, she said in a daze. “Daddy isn’t dead, right?” Wan’er immediately walked over and patted Liu’er on the head. “Bah bah bah, Liu’er, don’t talk nonsense.” Then, the three girls climbed onto Jiang Ping’s bed. They planned to use force to wake up their father. Wan’er picked up Jiang Ping’s hand and began to bite it. Yan’er scratched the soles of Jiang Ping’s feet. Liu’er was even more outrageous. She directly sat on Jiang Ping’s face. After the three little girls stretched out their demonic claws at Jiang Ping, Jiang Ping immediately woke up in shock. “Liu’er, get down quickly. Daddy can’t breathe.” “Wan’er, daddy’s flesh isn’t delicious. Can you stop biting?” “Also, Yan’er, stop. Don’t touch the soles of my feet.” Seeing that Jiang Ping had woken up, the three little girls jumped off the bed one after another and started running away while giggling. Only Jiang Ping was left sitting on the bed alone in a mess. Looking at the teeth marks on his hands and the messy bed, Jiang Ping shook his head and thought to himself. These three little girls must have reached the rebellious stage. That must be it! By the time Jiang Ping finished washing up, the three little girls were already sitting at the dining table, holding bowls and drinking porridge. Seeing Jiang Ping walk over, the three little girls covered their mouths and giggled at the same time. Jiang Ping pointed at the little girls with his finger. “You three little rascals, if you do this again, I’ll teach you a lesson.” After saying this, Jiang Ping saw his three daughters laughing even louder. Just as he was about to put on an act of anger, Liu’er hurriedly jumped down from the chair and dragged him to his seat. “Liu’er is the most sensible one. You two older ones, remember to learn more from your younger sister.” Wan’er grumbled at the side. “Daddy, you should eat your breakfast quickly. Why are you talking so much? We still have to fly kites later.” Li Sushang walked over from the side. “See, it’s all because of you, the father.” Jiang Ping shook his head helplessly. He had no choice but to pick up the porridge and drink it. After breakfast, Jiang Ping asked the three girls to call Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi to set off together. Originally, Li Sushang didn’t plan to go, but Jiang Ping said that it wasn’t as simple as flying a kite today. He told her to come along so that he could protect them. Li Sushang did not understand the meaning of Jiang Ping’s words either, but she still obediently did as he said and followed Jiang Ping out. Before leaving, Jiang Ping had specially instructed the butler, Chen Zhong, to tell the servants that they would have a day off today. Those who need to go home should go home. Those who were not going home shall go out to the market. In short, they should not stay in the mansion. Sitting in the carriage, Wan’er stuck her head out of the window. Her small face was frowning slightly. She opened the curtain and said to Lei Jingyun, who was driving the carriage. “Old Uncle Lei, this isn’t the way out of the city. Did you take the wrong road?” Lei Jingyun smiled at the little girl and didn’t say anything The other two little girls also stuck their heads out to take a look. Wan’er didn’t like Lei Jingyun, so she slapped Lei Jingyun’s head and said in a childish voice. “I’m asking you a question, why are you acting mysteriously.” Lei Jingyun turned around and looked at Jiang Ping, feeling wronged. “Patriarch…” Jiang Ping pulled Wan’er back and sat her down. “Wan’er, you can’t be so rude. Apologize to Old Uncle Lei.” Wan’er lowered her head and apologized to Lei Jingyun who was outside the curtain. Li Sushang was also puzzled and asked. “There is only one straight path out of the city. Why are we taking a big detour now?” Jiang Ping smiled and put his finger to his lips, indicating that she should not speak. Then, a gong sounded, scaring everyone. “Clang!” “The Jiang Mansion is leaving the city to play. Those who are not involved, please make way!” Yan’er pricked up her ears and listened carefully, then said. “Isn’t that Uncle Qiu’s voice?” Liu’er also heard it and nodded. “Yes, that’s Uncle Qiu’s voice. I didn’t see Uncle Qiu when I got in the carriage. I thought he wasn’t coming today.” Li Sushang looked at Jiang Ping with a puzzled look. Jiang Ping still didn’t explain. He just said to the three little girls. “Okay, let’s go out of the city now.” The carriage drove out of the city. Qiu Chi followed behind them and kept knocking on the gong in his hand, repeating what he had just said. The people in the city were discussing animatedly. “Is the Jiang Mansion a powerful faction? Why do they have to make such a scene when they’re leaving?” “Is this the Jiang family from Osmanthus Lane?” “I think so. Look, the one who knocked on the gong is Qiu Chi from the Sky Wolf Sect. Previously the Sky Wolf Sect was located at Osmanthus Lane, but now it’s taken over by the Jiang family. “Why is there such a big commotion today when they are usually on a low profile?” “I don’t know. Who cares? Hurry up and buy some vegetables and go back to work.” The carriage soon arrived at the open space that Qiu Chi had mentioned outside the city. Before the carriage stopped, Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er jumped out of the carriage one after another. Li Sushang also followed behind and got out of the carriage. She kept reminding them. “Slow down. Wait for auntie.” The open space was a large lawn. The lawn was soft, and even if they fell, it wouldn’t hurt. The three little girls were running unrestrained with their arms wide open. “Daddy, hurry up and catch up.” Wan’er said to the people behind her while she was having fun. Jiang Ping waved his hand. “Okay, daddy will come right away.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi took down three kites from the carriage. Then, the few of them quickly caught up. After catching up, Jiang Ping said to the three little girls. “Today, let’s have a group competition to see who can fly the highest and furthest kites!” The three girls clapped in unison.  Jiang Ping pointed at Liu’er and said. “Liu’er is the youngest, so daddy will be in the same group as Liu’er.” “The others can choose whether to follow Old Uncle Lei or Uncle Qiu.” Yan’er said first. “Anyway, I’m not going to follow Old Uncle Lei. The last time he taught me how to make a kite, he couldn’t even teach well.” “I choose Uncle Qiu!” Lei Jingyun’s old face turned red. He thought to himself that she was the one who couldn’t learn it, but Wan’er and Liu’er both succeeded. Besides, he even made the biggest kite for her later. Wan’er was disappointed. “Ah? But Wan’er doesn’t want to group with Old Uncle Lei. Can I choose auntie?” Lei Jingyun wanted to cry, but no tears came out. He looked at Jiang Ping with a bitter face. Jiang Ping laughed loudly and said. “Old Lei looks like you’re not popular. Even Wan’er, who’s closest to you, doesn’t want to choose you.” Li Sushang caught up with the three girls and panted heavily at the side. She had not recovered yet, so she waved her hand and said. “I didn’t learn martial arts, and I can’t run as fast as you guys. I can’t compare to all of you. So, I won’t be participating. After saying that, she sat down on the lawn. Wan’er was forced to team up with Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun’s face was looking smug as if he was saying. “Since you didn’t want to choose me, now it’s not up to you.” But he didn’t know that this was the beginning of his nightmare. The three teams started to fly the kites at the same time. The three adults held the kites and ran forward. When the kites flew up, they handed the coils in their hands to the little girls. The little girls held onto the coils and controlled them to fly higher. The adults guided them from the side. In a short while, Liu’er and Yan’er’s kites had already flown up. The two little girls followed Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi’s instructions to retract and release the coils in their hands. However, on Wan’er and Lei Jingyun’s side… Lei Jingyun desperately ran with the kite in his hands, but when he stopped, the kite also stopped. When Wan’er heard Liu’er and Yan’er’s cries of joy after the kites flew up, she was so angry that she jumped up and slapped Lei Jingyun on the head. “That’s why I didn’t want to choose you. Look, now we’re falling behind.” Lei Jingyun smiled awkwardly. “Miss, don’t be anxious. We’ll catch up later.” After saying that, he ran forward as fast as he could. After the time it takes for an incense stick to burn, Lei Jingyun still did not manage to fly the kite. In the time it takes for an incense stick to burn, Lei Jingyun received more than ten slaps. In the end, he even fell and collapsed on the ground. Wan’er came up and gave him another slap, then said. “You’re so stupid. Let me do it.” The little girl grabbed the string of the kite and ran forward. This time, the kite finally flew up. Lei Jingyun saw this and quickly went forward to teach Wan’er how to control the kite. But before he could speak, Wan’er stretched out her hand and said. “Don’t talk. I’ll do it myself.” Lei Jingyun could only stand silently at the side and look at Wan’er. Wan’er had been looking at Liu’er and Yan’er’s side just now, watching them retracting the coil. Then, she imitated them. In a short while, the kite flew high, more than a hundred feet, almost catching up with Yan’er and Liu’er. Li Sushang sat in the distance and looked at these people. The smile on her face was overflowing, and the Sun was also warm. In Fusheng City, at the entrance of the Jiang Mansion. The sect master of the Tianyuan Sect, Liu Fang, brought along Feng Qingye, Meng Qiang, He Shiyuan, three nascent soul realm cultivators, and Xu Shi, who was at the origin core realm. They quietly landed in front of the gate. As soon as they landed, Liu Fang furrowed his brows. He could sense that there was not a single trace of life in the entire Fang Mansion, which meant that there was no one inside. However, he still let Xu Shi and Feng Qingye go in to investigate. However, the two people who came out shook their heads. Liu Fang was furious. “Xu Shi, what’s going on? Didn’t you say that you sent people to keep an eye on the Fang family?”. “Where are your informants? What about the people in the Fang Mansion? Where have they gone?” Xu Shi hurriedly lowered his head and cupped his hands. “Sect Master, don’t be anxious. When we went in to investigate just now, although there was no one inside, everything was still there.” “For such a big family, even if they went out somewhere, someone would definitely see them. Let me find someone to ask first.” Liu Fang glared at Xu Shi. “Then go quickly!” Xu Shi immediately ran out and grabbed someone to ask. “Do you know where the Jiang family went?” The man who was grabbed was carrying a wicker basket and a sickle in his hand answered with a face full of panic. “The Jiang family? Are you talking about the Jiang family in Osmanthus Lane?” Xu Shi nodded. The man said. “The Jiang family went on a trip today. The whole family went out. I think they went flying kites in the open space outside the city.” After saying that, he pointed in the direction outside the city. Xu Shi hurriedly ran back to report to Liu Fang. “Sect Master, the Jiang family is flying kites in the open space outside the city.” Liu Fang kicked Xu Shi and asked him to lead the way. Then, the five of them hurried out of the city. “Sister Wan’er is about to overtake us. Daddy, what should we do?” Liu’er looked at Wan’er’s kite flying higher and higher and said to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping patted Liu’er’s little head and said. “Don’t worry. Let’s take it slow. Remember what daddy said about haste makes waste?” Liu’er nodded and pulled the string back and forth freely. Yan’er, who had always liked to compete with Wan’er to be the elder sister, saw that Wan’er’s kite was about to surpass hers. She was so anxious that she wanted to release all the strings. Qiu Chi, who was instructing Yan’er at the side, could not stop her. “Miss Yan’er, if you release the string like this, the kite will go off-balance and crash.” Yan’er did not stop. She did not want to be surpassed by Wan’er. On Wan’er’s side, she relied on her super learning ability to become more proficient with her movements. The kite flew higher and higher. Lei Jingyun could only feel dejected at the side. If he clapped his hands too loudly, he would be glared at by this little girl. Very soon, Wan’er’s kite was already higher than Yan’er and Liu’er’s. Her frowning little face finally revealed a smile. Liu’er listened to Jiang Ping’s words and continued to control the kite unhurriedly. On the other hand, Yan’er’s kite was on the verge of crashing because she had released the string too quickly. In the end, there was no way to save it. The kite fell from the sky. Yan’er was a little unhappy about this and said to Qiu Chi. “Why didn’t you stop me just now?” Qiu Chi was stunned. Could it be that the sound he made just now was fart? Then, Yan’er hurriedly asked Qiu Chi to fly the kite. Qiu Chi had no choice but to drag the kite string and run forward again. Above the clouds in the open space, Liu Fang and the remaining four people were floating. “That is Jiang Ping, the one that I mentioned.” Xu Shi pointed at Jiang Ping and said to Liu Fang Liu Fang nodded and stretched out his finger. The strings of the three kites that were flying in the sky broke and fell to the ground. The three little girls on the lawn were puzzled, especially Yan’er. She had just restarted the kite, and before it could fly far, the string broke. The smile on Jiang Ping’s face slowly disappeared. He turned around and looked up at the sky. Liu Fang and the others slowly landed. Then they stood fifty steps away from Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping said to Liu’er who was beside him. “Liu’er, go and find Uncle Qiu and Old Uncle Lei. Go to the carriage, okay?” The little girl nodded. Then, Jiang Ping shouted in the direction of Wan’er and Yan’er. “Wan’er and Yan’er, go back to the carriage with Old Uncle Lei first.” Although they didn’t understand, the three little girls still did as they were told. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi brought the three little girls and Li Sushang to the carriage. Wan’er poked her little head out and looked at the people outside and Jiang Ping, then asked Lei Jingyun. “Old Uncle Lei, who are these people?” Lei Jingyun said to Wan’er. “They are your daddy’s friends. They are here to catch up with your daddy.” Wan’er slapped Lei Jingyun again. “Do you think I’m so gullible? Do these people look like they are here to catch up?” Lei Jingyun covered his head and said. “It’s true. If you don’t believe me, you can ask your daddy later.” Wan’er leaned against the window and stretched out her small hand to point at Jiang Ping as she muttered. “Really?” Every time Jiang Ping wanted to fight, he would send the three little girls away. After he was done, he would use a lame excuse to trick them. Liu Fang looked at the young man in front of him and gave Xu Shi, who was behind him, a look. Xu Shi understood and left his position where the four of them were standing and headed towards the carriage. Jiang Ping watched Xu Shi walk over with a calm expression and didn’t say anything. Wan’er said to everyone in the carriage. “Look, that person is walking towards us.” Li Sushang turned pale with fright and quickly stuck her head out of the same window as Wan’er to look. The other two little girls also wanted to look, but the window was no longer big enough for their heads. Seeing Xu Shi walk over while rubbing his fists, Li Sushang’s heart pounded. Behind her, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi, who was leading the horse, remained unmoved. Lei Jingyun patted Li Sushang’s shoulder and said. “Don’t panic. The patriarch has already thought of a plan. We can just sit in the carriage.” Li Sushang finally calmed down. If Jiang Ping had already made a plan, then she didn’t have to worry. Because her trust in Jiang Ping was no less than the three little girls’ trust for their father. Xu Shi slowly walked over, waved his hand, and a hammer appeared in his hand. He had an evil smile on his face. Liu Fang said to Jiang Ping. “If you are willing to tell us the location of the spirit stone mine and hand it over to me, then I will ask Xu Shi to stop now.” Jiang Ping shook his head. Liu Fang continued to ask. “You are not willing?” Then, he narrowed his eyes and stared at the person in front of him. Jiang Ping smiled. “No, I don’t know.” “How would I know where there is the spirit stone mine in Fusheng City?” A smile appeared on Liu Fang’s face, and his smile was somewhat playful. “Then, could it be that those four top-grade spirit stones of yours are fake?” “If you don’t say it, then watch your family, the young and old get slaughtered.” Jiang Ping was calm and composed, his hands behind his back. When Liu Fang saw that Jiang Ping was so calm, he looked in Xu Shi’s direction with confusion. Xu Shi had already walked to the front of the carriage. Just as he was about to make a move, with the carriage as the center, smoke suddenly rose from the surroundings. As soon as the smoke rose, it quickly enveloped the entire carriage. Seeing this, Xu Shi immediately raised his sledgehammer and waved it in front of him. He used the rotation of the sledgehammer to blow away the smoke. After the smoke was blown away by Xu Shi, Xu Shi focused his eyes and saw that the carriage had disappeared in place. A carriage appeared out of thin air in front of the Jiang Mansion. The three little girls got down from the carriage and exclaimed in surprise. “Wow, Uncle Qiu, what spell did you cast just now? How did we get home so quickly?” Just now, on the lawn, after Xu Shi approached the carriage, Qiu Chi told the three little girls in the carriage that he knew spells. Then, he made a seal with his hands, and the carriage disappeared and reappeared in the Jiang Mansion. In fact, it was because Jiang Ping had brought Qiu Chi to the open space outside the city in advance last night. Then, he used the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk to set up a formation. This was a low-level formation recorded in the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk that could allow the carriage to teleport. It was called the Earth Shrinking Formation. One only needed to carve the formation eye in two places to teleport. However, the teleport distance was not far. The distance from the Jiang Mansion to the open space outside the city was already the limit. On the open space outside the city, Xu Shi widened his eyes and looked at the spot where the carriage had disappeared. He was a little confused. Then, he turned to look at Liu Fang and Jiang Ping. He saw that Jiang Ping was also looking in his direction with a meaningful smile. Xu Shi felt uneasy and wanted to leave the place where he was standing. Before he could take a step, he saw Jiang Ping wave his hand. Then, a small circle with Xu Shi as the center started to burn. Xu Shi wanted to escape, but the fire quickly drowned him and made him unable to use any of his spiritual energy. After the fire swallowed Xu Shi, the light yellow color at the beginning turned purple. The whole open space was surrounded by Xu Shi’s wails and cries for help, but Liu Fang didn’t move. There were no changes in his expression. Jiang Ping asked Liu Fang. “Sect Master, aren’t you going to save your men?” Liu Fang smiled and shook his head. “Just an origin core realm who should have died long ago. There’s no need to waste energy to save a person who should have died.” The few people just watched Xu Shi be burned by the flame, unable to move, until he turned into ashes. After that, Liu Fang no longer looked at the pile of ashes that Xu Shi had turned into. He turned his head and asked Jiang Ping. “Formation?” Jiang Ping nodded. “Good technique. That formation is so strange. Not to mention an origin core realm like Xu Shi, even if the few nascent soul realm cultivators behind me stepped into it, they would have to suffer a lot.” Liu Fang continued. When Jiang Ping heard this, he cupped his hands and said to Tianyuan Sect’s sect master. “You flatter me, but this small formation wouldn’t be able to burn even a hair on an earth immortal realm cultivator like you.” Liu Fang didn’t directly answer Jiang Ping’s question. Instead, he said to Jiang Ping. “How many more formations like this have you set up?” Jiang Ping smiled and shook his head. “There was too little time, so I only set up that Earth Shrinking Formation and the Red Flame Formation.” “Then it won’t be easy for you to handle next.” “I hope the sect master can show mercy.” Liu Fang sneered. “Then you just have to obediently hand over the spirit stone mine.” Jiang Ping helplessly spread his hands. “I already said that there is no spirit stone mine. Why won’t you believe me?” “After I beat you until you’re half-dead, if you still say that there is no spirit stone mine, then I might believe you.” Liu Fang waved at the remaining three people behind him, and the three people behind him walked forward in unison. Then, they walked faster and faster until finally, they charged towards Jiang Ping. When the three people reached Jiang Ping, they spread out again and surrounded him in a triangular formation. Feng Qingye, Meng Qiang, and He Shiyuan were people who had stayed in Tianyuan Sect for quite a long time, so they had a tacit understanding with each other. The three of them jumped up almost at the same time, clenched their fists, and punched at Jiang Ping’s head, heart, and back respectively. However, Jiang Ping’s response puzzled the three of them. Jiang Ping still had his hands behind his back and didn’t move at all, letting the three of them punch at him. What kind of experience did Feng Qingye and the other two have? Let alone the nascent soul realm, even the earth immortal realm couldn’t be as calm as Jiang Ping when the three of them attacked. The three of them felt that there was a trap. If Jiang Ping had set up a formation around them, they would be falling for his trick. The three of them reacted almost at the same time. Their fists were about to land on Jiang Ping’s body, but they quickly used their spiritual energy to stop their movements and put some distance between them and Jiang Ping. Seeing this, the corners of Jiang Ping’s mouth rose, and he couldn’t help but laugh out loud. “Haha, why are you people so vigilant?” “I told you, there are only two formations. What are you afraid of?” Liu Fang was a little dissatisfied with the three of them. “Go on, what are you waiting for?” The three of them started to attack Jiang Ping like before. Jiang Ping sighed and murmured. “You can’t use the same move twice, understand?” Then, he reached out his hand, grabbed Meng Qiang’s fist, and took a small step back. With the help of inertia, he threw Meng Qiang to the ground. Then, he turned to face He Shiyuan on his left and directly raised his leg to kick at his abdomen. Feng Qingye was behind Jiang Ping, and his target was Jiang Ping’s head. Jiang Ping first lowered his body to dodge Feng Qingye’s fist, then turned around and changed positions with Feng Qingye. He also gave Feng Qingye a heavy kick on the back, causing Feng Qingye to lie on the ground. Liu Fang didn’t seem to care that Feng Qingye and the other two were defeated by Jiang Ping one by one. He only opened his mouth to speak. “All of you, show your true abilities. Don’t let Patriarch Jiang look down on us.” The three quickly stood up and gathered together. Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes as he looked at them. The three of them each took out their own spiritual artifacts. They were all middle-grade spiritual artifacts. An additional halberd appeared in Meng Qiang’s hand. He Shiyuan took out a green-blue sword. Feng Qingye’s spiritual artifact was the strangest. It was a branch. The three of them poured their spiritual energy into their own spiritual artifacts, and then they attacked Jiang Ping respectively. Liu Fang watched from the side. He thought that he didn’t need to make a move to kill Jiang Ping. After all, no matter how strong Jiang Ping was, he couldn’t block the three nascent soul realm cultivators’ famous skills. The spiritual energy turned into a physical form, and three streams of spiritual energy twisted together and flew towards Jiang Ping. This stream of spiritual energy contained the unique skills of Feng Qingye and the other two, so it would alternate between black, blue, and green. This materialized spiritual energy was as big as a house, and when it swept towards Jiang Ping, it brought up the soil and dust on the ground. If an ordinary person were to stand here, they would be swept into that stream of spiritual energy Jiang Ping flipped his hand, and a long blade appeared in his hand. The Sky Piercer blade that originally belonged to the sect master of Chuanyun Sect had just been taken out by Jiang Ping. The Sky Piercer blade that already had spiritual intelligence let out a long cry. However, Jiang Ping could feel that this cry wasn’t resisting him, but it was a manifestation of its desire for battle. Jiang Ping held the hilt of the blade with both hands and made a circle on the spot, using inertia to make a chopping motion. The blade emitted red light and chopped down at the enormous spiritual energy that was changing colors. Although the move that Jiang Ping used was not as powerful as the combined moves of Feng Qingye and the other two, everyone could see it. A sharp aura was revealed in the red light. The two spiritual energies collided, and a boom was heard in the open space. Then, an intense light flashed, and nothing could be seen clearly. After Jiang Ping drew his sword, he stood with the sword in his hand and watched the collision of the two rays of light in front of him. This was because at that time, the sect master of the Chuanyun Sect, Yun Lan, had only used seventy percent of the sword’s power, and he was able to beat Jiang Ping until his clothes were tattered. Now that he was the one controlling this sword, Jiang Ping was very confident that he could rely on this move to win. The huge spiritual energy was gradually repelled by the red light, and then it forced its way towards Feng Qingye and the other two. Before Feng Qingye and the other two could dodge, the red light directly pierced through the spiritual energy pillar and hacked at them. Seeing this, Liu Fang raised his toes and retreated. When the light dissipated and the view became clear, Feng Qingye, He Shiyuan, and Meng Qiang were lying on the ground unconscious. The spiritual artifacts in their hands were all broken into two pieces. Jiang Ping held the Sky Piercer Blade and looked at the scene in front of him with a satisfied smile. The Sky Piercer also hummed, as if it was asking for Jiang Ping’s praise. Jiang Ping patted the Sky Piercer Blade and said while looking at the blade. “What’s going on? We haven’t even finished fighting, and you want me to praise you?” The Sky Piercer Blade immediately quieted down. Liu Fang went up to check on Feng Qingye and the other two, and found that they were only injured and unconscious, and their lives were not in danger. He waved his hand, and the three flew to the side, leaving the battlefield. Then, he looked carefully at the long blade in Jiang Ping’s hand. “A high-grade spiritual artifact?” “No, a high-grade spiritual artifact is not that powerful. Is this a quasi-immortal weapon that is about to give birth to spiritual intelligence?” Jiang Ping nodded and said. “As expected of the sect master of Tianyun Sect who is knowledgeable and discerning.” Liu Fang sneered. “No wonder you are so confident. It turns out that you have a quasi-immortal weapon.” Jiang Ping pointed the tip of the blade at Liu Fang and said. “Then, Sect Master, do you want to experience it? Liu Fang moved his wrist and didn’t answer Jiang Ping’s question with words. Instead, he directly expressed with actions. He shot out and punched out with both fists, aiming at Jiang Ping’s chest. Jiang Ping grabbed the hilt of the blade with one hand and held the blade in front of his chest with the other hand. Liu Fang punched down at the blade, and Jiang Ping retreated more than twenty steps. After Jiang Ping stopped retreating, he rubbed his chest. It seemed that Liu Fang’s punch just now was quite powerful. After rubbing his chest, Jiang Ping raised his blade and slashed at Liu Fang. Liu Fang was not afraid at all. His palm turned into a blade. His palm hacked at Jiang Ping’s blade. When the blade and palm collided, it was obvious that Jiang Ping had the upper hand. Liu Fang’s palm was deflected. Jiang Ping struck while the iron was hot and continued to hack. The continuous hacking forced Liu Fang to retreat. Liu Fang continued to infuse spiritual energy into his palm, increasing the hardness of his palm to block Jiang Ping’s attack. Taking advantage of the moment when Liu Fang was not paying attention, Jiang Ping raised his leg and gave Liu Fang a fierce kick. Liu Fang was kicked five steps away. Then Jiang Ping chased after him, aimed the tip of the blade, and was going to stab Liu Fang’s chest. Liu Fang quickly put his palms in front of his chest to resist the tip of the blade. Taking advantage of the moment when Jiang Ping exerted his strength, he turned his body to the side and slapped the blade, deflecting the Sky Piercer. Then his palm turned into a fist, smashing heavily at Jiang Ping’s right face. Jiang Ping was sent flying far away by the punch. When he stood up, Liu Fang was already in front of him. He grabbed Jiang Ping by the collar and threw him into the air. Then he leaped up and hit Jiang Ping’s stomach with his head. Jiang Ping stabilized his body in the air, just as Liu Fang’s head was about to hit Jiang Ping’s stomach. He immediately turned the blade horizontally to block Liu Fang’s impact. Liu Fang’s body was unexpectedly hard. His head was against the blade, and he could still send Jiang Ping flying. Jiang Ping, who had fallen to the ground, coughed twice and coughed up blood. However, Liu Fang was still walking towards him. Jiang Ping held his blade horizontally in front of him and used the move that he had used against Feng Qingye and the other two. Liu Fang didn’t dodge. He wanted to see if the power of a quasi-immortal weapon could shake him. Facing the incoming red light, he lowered his body and threw a punch. The fist collided with the light, and then Liu Fang’s body was quickly swallowed by the light. Jiang Ping straightened his body and wiped the blood from the corner of his mouth, ready to receive the next attack. Because he knew that this move could not cause fatal damage to Liu Fang, who was at the initial stage of the earth immortal realm. The light dissipated, but Liu Fang still maintained his punching stance. Other than the fact that Liu Fang’s fist had some blood on it, everything else was fine. Liu Fang put away his fist and said to Jiang Ping. “This quasi-immortal weapon is just so-so. It’s far inferior to a real immortal weapon.” The Sky Piercer in Jiang Ping’s hand seemed to be a little unconvinced, and it kept humming. Then, Jiang Ping knocked on the blade with his finger, and the Sky Piercer stopped. Then, he said to Liu Fang. “Oh? Sect Master Liu, have you experienced the power of an immortal weapon?” Liu Fang laughed. “Yes, and it’s also a coincidence that I also have an immortal weapon in my hand. Although it’s only a low-level one, it’s more than ten times more powerful than the quasi-immortal weapon in your hand.” After saying that, Liu Fang took out a short sword from his storage space. “Patriarch Jiang, do you want to test the power of my Crimson Cloud Sword?” Jiang Ping didn’t reply to Liu Fang. He just kept the Sky Piercer Blade back in his storage space. Before he kept it, he even said to Sky Piercer, “Thank you for your hard work.” The Sky Piercer hummed twice as if it was saying that it could still fight. However, Jiang Ping didn’t pay attention to it and directly put the Sky Piercer Blade back into his storage space. Seeing this, Liu Fang asked in puzzlement. “What are you doing?”. “If it wasn’t for that blade, I’m afraid you wouldn’t be able to last even one round against me.” Jiang Ping laughed. “That blade, logically speaking, was borrowed by me, and I have to return it in the future.” “Seeing Sect Master Liu take out that immortal artifact, I’m afraid that my blade will be damaged when it comes into contact with that immortal artifact of yours.” “When it is time to return it, it’ll be very difficult for me to explain.” Hearing Jiang Ping’s words, Liu Fang laughed heartily. “With or without that blade, you’ll die. It’s just a matter of time.” “But if you tell me the whereabouts of the spirit stone mine now, I can consider crippling you and keeping you alive.” Jiang Ping’s expression turned cold as he said with disdain. “I’ve told you a few hundred times that Fusheng City doesn’t have any spirit stone mines.” As he said that, he took out the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. “Besides, it’s just an immortal weapon.” “I have one too, and it’s a middle-grade one!” Liu Fang’s face began to look shocked. He knew how rare an immortal-grade weapon was. The Crimson Cloud Sword in his hand had cost at least half of Tianyuan Sect’s wealth. At that time, in order to fight for this immortal weapon, he almost fought badly with other sects. Therefore, when Jiang Ping took out the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk, he was even more convinced that the Fusheng City’s spirit stone mine rumor was not groundless. Even if it didn’t work out, and there were really no spirit stone mines, if he killed Jiang Ping, the treasures he would have plundered from him would be worthwhile. Jiang Ping waved at Liu Fang. “What’s wrong, Sect Master Liu? Did you become bewitched after seeing that I have a middle-grade spiritual artifact in my hand?” “If you’re afraid, then just leave. I, Jiang Ping, will not pursue the matter.” 129 Jiang Ping Also Had a Middle-Grade Immortal Artifact! The huge spiritual energy was gradually repelled by the red light, and then it forced its way towards Feng Qingye and the other two. Before Feng Qingye and the other two could dodge, the red light directly pierced through the spiritual energy pillar and hacked at them. Seeing this, Liu Fang raised his toes and retreated. When the light dissipated and the view became clear, Feng Qingye, He Shiyuan, and Meng Qiang were lying on the ground unconscious. The spiritual artifacts in their hands were all broken into two pieces. Jiang Ping held the Sky Piercer Blade and looked at the scene in front of him with a satisfied smile. The Sky Piercer also hummed, as if it was asking for Jiang Ping’s praise. Jiang Ping patted the Sky Piercer Blade and said while looking at the blade. “What’s going on? We haven’t even finished fighting, and you want me to praise you?” The Sky Piercer Blade immediately quieted down. Liu Fang went up to check on Feng Qingye and the other two, and found that they were only injured and unconscious, and their lives were not in danger. He waved his hand, and the three flew to the side, leaving the battlefield. Then, he looked carefully at the long blade in Jiang Ping’s hand. “A high-grade spiritual artifact?” “No, a high-grade spiritual artifact is not that powerful. Is this a quasi-immortal weapon that is about to give birth to spiritual intelligence?” Jiang Ping nodded and said. “As expected of the sect master of Tianyun Sect who is knowledgeable and discerning.” Liu Fang sneered. “No wonder you are so confident. It turns out that you have a quasi-immortal weapon.” Jiang Ping pointed the tip of the blade at Liu Fang and said. “Then, Sect Master, do you want to experience it? Liu Fang moved his wrist and didn’t answer Jiang Ping’s question with words. Instead, he directly expressed with actions. He shot out and punched out with both fists, aiming at Jiang Ping’s chest. Jiang Ping grabbed the hilt of the blade with one hand and held the blade in front of his chest with the other hand. Liu Fang punched down at the blade, and Jiang Ping retreated more than twenty steps. After Jiang Ping stopped retreating, he rubbed his chest. It seemed that Liu Fang’s punch just now was quite powerful. After rubbing his chest, Jiang Ping raised his blade and slashed at Liu Fang. Liu Fang was not afraid at all. His palm turned into a blade. His palm hacked at Jiang Ping’s blade. When the blade and palm collided, it was obvious that Jiang Ping had the upper hand. Liu Fang’s palm was deflected. Jiang Ping struck while the iron was hot and continued to hack. The continuous hacking forced Liu Fang to retreat. Liu Fang continued to infuse spiritual energy into his palm, increasing the hardness of his palm to block Jiang Ping’s attack. Taking advantage of the moment when Liu Fang was not paying attention, Jiang Ping raised his leg and gave Liu Fang a fierce kick. Liu Fang was kicked five steps away. Then Jiang Ping chased after him, aimed the tip of the blade, and was going to stab Liu Fang’s chest. Liu Fang quickly put his palms in front of his chest to resist the tip of the blade. Taking advantage of the moment when Jiang Ping exerted his strength, he turned his body to the side and slapped the blade, deflecting the Sky Piercer. Then his palm turned into a fist, smashing heavily at Jiang Ping’s right face. Jiang Ping was sent flying far away by the punch. When he stood up, Liu Fang was already in front of him. He grabbed Jiang Ping by the collar and threw him into the air. Then he leaped up and hit Jiang Ping’s stomach with his head. Jiang Ping stabilized his body in the air, just as Liu Fang’s head was about to hit Jiang Ping’s stomach. He immediately turned the blade horizontally to block Liu Fang’s impact. Liu Fang’s body was unexpectedly hard. His head was against the blade, and he could still send Jiang Ping flying. Jiang Ping, who had fallen to the ground, coughed twice and coughed up blood. However, Liu Fang was still walking towards him. Jiang Ping held his blade horizontally in front of him and used the move that he had used against Feng Qingye and the other two. Liu Fang didn’t dodge. He wanted to see if the power of a quasi-immortal weapon could shake him. Facing the incoming red light, he lowered his body and threw a punch. The fist collided with the light, and then Liu Fang’s body was quickly swallowed by the light. Jiang Ping straightened his body and wiped the blood from the corner of his mouth, ready to receive the next attack. Because he knew that this move could not cause fatal damage to Liu Fang, who was at the initial stage of the earth immortal realm. The light dissipated, but Liu Fang still maintained his punching stance. Other than the fact that Liu Fang’s fist had some blood on it, everything else was fine. Liu Fang put away his fist and said to Jiang Ping. “This quasi-immortal weapon is just so-so. It’s far inferior to a real immortal weapon.” The Sky Piercer in Jiang Ping’s hand seemed to be a little unconvinced, and it kept humming. Then, Jiang Ping knocked on the blade with his finger, and the Sky Piercer stopped. Then, he said to Liu Fang. “Oh? Sect Master Liu, have you experienced the power of an immortal weapon?” Liu Fang laughed. “Yes, and it’s also a coincidence that I also have an immortal weapon in my hand. Although it’s only a low-level one, it’s more than ten times more powerful than the quasi-immortal weapon in your hand.” After saying that, Liu Fang took out a short sword from his storage space. “Patriarch Jiang, do you want to test the power of my Crimson Cloud Sword?” Jiang Ping didn’t reply to Liu Fang. He just kept the Sky Piercer Blade back in his storage space. Before he kept it, he even said to Sky Piercer, “Thank you for your hard work.” The Sky Piercer hummed twice as if it was saying that it could still fight. However, Jiang Ping didn’t pay attention to it and directly put the Sky Piercer Blade back into his storage space. Seeing this, Liu Fang asked in puzzlement. “What are you doing?”. “If it wasn’t for that blade, I’m afraid you wouldn’t be able to last even one round against me.” Jiang Ping laughed. “That blade, logically speaking, was borrowed by me, and I have to return it in the future.” “Seeing Sect Master Liu take out that immortal artifact, I’m afraid that my blade will be damaged when it comes into contact with that immortal artifact of yours.” “When it is time to return it, it’ll be very difficult for me to explain.” Hearing Jiang Ping’s words, Liu Fang laughed heartily. “With or without that blade, you’ll die. It’s just a matter of time.” “But if you tell me the whereabouts of the spirit stone mine now, I can consider crippling you and keeping you alive.” Jiang Ping’s expression turned cold as he said with disdain. “I’ve told you a few hundred times that Fusheng City doesn’t have any spirit stone mines.” As he said that, he took out the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. “Besides, it’s just an immortal weapon.” “I have one too, and it’s a middle-grade one!” Liu Fang’s face began to look shocked. He knew how rare an immortal-grade weapon was. The Crimson Cloud Sword in his hand had cost at least half of Tianyuan Sect’s wealth. At that time, in order to fight for this immortal weapon, he almost fought badly with other sects. Therefore, when Jiang Ping took out the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk, he was even more convinced that the Fusheng City’s spirit stone mine rumor was not groundless. Even if it didn’t work out, and there were really no spirit stone mines, if he killed Jiang Ping, the treasures he would have plundered from him would be worthwhile. Jiang Ping waved at Liu Fang. “What’s wrong, Sect Master Liu? Did you become bewitched after seeing that I have a middle-grade spiritual artifact in my hand?” “If you’re afraid, then just leave. I, Jiang Ping, will not pursue the matter.” Liu Fang’s eyes were still staring at the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk as if he had discovered something. His expression began to show some joy as he said to Jiang Ping. “It seems that the immortal weapon in your hand is somewhat different from the immortal weapon I know.” “Even the quasi-immortal weapon just now has a trace of spiritual intelligence.” “But that eight trigrams disk in your hand, although it’s a middle-grade spiritual artifact, it doesn’t have a trace of life.” Jiang Ping looked at the eight trigrams disk in his hand. Liu Fang was right because the weapons produced by the system wouldn’t have any spiritual intelligence. Without spiritual intelligence, it meant that the weapon couldn’t fight on its own. After all, it was produced by the system. Although it didn’t have spiritual intelligence, its power wasn’t inferior to the weapons in this world, and it was even more powerful. Liu Fang didn’t know about this, so Liu Fang felt that even if Jiang Ping took out a middle-grade spiritual artifact, and even if it was in the perfect divine baby nascent soul realm. But against him, who was at the earth immortal realm, and with a Crimson Cloud Sword which had intelligence equivalent to a child’s. He still had a higher chance of winning. Jiang Ping didn’t explain but only said to Liu Fang. “Then, Sect Master, do you want to try the power of a middle-grade immortal artifact?” Liu Fang held the sword and snorted coldly. Without any nonsense, he shouted, “Then let’s try it.” Then, he moved forward to stab Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping held the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk in his left hand and slid his right hand’s finger on it. He was even muttering. “Gen is the mountain, rise.” Liu Fang was still rushing in the direction of Jiang Ping. Suddenly, a huge mountain rose from the lawn in front of him. Then, he quickly stopped. Without taking a detour, he held the Crimson Cloud Sword and hacked at the mountain. After three consecutive slashes, the mountain cracked open a gap that allowed Liu Fang to pass through. Liu Fang passed through the crack and slashed towards Jiang Ping in the distance. The blade of the Crimson Cloud Sword lit up with a touch of red, and then the cry of a phoenix rang out in the sky. The spiritual energy that burst out of the sword turned into a flaming red phoenix and flew towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping turned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk and put himself in the Kan position in front of him. Kan was water, so when the flaming red phoenix rushed towards him, a giant dragon that was entirely made of water appeared out of thin air. The phoenix with burning feathers collided with the transparent water dragon. When a fire is boiling water, a gurgling sound is created. A sizzling sound is produced when water puts out a fire. The two sounds went off at the same time. The water dragon and the fire phoenix were evenly matched. At this time, Jiang Ping turned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk again. He shouted in a deep voice. “Xun position, the wind rises!” Then, a gust of strong wind blew over the originally calm open space. That gust of strong wind blew towards the fire phoenix, weakening the fire. When Liu Fang saw that the eight trigrams disk in Jiang Ping’s hand was so unpredictable and especially difficult to deal with, his brows knitted together. He held the Crimson Cloud Sword and infused a lot of spiritual energy into the sword, then threw the Crimson Cloud Sword out. The Crimson Cloud Sword, which had slipped out of his hand, flew quickly in the air like a child, and the cries of the phoenix sounded from time to time. The Crimson Cloud Sword directly shot towards the water dragon. The water dragon was still fighting against the fire phoenix, and then it was directly pierced by the Crimson Cloud Sword. The dragon formed from flowing water directly dissipated, and water droplets scattered all over the ground. Liu Fang laughed loudly. “How is it? This is the benefit of having spiritual intelligence in an immortal artifact. When you defend against the Crimson Cloud Sword, don’t forget that you still have me.” “Let me see if Patriarch Jiang has the ability to multitask.” After the Crimson Cloud Sword pierced through the water dragon, it headed straight towards Jiang Ping. At the same time, Liu Fang also rushed towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping turned around to face the Crimson Cloud Sword that was heading towards him and rotated the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. “Qian and Kun swap, reverse.” The Crimson Cloud Sword’s tip that was facing Jiang Ping, for some unknown reason, changed to the hilt facing Jiang Ping. Moreover, the Crimson Cloud Sword, which was originally aimed at Jiang Ping, was now deflected in the opposite direction. Jiang Ping only turned around after the Crimson Cloud Sword had flown far away. At this moment, Liu Fang was already in front of him, and his fist was about to smash towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping hurriedly turned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. Immediately after, Liu Fang’s fist smashed into a golden brick wall. Seeing that he had managed to block Liu Fang’s attack in time, Jiang Ping slowly exhaled and said. “Five elements, gold!” Liu Fang bypassed the golden wall and raised his leg to kick at Jiang Ping’s head. Jiang Ping deliberately did not use the eight trigrams disk to block Liu Fang’s attack. Instead, he raised his arm to block Liu Fang’s kick. However, despite protecting his head, Jiang Ping was still sent flying by the kick. Holding the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk, Jiang Ping was dragged far away on the ground. Seeing that his sneak attack had succeeded, Liu Fang immediately beckoned for the Crimson Cloud Sword. The Crimson Cloud Sword steadied its body and sensed its master’s summons. It turned the tip of the sword and flew back. After flying to Liu Fang’s side, Liu Fang pointed at Jiang Ping who was lying on the ground. The Crimson Cloud Sword shared the same spirit as its master and directly pierced forward with a bright red light. The Crimson Cloud Sword let out a long howl towards the sky and transformed into a fiery red phoenix that was exactly the same as before. It shot down towards Jiang Ping. At this moment, Jiang Ping, who was lying on the ground, had a smile on his face. Just as the Crimson Cloud Sword was about to approach him. He immediately turned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. A door appeared in the direction the Crimson Cloud Sword was pointing towards. The Crimson Cloud Sword did not suppress its speed and directly pierced through the door, then disappeared. Jiang Ping stood up and looked at Liu Fang’s astonished expression. “Sect Master Liu is being too arrogant. Can’t you tell that this is a trap?” Liu Fang asked angrily when he heard this. “Where did you put the Crimson Cloud Sword?” Jiang Ping pointed at the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk in his hand. “I wonder if Sect Master Liu has heard of the eight-door god-trapping formation?” Of course, Liu Fang had heard of it. Even though the eight-door god-trapping formation’s name sounds domineering, it was very easy to break it. It was just that the method to break it was a bit special. One could not use brute force. One could only rely on intelligence to find the door of life in order to break out of the formation. Jiang Ping did not wait for Liu Fang’s reply and said. “Although this eight-door god-trapping formation cannot even trap a normal adult who has not cultivated, your Crimson Cloud Sword only has the spiritual intelligence of a ten-year-old child.” “How long do you think it will take for a ten-year-old child to break out of the formation to help you?” Liu Fang clenched his teeth and gazed at Jiang Ping fiercely. Jiang Ping just smiled calmly. “Now Sect Master Liu is left alone to experience the power of a middle-grade immortal artifact.” After saying that, Jiang Ping used his spiritual energy to activate the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. His other hand turned the eight trigrams disk. “Detonate the fire to burn!” A raging fire started under Liu Fang’s feet. Jiang Ping didn’t give Liu Fang a chance to breathe. “Wood fuels fire!” The raging fire wrapped around Liu Fang burned even more fiercely. Liu Fang wanted to escape from the fire, but when he moved, the fire followed him and surrounded him tightly. Therefore, he could only use his spiritual energy to protect his body and wait for an opportunity to attack. He brought the fire close to Jiang Ping, wanting to pull Jiang Ping over to suffer the burning together. Before he could reach out, Jiang Ping turned the eight trigrams disk again. Then, the same mountain that Liu Fang had broken into appeared on the empty ground. However, the mountain did not rise from the ground. Instead, it fell from the sky and pressed down on Liu Fang. With a bang, Liu Fang was firmly pressed down by the mountain. There was no movement. Chapter 131 The Two Disciples Inform Their Master! The person could see through Dong Mi’s instant embarrassment. It was normal though, after all, the money required was a huge number. It would not be an easy matter for a fourth or fifth-rank faction to have so many spirit stones. “Hey, young man, judging by your clothes, you should’ve known this beforehand. Why did your Master send you here? I wonder what he is thinking,” The man said as he shook his head, his eye filled with ridicule towards Dong Mi and his Master. “Don’t be so sure of your words,” Dong Mi said coldly. It wasn’t like he didn’t have the money. With a flick of his sleeve, a large pile of spirit stones appeared on the table. “Give me the ticket. Also, my Master isn’t someone you can point your finger at.” The person at the counter was stunned. He looked at the pile of spirit stones on the table, then he looked at Dong Mi. Why did this rich kid choose to join an unrated sect as a disciple? Putting that aside, since Dong Mi had just about thrown the spirit stones on his face, he couldn’t say no to money! The man stood up and took the spirit stones from the table, then he threw a stone tablet to Dong Mi. After taking the stone tablet, Dong Mi turned around and left. He didn’t want to listen to any more of the nonsense from the man behind him. As they watched Dong Mi turn around and leave, the people in the window started discussing again. Dong Mi tried his best to put all these comments behind him. He had made up his mind that even if he had to move all his savings here, he had to give these people a good slap in the face! Seeing Dong Mi’s figure, Gu Lingfei quickly went up to ask about the situation, “Junior brother! How is it?” “Sigh! I’ve got the item, but that fatty really spoke rudely. He deserves a beating,” Dong Mi shook his head. Thinking of the fatty in the window just now, he couldn’t help but get angry. Fortunately, he had asked his senior brother to leave first. Otherwise, with his senior brother’s temper, Gu Lingfei might have really trashed the place. “No matter what, I absolutely trust our Master!” Dong Mi’s eyes were bright again. Who was their Master? Their Master was someone who had first brought him to the Underworld, then successfully escaped. Then, Jiang Yiming had immediately brought his disciples to the Canglan Region, wreaked havoc in the Shangguan Family, and retreated in one piece! This was already far beyond the scope of an ordinary person! Gu Lingfei nodded as well. Dong Mi was a disciple who had joined later, so he might not have known about the tragic state of the Lingyun Sect in the past. However, he, Gu Lingfei, had been with the Lingyun Sect since the beginning and moved together step by step at a time! Even though the current strength of the Lingyun Sect was not to be underestimated, the Lingyun Sect from before was really poor. Even from the most direct aspect of strength, the Lingyun Sect was simply not worth mentioning back then! But now, the sect had been completely renovated, and the cultivation, as well as the strength of the disciples, had also increased greatly. As such, perhaps their Master really had a way in terms of finances! “Sigh! It’s useless to stand here and talk!” Gu Lingfei patted Dong Mi’s shoulder and continued, “Hurry up and send a telepathic message to Master for now.” Dong Mi nodded. He looked at the stone tablet. The day of the Fenghuo Auction was three days later. Time was already a little tight. After some discussion, Jiang Yiming decided to leave immediately. The matters in the sect had gradually calmed down, anyway, so there was no need for him to stay in the sect. Jiang Yiming immediately asked his two disciples to find a place to stay in the Canglan Region. Then, he walked out of the medicine pavilion while stretching his back, his heart full of joy. “Master! What’s the good news? Tell me quickly!” When Huang Chaoyu, who was still concentrating on refining pills in the medicine pavilion, saw her Master leaving with a beaming face, she quickly went up and asked. “I’m going to the Calnglan Region again!” Jiang Yiming was beaming with joy. After all, this was the first time he had encountered such a thing. After he had come to this world, the system had given him so many privileges! Although everything was good enough now, with so many spirit stones that were the currency here, if he couldn’t spend them, it was really a waste of God’s gifts! “Ha? Master? Are we going to participate in the Fenghuo Auction too?” Upon hearing that her Master was heading to Canglan Region once more, Huang Chaou’s expression immediately changed. “What’s wrong, Xiaoyu? You have so little in your Master?” Jiang Yiming raised his eyes as he said. “Sheesh! Master, do you even hear yourself?! You’re my Master! How can I not have confidence in you!? It’s just that the people from the Divine Phoenix Empire have already told me about the auction before,” Huang Chaoyu said as a hint of surprise appeared in her eyes, “The number of spirit stones required by the Fenghuo Auction …” “I know! It requires a lot of spirit stones!” Jiang Yiming nodded and said, “But don’t forget! Look at the Lingyun Sect, we need a lot of spirit stones to build these things!” Seeing that Jiang Yiming was not worried at all, Huang Chaoyu relaxed a little. “Master, if there is anything I can help you with, just let me know. Although I don’t want to return to the Divine Phoenix Empire yet, the Imperial Advisor has fully recognized your strength. I can also…” Hearing Huang Chaoyu’s words, Jiang Yiming burst into laughter. Although the Divine Pheonix Empire was an empire, it was at most a third or fourth-rank force that didn’t even have an Incarnation Realm warrior. Even if they moved all the wealth of the entire Empire here, it might not even be one-tenth of what he, Jiang Yiming, had! “Hahahaha! Good! Good! Xiaoyu, I know your good intentions! However, I really don’t need your family’s help,” Jiang Yiming shook his head. He really didn’t expect that such a thing would happen to him one day. “Master! I haven’t participated in the Fenghuo Auction either! Can you bring me with you?” Huang Chaoyu’s expression suddenly turned expectant as she asked to go with her Master. “Sure!” Jiang Yiming did not refuse. After all, Xiaoyu was his first-generation disciple who had been with him for a long time. This time, all she asked for was to go with him to take a look at the Fenghuo Auction, it was not too much of a request. “Hehe! Okay! Then, Master, if you want to participate in the Fenghuo Auction, don’t you have to choose better clothes?” Jiang Yiming was a little stunned when he heard that. It was indeed so. Perhaps it was because he had so much money that he couldn’t spend it all that he didn’t have any desires in this aspect. No! Rather, this was the effect he wanted! Thinking of this, Jiang Yiming couldn’t help but burst out laughing, “There’s no need for me to do that. You just need to dress yourself up well!” “Um… Okay!” Although Huang Chaoyu thought that it was strange, since her Master was the one who made the decision, she wouldn’t have any objections. The phoenix’s head was as big as a restaurant Then, the phoenix slowly stretched out its entire body. Other than its golden eyes, the rest of its body was dark red. The phoenix opened its mouth wide and roared at Jiang Ping. Everyone in Fusheng City was shaken by this roar until their brains buzzed. Jiang Ping was even forced back a few steps by this roar. Liu Fang’s sword fell, and as he moved, the phoenix above the clouds also fell headfirst towards where Jiang Ping was standing. When the phoenix fell, Feng Dan, who was watching the battle from the top of the city wall, jumped down at almost the same time and rushed out. Zi Yue, who was beside her, didn’t even have the time to reach out to stop her. Jiang Ping raised his head and looked at the phoenix. He gritted his teeth and took out five top-grade spirit stones from his storage space. Then, without using any secret method to refine them, he opened his mouth and swallowed them. After the five spirit stones that Jiang Ping swallowed entered his body, the essence of the spiritual energy inside flowed out automatically and nourished every corner of Jiang Ping’s body. If others dared to do what Jiang Ping did, their bodies would definitely crack, and they might not even have much of their souls left. However, the cultivation method that Jiang Ping practiced was different. Although there was a possibility of death, he could only give it his all now. He immediately sat cross-legged on the ground, took out the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk, and activated it with his spiritual energy. Almost all of the eight trigrams and five elements were unleashed. They were used to block the ferocious fiery red phoenix. When Liu Fang saw Jiang Ping’s actions, although he was also shocked, he only treated it as his last struggle before he died. When the phoenix was on its way, many golden brick walls appeared, and there were more than a hundred of them. Behind the brick walls, more than ten mountains were standing in front of Jiang Ping. In the sky, bolts of lightning struck at the fiery red phoenix without hesitation. Two water dragons that looked like earthworms compared to the phoenix coiled around it. However, these were not enough to stop it. At most, they could only make it pause for a while. What Jiang Ping needed was just a little hindrance. Every second he had, the progress of refining those few spirit stones would be increased. Jiang Ping roared and pushed the great void celestial technique to the limit, trying his best to refine those few spirit stones. The fiery phoenix did not care about the lightning that struck it. With a flap of its wings, it destroyed the two water dragons. Then, it charged straight at the golden brick walls. The golden brick walls shattered when the phoenix’s sharp beak passed through them. A total of a hundred brick walls shattered within five breaths. Then, the fiery red phoenix did not stop. After breaking through the brick walls, it flew towards the five mountains. Liu Fang had already used up all his energy to execute this move. At this moment, he had to rely on his sword to barely stand. As he watched the fiery red phoenix continue to break through the barrier and fly towards Jiang Ping, Liu Fang smiled in satisfaction. He had already thought of the scene after he obtained the spirit stone mine. The few mountains were unable to block the phoenix’s attack. However, just as the phoenix was about to break through the last mountain, Jiang Ping opened his eyes and smiled. When the last mountain collapsed, Jiang Ping stood up and went up to the phoenix. The fierce collision was like a meteor falling, and the momentum was huge. Feng Dan, who was running towards Jiang Ping, was sent flying by the sound wave from the collision. The light instantly lit up the entire open space, as if the Sun had come in person, hot and dazzling Zi Yue, who was still standing on the city wall, covered her eyes tightly with her hands, not daring to look through the gaps between her fingers, afraid that the dazzling light would burn her eyes. A moment later, the empty space was no longer so dazzling, and the people in the empty space could be seen clearly. Jiang Ping was lying motionlessly in a big pit. However, his chest was still rising and falling slightly, proving that he was still breathing. If Jiang Ping hadn’t refined the spirit stones at the last moment and successfully entered the earth immortal realm, he wouldn’t even be left with dregs now. At this moment, Liu Fang had already exhausted all the spiritual energy in his body. If an ordinary person came now, they could easily kill him. He slowly walked towards Jiang Ping. When he came to the edge of the pit, he didn’t directly jump down. Instead, he slowly slid down. Standing beside Jiang Ping, although Liu Fang was covered in wounds and bleeding, the smile on his face didn’t diminish. “Patriarch Jiang, can you tell me the location of the spirit stone mine now?” Jiang Ping slowly opened his eyes. He wanted to get up, but he couldn’t move, as if his whole body didn’t belong to him. He opened his mouth and said in a hoarse voice. “I’ve told you a few hundred times that Fusheng City doesn’t have any spirit stone mines.” At this moment, his voice was as soft as a mosquito, but Liu Fang could hear it clearly. Liu Fang directly pressed the Crimson Cloud Sword against Jiang Ping’s neck. “Then I’ll kill you.” “In any case, from what I see, the treasures in your storage space are definitely not inferior to a spirit stone mine. I’ll kill you and take your storage space for myself.” “I didn’t come all this way for nothing.” After saying that, he wanted to use the Crimson Cloud Sword to cut Jiang Ping’s neck. Jiang Ping gritted his teeth and also intended to use the last trace of spiritual energy in his body to make a final counterattack. However, before the two of them could make a move, a fiery red whip coiled around the Crimson Cloud Sword. Without the spiritual energy of its master, the Crimson Cloud Sword couldn’t fight alone at this time, so it could only let Feng Dan use the whip to sweep it away. Feng Dan pulled the Crimson Cloud Sword back and threw it beside her feet. She raised and released her arm again, and the whip was swung towards Liu Fang’s body. At this time, Liu Fang’s mind reacted, but his body could no longer keep up, and he let the whip hit his body. “Crack!” The whip left a wound on Liu Fang’s back, and it was a bloody mess. He cried out in pain and fell to the ground, rolling around non-stop. As he moved more and more, blood was flowing out of the wound even more. Feng Dan raised the whip and swung it at Liu Fang again. But this time, it was aimed at his head. There was another crack sound, and Liu Fang’s brain matter was overflowing in all directions. He could no longer roll around, and could only lie on the ground and twitch. If Liu Fang still had the spiritual energy to open his storage space at this time, he could take out a bunch of spirit pills and miraculous medicines. Any one of them could allow him to kill Feng Dan. Even if his body shatters, he would be able to escape with his soul even if he couldn’t defeat Feng Dan. Unfortunately, Liu Fang, who had used up all his spiritual energy, was just like an ordinary person. He could only lie on the ground and be beaten to death by Feng Dan. After confirming that Liu Fang was dead, Feng Dan put away her whip and the Crimson Cloud Sword and ran towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping was lying on the ground when he saw Feng Dan running towards him. He thanked Feng Dan in a soft voice. Feng Dan trotted to Jiang Ping’s side and squatted down. Then, she took out a medicinal pill that could recover spiritual energy and fed it to Jiang Ping. “You are seriously injured. Don’t speak for now.” After Feng Dan fed Jiang Ping the medicine, she took out the medical powder for external application and sprinkled it on Jiang Ping’s wound to stop the bleeding. After a bottle of powder was sprinkled, there were still many wounds on Jiang Ping’s body that kept bleeding. Then, she had to take out a few more bottles and carefully applied the medicine on Jiang Ping. When the bottles in her hand were empty, Feng Dan’s hand could not stop trembling as she applied the medicine. She kept sobbing, and her tears fell on Jiang Ping’s body. At this moment, Jiang Ping, who had already recovered some of his spiritual energy, wanted to sit up. Feng Dan immediately stopped sobbing when she saw this. She wiped her tears and supported Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping looked at the red-dressed girl in front of him with teary and bloodshot eyes. He asked in puzzlement. “Miss Feng, are you crying?” “It can’t be. I’m not dead yet.” When Feng Dan heard this, she stuffed the medicine bottle in her hand to Jiang Ping. “From the looks of it, you should be able to move. Apply the medicine yourself.” Then, she turned around and left. Jiang Ping was a little surprised. Could it be that this girl likes him? Then, Jiang Ping, who knew nothing about romance, shook his head. He took out the medicinal pills that the system had given him and put one in his mouth. The medicinal pills that the system had given him were very powerful. Originally, Jiang Ping would need at least four hours to recover before he could move. Now, after only fifteen minutes, he could move freely. Jiang Ping took a fresh set of clothes from his storage space, changed into them, and ate a few medicinal pills. He stretched his muscles and bones and jumped out from the bottom of the pit. He took a deep breath and turned his head to look at the corpse at the bottom of the pit. After thinking for a moment, he reached out and grabbed the thumb ring on Liu Fang’s hand. This was Liu Fang’s storage space. Now that Liu Fang was dead, the restriction on it was easily lifted by Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping didn’t even carefully observe what was inside and directly put the ring into his storage space. Then he walked into the city. When he reached the city gate, Feng Dan and Zi Yue blocked his way. Jiang Ping asked, “What’s the meaning of this?” Feng Dan turned her head and pointed to the side with her chin. Jiang Ping followed her gaze. Feng Qingye, Meng Qiang, and He Shiyuan were still unconscious at the side. Jiang Ping slapped his forehead. “How could I forget these three?” Feng Dan asked. “How are you going to deal with these three people?” Jiang Ping pinched his chin and pondered. “Kill them. Leaving them alive is a disaster.” Feng Dan nodded, then took out the Crimson Cloud Sword and slashed at the three people’s throats. The Crimson Cloud Sword was indeed an immortal artifact. Even with Feng Dan using it, she could easily kill Feng Qingye and the others. Although a large part of the reason was that Feng Qingye and the others were unconscious and unable to resist. Jiang Ping nodded, thanked Feng Dan and Zi Yue, and turned to go home. Feng Dan immediately called out to Jiang Ping. Then, she handed the Crimson Cloud Sword to Jiang Ping Jiang Ping didn’t accept it and said to Feng Dan. “This sword suits you very well. You should keep it.” “Oh right, there’s also this.” After saying that, Jiang Ping took out Liu Fang’s thumb ring from his storage space. “This is Liu Fang’s storage space. You killed him, so it should belong to you.” Then, he threw it towards Feng Dan. Feng Dan subconsciously took the ring, feeling a little flattered. She quickly rejected Jiang Ping. “I can’t take this. And this Crimson Cloud Sword, it’s an immortal artifact. If I hold it in my hand, I won’t be able to display its true strength.” Jiang Ping didn’t waste time with her. He just turned around and waved his hand. “Then work hard to cultivate until you can truly display its strength.” “And I think that sword suits you well.” Then, he walked away without turning his head. Feng Dan was still standing there, stunned. Zi Yue, who was beside her, teased. “Yo, your sweetheart gave you a gift, and you’re still not happy. What’s wrong with you, Sister Feng?” <b>Nron</b>  Feng Dan turned her head and pinched Zi Yue’s face. “You only know how to talk nonsense.” Then, she turned around and walked into the city. However, there was an additional touch of red on her face. Her smile was overflowing, and her eyes were almost closed. Zi Yue ordered her guards at the city gate to clean up the few corpses and then caught up with Feng Dan. Her hand rested on Feng Dan’s shoulder. “Is that Crimson Cloud Sword really an immortal artifact? I haven’t seen it before. Why don’t you let me touch it?”. Feng Dan put away the Crimson Cloud Sword and turned her head away. “No!” Zi Yue smiled. She wasn’t really coveting that immortal artifact. After all, she knew that some things didn’t belong to her. If she got her hands on it, she would be in trouble. “Yo, I’m your best friend, and you won’t even let me touch it. How dare you deny that you don’t like that guy?” Feng Dan slapped Zi Yue’s hand off her shoulder. Then, she strode over. Zi Yue chased after her, shouting as she walked, asking Feng Dan to wait for her. On the way back home, Jiang Ping had eaten quite a few medicinal pills. The superficial wounds on his body that could be seen with the naked eye were almost healed. Only some internal injuries still needed time to recuperate. Now, he looked like he was fine, and his clothes had been changed long ago. He didn’t want his three daughters to worry about him. In the hall, the three little girls were sitting on stools next to each other. Wan’er was sitting at the far end, resting her chin on her hands and leaning against the table. Her two little feet were swaying casually in the air as they couldn’t reach the ground. She seemed to have something on her mind. She asked Lei Jingyun. “Old Uncle Lei, it’s been so long, so why isn’t my daddy back yet?” Lei Jingyun was drinking tea at the side. As soon as he opened the lid, he was stunned by Wan’er’s question. Jiang Ping had been reminding Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. He told the two of them not to tell the three little girls about him risking his life to fight with others. Therefore, they were always perfunctory. But now that Wan’er seemed to have noticed something, it wouldn’t be easy to trick her anymore. Lei Jingyun could not tell Wan’er directly that her father was fighting outside and might have been beaten half to death. He had no choice but to bite the bullet and say. “Didn’t I say that the master is catching up with his friends? It’s normal for him to spend more time with them.” Wan’er raised her hand and wanted to slap the old man who was spouting nonsense again. However, she turned around and looked at her two younger sisters. Then, she lowered her raised hand quietly. She continued to hold her chin with both hands. Lei Jingyun was glad that he had dodged another disaster, so he quickly drank a mouthful of tea to calm himself down. Yan’er was on the stool, holding a book to revise the knowledge that the teacher had taught her in class. She planned to wait for her father to come back and ask for a compliment from him. Liu’er had an empty expression. She sat there in a daze, not saying a word, just waiting for her father to come back. Jiang Ping stepped into the hall with his left foot. Before he could make a sound, the three little girls who heard the footsteps directly jumped down from the stool. They ran towards Jiang Ping. Although Jiang Ping looked fine, he was still injured. Enduring the pain, he slowly squatted down. Then, he opened his arms and waited for the little girls to rush over. Yan’er and Liu’er directly pounced on him, causing Jiang Ping to almost lose his balance and fall backward. However, Wan’er only ran to Jiang Ping’s side and didn’t rush over to hug him. Instead, she stood in front of Jiang Ping and carefully studied Jiang Ping. Yan’er told Jiang Ping that she had been revising the knowledge taught by the teacher while she was waiting for him. Jiang Ping quickly praised her, saying that Yan’er worked the hardest and that he liked hardworking little girls. Liu’er buried her head in Jiang Ping’s chest. Then, she kept repeating to Jiang Ping, “I miss daddy so much.” Jiang Ping comforted Liu’er, saying that he missed Liu’er too. Then, Jiang Ping noticed that Wan’er, who was usually the noisiest, was actually just standing in front of him, looking at him. Then, he turned to look at Lei Jingyun doubtfully. Lei Jingyun blinked his eyes at Jiang Ping a few times. Then, Wan’er opened her mouth and asked. “Daddy, where did you go today? Why did you take so long to come back?” The other two girls also looked at Jiang Ping in unison. They were also curious about what their father had gone to do today. Jiang Ping looked at Lei Jingyun again. Lei Jingyun immediately put down his teacup and said to Jiang Ping. “Master, how was the reunion with your old friends? Was it fun?” Jiang Ping immediately understood and first answered Lei Jingyun’s question. “It was alright. I just didn’t dare to drink. You know, these three girls hate the smell of alcohol the most.” Lei Jingyun nodded with a smile. Then, Jiang Ping replied to Wan’er. “I went to catch up with my friends today.” With these words, Yan’er and Liu’er, the two little girls who trusted their father the most, believed him. The two little girls didn’t care if there was something fishy about it. Wan’er turned her head and glared fiercely at Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun was so scared that he quickly pretended not to see it. He raised his teacup and looked to the other side, drinking his own tea. When she saw Lei Jingyun doing this, she turned her head and stared at Jiang Ping. Her expression looked fierce and cute. It made Jiang Ping’s back feel cold. Jiang Ping quickly laughed and said to the little girl. “Daddy has been out for a day, and I’m tired. It’s almost dark. Why don’t we go wash up first and then have dinner?” Liu’er and Yan’er’s eyes lit up. Yan’er asked. “Is daddy going to cook today?”. Jiang Ping, who was struggling to carry the two little girls, said awkwardly. “Daddy won’t cook today. Tomorrow, I will ask Uncle Qiu to buy crabs.” “I’ll cook spicy crabs for you tomorrow, okay?” Yan’er and Liu’er clapped and cheered. Then, they followed Li Sushang to take a shower. Wan’er was also dragged away by Li Sushang and went to wash up. Jiang Ping sighed and slowly stood up. He didn’t go back to his room immediately. Instead, he sat on a stool and took a rest. He ordered Qiu Chi to get someone to prepare dinner. Then, Lei Jingyun walked to Jiang Ping’s side and sat down. “Master, Wan’er…” Jiang Ping reached out his hand and interrupted Lei Jingyun. He muttered to himself. “The little girl has grown up. I can’t hide it anymore.” Lei Jingyun heard Jiang Ping’s muttering and for some reason, a kind smile appeared on his face. Jiang Ping asked Lei Jingyun to stand guard at the door of his room. He must not let the little girls break-in. He had to go back and clean up. After all, he had suffered a lot of injuries during today’s fight. Jiang Ping took off his robe in his room. Although most of the wounds had almost healed, his body was still covered with bruises of all sizes. Jiang Ping looked at his back in the bronze mirror. It was even worse. There were two large wounds on his back. He sighed and put on his robe again. He took out a few high-quality healing medicinal pills from his storage space and put them in his mouth. Then, he sat cross-legged on the bed and used his spiritual energy to slowly heal the injuries to his internal organs. The three little girls were soaking in the bathtub. Yan’er and Liu’er kept splashing water on each other and playing. Then, Wan’er just lay at the side of the bathtub, looking listless. Yan’er noticed Wan’er’s abnormality and asked. “Wan’er, what’s wrong? Why are you so depressed?” Liu’er also said in her baby voice. “That’s right, Sister Wan’er. Why are you like this all day?” Wan’er didn’t say anything. Yan’er continued to ask. “Did someone bully you? I’ll help you beat her up.” At that moment, Wan’er turned around and was about to tell her two younger sisters what was on her mind. But when she saw the innocent faces of her two younger sisters, she couldn’t say anything. She could only change her words. “I can’t be happy just thinking about going to school tomorrow.” After Liu’er heard this, she immediately became depressed. She had initially forgotten that she had to go to school tomorrow, but when Wan’er mentioned it, she remembered it. Yan’er herself was not very resistant to going to school. She did not feel anything, but when she saw Wan’er so unhappy, she silently remembered it in her heart. Although Yan’er always wanted to compete with Wan’er to be the elder sister, Yan’er still cared about Wan’er’s feelings in her heart. After taking a shower, everyone came to the hall. The dishes were all served. They were just waiting for the little girls and Jiang Ping to come over and eat. When Li Sushang came over with the three little girls, Jiang Ping followed closely behind and entered the hall. Jiang Ping asked everyone to sit down and prepare to eat. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi, who were waiting for Jiang Ping, took their seats. After Jiang Ping said to eat, Qiu Chi started to eat as thoughtlessly as usual. Yan’er and Liu’er also displayed their usual fighting strength and fought with Qiu Chi for the food. Wan’er was the only one who was abnormal. She was usually the fastest person to eat. Even Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun might not be able to compete with this little girl who ate like she was fighting Today Wan’er felt weak all over, and her hands were not strong enough to pick up the food. She chewed slowly as she ate. Qiu Chi saw this and immediately stopped eating and asked. “Wan’er, did you lose your appetite today?” Yan’er also stopped eating after hearing this. “Wan’er is a little unhappy because she has to go to school tomorrow.” “Daddy, why don’t you apply for leave for Wan’er tomorrow?” Liu’er was the most naive, but when she heard that it was related to Wan’er, she immediately stopped what she was doing. She swallowed the last mouthful of rice in her mouth and said to Jiang Ping. “That’s right, daddy. I don’t want to see Wan’er unhappy.” Yan’er was afraid that Jiang Ping would not agree, so she added another sentence. “I’ll go to school tomorrow, and then I’ll memorize all the lessons that the teacher will be teaching.” “After class, I’ll come back to teach Wan’er. That way, Wan’er won’t have to go to school.” Wan’er was also a little stunned when she heard her two younger sisters’ words. She didn’t expect that her two younger sisters would remember the words she made up. Of course, Jiang Ping knew that although Wan’er hated going to school, she was definitely not depressed because of this matter. But for Wan’er to be happy, Jiang Ping still agreed. “How about this, the three of you don’t have to go to school tomorrow.” “I’ll ask Uncle Qiu to apply for leave for you. The teacher won’t scold you.” “How about the three of you train with daddy tomorrow?” Wan’er still didn’t have any reaction after hearing it. On the contrary, the two girls beside her were in high spirits. Liu’er was happy because she didn’t have to go to school. Yan’er was happy because she thought she had helped Wan’er. Yan’er said to Wan’er. “Wan’er, we don’t have to go to school tomorrow!” Liu’er also said to her eldest sister. “Yes, yes. Sister Wan’er, don’t you like to cultivate the most?” Wan’er looked at her two younger sisters. In order not to let her two younger sisters down, she had to force a smile. “Thank you, Yan’er, Liu’er. I’m very happy.” The adults at the dining table looked at this forced smile. It was especially forced and perfunctory. But the two little girls would not think so much. They just felt that they had helped their eldest sister, and a sense of superiority arose in their hearts. Jiang Ping looked at Wan’er’s expression and sighed quietly. “Then why aren’t you eating quickly? Otherwise, you won’t have the energy to cultivate tomorrow. Don’t complain when you’re tired.” Yan’er and Liu’er made an “oh” sound and then began to eat. Seeing Wan’er still eating slowly, Qiu Chi felt that he no longer had an opponent. His appetite was also reduced by more than half. After eating, Jiang Ping coaxed the three little girls to sleep. Then he walked out of their room and went back to his bedroom. Just as Jiang Ping walked out of the door. Wan’er quietly opened her eyes. Then she tiptoed to get up. Afraid of waking the two little girls, Wan’er didn’t put on her shoes. She carried her little shoes with both hands and tiptoed to go out. After she went out, she gently closed the door and slowly put on her shoes. After putting on her shoes, the little girl came to a courtyard wall. She raised her head to look at the courtyard wall, then reached out to grab the protruding part of the wall. She grabbed it, stepped on the protruding bricks outside the courtyard wall, and slowly climbed to the roof. Then, she carefully climbed to the highest point of the roof and sat down on the roof ridge. Her feet stepped on the tiles, and she put her feet together. Her elbows rested on her knees, and her palms supported her small face as she looked at the moon hanging in the sky. Jiang Ping was just about to take off his clothes and lie down on the bed when he returned to his room. Suddenly, he used his spiritual energy to investigate the area within the Jiang Mansion. When his spiritual energy swept across the roof, Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment before he smiled. He put on the robe that he had taken off halfway, then took a blanket from the bed and walked out of the room. On the roof ridge, the little girl was sitting quietly. Jiang Ping quietly flew behind the little girl. He covered Wan’er with the blanket. “It’s autumn now, and you didn’t put on more clothes. Aren’t you afraid of catching a cold?” The little girl heard her father’s voice and looked back in surprise. Jiang Ping smiled gently at the little girl. Then, he followed the little girl and sat down on the roof, holding his face with his hand. “Daddy, why are you here? Aren’t you supposed to be asleep?” Jiang Ping flicked the little girl’s forehead. “It’s because there’s a little rascal who has been troubled the whole day. How can daddy sleep?” Wan’er used her hand to cover her forehead. She was a little embarrassed, and her ears were slightly red. Jiang Ping turned his head away from Wan’er and said while looking at the moon. “Tell me, what’s going on with my eldest daughter, who usually makes me worry the most?” Of course, Jiang Ping knew what Wan’er was worried about, but he still wanted to hear it from Wan’er. Wan’er also turned her head and looked at the moon. “I will ask daddy a few questions. Can daddy answer me seriously?” Jiang Ping nodded and waited for the little girl to ask questions. “Daddy, did you go and fight whenever you said that you were going to reason with someone?” Jiang Ping didn’t lie. He nodded and acknowledged. “Yes.” “Then, you would deliberately send the three of us away every time so that we wouldn’t worry, right?” “Yes.” “Then, each time you get injured from fighting, you didn’t tell us, right?” When she asked the third question, the little girl sounded a little anxious. Her breathing also became heavier and heavier. After Jiang Ping noticed that something was wrong with Wan’er, he reached out and patted the little girl’s head to calm her down. “Yes and no, it depends on who the other party is. Daddy is very powerful.” “Not just anyone can hurt daddy.” The little girl asked one last question. “Then did you suffer a very, very serious injury today?” When she asked this, there was a slight sob in her voice. Jiang Ping nodded. “Relatively speaking, today I suffered the most serious injuries.” “But didn’t daddy come back safely?” For some reason, the little girl bit Jiang Ping’s arm. After biting, she stood up and shouted at Jiang Ping. “Why did you hide it from us? I’m also very strong. I can help you to beat up bad people.” Before the little girl shouted, Jiang Ping used his spiritual energy to isolate their voices. He didn’t want to wake up the other two little girls. Jiang Ping held the little girl’s hand and pulled her to sit down. He patted her back gently. “Of course, I know that Wan’er is very strong. You can help daddy to protect your sisters.” “But if daddy is injured. How can you guarantee that you can chase away the bad guys?” The little girl pouted and shed tears. She did not answer. Jiang Ping quietly wiped away the little girl’s tears. ar “You are crying like a little kitten.” “The little warrior who left home alone in Xiaoyu Town and went to the demonic wolf mountain range to train won’t cry.” Wan’er didn’t even need Jiang Ping to wipe her tears when she heard this. Her tears instantly stopped, and she raised her little hand to wipe away the remaining tears on her face. Jiang Ping smiled. His eldest daughter was quite strong The little girl took a deep breath and sniffed back the two little strings of snot that were about to drip down her lips into her nostril. “Then I will work hard to help daddy protect my younger sisters in the future.” “I can do it.” Jiang Ping tilted his head and looked at Wan’er. “Okay, but you have to promise daddy that you can’t act tough.” “If there’s a trouble that can’t be solved, you have to tell daddy.” The little girl hesitated for a while and didn’t answer Jiang Ping immediately. Seeing this, Jiang Ping turned his head away and deliberately didn’t look at the little girl. “If you don’t agree, daddy won’t allow you to help me protect your younger sisters in the future.” Wan’er nodded her head in panic. “Yes, I agree.” “But you can’t lie to me in the future.” “I won’t tell Yan’er and Liu’er either, lest they worry.” Jiang Ping gave the little girl his pinky. “We agreed to pinky swear.” The little girl broke into a smile and also gave her pinky. The two pinkies hooked together and made an agreement that only belonged to the two of them. Jiang Ping sighed. His daughter had finally grown up. In the near future, the other two little girls might also be angry at him for hiding it from them. Who cares? He will talk about that in the future. At most, he would let the two little girls bite his arm. It was fine if he admitted defeat. The two of them sat on the roof ridge just like that. They looked at the moon in front of them, which was not full tonight. Jiang Ping looked at the moon and suddenly asked the little girl. “You naughty girl, how did you climb up to the roof so skillfully?” Wan’er said with a smile. “If you climb often, you will naturally become more proficient.” Jiang Ping looked at his eldest daughter with some surprise. “Oh, it seems that you have grown up, and there’s a lot of things on your mind.” Wan’er did the same thing as before, with her elbows on her knees and chin resting on her hands. “Yan’er often fights with me to be the elder sister, so she deliberately annoys me.” “Liu’er also inadvertently annoys me sometimes.” “It’s not like I can beat and scold them. I can’t get over my anger, so I secretly come up to look at the moon for a while.” “I’ll be in a good mood the next day.” Jiang Ping said in disbelief. “Being the eldest sister is really different. You think more than your two younger sisters.” The little girl shook her head. “No, I don’t. Sometimes I make them unhappy.” “For example, when Yan’er can’t beat me, she would secretly hide in the quilt and cry.” “I will hit Liu’er on her head when she said the wrong thing. Although I didn’t use much strength, she still went to look for you, daddy.” “It’s just that every time she cries in front of you, she doesn’t say what’s wrong. She’s just afraid that you will punish me.” As the little girl spoke, she rested her chin on her knees. Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment, then he caressed his eldest daughter’s head. “Daddy, did it hurt when I bit you just now?” “It hurts so much. It hurts even more than when I was being pressed down and beaten up.” “Then can daddy still hold a spatula?” “What’s wrong?” “I didn’t eat enough for dinner tonight. I’m hungry.” Jiang Ping laughed out loud. “Okay, okay, okay. Daddy will cook for you.” The little girl nodded hard and also laughed. The two of them, an adult and a child, went back to their rooms to sleep after finishing their supper. The next morning. Jiang Ping got up early. In fact, there was another reason why he promised the three little girls yesterday that he would bring them to cultivate today. He wanted to give them the three cultivation methods that the system had rewarded him when he signed in. After all, the three little girls were already at the core building realm. With the cultivation methods, they would be able to improve faster. Jiang Ping washed up in advance and pushed open the door of the three little girls’ rooms. As soon as he opened the door, Jiang Ping sighed helplessly. The three of them were sleeping on a big bed with their limbs spread wide. Wan’er’s upper body was about to fall off the bed. Liu’er and Yan’er slept in the opposite direction of each other, smelling each other’s feet. Jiang Ping was secretly impressed. They were indeed his daughters since they could even sleep like this. Jiang Ping went forward and moved half of Wan’er’s body back to the bed, afraid that she would really fall off the bed and get hurt. Then he woke up the three little girls. Liu’er woke up the fastest when she heard her father’s voice. Yan’er was next. Every time, only Wan’er, who loved to sleep in, was left. Jiang Ping suddenly pulled Wan’er up. But he didn’t expect that this little girl didn’t even open her eyes. After being pulled up, her body slowly lay down again. After lying down, she turned over and fell asleep again. Jiang Ping held his forehead. He pulled her up again. She slowly fell down again and lay back down to sleep. After repeating this a few times, Wan’er was finally woken up. Li Sushang brought the three little girls to wash up. Jiang Ping first went to the hall and waited for the three of them to have breakfast. After washing up, the little girls ran over with skipping steps. Wan’er returned to her previous lively and active appearance. “You guys hurry up and eat, then start cultivating.” The little girls agreed in unison! Jiang Ping finished eating first and went to the courtyard to wait. Then, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi brought the little girls over. Then, the little girls stood in a row in front of Jiang Ping while Lei Jingyun sat under the eaves to watch. Qiu Chi, who was born with a hard life, left the house and went to school to apply for leave for the three little girls. Wan’er rubbed her fists and said. “Daddy, what are we practicing today? Fist techniques? Or martial techniques?” After their conversation last night, Wan’er was even more focused on cultivation. She had always wanted to become stronger so that she could help her father protect the family. Jiang Ping smiled and shook his head. “We’re not practicing fist techniques or martial techniques today.” The three little girls were all puzzled. Yan’er asked. “Then what are we going to do today?” Liu’er’s little eyes blinked. “Are we just going to play today? We’ll eat when we’re done.” Wan’er quietly glared at Liu’er. “Liu’er, don’t cause trouble.” Liu’er could only lower her head in embarrassment and make an “oh” sound. Jiang Ping took out the three cultivation methods that the system had given him. Then, he waved them in his hand. “We’re practicing cultivation methods today.” Liu’er scratched her head and said. “Cultivation methods? Daddy, what are cultivation methods?” Jiang Ping turned his head to look at Lei Jingyun, gesturing for him to explain. Lei Jingyun understood and stood up to walk to Jiang Ping’s side. “Cultivation methods are used to assist cultivators in their cultivation.” “A suitable cultivation method can make one’s cultivation progress twice as fast with half the effort.” “And it can also improve your combat strength in the process of fighting with others.” After saying that, Lei Jingyun stroked his beard with a smile, looking forward to the admiring gazes of the little girls. Wan’er raised her hand first. Jiang Ping pointed at Wan’er. “Kid, what’s your question?” Waner asked loudly. “What does it mean to achieve twice the result with half the effort?” Jiang Ping and Lei Jingyun were a little speechless. Yan’er snickered at the side. “Why didn’t you listen to the lessons in the classroom. Twice the result with half the effort means that it’s efficient.” Wan’er nodded as if she suddenly understood. According to each person’s special constitution, Jiang Ping distributed the corresponding three cultivation methods to each of the little girls. After the little girls received the cultivation methods, they couldn’t wait to open them and read them. Jiang Ping said to them. “All of you will read it first, then try to cultivate it according to the instructions. If you have any difficulties, you can ask Old Uncle Lei and me.” “Old Uncle Lei and I will help you to cultivate.” The little girls nodded and then scattered. They found a place to sit and directly sat down to flip through the book. Lei Jingyun asked Jiang Ping from the side. “Master, it’s not good to let the girls cultivate according to the instructions, isn’t it?” “In the past, we always taught our disciples step by step. We were afraid that they would do the wrong thing and go mad.” Jiang Ping laughed. “Old Lei, are you treating Wan’er and the others as the ordinary disciples of your Chuanyun Sect and comparing them?” “And look at their respective cultivation methods?” Lei Jingyun listened to Jiang Ping’s words and looked at them. He didn’t know until he looked at them, but when he saw them, he was shocked. Lei Jingyun knew that these three young ladies had special physiques. He was also curious about what kind of cultivation method Jiang Ping would take out for the three young ladies to cultivate. Because the three young ladies were so talented, even Lei Jingyun couldn’t think of any cultivation method in this world that was suitable for these three little monsters. He looked over. The book in Wan’er’s hand had the big words “Ancient Divine Technique” written on the cover. And the book in Yan’er’s hand was the spiritual chaos sword technique. The book in Liu’er’s hand was also suitable for her special physique, the resurrection lily technique. Lei Jingyun’s eyes almost popped out of their sockets, and his mouth was wide open. According to his understanding, these three cultivation methods did not exist in this world. “Patriarch, where did you get these cultivation methods? Why haven’t I seen them before?” Jiang Ping purposely answered mysteriously. “The secrets of heaven must not be revealed.” The two stood there and watched the three little girls cultivate. Yan’er was the most interested in the knowledge of books, so Yan’er was the fastest among the three little girls. She had already finished reading the book and had already begun to try to cultivate. Liu’er was seriously and carefully flipping through the book, and she was almost done reading Only Wan’er had barely flipped through a few pages, and her two little eyebrows were almost knitted together. “Daddy, I don’t understand this sentence. Come and teach me quickly.” Liu’er shouted at Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping waved at Liu’er and smiled. Then he trotted over. Wan’er was still frowning. Her gaze moved away from the cultivation method. When she raised her head and wanted to call Jiang Ping, she found that Jiang Ping had already gone in Liu’er’s direction. Only Lei Jingyun was left standing in that direction. Wan’er felt a little disgusted, but she had no choice but to wave her hand and call out. “Old Uncle Lei, come here.” Lei Jingyun walked over with a smile. As he walked, he spoke. “What’s wrong, young miss? Are there some sentences that you don’t understand at all?” It would have been better if he didn’t ask, but as soon as he asked, the little girl’s ears immediately turned red. She pointed at a word on the cultivation method and said awkwardly. “Not only do I not understand the meaning, but there are also a lot of words that I can’t recognize.” When Lei Jingyun heard this, he was stunned for a moment before he began to stifle his laughter. The little girl, who was still embarrassed, saw Lei Jingyun’s stifled laughter. Wan’er waved at Lei Jingyun, indicating for him to lower his body and teach her. When Lei Jingyun lowered his body and looked at the word that Wan’er was pointing at. The little girl immediately raised her hand and slapped Lei Jingyun’s head. She said angrily. “Old Man Lei, you still dare to laugh at me.” The force of the slap was not strong, and Lei Jingyun, who was originally suppressing his laughter, began to laugh loudly. Wan’er glared at him. Lei Jingyun immediately stopped smiling and earnestly taught the little girl how to read. After teaching the little girl what the word meant, Wan’er flipped to the first few pages of the book and pointed out a few more words. “And the ones I saw earlier, I don’t recognize any of them.” Lei Jingyun couldn’t hold it in any longer and turned his head away. Before he could laugh out loud, Wan’er slapped him on the head three times in a row. This time, the little girl increased the strength of her hand. <b>as</b>  <b>Cove</b>  It was so painful that Lei Jingyun covered his head. “If you don’t teach me seriously, I’ll beat you to death.” Lei Jingyun had no choice but to start teaching the little girl how to read seriously. Every time he saw that the little girl couldn’t even recognize common characters, Lei Jingyun would pinch his thigh with his hand. He forced himself not to laugh at the little girl, or else he would be slapped on the head a few more times. Yan’er’s comprehension ability was strong, so she didn’t need anyone’s guidance. She had already begun to slowly understand the true meaning of the spiritual chaos sword technique. Under Jiang Ping’s guidance, Liu’er also crossed her legs and slowly got on the right track. When Wan’er saw that her two younger sisters were progressing faster than her, she was so angry that she gave Lei Jingyun a few more slaps. Lei Jingyun was somewhat at a loss. “What’s wrong, young miss? I’m not laughing.” Wan’er said angrily. “You better hurry up, or you’d be dead. Read it to me.” Lei Jingyun’s face was sullen. At this moment, he missed Qiu Chi again. If only he could run errands and apply for leave for the three little girls. A moment later, Lei Jingyun read out the contents of the cultivation method. Wan’er sat cross-legged while listening. She closed her eyes and followed the steps of the cultivation method that Lei Jingyun read. After a while, Lei Jingyun finished reading as well. The three little girls gradually entered an optimal state of mind. Lei Jingyun stood up and came to Jiang Ping’s side. He held his head and looked at Jiang Ping with some grievance. Needless to say, Jiang Ping knew that Lei Jingyun had been beaten up by Wan’er again. He laughed loudly. “It seems that Wan’er still likes you the most.” Lei Jingyun wanted to cry, but no tears came out. At this time, Qiu Chi had just returned from school. Jiang Ping called Qiu Chi over. When Qiu Chi walked in front of him, Jiang Ping said to the two people. “If I remember correctly, Qiu Chi, you should be in the late stage of the refinement realm, right?” “And Old Lei, you are now in the middle stage of the origin core realm?” The two of them nodded their heads. Jiang Ping took out a few spirit stones from his storage space. A total of five middle-grade spirit stones and one high-grade spirit stone. The middle-grade spirit stones were handed to Qiu Chi, and the high-grade spirit stone was handed over to Lei Jingyun. He said, “Qiu Chi, if you absorb the high-grade spirit stone now, it will be harmful instead of benefitting you. I reckon that five middle-grade spirit stones will be enough for you to break through from the refinement realm to the origin core realm.” “Old Lei, although this high-grade spirit stone can only allow you to reach the late-stage of the origin core realm at most, and breaking through is still far away, it is still the limit of what you can absorb.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi looked at the spirit stones in their hands with dumbstruck expressions. Qiu Chi first refused. “Patriarch, you are my benefactor, and I am here to repay your kindness. I have yet to repay my kindness, so how can I owe you a favor again? I cannot accept these spirit stones.” Lei Jingyun also smiled as he handed over the spirit stones. “I can’t be rewarded when I don’t deserve it. It’s not too late to give them to me after I have made a great contribution.” Jiang Ping did not accept the spirit stones that they returned. He only smiled and said. “I let you increase your cultivation so that you can better protect my three daughters.” “Are you really not going to do anything after receiving the items.” “Hurry up and put it away. Otherwise, I might change my mind later.” Although Jiang Ping used the excuse of protecting the three little girls to give the two of them spirit stones. But the two of them knew in their hearts that it wouldn’t be long before these three little girls would surpass them. When that time came, it would still be uncertain who would protect whom. Therefore, Jiang Ping’s excuse was actually a bit far-fetched. The two of them were also grateful to this patriarch from the bottom of their hearts. Now that they thought about it, they didn’t feel ashamed at all when they cried and made a scene in front of the Jiang Mansion. Moreover, it was a very wise move. The two of them looked at each other and smiled before putting away the spirit stones. After putting away the spirit stones, Jiang Ping said to the two of them. “If you don’t have enough spirit stones, feel free to ask me for them. I have a lot.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi both knew how rare spirit stones were, so they quickly refused with a smile. They didn’t dare to let the patriarch spend so much. Jiang Ping said to the two of them with a sinister smile on his face. “Don’t regret what you’ve said.” The three little girls were adapting the cultivation method they had just learned, using it to absorb the spiritual energy in this small world. Soon, Jiang Ping and the other two felt that the cultivation methods of the three little girls were too powerful. Although the spiritual energy in this area of the Jiang Mansion was not particularly dense, it was definitely not thin. Not long after, the spiritual energy in this small area surged towards the three little girls like a dam collapsing. Lei Jingyun reminded Jiang Ping while exclaiming in surprise. “Master, at this speed, I’m afraid that before the three little girls have finished refining their cultivation methods, the spiritual energy in this area will no longer be available for them to absorb.” Jiang Ping nodded and waved his hand. He isolated the Jiang Mansion from the outside world. This barrier directly caused the spiritual energy from other places to stop flowing into the Jiang Mansion. Thus, the other two were puzzled. The spiritual energy in this world wasn’t enough for these three little girls to absorb in the first place. If they isolated this place, wouldn’t it be even more difficult for the girls to accomplish anything without the necessities? Qiu Chi was just about to ask a question when Jiang Ping interrupted him with a smile. “Just watch.” Then, Jiang Ping took out about twenty middle-grade spirit stones from his storage space. Then, he directly crushed the spirit stones. And let the spiritual energy in the spirit stones float out. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi suddenly came to a realization. It turned out that Jiang Ping isolated heaven and earth to prevent the spiritual energy essence in the spirit stones from floating out. More than twenty middle-grade spirit stones were crushed. The spiritual energy essence also slowly drifted towards the three little girls, allowing them to absorb it. After crushing more than twenty middle-grade spirit stones, Jiang Ping frowned. It was the first time that the little girls had cultivated a cultivation method, and their physiques were special, so the cultivation method was even more special. Therefore, it was far from enough to fill them up. Jiang Ping said in a deep voice. “Then I’ll let you eat your fill in one go.” With a flip of his wrist, three high-grade spirit stones of excellent quality appeared in his hand. His five fingers gathered together, and the three spirit stones were crushed in an instant. Three flows of extremely pure spiritual energy essences floated out. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were dumbfounded. They knew that their patriarch was generous, but they had never seen such a generous person. These spirit stones were eaten like snacks. The two looked at each other bitterly. Now they regretted rejecting Jiang Ping’s offer to request spirit stones from him when they ran out of it. <b>ssences</b>  Three flows of green spiritual energy essences floated to the little girls’ side. They surrounded them, waiting for the little girls to slowly absorb them. Jiang Ping patted the gravel on his hand and nodded. This should be enough. After about two incense sticks’ time, Yan’er opened her eyes first. Her body flashed with a faint blue color. The little girl wanted to test how much her strength had increased, so she slightly moved her finger. In Jiang Ping’s storage space, there was the Sky Piercer Blade. It could not control itself and broke the restriction of the storage space. It flew to Yan’er’s side and allowed her to order it around. Jiang Ping was also a little surprised, not to mention Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. His jaw was so wide that it almost dislocated. Yan’er didn’t even use her hand to hold the blade. She just waved her arm gently, and the Sky Piercer Blade followed Yan’er’s hand. The Sky Piercer Blade kept humming. Lei Jingyun asked. “This is Chuanyun Sect’s Sky Piercer Blade.” “What’s with the humming?” Jiang Ping could feel the thoughts of the blade, so he asked calmly. “It wants to recognize its master.” Lei Jingyun was shocked! His pupils carefully stared at the blade and Yan’er. Qiu Chi asked Lei Jingyun about the origin of the blade. Lei Jingyun closed his agape mouth and replied softly. “That is a quasi-immortal artifact that has already gained spiritual intelligence.” This short sentence seemed to have shattered Qiu Chi’s worldview. Jiang Ping waved at the Sky Piercer Blade and wanted to put it back into his storage space. However, no matter how much Jiang Ping controlled the Sky Piercer Blade, it remained unmoved. It kept circling around Yan’er like a quiet puppy. Seeing how unreasonable the spiritual chaos sword physique was, Jiang Ping could only slowly walk towards Yan’er. “Yan’er, this blade belongs to someone else. Daddy still has to return it in the future.” “Let go of your control over it. Daddy will find a better weapon for you in the future.” Yan’er answered Jiang Ping with some doubt. “Yan’er didn’t deliberately control it. It wanted to listen to me.” Although Jiang Ping looked calm on the surface, he was actually surprised in his heart. “Then Yan’er, try to communicate with it.” Yan’er replied with an “oh”, then turned around and said to the Sky Piercer Blade. “Daddy said that you should go back.” The Sky Piercer Blade trembled, and Jiang Ping sensed that it was a sign of rejection. Seeing that the Sky Piercer Blade was disobedient, Yan’er put her hands on her waist and said angrily. “If you don’t go back now, I’ll get angry.” The long blade made a buzzing sound, and it seemed to land in Jiang Ping’s hand unhappily. Jiang Ping also took the opportunity to put it back into his storage space. Then, Jiang Ping reached out and held Yan’er’s small hand. He used his spiritual energy to sense Yan’er’s current cultivation. Sensing that Yan’er had advanced from the initial stage of the core building realm to the middle stage, Jiang Ping nodded his head in satisfaction. “Let’s go over to Old Uncle Lei’s place and stay there.” Then, he led Yan’er back to the eaves. Before they could stand still, they heard Wan’er shout. “Ha!” The few of them looked over when they heard the sound. They saw the little girl standing on the stone bench and lightly stomping her right foot. The stone bench turned into dust in the blink of an eye. Then, the little girl half-squatted and jumped up. She actually jumped a hundred feet high. The barrier that Jiang Ping had originally set up was pierced through by the little girl’s head. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were ashamed of their inferiority. Although that barrier was casually set up by Jiang Ping, no matter how hard they tried, it was impossible for them to break it so easily. Seeing their expressions, Jiang Ping comforted them with a smile. “Don’t be too surprised, and don’t be discouraged.” “These two little girls absorbed too much spiritual energy essence just now.” “It’s like eating too much and needing to release it. After releasing it, they will recover their original strength.” After listening to Jiang Ping’s explanation, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi felt relieved. If these little monsters were to compare with others after cultivating for two years, who in the world would dare to call themselves a genius? Wan’er’s height continued to rise, from the initial 100 feet to 150 feet to 200 feet. Until she flew into the clouds, invisible to the naked eye. After a moment, Wan’er’s figure came into view again. Then she landed heavily in the courtyard. Boom. Her small body actually made a hole in the ground. Jiang Ping looked at the little girl helplessly. Wan’er saw the big hole she had made and then looked at the crowd. She found that everyone was looking at her. The little girl scratched her head in embarrassment. Then she ran to Jiang Ping. “Daddy, I didn’t mean it. I have already restrained my strength.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi secretly ridiculed her. How was this restraining her strength? If she didn’t restrain her strength, the entire Fusheng City will be in trouble. Jiang Ping stroked the little girl’s head and said. “It’s fine. Later, daddy will let your Uncle Qiu tidy it up.” Qiu Chi bitterly looked at the pit in the courtyard that was at least the size of a hundred-year-old tree. How was tidying up enough? It was more like a renovation would be needed. Jiang Ping also used his spiritual energy to check Wan’er’s current cultivation. Late-stage core building realm and it was actually a minor level higher than Yan’er’s. Yan’er hurriedly asked Jiang Ping. “What is Wan’er’s current cultivation?” This little girl who wanted to surpass Wan’er, who was the eldest sister, couldn’t wait to know the answer. Jiang Ping said to Yan’er. “Wan’er is currently in the late-stage core building realm.” Yan’er didn’t quite believe it. “How is that possible? I was the first to start cultivating the cultivation method, but why is Wan’er’s level higher than mine?” Wan’er raised her little head proudly and smiled. Jiang Ping had seen his second daughter’s jealousy many times. He patted her little head and comforted her. “It’s okay. You can work hard in the future.” After saying that, Jiang Ping looked at Liu’er who was still sitting cross-legged. His eyes were full of worry. Jiang Ping didn’t know much about the resurrection lily. He only knew that there were two personalities. Everyone kept looking at Liu’er. Jiang Ping wanted to see if he could understand the specifics of the mysterious constitution of the resurrection lily. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi wanted to see Liu’er’s changes like the two little girls before her. Accomplish an impressive feat that would shock them. After the three of them broke through at the bottom of Yingri Lake. They knew that Liu’er also seemed to have a special constitution. And it was not weaker than Wan’er and Yan’er’s. Liu’er slowly opened her eyes. The moment she opened her eyes, a hint of red flashed across her eyes. Only Jiang Ping noticed this scene. Then Liu’er stood up. She stretched herself. Just as Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were waiting to watch a good show. Liu’er just let out a long breath. She exhaled the turbid Qi in her body. Then, she ran towards Jiang Ping with a blushing face. Seeing this, Jiang Ping squatted down and hugged her. He used his spiritual energy to check her cultivation. Then, Jiang Ping frowned in confusion. Lei Jingyun saw that Liu’er didn’t do anything that shocked them. So, he asked Liu’er about her current cultivation. Jiang Ping said slowly. “Liu’er’s cultivation hasn’t changed, but the spiritual energy in her body has increased a lot.” Hearing this, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were confused. After seeing the two young girls’ impressive feats, it seemed that Liu’er was the most shocking one. How was this possible. Then, Jiang Ping said to the three little girls. “The three of you have just finished cultivating. Go down and find your auntie to take your baths.” “Then, take a break and have lunch, okay?” Wan’er was already very hungry, so she answered first. Then, she dragged her two younger sisters to look for Li Sushang. After sending the three little girls away, Jiang Ping said to Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun. “You two follow me to the study.” After saying that, he walked to the study. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi followed him quickly. Qiu Chi was the last to step into the study. He closed the door. Jiang Ping stretched out his hand to let the two of them sit down. “I’m sure you can see that Liu’er also has a special constitution.” Lei Jingyun nodded. “And she’s not weaker than the other two young ladies.” Qiu Chi continued the topic and asked. “Then why does Liu’er’s cultivation method seem ordinary this time?” Jiang Ping continued. “Actually, I’m not too sure about Liu’er’s physique.” “I only know that it’s called the resurrection lily, similar to the kind that has inner demons.” “I don’t know anything else.” Qiu Chi didn’t say anything after hearing that. He just sat quietly, thinking about this physique that he had never heard of before. Lei Jingyun grasped the main point and asked. “Then what does the master want us to do this time?” Jiang Ping asked. “Qiu Chi, do you still remember that there was an item in the auction of the Hundred Treasures House? It was a stone amber.” “And there was a flower in the stone amber.” Qiu Chi nodded. He was present at the auction of the Hundred Treasures House that day, but he had disguised himself and sat in the audience seats. “I remember. I still remember that it was bought by Room 12 for twenty middle-grade spirit stones.” Jiang Ping said calmly. “I was the person in Room 12.” The two of them were already used to it. They had already accepted the fact that their master was rich. Lei Jingyun stroked his beard and said. “Patriarch, are you thinking that the stone amber has something to do with Liu’er’s constitution?” Jiang Ping nodded. “Because I gave the stone to Liu’er after I won the auction. Not long after that, Liu’er’s constitution was awakened.” “So, I want to trouble you to make a trip.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi sat up straight and waited for Jiang Ping to issue the mission. “Qiu Chi, go to the Hundred Treasures House and ask for information about the owner of the stone amber. Then, try to find out the origin of the stone from the owner.” “Old Lei, you are well-qualified. Help me look through the ancient books and check for the flower.” “I remember that the flower is red except for its stamen. It has six petals.” “That’s all. It might be a bit troublesome to investigate it. I’ll have to trouble you guys with this.” Qiu Chi stood up and cupped his fists at Jiang Ping. “Patriarch, you are my benefactor. How can such a small matter be considered troublesome?” Lei Jingyun also followed closely behind. He stood up and said respectfully. “Master, you are making it hard for us. We just received your spirit stones today, and now you’re saying the errand is troublesome for us.” “Then, I won’t feel comfortable keeping the spirit stone in my hand.” Jiang Ping said with a smile. “Then, in the end, it’s my fault.” After saying that, Jiang Ping sat up straight and said in the tone of an ordinary patriarch to a servant. “Then why aren’t you guys hurrying up with the errand?” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi finally left the study with smiles on their faces. Jiang Ping sat in the study for a while and summoned the system. Then, he opened the resurrection lily’s introduction panel. There were only a few words on it. Twin body engenders and inhibits… Jiang Ping logged out of the system and stopped thinking about it. After leaving the study, he went to the hall to look for a few young girls. The little girls had just finished their lunch when they saw Jiang Ping coming over. They immediately called for Jiang Ping to sit down and eat together. After Jiang Ping sat down, he looked at the three little girls in front of him and said. “You three little greedy cats, what do you want to eat for dinner? Daddy will cook for you.” Wan’er’s eyes lit up. “I want to eat spicy crab.” Yan’er and Wan’er thought of the spicy crab that Jiang Ping had made last time. They had just eaten lunch, and they swallowed hard. “Yan’er agrees.” “Liu’er also agrees.” The two little girls raised their hands and said. Jiang Ping said with a smile. “Well, let’s pack up. Let’s go to the market to buy crabs.” Wan’er and Liu’er cheered loudly. Yan’er asked Jiang Ping. “Daddy, aren’t you going to eat your lunch first?” Jiang Ping touched his stomach. “I’m going to save my appetite for spicy crab tonight.” “Call auntie along. We’re going out to buy crabs.” Just like that, three little girls were in the middle, and two adults were holding the little girls’ hands as they walked out of the house. In the Golden Door Sect. Feng Dan was sitting in the room. There was a thumb ring and a short sword on the table. Feng Dan used her fingers to caress the Crimson Cloud Sword. Just as Jiang Ping had said, this Crimson Cloud Sword suited her. After obtaining it, Feng Dan began to refine it while feeling skeptical. Unexpectedly, the process was unexpectedly smooth. Zi Yue suddenly pushed open Feng Dan’s room door. Feng Dan was so frightened that she hurriedly put away the thumb ring and the Crimson Cloud Sword. “Yo, Sister Feng is thinking about love!” Feng Dan said to Zi Yue with some resentment. “Yue’er, can you knock on the door when you enter in the future?” Zi Yue covered her mouth and giggled. “Why didn’t you say that before? Now that you have a sweetheart, you know how to avoid suspicion.” Feng Dan threatened. “If you continue to talk nonsense, I will ignore you.” Zi Yue walked over, supported the table with her hand, and put her face close to Feng Dan’s face as she said. “Then, the thing that you put away just now wasn’t a token of love?” Feng Dan stood up immediately and walked to the side. “That’s something that needs to be returned. It’s not mine.” Seeing the situation, Zi Yue stopped teasing her. She went forward and hugged Feng Dan’s hand. “Okay, okay, okay. I won’t tease you anymore. Come, accompany me to go shopping.” Feng Dan was unwilling, but she was forcefully pulled out by Zi Yue. At the market, Jiang Ping and Li Sushang were walking around with the three little girls. Along the way, the three little girls wanted to buy anything new that they saw. After buying it, they handed the things to Jiang Ping to carry. Not long after they left the house, the things in Jiang Ping’s hands were higher than Jiang Ping. “Yan’er, Liu’er, look, there are rattle drums for sale.” Yan’er and Liu’er looked in the direction where Wan’er was pointing. When they saw the exquisite rattle drums placed over there, the three little girls shot out like arrows. Jiang Ping followed behind them and said helplessly. “My three little darlings, can we stop buying?” “Daddy really can’t carry anymore.” Li Sushang snickered at the side. “This is the result of pampering them. See, in the end, you’re the one who will suffer.” Jiang Ping thought for a moment. It seemed that he had been pampering them often. He also knew that if this continued, it would be disadvantageous to the children’s growth. It was time for them to learn to be sensible. However, the three little girls had already taken the rattle drum from the boss. They turned around and looked at Jiang Ping with a smile. When Jiang Ping saw the three little girls, his hardened heart softened. He had no choice but to take out the money from his pocket. After paying, Li Sushang saw that the items in Jiang Ping’s hand had blocked Jiang Ping’s line of sight. Li Sushang sneered at Jiang Ping. “Did you forget about the storage space?” Jiang Ping was stunned as if he suddenly realized something. He put the items down and patted his head. “If you didn’t remind me, I would have forgotten about it.” Then, he waved his arm and put the things away. Then, Jiang Ping squatted down and said to the three little girls seriously. “It’s not right to waste money like this. Don’t think that I don’t know that you won’t touch many things twice after you buy them.” “Promise daddy that we’ll go to the market to buy crabs right now. We’re not allowed to buy anything else.” The three little girls waved the rattle drums in their hands. They agreed. However, it was the same every time they went out shopping because every time they agreed, they would ask Jiang Ping to buy them. In the end, Jiang Ping couldn’t resist the three little girls acting coquettishly at the same time. He had no choice but to obediently take out his money pouch. After Jiang Ping finished talking to the three little girls, he pulled them towards the market. Li Sushang followed behind him. After taking two steps, the three little girls saw an old man selling candied haws. They were clamoring to eat them. This time, Jiang Ping was determined to get rid of their clamoring habit. He kept refusing The three little girls stood in front of the stall selling candied haws and drooled as they looked at the skewers of candied haws. Wan’er pointed at the candied haws and said. “Daddy, look at this candied haw. Doesn’t it look delicious?” Jiang Ping didn’t look at the candied haw but turned his head away. “No, I’m not going to look. It’s not delicious.” Yan’er ran in Jiang Ping’s direction, turned his head, and jumped up at his feet. “Daddy, I’m hungry. I want to eat the candied haw.” Jiang Ping turned his head to the other side. “What do you mean that you’re hungry? Didn’t you just have lunch?” Liu’er imitated Yan’er and ran to Jiang Ping. She blinked her small eyes and said. “Daddy, Liu’er…” Before Liu’er finished speaking, Jiang Ping said firmly. “Stop. I won’t buy it for you.” The uncle selling candied haws saw that there was money to be made and quickly tried to persuade Jiang Ping. “Young master, buy a few skewers. It’s only two coins.” Jiang Ping extended his hand and refused. “Uncle, this isn’t about money.” “After they buy them, they definitely won’t be able to finish them, and they will be thrown away.” “I’m educating the children.” The uncle saw the opportunity and said. “How could they not finish them? There are only a few on one skewer.” Then, the three little girls either hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh. Or they tugged on Jiang Ping’s sleeve. They all acted coquettishly. “Daddy, buy one.” “Daddy, Wan’er can finish it.” “Daddy, daddy.” Jiang Ping was about to lose himself in the repeated calls of “Daddy”. He turned his head to look at Li Sushang for help. Li Sushang rolled her eyes at Jiang Ping and said. “Why are you looking at me? You’re the one who pampered them. Deal with it yourself.” After saying that, she turned her head away and covered her mouth with her hand while secretly laughing Just as Jiang Ping was about to sternly reject them.  A hand handed six copper coins to the boss. “Boss, give me three skewers.” “Okay.” After the boss received the copper coins, he picked out a few skewers of candied haws that looked better and handed them to the woman in red in front of him. Jiang Ping smiled and greeted the two women. “Miss Feng, Miss Zi, what a coincidence.” Zi Yue also waved her hand with a smile. Feng Dan didn’t respond. She just squatted down. She waved the candied haws in front of the three little girls. The three little girls stared at the candied haws in Feng Dan’s hand. Their eyes followed Feng Dan’s movements. “Here, these are for you.” The three little girls quickly took the candied haws from Feng Dan’s hand, afraid that she would go back on her words. Then, Feng Dan stood up and greeted Jiang Ping. “Yes, Mr. Jiang, what a coincidence.” Jiang Ping patted his forehead helplessly. “Miss Feng, what are you doing? I’m teaching my children. This is great, I’ve wasted my time talking to them.” Feng Dan was stunned for a moment. “Ah?” “Sorry, I thought you didn’t bring any money.” There was a hint of regret in her tone. Jiang Ping waved his hand. “Forget it, it’s fine.” Then, he lowered his head and said to the three little fellows. “Hurry up and say thank you.” The three little girls who were licking the candied haw with their tongues raised their heads in unison and said thank you to Feng Dan. Feng Dan touched their little heads and smiled warmly. Zi Yue said to Jiang Ping. “Since it’s such a coincidence, why don’t we go shopping together?” After saying that, she winked at Feng Dan. Feng Dan immediately glared at Zi Yue. It was as if she was saying, “Don’t talk nonsense.” Jiang Ping didn’t mind and agreed to Zi Yue’s request. “Sure, we’re going to buy crabs next. I’m going to cook tonight.” “If you don’t mind, let’s have dinner together.” Feng Dan didn’t expect Jiang Ping to invite them to have dinner together. In fact, after Feng Dan saved him on the lawn, Jiang Ping’s impression of the two girls in front of him increased a lot. Anyway, he had already beaten up all the people that he could defeat in Fusheng City. There wouldn’t be any sect disputes that would find trouble with him. Feng Dan was still a little stunned. Zi Yue reacted and immediately agreed. Then, the group went to the market. When they reached the place that sold fresh food, they were all searching for crabs. Suddenly, Wan’er stood up and shouted. e are “Daddy, look! There are crabs over there!” After saying that, she ran forward. Pointing at a big wooden basin, she turned around and looked at the crowd excitedly. Jiang Ping followed her with two other little girls. “Wan’er is awesome. Tonight, I’ll reward Wan’er with two more bowls of rice.” The little girl blushed and smiled. Jiang Ping squatted beside the wooden basin and picked the crabs. Wan’er also copied her father and squatted beside the wooden basin to pick and choose. Occasionally, she was caught by the crab’s pincers, and she would secretly slap the crab’s head when the boss was not paying attention. Jiang Ping picked for a long time, and he was finally done. Liu’er, who was standing behind Jiang Ping, kept repeating the same words. “Daddy, this is not enough!” Jiang Ping had intended to pay the bill and leave. When he heard Liu’er’s nagging, Jiang Ping sighed and stopped picking. He directly asked the boss to sell him the whole basin of crabs. After paying the bill, Jiang Ping asked the boss. “Boss, can you deliver it to my doorstep?” The corner of the boss’ mouth was about to curl up to his eyebrows. He nodded hard. “Young Master, since you’ve bought so many, delivering it to your doorstep is nothing. Give me your address later, and I promise that it will be delivered before you reach home.” Jiang Ping gave the address to the boss and told the boss to deliver it to the gatekeeper, Chen Zhong Then, he turned around and said to the crowd. “It’s still early. Why don’t we go for a walk?” The little girls agreed. Li Sushang had always followed Jiang Ping’s arrangements. She did not say a word and just nodded. The other two ladies were beaming with joy. They seemed to be very happy. The few of them continued to walk on the street. While walking, Jiang Ping kept telling the little girls repeatedly that he would not be buying them anything No matter what he said, it was useless. The three little girls were originally in high spirits, but when they heard Jiang Ping’s words, they were a little depressed. “Daddy, how do you pronounce those three words?” When everyone passed by a restaurant, Wan’er pointed at the signboard in front of the door and asked. Jiang Ping knocked Wan’er’s little head. “I told you to study properly. This is called, ‘Pure Grace Pavilion’.” Wan’er covered her head and made an “oh” sound. A waiter walked out of the Pure Grace Pavilion’s door. He shouted at the people coming and going by the roadside. “Ladies and gentlemen, you don’t want to miss this chance.” “Today, our Pure Grace Pavilion has invited the popular actress, Miss Ning Xiao, from Fusheng City.” “If you are not busy, please stop by and come into our Pure Grace Pavilion to watch the show.” Liu’er blinked her small eyes and raised her head to ask Jiang Ping. “Daddy, what is an actress?” Jiang Ping patted Liu’er’s small head. “An actress is someone who acts.” Liu’er scratched her small face. “Act? What is acting?” Jiang Ping did not know how to answer the question. Zi Yue, who was beside him, helped him out. “Acting is telling a story. Not only do you use your mouth, but you also use your actions to express the story.” Liu’er understood after hearing that. “Liu’er loves listening to stories the most. Daddy, let’s go in and have a look.” Jiang Ping turned around to look at the few of them, and they didn’t have any objections. “Okay, then let’s go in and listen to the story.” Jiang Ping walked forward and handed a silver ingot to the waiter, asking him to arrange a better spot to watch the show. The waiter shook the silver ingot and said yes with a smile. Then, he led Jiang Ping and the others into the restaurant. A private room on the second floor of the restaurant was arranged for Jiang Ping’s group. From there, they could see the entire restaurant. As a place to watch the show, it was even better. The waiter handed Jiang Ping the program list and the menu. “Master, this is the menu and the program list. Please look at it first. If there is anything, please call me.” Jiang Ping nodded and let the waiter go to work while he handed the menu to the three little girls. Then, he picked up the program list and started reading it. After handing the menu to the three little girls, they only ordered drinks and didn’t look at the rest. Jiang Ping asked why they didn’t order food. Li Sushang secretly smiled and asked Jiang Ping. “Did you forget that we had just bought a big basin of crabs?” Jiang Ping patted his head. “That’s right. I was wondering why the three little greedy cats were so quiet today.” “Alright, then we won’t order food. We’ll just drink some tea.” After saying this, Yan’er looked at the program list in Jiang Ping’s hand. “Daddy, can I take a look at this program list?” Jiang Ping smiled and replied, of course, then he handed the program list to Yan’er. There was only one program written on the program list, but the story of this show was roughly recorded on it. This show was about a young lady from a landlord’s family who fell in love with a poor scholar but was forced to give up because of her father’s disapproval. Later on, this poor scholar entered the capital and obtained a scholarly honor. Then the landlord wanted his daughter to tie the knot with the poor scholar who became successful. But this young lady felt that she had not accompanied the scholar during his most difficult time, and seeing that he had obtained a scholarly honor, she was no longer worthy of him. The landlord wanted to force the scholar to marry his daughter, but the scholar was unwilling. The young lady could not bear to see the scholar in a dilemma, so she left far away and did not want to see him again. Yan’er carefully read every word and remembered it in her heart. After reading it, the young lady’s face actually showed grief and indignation. Seeing this, Jiang Ping asked Yan’er. “Yan’er, did you understand something?” Yan’er nodded. “Daddy, the landlord in this show is horrible. He actually broke up such a good couple.” Feng Dan and Zi Yue were very curious about this show when they saw Yan’er’s reaction. “Yan’er, can you show me the program list?” Zi Yue asked Yan’er. Yan’er was indignant. She was still muttering bad things about the landlord in the show and ignored Zi Yue. Zi Yue then took the program list from the little girl. Feng Dan also came over, and the two of them looked at it together. The two ladies didn’t feel anything after reading it. Wasn’t this just a cliche tragic drama? The two ladies, who were used to the wind and waves, didn’t think much of it. But they didn’t say it out loud. After reading it, they returned the program list to Jiang Ping. Soon, the waiter started to beat drums and gongs on the stage. Everyone in the restaurant was attracted by it. “Ladies and gentlemen, the show is about to begin.” “Don’t blink, everyone. I’m afraid that you’ll miss the exciting part.” With the sound of a gong, the show began. Feng Dan and Zi Yue picked up the teacups on the table and drank tea. The restaurants in Fusheng City could perform such a bitter drama eight hundred times a day. Therefore, the two girls did not find it interesting Wan’er had also looked at the program list and found that she was not interested in what was written on it at all. Moreover, she could not recognize most of the words, so she did not pay attention to the stage. At first, Liu’er ran forward and leaned on the railing to watch it carefully. But after watching it for a while, she realized that this was not the story she wanted to hear. She walked back and sat down dejectedly. “This isn’t even as good as daddy’s Pleasant Goat and Gray Wolf’s story.” Jiang Ping laughed loudly. “Thank you, Liu’er, for thinking so highly of daddy.” Li Sushang’s mind was not on the stage. She only looked at the three little girls quietly. Only Yan’er was watching the show seriously. During this time, Liu’er called Yan’er a few times, but she did not hear it. The show ended, and the crowd dispersed. Everyone in the restaurant walked out one after another. Jiang Ping and the others also stood up and wanted to leave. Just as they were about to leave, they found Yan’er still sitting on the chair, looking at the stage in a daze. When Jiang Ping saw this, he immediately squatted down and held the little girl’s hand. “What’s wrong? Are you mesmerized?” Only then did Yan’er come back to her senses. “Daddy, do you think that two people who love each other will eventually get separated?” Jiang Ping patted the little girl’s head and smiled. “Not necessarily. If they love each other very deeply, they will meet each other no matter how far they go.” Yan’er asked again. “Then Daddy, do you love Mommy?” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment. He had already guessed what the little girl was going to ask next. Before he could answer, Yan’er spoke again. “Daddy, why haven’t I seen Mommy before?” Jiang Ping was rendered speechless by the question. The other two little girls also looked at Jiang Ping, waiting for his reply. At this time, Li Sushang also bent down and squatted by Jiang Ping’s side. “Because your mommy has other things to do now.” “When she’s done, she’ll naturally come and look for Yan’er, Wan’er, and Liu’er.” Yan’er looked at Jiang Ping with a curious gaze. “Is what auntie said true?” Jiang Ping tidied Yan’er’s hair. “Of course, it’s true. Daddy promises you that when your mommy is done with her work, I will definitely bring you to see her.” The little girl was finally not so depressed. Feng Dan, who was at the side, held Zi Yue’s hand tightly. She did not even realize that Zi Yue’s little hand was already red from her pinching. Zi Yue’s right hand gently patted the back of Feng Dan’s hand that was grabbing her left hand. When she turned to look at Feng Dan, a hint of worry appeared in her eyes. Jiang Ping held Yan’er’s hand and led everyone out of the restaurant. Along the way, Jiang Ping told Yan’er a few jokes before he calmed the little girl’s worries. When they returned to the mansion, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were not back yet. Jiang Ping let the little girls play first while he went to the kitchen to scrub the crabs. Jiang Ping rolled up his sleeves and was about to start working. Feng Dan walked in. “Let me help you.” Jiang Ping waved his hand. “No need. I can do it myself. You are a girl. How can you do such menial work?” But Feng Dan didn’t listen to his advice and insisted on staying behind to help Jiang Ping. In fact, Feng Dan was the daughter of a large sect. How would she know how to handle such menial work in the kitchen? Several times when she tried to grab the crabs, they ran away. Seeing this, Jiang Ping had no choice but to let her help him to take and pass the things to him accordingly. The crab was put into the pot with hot oil. The fragrance was absolutely superb. “Bring me a plate.” Jiang Ping said to Feng Dan. Feng Dan obediently brought the plate to Jiang Ping and asked him. “Can I ask you a question?” Jiang Ping was focused on frying the crab and replied. “What question?” Feng Dan stammered, and her small hands clutched her sleeves. “I want to know, the little girls’ mother…” When Jiang Ping heard this, the spatula in his hand paused. “I don’t know where their mother went either.” After saying this, Jiang Ping continued to stir-fry the crabs, pretending that he didn’t care. “It’s hard to say if we’ll ever see each other again in this lifetime.” Feng Dan stared at Jiang Ping seriously and didn’t continue to ask. She couldn’t tell whether she was happy or unhappy. When Jiang Ping brought a big pot full of crabs to the table. The three little girls were already in position, tapping the porcelain bowl with chopsticks in their hands. “The dishes are served. You little greedy cats must have waited for a long time.” Jiang Ping invited Zi Yue and Feng Dan to take a seat. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi hadn’t returned yet. This made the three little girls extremely happy. Especially Wan’er. Even though she looked calm on the surface, in reality, she had already prepared today’s “battle plan”. The little girl muttered softly. “Later, I’ll just pick up the dishes before I start eating. I’ll eat when I picked up enough.” In order to eat enough this time, Wan’er specifically changed the small bowl that she usually ate from. She changed into a pot that was bigger than her head. Just as Jiang Ping was about to say start eating, Qiu Chi ran in while panting. After entering, Qiu Chi panted heavily. He went to the table to get a cup of tea. Regardless of who it belonged to, he drank it in one gulp. Just as he was about to speak to Jiang Ping, Jiang Ping pointed at the crowd and said to Qiu Chi. “Let’s eat first and talk later.” Wan’er, who had her tea drunk by Qiu Chi, also said with some resentment. “Yeah, Uncle Qiu, why are you always so impatient?” When Wan’er saw Qiu Chi return, she was actually thinking, “Oh no, I have another strong opponent.” Qiu Chi scratched his head awkwardly and sat down. Feng Dan and Zi Yue had tasted Jiang Ping’s cooking before, and they were already salivating Especially when the crab was done cooking and taken out of the pot, the entire mansion was filled with fragrance. It didn’t matter if the people were full or hungry. They were all drooling. After they start, Wan’er quickly picked up a crab and put it into her bowl. In order to make room for the crab, Wan’er didn’t even fill the bowl with rice. Qiu Chi saw this and quickly complained to Jiang Ping “Master, Wan’er broke the rules.” He didn’t stop his actions even as he spoke. Jiang Ping snickered. “The rules have been set before. There are no rules when it comes to eating. Nobody said that you can’t use a pot. You should hurry up or else the dishes will be gone.” Feng Dan and Zi Yue saw that the people at the table were so desperate. They didn’t care about their status and just stuffed the food into their mouths. Soon, Wan’er’s pot was filled up. Then, she walked to the side with the pot. She put the pot of crabs on the bench and then squatted by the bench and started to eat. Liu’er and Yan’er were not fast enough, and they were becoming anxious. Seeing this, Jiang Ping had to help the two little girls with the dishes. After a moment, Wan’er went back to her seat with a big belly. She burped contentedly. She looked at her “opponents” with arrogance. The others were also full. Even if they were not full, there was only some soup left in the pot. After dinner, Jiang Ping said to Feng Dan and Zi Yue that he would not send them off. He still had important things to do. He told them to stay in the mansion for a while if they wanted to. If they wanted to go back, they could leave on their own. Feng Dan and Zi Yue didn’t say anything. They walked around the Jiang Mansion, digested their food, and then went back. After speaking to the two women, Jiang Ping brought Qiu Chi back to the study. As soon as he closed the study door and before he sat down, Jiang Ping asked Qiu Chi. “The matter which I told you to investigate. Did it go smoothly?” Qiu Chi nodded. Today, Qiu Chi went to the Hundred Treasures House to investigate the source of the stone amber that Jiang Ping had bought. When the butler of the Hundred Treasures House saw him, he was extremely enthusiastic. He went in and asked Director Fei Cai about the stone amber. At first, Fei Cai told him that by right, according to the rules of the Hundred Treasures House, they would not reveal any information about the owner of the goods. However, it just so happened that the owner of the stone amber was one of the Hundred Treasures House’s people. She was not afraid of being remembered by Jiang Ping, so she brought Qiu Chi to meet the owner. Qiu Chi said to Jiang Ping. “After I went to the Hundred Treasures House today, Director Fei Cai took me to see the owner.” “He was a foreigner who came to our Fusheng City from other places to earn a living.” “He said that he found the stone near Fengdu City when he went to the south area.” “At that time, he didn’t pay much attention to it and stuffed it into his pocket. Then, after he arrived at Fusheng City, he sold it to the Hundred Treasures House for money and started to work for the Hundred Treasures House.” When Jiang Ping heard Qiu Chi’s words, his expression changed slightly when he heard about Fengdu City. Of course, he had never heard of Fengdu City, but the words Fengdu seemed to describe the underworld. Why would someone use the words Fengdu as a city’s name? Why wasn’t the secular empire that was governing that city going to do something about the name? Jiang Ping questioned in his heart. However, Qiu Chi had no comment because he was a native of Fusheng City. He had never even been 200 kilometers away from the city, much less heard about Fengdu City. Furthermore, the foreigner from the Hundred Treasures House was only passing by. He only knew that the city was called Fengdu and did not know the details. “Fengdu City is under the jurisdiction of the Dafeng Empire. It was originally called Yongdu City.” “Almost every time the empire changes, the first battle would be fought in this city.” “Many people died, and because the pronunciation is similar to Fengdu, it became Fengdu City.” Lei Jingyun’s voice could be heard before he appeared. Halfway through his sentence, Lei Jingyun pushed open the door and entered the study. Seeing that Lei Jingyun understood so well, Jiang Ping asked excitedly. “So, Old Lei, you’ve been there before?” Lei Jingyun shook his head. “I haven’t been there before. It’s just that I’ve read about it in books because I’ve always liked to read about travel notes.” “It was also because I was curious about the name of this city that I had such a deep impression of it.” Qiu Chi patted Lei Jingyun on the shoulder. “I didn’t expect it, Old Lei. Seeing that you’re usually so rough, but you are interested in literature and art. What a surprise.” Lei Jingyun patted Qiu Chi’s hand away with a smile. “Master, I have been all over Fusheng City today and read a lot of ancient books.” “I finally have some clues.” Jiang Ping’s eyes were full of expectation. “Tell me about it.” Lei Jingyun casually found a chair and sat down. “The flower you described is completely red and has a pale yellow stamen. It is called the red spider lily.” “To be exact, it’s also called the red magic lily.” “This red magic lily only grows in one place. Coincidentally it is the place before Fengdu City’s name was changed.” “According to the ancient books, before the war broke out in Yongdu City, the petals of this flower were not red, but pale yellow.” “After being stained by blood, the color of the flower slowly turned red, and Yongdu City changed its name to Fengdu.” “The red magic lily was also changed to red spider lily.” Jiang Ping rubbed the teacup in his hand and said. “Can this flower still be found?” Lei Jingyun shook his head regretfully. “It has gone extinct.” Jiang Ping was a little disappointed. He had thought that if he could ask someone who understands the red spider lily. Perhaps, there would be an explanation for Liu’er’s special constitution. Lei Jingyun saw that Jiang Ping didn’t ask anymore, so he comforted Jiang Ping. “Patriarch, you don’t have to give up so early.” “I’ve seen it in the travel notes. Many people in this world have some special fetishes such as collecting stone ambers.” “If we meet them, we might know something.” Although this explanation was somewhat illusory and ethereal. But Jiang Ping’s heart was still much more at ease. After thinking for a moment, Jiang Ping said to the two of them. “I think it’s necessary for us to go to Fengdu City.” Qiu Chi was the first to speak with cupped fists. “I pledge my life to follow you everywhere.” Lei Jingyun also cupped his hands and bowed, only answering with one word. “Same.” Jiang Ping was full of smiles. “Then let’s not delay. Tonight, absorb the spirit stones I gave you yesterday and try to raise your cultivation realms before you set off.” The two nodded, and then Lei Jingyun asked. “What about the young ladies?” Jiang Ping said. “Naturally, we’ll move together. If we can figure out Liu’er’s constitution, we’ll come back.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi cupped their fists at the same time and then left the study. Jiang Ping took out spirit stones from the storage space in the study. In fact, Jiang Ping had already broken through to the earth immortal realm when he battled with Liu Fang on the lawn. According to secular cultivation, one had to first settle down as it was not easy to breakthrough in a short period of time. This would cause the foundation to be unstable. Although it could be repaired, it would also cause a lot of suffering in the future. However, he was going to Fengdu City now, and he was not familiar with the place. If some people were not tactful and insisted on finding trouble, he would have to deal with them. Therefore, Jiang Ping planned to improve his realm and take care of the present first. It was late at night. Jiang Ping was busy cultivating tonight, and the three little girls were coaxed to sleep by Li Sushang. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun were busy refining spirit stones in their respective rooms. After Feng Dan and Zi Yue came out of the Jiang Mansion, they didn’t go home. Instead, they climbed up a mountain outside of Fusheng City. They looked at the night view of Fusheng City. “Feng Dan.” “Huh?” The two of them asked and answered one by one. “There’s no one else here. Tell me honestly. Do you like Jiang Ping?” Feng Dan was also a little confused by the question. She looked at Zi Yue, but Zi Yue didn’t turn her head. She was still looking at the bright lights of Fusheng City. “You can tell, can’t you?” Feng Dan asked Zi Yue in return. Zi Yue smoothed her hair that had been messed up by the wind, not letting it cover her eyes. “I want to hear it from you personally.” Feng Dan turned her head and also looked at the night scene. She said happily. “I like him.” Zi Yue only replied with an “oh” and did not continue. “Then, Yue’er, do you have someone you like?” Feng Dan asked. Zi Yue slowly opened her mouth to answer. “Of course I do.” UF Wa Feng Dan was a little excited when she heard that, but after a moment, she pretended to be angry and said to Zi Yue. “Hmph, if you have someone you like, why didn’t you tell me? I just slept with you for nothing!” Zi Yue slowly lowered her head and said something that even Feng Dan could not understand. “I don’t even know if I like that person. How would I dare to tell you?” “Is there such a thing as not knowing if you like someone?” “Yes, there is.” “Can you explain it to me?” “It’s like, I don’t know if it’s friendship or love.” Feng Dan was confused by Zi Yue’s answer. “Yue’er, what are you talking about? I don’t even know what it means to like someone after you said that.” Zi Yue suddenly turned around and said with a smile. “I just want to be with that person, so that is also liking someone.” Feng Dan replied with a vague understanding. “Then do you like to be with him? I don’t see you thinking about him all day long. Instead, you are pestering me all the time.” Zi Yue replied. “Of course, I like to be with that person.” Feng Dan seized the opportunity to ask. “Then why don’t you tell him that you like him?” Zi Yue rolled her eyes at Feng Dan. “Then why didn’t you tell Jiang Ping that you like him?” “This…” “Sister Feng, I’m so tired. Can I lean on you?” After saying this, Zi Yue didn’t wait for Feng Dan to answer and rested her head on Feng Dan’s shoulder. Jiang Ping opened the door and stretched. He breathed in the morning air. Then he planned to wake up the little girls and bring them to school. Before Jiang Ping reached the little girls’ room, he saw them squatting under the eaves, holding large porcelain cups. They lined up and washed up obediently. Jiang Ping waved at the little girls. “Why are you girls up so early? Daddy was just about to wake you up.” The little girls heard their father’s voice and looked up at Jiang Ping weakly. Well, looking at their current state, they were still half awake. Li Sushang had just finished making the beds in the little girls’ rooms. “How could we wait for you. They’re going to be late. Can’t you see what time it is now?” Jiang Ping raised his head and looked at the glaring sun in the sky. He smiled awkwardly. “Hehe, it’s quite late. I was cultivating too late last night and didn’t pay attention to the time.” Li Sushang rolled her eyes at Jiang Ping and then took out the quilt from the little girls’ room to bask in the sun. Jiang Ping walked to the eaves. “Auntie will send you to school later. After school, daddy has something important to announce.” The three little girls were curious, and the drowsiness on their faces was gone. Wan’er stopped brushing her teeth. “What important thing?” Jiang Ping flicked Wan’er’s forehead with his finger. “I said I’ll announce it when I come back tonight.” Yan’er asked Jiang Ping. “Auntie will send us to school? Where’s Uncle Qiu?” Jiang Ping said to the little girls with a smile. “Uncle Qiu and Old Uncle Lei are busy cultivating right now. We probably won’t be able to see them today.” “Cultivating!” “Wan’er wants to cultivate too. I don’t want to go to school!” “Liu’er too!” Jiang Ping gave these two mischievous kids who disliked going to school a knock on their heads. “You two should learn more from Yan’er. She doesn’t complain about not wanting to go to school like the two of you.” Yan’er, who was being praised, looked at her sisters on her left and right and secretly smiled. Jiang Ping stood up. “All of you have to be good today. If daddy isn’t home after you girls have returned from school, you can play at home by yourselves.” Apart from Yan’er, the other two nodded their heads listlessly. Jiang Ping then walked out of the door. Last night, he looked at the map and found that Fengdu City was probably a continent away from where he was now. Therefore, if he wanted to move his family there, he would definitely need to use a ferry. This ferry was not a ferry that ordinary people knew about but was specially provided for cultivators. The ferry was one of the faster means of transportation. Although it was called a boat, it was actually a behemoth. The number of people it could carry was not something an ordinary wooden boat could compare to. Some swam in the water, and some flew in the sky. These behemoths were all domesticated by some immortal sects. Not only were they gentle, but they could also travel long distances. However, the immortal sects that domesticated these behemoths made a lot of money because of the characteristics of the ferries. For example, the Tianyuan Sect that Jiang Ping killed had a small ferryboat. Although the ferry could only carry two thousand pounds of goods and people, it was also the main source of the Tianyuan Sect’s economy. Jiang Ping was going out this time to inquire about the ferry. He knew nothing about the sects near Fusheng City, and Lei Jingyun was in seclusion. Therefore, he wanted to go to the Hundred Treasures House to ask Fei Cai. In the Hundred Treasures House, Fei Cai was talking to a woman in purple. “You didn’t tell her?” “No, I didn’t dare.” “What’s there to be afraid of liking someone? Listen to me.” “But…” This woman in purple was Zi Yue. Early this morning, Zi Yue came to the Hundred Treasures House. She said that she hadn’t slept all night and wanted to come to Fei Cai to talk to her. After talking about her difficult problem, Fei Cai wasn’t surprised. After listening to Zi Yue’s recount, this was Fei Cai’s first sentence. “I’m not surprised because anyone with a discerning eye can see it.” Zi Yue lowered her head and sighed. She answered Fei Cai’s previous question. “But… we’re both women.” After saying this, Zi Yue started to sob. Although Fei Cai and Zi Yue would always argue with each other, the two of them did not have any deep enmity, and they had quite a good impression of each other. Seeing her sister feeling so sad, Fei Cai felt her heart aching a little. She reached out and touched Zi Yue’s cheek. She was planning in her heart, thinking about how to comfort the woman in front of her. The gatekeeper, Old Zhao, suddenly walked in. He said to Fei Cai with a smile on his face “Director, guess who is here.” Seeing someone come in, Zi Yue hurriedly wiped her tears. She pretended to be fine, but her head was still lowered, not daring to let anyone see. Fei Cai was a little angry, and she scolded. “No one can come in without knocking.” The gatekeeper only told Fei Cai about Jiang Ping’s arrival. Fei Cai was no longer angry. She quickly asked. “Then where is Mr. Jiang? Where is he?” The gatekeeper reached out his hand and pointed outside. “I’ve brought him to the living room. He’s waiting for you.” Fei Cai tidied her clothes, stood up, and was about to go to the living room. When she saw Zi Yue from the corner of her eyes, she remembered that Zi Yue was still there. “Sister Yue’er, why don’t you come with me?” Zi Yue tried her best to make her voice sound less like she had cried before, and she spat out a few words forcefully. “You go first, I’ll be there later.” Fei Cai nodded, and then she walked quickly to the living room. Jiang Ping didn’t just sit there. Sometimes he walked back and forth around the table, and sometimes he looked at the exquisite items on the wall shelves. When the sound of footsteps came. Jiang Ping looked towards the door of the reception room. He saw Fei Cai, who was wearing a green body sculpting cheongsam, walk in with a smile on her face. Fei Cai let Jiang Ping take a seat before she sat down. “What is the purpose of Mr. Jiang’s visit this time?” “If it’s because of the stone amber, that servant from our Hundred Treasures House said everything he could on that day.” “Mr. Jiang, you won’t be able to get anything more out of him.” Jiang Ping smiled and said. “It’s not because of that. I’m here to ask Director Fei Cai for a favor.” “Of course, I’ll pay you normally.” Fei Cai immediately sat up straight when she heard that there was money to be made. “I wonder what’s the matter?” “If our Hundred Treasures House can help, we definitely won’t refuse.” Jiang Ping said. “I need Miss Fei Cai to contact a ferry for me.” “And plan the route to Fengdu City.” Fei Cai was a little puzzled. “This ferry matter is not difficult to resolve.” “But I am curious.” “Mr. Jiang, why are you going to Fengdu City?” Jiang Ping laughed and said. “After staying in Fusheng City for a long time, I become a little bored and feel like moving.” At this time, Zi Yue had just calmed herself, walked to the living room door, and just heard what Jiang Ping said about moving. “Moving!” “Where are you moving to?” Zi Yue practically shouted out loud. Jiang Ping was shocked by Zi Yue’s sudden questioning and didn’t know how to answer. When Fei Cai saw this, she quickly stood up, walked to the door of the living room, and held Zi Yue’s hand. “Mr. Jiang, don’t be a stranger. Zi Yue has always been rude when she’s with me.” After Zi Yue reacted, she realized that she had lost her composure just now. After she calmed down, she asked again. “Mr. Jiang, what did you say about moving just now?” “Can you tell me about it?” Jiang Ping took a sip of the tea that Fei Cai handed him. “We’re going to move to Fengdu City.” Zi Yue asked again. “Why?” “No reason. I just felt like moving.” Of course, Jiang Ping wouldn’t tell the two of them the real reason for the move. Zi Yue opened her mouth very quickly, and she spoke in a hurry. “Do you know that Feng Dan will be very sad if you move away?” Jiang Ping was a little confused. “What does it have to do with Feng Dan if I moved away?” “Don’t you know that Feng Dan…” Zi Yue almost blurted it out, but Fei Cai patted the back of her hand in time. Only then did she take back what she wanted to say. Jiang Ping was a little speechless. Why did she stop mid-sentence? “What’s wrong with Feng Dan?” Zi Yue turned her head away and asked. “Can’t you see that Feng Dan really likes your three daughters?” “Once you move away and the three little girls leave, she’ll be sad for a long time.” Jiang Ping only realized this after hearing that. “Oh, is that so?” “That won’t be a problem. If you want to, you can come to Fengdu City to visit me. I’ll pay for the trip.” Zi Yue nodded but didn’t say anything. Fei Cai broke the strange atmosphere. “Then don’t worry, Mr. Jiang. I’ll keep an eye on this matter, but it’ll take about two or three days for me to give you a reply.” Jiang Ping smiled and said it was fine. He just let Fei Cai take care of the arrangements. After Fei Cai discussed some details with Jiang Ping, she sent Jiang Ping out of the Hundred Treasures House. Zi Yue left the Hundred Treasures House after Jiang Ping left. Looking at Zi Yue leaving in a hurry, Fei Cai stood at the door and shook her head helplessly. Zi Yue was practically running towards the Golden Door Sect. Then, she stopped at the door of Feng Dan’s room. She repeatedly raised her hand and wanted to knock on the door, but she kept putting it down. She raised her hand but did not knock and she put down her hand. She was doing that until Feng Dan opened the door. “Yue’er, why are you here? When did you come? Why didn’t you come in?” Zi Yue put away her conflicted emotions from before. “I just came. I was just about to knock on the door.” Feng Dan waved the teapot in her hand. “You go in and have a seat first. I’ll go get some more tea.” Zi Yue nodded and walked into Feng Dan’s room. Then, she sat in her usual seat. Not long after, Feng Dan came back with a full pot of tea. She turned over the upside-down teacup on the table and poured the tea. “Yue’er, what’s wrong? Are you feeling bored at home again?” “You came to my place to have fun?” Zi Yue reached out her hand to pick up the teacup. As if she was drinking wine, she finished the tea. Then, she placed the teacup near Feng Dan’s table and gestured for her to pour another cup. Feng Dan filled Zi Yue’s cup with tea again. Again, Zi Yue finished the tea in one gulp. Feng Dan could not sit still anymore. There was a hint of concern in her tone. “Yue’er, what’s wrong with you? Do you have any difficulties?” Zi Yue shook her head and extended her teacup towards Feng Dan. Feng Dan took the teacup from Zi Yue’s hand and placed it on the side. “This isn’t wine. You’re wasting it by drinking like this.” Zi Yue had no choice but to withdraw her hand. Zi Yue, who had not said a single word after entering the door, let out a long sigh. She sat up straight and said. “I have something to tell you. You have to promise me that you can’t be sad.” After saying this, Zi Yue felt that she had said nonsense. How could she not be sad? It was impossible! Feng Dan stretched out her hand and touched Zi Yue’s forehead. “Yue’er, you’re not sick, right? Why are you saying strange things?” After hesitating for a moment, Zi Yue slowly said a few words. “Jiang Ping is moving.” “So be it. What does Jiang Ping moving have to do with me…” “Wait, what did you say?” “Jiang Ping!” “Moving!” Zi Yue nodded. “Where is he moving to?” Feng Dan grabbed Zi Yue’s hand and asked. Zi Yue slowly said. “Fengdu City.” Fengdu City? Although this was the first time Feng Dan had heard of Fengdu City, as soon as Zi Yue said it, she felt that Fengdu City was so far away. Feng Dan sat quietly, her gaze unfocused, and she didn’t speak for a long time. When Jiang Ping returned home, the three little girls had already returned from school. They were all waiting for Jiang Ping at the door. “What’s going on? Didn’t I say that if I’m not back yet, you guys can play by yourselves for a while?” “What’s with this scene at the door? Who are you trying to scare?” Liu’er said angrily to Jiang Ping. “Daddy is bad. You only said half of what you wanted to say.” Wan’er also had her hands on her hips. “That’s right. I couldn’t even listen to what the teacher was talking about the whole morning.” Yan’er, on the other hand, sat on the threshold and exposed Wan’er. “That’s because you didn’t listen to him in the first place. It doesn’t seem to have anything to do with daddy.” After Wan’er was exposed, her anger was immediately vented out. With low morale, she said to Yan’er. “Yan’er, who are you helping? Didn’t you say that the three of us are going to criticize daddy today?” Yan’er spread out her hands. “I’m just telling the truth.” Wan’er was feeling very helpless towards this younger sister who was trying to boost the morale of others and destroy her prestige. She sighed. When Yan’er saw Wan’er like this, she chuckled foolishly. Then, she turned her head and said to Jiang Ping. “Daddy, honestly speaking, what you did was indeed wrong.” “You only said half of what you wanted to say, and it made the three of us so curious.” Jiang Ping was amused by the little girls. He went forward and knocked each of them on their heads. “All of you have grown up, and you are all ganging up to bully me.” Liu’er covered her head and said. “That’s not true. Daddy, you said that a mistake is a mistake, and it didn’t matter if it’s serious or minor.” Yan’er also nodded. “That’s right. Daddy, you even blamed us. Adding on to your mistake.” Jiang Ping laughed instead because he was angry. “Okay, okay, okay. Little princesses, I’m sorry, okay?” The little girls looked at each other. Wan’er pointed at Jiang Ping and said. “We don’t intend to forgive you, unless…” Yan’er continued. “Unless you tell us what the important thing is.” Jiang Ping picked up the three little girls and walked into the mansion. He put them down after they reached the hall. “Go and call auntie out first, then I’ll announce the important thing.” Li Sushang walked out from behind Jiang Ping. “There’s no need to call me. I’m coming.” Then Jiang Ping let everyone sit down. He stood in the middle of the hall. Jiang Ping coughed twice and said. “I’ve decided. We’re going to move.” “Move?” “Why do we have to move?” “Haven’t we only moved for less than a year?” “There are so many delicious food and fun things in Fusheng City. Liu’er doesn’t want to move.” “Wan’er doesn’t want to either!” “Yan’er too!” The three little girls were all talking at the same time. Jiang Ping couldn’t break into the conversation at all. He waited until the three little girls had finished their words, then cleared his throat. “Ahem, what if I say that the place we’re moving to is bigger than Fusheng City?” “There’s more delicious food compared to Fusheng City.” The three little girls were dubious. “Then how do you prove it?” Liu’er pointed at Jiang Ping and asked. Jiang Ping secretly laughed. “Have daddy ever lied to you?” The little girls looked at each other. They shook their heads in unison. “Then, do I still need to prove it?” The three little girls fell into deep thought. Then, Wan’er pulled her two sisters to the side and whispered something to them. After a moment, the three little girls returned to Jiang Ping. Wan’er held her chin. “We’ve decided. We’ll believe you this time.” “If there’s nothing good to eat or play with, Wan’er will ignore Daddy.” “Yan’er is the same.” “Yeah, Liu’er is the same.” Jiang Ping patted his chest. No problem. “Let me tell you another piece of good news.” “If we move this time, we can take the boat.” Liu’er jumped up in joy. “Really? I want to take the boat.” Wan’er said nonchalantly. “What’s so fun about taking a boat? A boat can’t swim as fast as me.” Jiang Ping said, “Really? I’m talking about the kind of boat that flies in the sky.” The three little girls widened their eyes. “Daddy, you’re not lying, right?” “How can there be a boat that flies in the sky?” “Yeah, Daddy’s bad. Daddy’s lying to children.” Jiang Ping pretended to say this. “Let’s wait and see!” Then, he directly turned to face Li Sushang. Just as he was about to open his mouth to discuss with Li Sushang, Li Sushang nodded and said. “No need to say it. I’ll listen to you.” The corners of Jiang Ping’s mouth curled up, and then he walked out of the hall. There were only three little girls left in the hall. Liu’er and Yan’er were thinking about the authenticity of Jiang Ping’s words. “Do you think there’s really a boat that can fly?” Liu’er asked her two sisters. Yan’er shook her little head. “I don’t know. The teacher in the school never mentioned it before.” In her eyes, the most knowledgeable person was the teacher in the school, so she thought that the teacher should know everything. Although she said that she didn’t know, in her heart, she had already planned to find a time to go to the school to ask the teacher. Yan’er saw that Wan’er did not say anything, so she pushed Wan’er’s arm. “Wan’er, what do you think?” Wan’er held her chin, and her eyes were moving around non-stop. When Liu’er saw that Wan’er was thinking so seriously, she must have thought of something, and she asked. “Sister Wan’er, what are you thinking? Do you know something about the flying boat in the sky that daddy mentioned?” Wan’er’s eyes stopped moving. “I’m thinking…” “I’m thinking about what it means to wait and see.” Yan’er covered her forehead and sighed. Liu’er also shook her head. Wan’er rolled her eyes at her two sisters when she saw them like this. “I call this learning. What kind of expressions are those?” Yan’er came in front of Wan’er and patted Wan’er’s shoulder. She sighed and shook her head. Then, she walked out of the hall. Liu’er also imitated Yan’er. She patted Wan’er’s shoulder, shook her head, and also walked out of the hall. Only Wan’er was left standing on the spot. There was also Li Sushang who was covering her mouth, trying to stifle her laughter at the entrance of the hall. “Feng Dan, are you okay?” In Feng Dan’s room, Zi Yue tightly held Feng Dan’s hand and asked. But Feng Dan did not reply. She just lowered her head and kept silent. Seeing her like this, Zi Yue did not continue asking. She sat beside her the entire time. Feng Dan’s entire body trembled. It was as if she had lost all her strength. After a long time, Feng Dan slowly raised her head. “Yue’er, I want to be alone for a while, is that alright?” Feng Dan looked at Zi Yue with her slightly red eyes and asked. Zi Yue said solemnly. “No, I don’t know what kind of stupid thing you will do, so I have to accompany you.” “Besides, it’s just moving away, not dying…” Zi Yue realized that her words didn’t sound right, so she stopped talking. Feng Dan pulled her hand back from Zi Yue’s hand. “I’m fine, I’m just a little sleepy.” Zi Yue wanted to reject Feng Dan’s request, but just as she was about to speak, Feng Dan spoke first. “Yue’er, can I?” Zi Yue looked at the woman in front of her who was about to cry, and her heart ached. “Alright, then I’ll wait for you at the door. If there’s anything, you can call me.” Feng Dan nodded. Zi Yue walked out of the room and closed the door. She didn’t go far and just stood by the door. After Jiang Ping left the hall, he first went to Qiu Chi’s room. But he didn’t push the door open and enter. Because using his spiritual energy, Jiang Ping sensed that Qiu Chi was still refining spirit stones in the room. Then he turned around and walked to the room where Lei Jingyun was. Similarly, he used his spiritual energy to sense first. After he sensed that Lei Jingyun wasn’t cultivating, he knocked on the door and entered. When Lei Jingyun heard the knock on the door, he stood up to welcome him. Jiang Ping looked at Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun understood what he meant. “You have lived up to everyone’s expectations. You’re already in the late stage of the origin core realm.” Jiang Ping nodded. “I passed by Qiu Chi’s room just now and perceived that his cultivation was almost coming to an end.” “Shall we go and wait for him together?” Lei Jingyun smiled and said of course. Then he reached out his hand to let Jiang Ping go first. After he closed the door, he quickly followed Jiang Ping. “Master, what about the ferry?” Jiang Ping said. “I have already gone to the Hundred Treasures House and told Director Fei Cai about it. She said that the ferry matter will take two or three days to arrange.” Lei Jingyun bowed down and said. “This kind of trivial matter should be done by me. Master, you have troubled yourself.” Jiang Ping smiled and waved his hand. “No worries.” “But Old Lei, I feel that you have a glib tongue recently.” Lei Jingyun replied with a smile. “This is because of the master’s gift. I’m feeling grateful in my heart.” “Without master’s high-grade spirit stone, it might take another ten years or so before I can advance.” “Originally, I thought that at most in this lifetime, I would only be at the late stage of the origin core realm.” “Master, now that I’m following you, I even dare to think about the earth immortal realm now.” Jiang Ping was amused by Lei Jingyun’s words. “Hahaha, Old Lei, you’re so old, yet you still dare to boast?” “You even dared to mention the earth immortal realm. Aren’t you afraid of embarrassing yourself?” Lei Jingyun didn’t reply as he walked beside Jiang Ping with a smiling face. “Also, in the future, you should stop flattering me and put more of your attention on a few young girls.” “Taking care of them is the best repayment for me.” Lei Jingyun said. “Of course. Don’t worry about this master.” Jiang Ping patted the old man’s shoulder as he walked. The two of them came to the door of Qiu Chi’s room. Lei Jingyun used his spiritual energy to sense once and then said to Jiang Ping. “Still cultivating.” Jiang Ping directly sat on the steps in front of Qiu Chi’s room and then patted the seat beside him. He motioned for Lei Jingyun to sit down as well. Lei Jingyun probably felt that sitting on the floor with the patriarch was somewhat against the rules, but after hesitating for a moment, he also sat down. “Old Lei, do you think our trip to Fengdu City is a blessing or a curse?” Lei Jingyun shook his head helplessly. “I don’t know. I don’t have the ability to predict the future through fortune-telling.” “However, with the master around, I firmly believe that there shouldn’t be any big trouble.” Jiang Ping imitated Wan’er and slapped Lei Jingyun’s head. “I told you to stop flattering me. I don’t like it.” “Oh right, the fortune-telling skill you mentioned just now, is there such a skill in this world?” After Lei Jingyun was slapped by Jiang Ping, his body moved away from Jiang Ping. “According to the records in the travel notes that I read, such an expert does exist in this world.” “But it’s rare.” Jiang Ping’s interest was piqued. “Is that so? If I have the chance to meet such a person, I’ll have to befriend him.” After saying that, he thought for a moment and changed his words. “Forget it. It’s impossible to hide secrets when befriending such a person. If I scold him behind his back and he finds out…” “Forget it, forget it.” Lei Jingyun chuckled. “It’s not that exaggerated. Usually, fortune-telling can only predict the general direction of the event.” Jiang Ping nodded. At this moment, Wan’er was right behind the two of them, and she was quietly approaching Lei Jingyun. Jiang Ping’s spiritual energy had already sensed this little rascal behind him. But he didn’t expose her. Instead, he patted Lei Jingyun on the shoulder. “Old Lei, then do you believe in fate?” Lei Jingyun was confused by Jiang Ping’s question. He turned around and was about to answer. Wan’er took the opportunity to stand behind Lei Jingyun and gave him a hard slap. He was shocked by the sudden attack. Lei Jingyun’s body trembled, and he jumped up. Then he covered his head and shouted. “Ouch!” Wan’er saw that she had succeeded and immediately held her stomach and laughed. Lei Jingyun looked at Jiang Ping with an aggrieved look. He found that Jiang Ping had turned his head to the side and whistled. He then understood that Jiang Ping had noticed Wan’er’s approach a long time ago, and he asked him that strange question to cover for Wan’er. Lei Jingyun said to Jiang Ping with a sad face. “Master, I believe in fate. Wan’er is a difficult hurdle to cross in my life.” Jiang Ping smiled and waved for Lei Jingyun to come back and sit down. Lei Jingyun looked at Wan’er, who was still standing in the same spot and feeling smug. He refused to go back and sit down no matter what. Jiang Ping clicked his tongue and said. “Old Lei, look at you. You’re so narrow-minded.” “Wan’er is just teasing you. If she really wanted to hit you, she could smash the stone table into pieces with a slap.” “If she used all her strength, wouldn’t you die?” Lei Jingyun felt a sense of grievance. “Even though it’s true, it really hurts!” Jiang Ping grinned and pulled the little girl behind him to sit beside him. Then, he said to Lei Jingyun. “How about this, I’ll ask Wan’er not to hit you in the future.” Lei Jingyun’s eyes were shining. “Really?” “Uh… I’ll try my best.” Jiang Ping didn’t dare to guarantee, so he said hesitantly to Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun looked at Jiang Ping with a side-eye. Jiang Ping patted the little girl beside him. “Wan’er, what do you think?” Wander said seriously. “I can hit lighter in the future.” Jiang Ping finally couldn’t hold back his laughter and laughed heartily. Lei Jingyun looked helpless. Qiu Chi pushed open the door and saw Jiang Ping and the other two making a racket outside his room. “What’s wrong?” “What happened?” Qiu Chi asked the people in front of the door. Jiang Ping immediately stopped laughing when he heard Qiu Chi’s voice. “Qiu Chi, you’re done. It’s nothing. We’re just fooling around.” Wan’er also nodded. “Yeah, we’re just fooling around.” Only Lei Jingyun looked at the father and daughter in front of him, unable to speak. Qiu Chi stretched lazily, his bones cracking. “I thought there was something wrong.” Wan’er walked forward and walked around Qiu Chi once. She asked in a somewhat strange manner. “Daddy, why does Uncle Qiu’s aura feel stronger? I also felt that Old Uncle Lei seemed to be different just now.” Lei Jingyun asked in surprise. “You can feel it?” Wan’er nodded. “Otherwise, why do you think I hit you so hard just now?” Lei Jingyun’s head was in a mess. If she wanted to test him, she could have just asked him directly. Why did she have to slap him? It was even a sneak attack. That was immoral. And there was no martial virtue. Jiang Ping asked Qiu Chi. “Did it go smoothly?” Qiu Chi patted his strong chest. “It went smoothly. I’m already at the initial stage of the origin core realm now.” Then, he looked at Lei Jingyun with a smile. “Old Lei, you have to be careful. I’ll surpass you very soon.” Lei Jingyun said unhappily. “You should surpass me quickly. In the future, you’ll receive Wan’er’s slap.” Wan’er shook her head seriously. “I’ve also slapped Uncle Qiu’s head before, but it doesn’t feel as good as Old Uncle Lei’s.” After Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi heard this, they burst into laughter. At this moment, Liu’er and Yan’er jogged over. Liu’er asked. “What’s wrong? What’s so funny?” Wan’er shook her head. “I don’t know. I just said that it feels good to slap Old Uncle Lei’s head.” Yan’er raised her hand at this moment. “I can prove that. I’ve smacked it too. It feels good.” Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi laughed until tears came out. Lei Jingyun was also about to cry, but he wasn’t laughing One night after that, an old man quietly hid in his room. He held a mirror to his head and patted it twice from time to time. The old man put down the mirror and muttered to himself. “It doesn’t even feel that good to slap it. Why is everyone saying that?” The old man picked up the mirror and put it down again. His movements were repetitive, and his face was gloomy. Feng Dan was still sitting in her room, in the position where she had talked to Zi Yue earlier. She didn’t move for a long time. It was the same for Zi Yue, who was outside the door. Her feet were sore from standing, and she would rather lean against the door frame than walk away to bring a chair. It was late at night, and Feng Dan finally stood up and opened the door. Zi Yue, who was leaning against the door, was already drowsy. When Feng Dan opened the door, Zi Yue almost fell to the ground. Zi Yue, who couldn’t open her eyes, was frightened. “Yue’er, why are you still here?” Seeing Feng Dan speak first, Zi Yue’s heart, which was already hanging in the air, finally calmed down. Zi Yue rubbed her eyes and said. “Are you hungry? I’ll get someone to make you something to eat.” Feng Dan shook her head. “I want to go to the mountain that we climbed that night to see the night view.” Zi Yue volunteered. “I’ll accompany you.” Feng Dan hesitated for a moment, then nodded and said. “Okay.” “Yue’er, tell me, why do I suddenly feel empty when I hear that Jiang Ping is leaving?” Feng Dan asked Zi Yue as soon as she climbed up the mountain. Zi Yue found a rock and sat down beside Feng Dan. “I remember something from a scripture.” “There are seven hardships in life: birth, old age, illness, death, resentment, love, and separation. These are the things that one will not be able to ask for it.” “You should feel a little sad about parting from someone you love.” Hearing this, Feng Dan lowered her head. She sighed secretly. Zi Yue spoke again. “But there’s another sentence after this. Do you want to hear it?” Feng Dan was not interested, but she still cooperated with Zi Yue. “What?” Zi Yue raised her head and looked at the moon. “Separation and reunion are a cycle. Sorrow and joy alternate each other.” Feng Dan did not feel any better after hearing Zi Yue’s comforting words. She squatted down and put her legs together. Her arms were wrapped around her legs, and her head was buried in her thighs. She muttered to herself. “I understand the logic, but I’m just not happy.” Zi Yue gave the woman beside her a back hug. She patted her back gently and said to her. “Sister Feng, do you know what I admire the most about you?” Feng Dan did not raise her head and replied to Zi Yue. “Hmm?” “When I was young, I was always bullied. Every day, I was bullied by my peers. At that time, my father had yet to establish the mayor’s mansion, and I was already used to this kind of life.” “Until one day, I was still stuck in an alley. A few boys surrounded me.” “When I was already using my hands to cover my eyes, an elder sister appeared out of nowhere and stood in front of me.” “She used a broom to help me chase away those who bullied me.” “I admire you the most for your courage. You always look fearless.” “From now on, I hope that you will continue to be fearless like when you were young.” “I don’t want to see you sad.” Zi Yue told the story of her childhood. But her lips were still moving after she finished speaking. She was still talking, but she didn’t make any sound. If Feng Dan had raised her head to look at Zi Yue at this moment. Based on the shape of her lips, it wasn’t hard to see what she was mouthing. “I started liking you at that time.” Feng Dan took a deep breath and slowly straightened her body. She didn’t look at Zi Yue, but she said with a firm expression. “Alright, I won’t make Yue’er worry!” After saying that, she directly pulled Zi Yue’s shoulder. She let her lean on her shoulder. Under the moon, there were two figures. One in purple clothes was leaning against the red one. The two of them looked at the night scene of Fusheng City and sat until the sky lit up. At dawn, Jiang Ping woke up the three little girls and sent them to school. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun followed behind him. Wan’er walked in front of Jiang Ping and turned her head to look at Jiang Ping, who was holding her two younger sisters. “How rare it is that a busy man like daddy would personally send us to school today.” “Daddy, I’ll walk in front. Otherwise, you won’t even know the way to the school.” Jiang Ping was very helpless. “You don’t learn the knowledge taught by the teacher in the school, but you learn quite quickly by teasing people.” Wan’er chuckled. “I feel that the knowledge taught by the teacher is useless.” Jiang Ping was about to lecture Wan’er, but Yan’er became unhappy first. “You can’t learn on your own, and you blame the teacher for his useless teachings.” Seeing this, Jiang Ping quickly agreed with his second daughter. “Yeah, yeah, I think so too.” Wan’er ignored their words. With her hands behind her back, she whistled and walked with her head raised. Looking at the little girl in front of him, Jiang Ping was angry and amused at the same time. “Today is your last day of school. If nothing unexpected happens, we will set off tomorrow.” Wan’er was overjoyed when she heard that. “Really?” Jiang Ping laughed. “Really. Do you dislike school that much?” Wan’er nodded at Jiang Ping very seriously. Jiang Ping sighed. They were all given birth by the same mother and raised by the same father. Why were the three little girls so different. Jiang Ping shook Yan’er, who was holding his right hand. “What about you, Yan’er? What do you say?” Yan’er thought carefully and replied. “Then I’ll say goodbye to the teacher when school is over later.” Jiang Ping smiled. “This is my good daughter.” “Where’s Liu’er?” Liu’er picked up a stone by the roadside as she walked, completely ignoring what her two sisters and father were talking about. “Ah? What’s wrong?”. Jiang Ping was speechless and quickly said nothing Then the little girl lowered her head and walked while looking for stones. After sending the three little girls to the school. Jiang Ping turned around and led Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi to the Hundred Treasures House. When they reached the Hundred Treasures House, Fei Cai was already waiting at the door. She welcomed Jiang Ping and the others. This morning, Fei Cai had already sent someone to the Jiang Mansion to inform Jiang Ping that everything had been settled. Therefore, Jiang Ping dropped off the three little girls on the way and came straight over. Jiang Ping first cupped his hands and thanked Fei Cai. “Sorry to trouble Director Fei Cai.” Fei Cai smiled and waved her hand. “It’s a business deal. So, this is what I should do.” Then, she led Jiang Ping and the other two into the living room. After Jiang Ping sat down, Fei Cai took out a few thin square sheets made of refined iron. “These are the tickets for the ferry.” “I bought two more because I was afraid Mr. Jiang would want to bring a friend along with you.” “If you don’t need them, I can just take them and return them.” “The fee is paid by our Hundred Treasures House.” Jiang Ping said with a smile. “No need, no need. This would trouble you, Director Fei Cai.” “I’ll keep it. I’ll pay the money as usual.” Fei Cai then told Jiang Ping about the history of this ferry, the boarding location, and the docking area. This ferry was actually a huge roc. It could accommodate nearly 10,000 people. On the back of the roc was a town of considerable size. When Jiang Ping boarded the ferry, he could use the ticket to move into a house corresponding to the ticket. Although it was called a ferry, it was actually no different from being on land. That town had everything, including food, drinks, and entertainment. The only thing that was different from being on land was that the scenery on the ferry would be very beautiful. Jiang Ping was curious about the ferry as he listened to Fei Cai’s description. Ever since he came to this world, even if he knew that there was such a thing, he had never tried it himself. If it wasn’t for wanting to find out about Liu’er’s constitution. Jiang Ping really wanted to stay in Fusheng City. After all, those brainless people who came to cause trouble in Fusheng City had already turned to dust. Therefore, it was a good choice to live in seclusion here. Fei Cai also said that this ferry would not dock in Fusheng City. Therefore, if one wanted to board the ferry, they would have to go to an island called Xianlai Island, which was 300 miles away from Fusheng City. They would board the ferry from there and pass by five stops. However, their final stop was not Fengdu City, where Jiang Ping’s group was heading to. It was the capital of the Dafeng Empire, about 500 miles away from Fengdu City. It would take about a month. Fei Cai explained it in detail. Jiang Ping listened attentively. After she finished speaking, Fei Cai took out a map and a book. “This is the route map of your trip.” “Remember that the notes in this book are what I told you just now, Mr. Jiang.” “I was afraid that I couldn’t explain it clearly, so I wrote it down.” “Not only that, but it also recorded the scenic spots that you will encounter along the way.” “If you don’t mind the trouble, you can get off the boat and visit these places.” “Because ferries usually dock for two or three days. They will only set off again after they restocked the supplies.” Jiang Ping nodded in satisfaction. Then, he took the map and the book. Jiang Ping directly handed the map to Qiu Chi. The book was given to Lei Jingyun, who liked to read travel notes. Then, he took out a bag from his storage space and placed it on the table. The sound of rocks colliding could be heard from inside the bag. “Director Fei Cai, thanks to your meticulous arrangements. This bag includes the cost of the tickets. “Thank you again, Director Fei Cai.” After Fei Cai sent the three of them out of the Hundred Treasures House. She went back to the living room and opened the bag that Jiang Ping had given her. When she opened it, Fei Cai was surprised at first, but then she smiled. She had known from the beginning that it was the right choice to be on good terms with Jiang Ping. It was comfortable to deal with such a person. It would not be a loss to do business with such a person. Fei Cai put down the bag full of spirit stones. She beckoned for the gatekeeper. “Remember to send those carriages to the Jiang Mansion before dawn tomorrow.” “Don’t waste any time.” The butler, Old Zhao, hurriedly nodded and bowed. Then, he was about to leave. Fei Cai suddenly called out to him. “Old Zhao, it’s been a long time since you went home.” “When this matter is over, go to the accountant, and get some more money, and I’ll give you a few days off.” Old Zhao was overjoyed and quickly thanked Fei Cai. Then, he immediately left the living room and went down to make arrangements for Fei Cai’s orders. In the classroom, Yan’er was still listening attentively to the lesson while Liu’er was still seriously putting on an act in class. Wan’er was still holding her little face with all her strength. She could barely lift her eyelids. The little girl felt that the more engrossed the teacher was giving his lecture. The heavier her little head became. Her also eyelids became heavier. Her head was almost on the table, and the little girl suddenly sat up straight and shook her head. No, this can’t go on. She had to listen to the lesson well. But not long after she made up her mind, Wan’er began to feel drowsy again. The teacher had noticed this little girl a long time ago. At first, he often reminded her. Later, when he realized that it was useless, he was too lazy to say anything. Just as the teacher was engrossed in his lecture, Wan’er suddenly stood up and raised her hand. The teacher stopped reading the article. “Jiang Wan’er, do you have any questions?” Wan’er scratched her head in embarrassment. “Sir, I don’t have any questions.” “I’m just a little urgent.” Wan’er’s words caused the classmates in the classroom to burst into laughter. Yan’er looked at her elder sister with some disdain. Liu’er did not care about it. She held a pen in her hand and wrote in the notebook. The teacher said helplessly. “Go quickly, don’t delay everyone’s study progress.” Wan’er ran out of the classroom in a flash. After leaving the classroom, Wan’er didn’t go to the toilet. She wandered around the school alone. The little girl walked unsteadily with her hands behind her back. When she told the teacher that she was in a hurry, it was so that she could come out and take a breather. She was born unable to sit still, so she was feeling very depressed in the classroom. Actually, this wasn’t Wan’er’s first time finding an excuse to leave the classroom. The teacher also knew what Wan’er did when she left class, and he was too lazy to expose her. As long as it didn’t affect other students’ having their lessons, he would turn a blind eye. The school was very big, and basically, all the wealthy families in the city paid for the repairs. There was a small pond and a bamboo forest on the other side of the mountain behind the school. Every time the little girl left class, she would wander around this area. When school was about to end, she would rush back to the classroom and follow her two younger sisters home. At this time, as usual, Wan’er staggered towards the pond at the back of the mountain. When she walked to the side of the pond, the little girl sat by the water. It was autumn now, so it was not very cold. The little girl took off her shoes and soaked her feet in the pond. Just as Wan’er put her feet in, a large group of young fish swam over and pecked at the little girl’s feet. Wan’er enjoyed the feeling of numbness. After putting her feet in, she leaned back against a rock that was even bigger than her own body. Wan’er had just closed her eyes and started to enjoy it when she heard someone muttering. “Master said that every blade of grass and every tree has their reason.” “Then I’ll try to see if I can ‘block’ this reason.” Wan’er felt a little strange when she heard that. Why would someone else come to such a godforsaken place during class time? Moreover, they were even saying something strange. The little girl put on her shoes, climbed up the rock that was even bigger than her, and stuck her head out to look. She saw that in the bamboo forest at the back of the mountain. A young Taoist priest was wearing a navy blue Taoist robe and a silk scarf on his head. The young Taoist priest looked about the same age as Wan’er. At this moment, the young Taoist priest was squatting beside the bamboo forest, staring at a large bamboo. He stared at it intently. Wan’er thought to herself, was there something wrong with this person. “Hey, who are you? Why haven’t I seen you before in our school?” “You’re also wearing strange clothes and a hat. Are you here to steal something?” The young Taoist priest did not turn his head after hearing Wan’er’s voice. He still stared at the bamboo in front of him and said. “My name is He Xiangjiang.” After answering Wan’er’s question asking who he was, the young Taoist priest did not say anything else. Wan’er saw that this person was so arrogant. Forget about finishing answering the whole question. When he answered the question, he did not even turn his head. He did not have any manners at all. Wan’er leaped to He Xiangjiang’s side. Then, she pressed the young Taoist priest down. “Aiyo!” “Heroine, please let me go.” “We don’t have any feuds, right? There’s no need for us to fight right away.” The young Taoist priest wailed. Wan’er increased the strength in her hands. “Now we have a feud.” “Looking at you acting so sneakily, you’re definitely not a good person. I will hold you down and bring you to the teacher for interrogation.” The young Taoist priest’s face was pressed against the soil as he panted heavily. “I’m really not a bad person. My master is an old acquaintance of the headmaster of your academy.” “We just happened to pass by to pay a visit.” Wan’er carefully considered the words of the strange young Taoist priest in front of her. Then, she slowly released him. “I still don’t believe you. Your behavior earlier was too strange.” “Unless you can explain to me what you’re doing.” He Xiangjiang stood up and rubbed his shoulder that had been pressed red by the little girl just now. He patted the soil on his body again. He Xiangjiang’s Taoist robe was tailored using his master’s old Taoist robe. He usually cared a lot about it. The young Taoist priest, who was already poor, couldn’t get the dirt off his body no matter how hard he patted it. His eyes reddened, and tears were about to fall. Seeing the little boy’s mincing actions, Wan’er went up to him and slapped him on the head. “You are not allowed to cry. If you cry, I’ll beat you up.” He Xiangjiang, who hadn’t cried yet, saw that the little girl in front of him was so rude and unreasonable. He was so scared that the snot and tears that were about to flow out of his nose were all retracted. Seeing that he wasn’t going to cry, Wan’er nodded. “Tell me, what were you doing just now?” He Xiangjiang pointed at the bamboo that he had been staring at just now. “I was demonstrating the knowledge that my master told me.” Wan’er’s two little eyebrows furrowed together. It was obvious that she did not believe him. “What knowledge that it needs to be demonstrated here like a thief?” He Xiangjiang lowered his head and said. “My master told me about studying the underlying principle to acquire knowledge. I wanted to see if this was true.” “Also, I’m not a thief…” When the young Taoist priest said the last sentence, his voice was very soft, as if he did not dare to say it out loud. Wan’er went forward and slapped He Xiangjiang’s head again. “Don’t use these profound concepts with me. Explain to me what is studying the underlying principle to acquire knowledge.” “Also, if I say you are a thief, you are a thief.” After He Xiangjiang was slapped again for no reason, he covered his head with both hands and was about to cry again. Seeing this, Wan’er hurriedly raised her hand to scare him. The young Taoist priest saw Wan’er’s action and quickly sniffed his nose and wiped his face. “Studying the underlying principle to acquire knowledge is the pursuit of the principles of things to learn knowledge.” “My master also said that every blade of grass and every tree has its reason, so I just squatted there and stared at the bamboo.” Wan’er pinched her chin and scrutinized He Xiangjiang The young Taoist priest felt uncomfortable by Wan’er’s stare and didn’t know where to put his hands. He could only grab the corner of his clothes and held his head very low. Wan’er did not understand the mess of what He Xiangjiang said about the pursuit of the principles of things to learn knowledge. Moreover, Wan’er felt sleepy when she heard about knowledge-related things. However, his strange behavior really piqued the little girl’s interest. Wan’er asked, “Then what did you get by staring at the bamboo?” He Xiangjiang shook his head and said in a voice that was even softer than a fly’s. “I haven’t learned anything yet, and I was held down by you.” Although his voice was very soft, Wan’er could hear it clearly. “What did you say?” As she said that, she raised her hand as if she was going to hit him. He Xiangjiang was so scared that he kept stepping back. “I said it wrong! I said it wrong!” “I was too stupid. I didn’t comprehend it!” Wan’er then put her hand down. “That’s more like it.” “How long have you been squatting here?” He Xiangjiang turned his face sideways, not daring to look at the little girl in front of him. “From morning till now.” The little girl was a little surprised. “What!” At this moment, Wan’er was thinking in her heart. How could there be such a boring person who could squat here and stare at a broken bamboo for such a long time? If it were her, the bamboo would probably have been cut down and made into a bench before 15 minutes had passed. “You’ve been squatting here for almost a day?” He Xiangjiang nodded. Wan’er gave the young Taoist priest in front of her a thumbs up. The young Taoist priest tugged at the corner of his clothes and looked at his clothes that were covered in mud. He looked hesitant. But he did not say anything. Wan’er saw that he seemed to have something to say, so she asked with her hands on her waist. “If you have something to say, say it. Don’t always act like a little girl.” He Xiangjiang pointed at the stain on his clothes. He stammered. “My clothes are dirty… can I go back and wash my clothes first…” Wan’er was a little helpless. She thought that the young Taoist priest would say something else. “If It’s dirty, just wash it. There’s a pond over there.” “I’ll bring you there.” After saying that, Wan’er walked in front and led the way, letting He Xiangjiang follow. The young Taoist priest was a little hesitant and stood in place. In the end, it was because of Wan’er’s words, “If you don’t come over, I’ll go to you and beat you up.” Only then did he slowly move his feet to follow. “Here, there’s water. You can wash your clothes here.” Wan’er pointed at the small pond and said to He Xiangjiang. He Xiangjiang walked to the side of the pond and didn’t make a move for a long time. “Heroine, can I don’t wash? How can I take off my clothes and wash them while you’re here?” Wan’er raised her eyebrows and pointed. “Then you’re not giving me respect.” He Xiangjiang hurriedly waved his hand. “No, no, no. Heroine, don’t be angry. I’ll wash them.” Wan’er nodded. “Just take off your clothes. I’ll hide behind that rock.” “Don’t worry. I won’t peek.” Wan’er walked behind the big rock. He Xiangjiang heaved a sigh of relief. But he didn’t take off his clothes. He just dipped his hand in the water and wiped it on his clothes. He said that just now because he wanted to send this fierce-looking little girl away and then find an opportunity to slip away. Although Wan’er said that she wouldn’t look, her little head still stuck out from the rock. When she looked over, she saw that the young Taoist priest was going to tiptoe and escape after wiping the stains on his body, This young Taoist priest actually wanted to take the opportunity to get rid of her and then sneak away! Wan’er couldn’t bear it anymore. She immediately ran up and gave the young Taoist priest another slap on the head. He Xiangjiang squatted by the pool and covered his head with his hands as he sobbed. The little girl looked at He Xiangjiang with her hands on her hips. “Let’s see if you still dare to run away.” He Xiangjiang was so scared that he burst into tears. “I don’t dare anymore. I don’t dare anymore.” Wan’er saw that the young Taoist priest was crying again. She used the same trick again and threatened him. “If you continue to cry, I’ll beat you up.” But this time, He Xiangjiang was unmoved. Tears still flowed down his face, and he was crying so hard. When Wan’er saw that the threatening was no longer effective, she became a little anxious. When did she ever see such a scene before? In the past, she would be the one crying, and her father would coax her. Oh right, coaxing. The little girl recalled how Jiang Ping had coaxed her when she was crying previously. She squatted down beside He Xiangjiang. She imitated how Jiang Ping had coaxed her, and reached out her hand to touch the young Taoist priest’s head. But the moment she touched his head, the young Taoist priest suddenly shrank back, afraid that Wan’er would give him another slap. Wan’er had no choice but to withdraw her hand and comfort him. “Can you stop crying? I won’t hit you anymore.” The young Taoist priest didn’t speak and continued to cry. Wan’er sighed helplessly. It wasn’t good to let He Xiangjiang squat over here and cry alone. She could only take out an exquisite stone from her purse. It was still shining with a blue light. This was the low-grade spirit stone that Jiang Ping had given to the three of them in the Hundred Treasures House. Wan’er took it out and handed it to He Xiangjiang. “Here, this is for you. Don’t cry anymore.” The young Taoist priest slowly raised his head. His snot was already bubbling. He looked at the spirit stone in Wan’er’s hand and choked. “What is this?” Wan’er asked. “My daddy gave this to me. I’ll give it to you. Don’t cry anymore.” He Xiangjiang stopped his tears and said. “My master said that I can’t take other people’s things.” Wan’er raised the spirit stone in her hand. “My daddy has plenty of things like this.” After saying that, she stuffed the spirit stone into He Xiangjiang’s hand, not caring whether he took it or not. The little girl stuffed the spirit stone into He Xiangjiang’s hands, then turned around and left, leaving behind a dashing back view. She spoke as she walked. “Don’t cry anymore. I only have one stone with me.” Looking at the little girl’s departing back, He Xiangjiang was a little lost in thought. How could someone come up to press him down the first time they met. The little girl’s domineering attitude caused the young Taoist priest to not dare to raise his head to look at her just now. He didn’t remember her appearance clearly, but he was beaten up for nothing and also received one candy. He Xiangjiang stood up, wiped his snot, and looked at the spirit stone in his hand. He stood by the pond and giggled. Wan’er was on her way back to the school. She kept thinking about the young Taoist priest who was acting strangely just now. Although that young Taoist priest was silly, his skin was also very dark. But he still looked pretty good. There was also that old and faded Taoist robe on his body. The little girl made up her mind that the next time she saw him, she would ask her father to buy a better piece of cloth for the young Taoist priest. That way, the next time she kicks him, even if she dirtied his clothes, he wouldn’t cry anymore. The little girl nodded as she walked as if she felt that her idea was particularly mature. When she returned to the classroom, it was already after school. Wan’er stood at the classroom door, waiting for her two younger sisters to come out and walk home together. After Yan’er and Liu’er came out, they saw Wan’er standing at the door. “Wan’er, you ran off to skip class again, right?” Yan’er asked Wan’er. Wan’er chuckled and scratched her face. “Same old rules. You’re not allowed to tell daddy.” Yan’er shook her head helplessly. “I really can’t do anything to you.” Then, she held Liu’er’s hand and shook it. “Liu’er, you better not learn from her.” Liu’er widened her eyes and nodded very seriously. “Yes, yes. Liu’er won’t learn from Sister Wan’er.” Wan’er walked over to the other side and pulled Liu’er’s other hand. “Hehe, let’s go home!” The two of them were dragged by Wan’er and trotted home. The young Taoist priest returned to the small bamboo house arranged by the academy. After pushing the door open, an old Taoist priest who looked like he was in his sixties could be seen. The old Taoist priest was lying on a bamboo recliner. He Xiangjiang asked the old Taoist priest as soon as he entered the house. “Master, did you manage to borrow money today?” The old Taoist priest sat on the recliner with his eyes closed and shook his head. He Xiangjiang said helplessly. “Master, why do you always look like nothing has happened?” “If we can’t borrow money, how can we get the money to go back to the Taoist temple?” He Xiangjiang started to waver. He didn’t know whether it was reliable for him to formally acknowledge the old Taoist priest in front of him as his master half a month ago. If it wasn’t for his mother’s illness and the old Taoist priest promised to leave some money for his family. He would not want to leave his mother and father and go to the Taoist temple that the old Taoist priest called the number one temple in the world. In any case, he had acknowledged the old Taoist priest as his master in such a muddle-headed manner. When the old Taoist priest brought him out of his hometown, he lowered his head and told him a sentence seriously. “Xiangjiang, Master’s money has been left to your family. I do not have any more money.” At first, He Xiangjiang thought that this old Taoist priest was trying to test him. But after walking for a while, he realized something This old man was serious. Without money, there would be no travel expenses. Originally, the journey from that small town to Fusheng City was only about ten days. But the master and disciple had to walk for half a month. On the way, no matter how hungry or tired he was, the old Taoist priest always looked indifferent and calm. He didn’t feel anxious at all. When they arrived at Fusheng City, the old Taoist priest said that he had an old friend there. He said that he could come over and visit to see if he could borrow some money for the traveling expenses. Now that he didn’t manage to borrow the money, the old Taoist priest still acted as if nothing had happened, but He Xiangjiang couldn’t sit still. He Xiangjiang said angrily. “Master!” The old Taoist priest slowly opened his eyes and looked at the dark-skinned young Taoist priest. “Xiangjiang, when you become more mature, you will know that I am not acting as if nothing had happened. This is called strategizing.” He Xiangjiang obviously didn’t believe it. He gave the old man with white hair and beard a side-eye. The old Taoist priest said to He Xiangjiang. “Hey! Don’t doubt it. Think about it carefully. We were almost starving all the way here, but didn’t we manage to survive in the end?” He Xiangjiang replied. “That’s because we were lucky. We kept encountering kind-hearted people to help us.” The old Taoist priest sat up and stared at He Xiangjiang. “Then how do you know that there are no kind-hearted people this time?” “Where did you go today? Tell Master who you met.” He Xiangjiang was helpless. He moved a small bamboo chair to the side and sat down. Then he said to the old Taoist priest. “There’s no point thinking about it. No kind-hearted person gave me a penny today.” “Not even a single penny.” The young Taoist priest raised a finger and waved it in front of the old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest chuckled. “I’m just asking if you met anyone. I’m not asking you about those.” He Xiangjiang took back the finger and thought for a moment. “I met a girl about my age.” “But she wasn’t a kind person. She beat me up right away.” He Xiangjiang sighed as he spoke. The old Taoist priest laughed. “What? Which boy could be bullied by a little girl?” “Then you didn’t fight back?” He Xiangjiang shook his head. “I didn’t dare. That person was fierce and strong.” “I’m even afraid to look her in the eye.” When he said these words, He Xiangjiang was obviously a little resentful. He gritted his teeth and said this. After saying this, he looked at the beam of the bamboo house and quietly laughed again. “But I took the opportunity when she wasn’t paying attention to sneak a glance at her.” “I don’t remember her appearance clearly, but I remember that she was very beautiful.” The old Taoist priest touched his grizzled beard and teased the young Taoist priest. “Do you like her?” He Xiangjiang turned around and said angrily. “Master!” The old Taoist priest quickly laughed and waved his hand. “It was just a joke. Don’t take it so seriously.” “What happened after that?” The old Taoist priest continued to ask. He Xiangjiang continued to speak. “Later, I wanted to sneak away, but I was found out and was beaten up by her again.” “But fortunately, I was smart and tricked her.” “I cried loudly, and she stopped hitting me. She even gave me a stone as compensation.” When he talked about the part where he cried, the young Taoist priest was obviously proud of himself. The old Taoist priest was looking at his disciple, who was feeling so happy even after he was beaten up. He didn’t know whether he should be happy or regretful. “Come on, come on. Just admit that you cried because you were beaten up. I won’t laugh at you.” The young Taoist priest rolled his eyes at his master, then took out the spirit stone that Wan’er had given him. The old Taoist priest took the spirit stone. He smiled. “See, I told you before that this is called strategizing.” He Xiangjiang saw his master’s expression and asked curiously. “Is this stone very valuable?” The old Taoist priest nodded. “It’s enough to cover our expenses on the way from Fusheng City to the boarding point of the ferry.” He Xiangjiang didn’t know how precious this spirit stone was. Half a month ago, he was just an ordinary person who hadn’t even gone out of his hometown. And he used secular money… Hearing that his master had said that this stone was so valuable, He Xiangjiang wanted to take it back and return it to the little girl. He stretched out his hand and wanted to take it back. However, the old Taoist priest waved his hand and slapped his hand away. “Do you think you could find her even if you go back now?” “Besides, we need it now. Wait until you earn money yourself and come back to Fusheng City to find her.” “At that time, you can just return it to her. At most, you can give her some interest and thank her properly.” He Xiangjiang withdrew his hand when he heard his master’s words. But he still said with some hesitation. “But Master, I don’t even know her name. Will I be able to find her when the time comes?” The old Taoist priest put the stone into his bosom and then circled around his back. “Disciple, do you believe in me?” He Xiangjiang asked. “Of course I do, but not completely.” “For example, you said last time that you could kill a cow with one punch, but we met a wild boar on the mountain road that day. “At that time, you ran faster than anyone else. So, I don’t believe it.” The old Taoist priest rolled his eyes at He Xiangjiang and explained. “That was an accident. Although I can kill a Cow with one punch, it doesn’t stop me from being afraid of wild boars.” “Think about it. The wild boar’s tusks are so long, and they are very fierce. Aren’t you afraid of them?” He Xiangjiang was already helpless against this master who was like a child. He simply did not argue with him. He turned his body, which was sitting on the bamboo chair, and faced him sideways. The old Taoist priest snorted. “What if I say that you will meet her again soon?” He Xiangjiang turned his head and gave the old Taoist priest a side-eye. “You don’t believe me? Then you wait and see.” Then He Xiangjiang stood up and no longer paid attention to his master. He walked out of the bamboo house and went to look for something to do. Seeing this, the old Taoist priest muttered. “I can’t even fool a little kid now that I’m old.” Then he continued to lie down on the recliner and closed his eyes. He hummed an unknown tune. Jiang Ping and the other two arrived home from the Hundred Treasures House. Once they got home, Jiang Ping spoke to Lei Jingyun, Qiu Chi, and Li Sushang. He ordered each of them to pack up their things. They would set off for Xianlai Island the next morning Then, he went to Chen Zhong’s room. He knocked on the door. Chen Zhong quickly walked over to open the door. “Master, this is?” “If there’s anything, just call me directly. You even came here specially.” Jiang Ping smiled and let Chen Zhong sit in his room. Then, he told Chen Zhong about his trip. After Chen Zhong heard it, he quickly stood up and wanted to pack his luggage. Jiang Ping held Chen Zhong’s shoulder and made him sit back on the stool. “Uncle Zhong, you’ve stayed in our house for more than half of your life.” “I came here to tell you that it’s not convenient for you to follow me because of the long journey.” “If you want to stay in the Jiang Mansion, then stay.” “If you don’t want to, I’ll leave you enough money anyway. You can also go and take a look around the world.” Chen Zhong’s eyes were gloomy. “I’ve been in the Jiang family for most of my life. Do you want to abandon me all of a sudden, Master?” Jiang Ping smiled and shook his head. “Of course not. It’s just that this time, it might be even more dangerous than in Fusheng City.” “I’m afraid I can’t take care of so many people by myself.” “So I thought it would be best if you were willing to stay in Fusheng City. I can also ask someone to take care of you.” “So that you’ll be taken care of since you’re old.” Chen Zhong sat and listened to Jiang Ping’s words. He didn’t say anything for a long time. Seeing this, Jiang Ping was not in a hurry. He just sat with the old man. It was just like when Chen Zhong came to the Jiang family when he was middle-aged and stayed with him the whole time. In the end, Chen Zhong looked at Jiang Ping and said. “I’ve thought about it.” “Indeed, if I follow you, I might really drag you down.” “Then I’ll just stay here.” “Otherwise, when you and the ladies come back one day, there won’t even be anyone to open the door for you.” Jiang Ping nodded, then left a sum of money and some spirit stones for Chen Zhong. “Actually, you don’t have to guard this house for us.” Chen Zhong was afraid that he would make things difficult for Jiang Ping, so he smiled and waved his hand. “It’s okay. I’ve been in the Jiang family for most of my life, been calling you from Young Master to Master.” “I have no children. I don’t remember my surname anymore.” “I only remember that I’m a member of the Jiang family. What’s wrong with me staying in my own home?” “Don’t tell me you’re going to chase me away?” After Jiang Ping heard this, he finally laughed. Wan’er held her two younger sisters and skipped back home. When they saw that everyone in the mansion was busy packing their luggage. The three of them ran towards Jiang Ping’s room. Before they reached Jiang Ping’s room, they bumped into Jiang Ping who had just returned from Chen Zhong’s place. Wan’er jogged towards Jiang Ping. “Daddy, I see that the people at home are busy.” “Are we setting off tomorrow?” The little girl’s eyes were filled with excitement and reluctance. Jiang Ping nodded. “Yeah, we’ll set off early tomorrow morning. You guys are not allowed to sleep in.” As he spoke, he pointed at a few little girls. Yan’er asked. “Then, will the whole family go with us?” “I saw that everyone was busy packing their luggage.” Jiang Ping shook his head and looked back at Chen Zhong’s room. “No, it’s just us this time. There’s also Auntie, Uncle Qiu, and Old Uncle Lei who will be going with us.” Liu’er was a little disappointed. “Then are we going to come back?” Jiang Ping smiled. “I don’t know, but when Liu’er grows up and wants to come back, you can come back on your own.” Then, he patted the little girl’s head. Then, Jiang Ping called out to a maid who was packing the three little girls’ luggage. “Gui Hua, tell everyone that I will personally cook today. Everyone, let’s have a meal together.” The woman named Gui Hua cupped her fists and replied okay before leaving to inform everyone. Actually, there were not many servants in the Jiang Mansion. There were only eight servants in total. Because Jiang Ping’s family was usually more disciplined, these servants basically had nothing to do. Moreover, their wages were not low, so everyone was very grateful to Jiang Ping, the patriarch. When they heard that Jiang Ping was going on a long trip, everyone was a little disappointed, but there was nothing they could do. Everyone was reluctant. When Wan’er heard that Jiang Ping was going to cook tonight, she began to order dishes. She kept repeating in Jiang Ping’s ear. Braised pork, beggar’s chicken, mapo tofu, stir-fried pork… Jiang Ping stretched out his finger and flicked the little girl’s forehead. “Alright, alright, alright. I’ll satisfy you. I’ll cook all of these for you.” Wan’er jumped up excitedly. When the other two little girls heard this, they were in for a treat. They also drooled one after another. During dinner, Jiang Ping cooked a total of twenty to thirty dishes. Everyone from the residence sat in the hall. The dining table was not big enough. Two more tables had been moved and put together. Jiang Ping sat at the main seat and raised his cup. “Thank you for your meticulous care during this period of time. I would like to propose a toast to all of you.” After saying that, he downed the wine in one gulp. The people from the residence chimed in one after another, saying that they did not do anything and that it was not tiring at all. Only Chen Zhong did not say a word. He raised his glass and downed the wine in one gulp. The banquet didn’t last long. After all, they still had to travel the next day. After three rounds of drinking, Jiang Ping had everyone start eating. After eating, everyone washed up and waited for the next day’s departure. At the back of the mountain of the academy, there was a small bamboo house. The master and disciple in the bamboo house had just finished their simple dinner. Then, they returned to their respective rooms. After returning to their rooms, He Xiangjiang did not sleep. Instead, he held a pen and wrote in a notebook. In this notebook, all the favors that he and his master had received along the way were recorded. After He Xiangjiang wrote and drew, he put down the pen. He turned to the first page of the notebook. Then, he began to read in a low voice. Aunt Wang, Longjing Village, September 12 of Gengchen Year. Because they felt sorry for us, they gave us two steamed buns… Uncle Li Hui, Weishan Village, September 20 of Gengchen Year. He opened a blacksmith shop, and he was willing to let me help him. Then, he paid me the corresponding wages… Aunt Su, Zitan Village, September 24 of Gengchen Year. She promised to let me look after the cattle, and then she gave us a meal.. an According to He Xiangjiang, these people were all benefactors to him. He’ll have to pay back twice as much in the future. Almost every time the young Taoist priest added a new stroke to the book, he would read it again from the beginning. Tonight was the same. He kept reading until the last line. Unknown Fusheng City people, a little girl in red, and she looked beautiful. October 3 of Gengchen Year. Because she beat me up, she gave me a valuable stone that glows… After reading the last line, He Xiangjiang did not close the book. The book stopped at the page where he had last written on. The young Taoist priest’s eyes were fixed on the words “little girl in red”. Just as He Xiangjiang was still in a daze, the old Taoist priest pushed the door open and entered. He Xiangjiang was shocked. “Master, can you knock on the door in the future?” The old Taoist priest looked at his disciple and said in a bad mood. “Look at your guts. There are only two of us in the whole back mountain. Are you afraid of thieves?” He Xiangjiang ignored the old Taoist priest and closed the book. He wrapped it carefully with a piece of oil paper. Seeing He Xiangjiang being so careful, the old Taoist priest teased him. “Yo, you have grown up. Did you write a love letter?” “Come, come, let me have a look.” He Xiangjiang glared at the old Taoist priest and said in a resentful tone. “Master! Stop fooling around.” The old Taoist priest chuckled. “Alright, alright. I just came to tell you to sleep early.” “We’ll set off for Xianlai Island early tomorrow morning, or else we won’t be able to make it.” The master and disciple had just arrived at Fusheng City today. Seeing the old Taoist priest in such a hurry, He Xiangjiang asked curiously. “That urgent? How long before the ferry leaves?” The old Taoist priest smiled meaningfully. “I didn’t say we are going to catch the ferry. You should hurry up and sleep. I’ll call you tomorrow morning.” With that, the old Taoist priest left, not giving He Xiangjiang the chance to ask any more questions. Anyway, it was not the first time that his master had said such strange words. He Xiangjiang did not think too much about it and lay down to sleep. The next morning. Jiang Ping washed up as soon as dawn broke. Then, he went to lift the three little girls out of bed. The three little girls reluctantly dragged their bodies to wash up. After washing up and eating breakfast, Jiang Ping led a group of people out of the door. There was a horse carriage at the door. Old Zhao, the butler of the Hundred Treasures House, led the horse and waited for Jiang Ping to come out. After he handed the horse’s reins to Qiu Chi, Old Zhao bowed respectfully to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping also bowed in return. “Mr. Jiang, this is the best horse in the entire Fusheng City.” “Its leg strength is enough to run 30 to 40 miles. Then, you can stop to feed some grains and let it rest for a moment.” “Yesterday, the map that our director gave you indicated the place where you can rest for the night when you reach Xianlai Island.” Jiang Ping laughed. “Thanks.” After exchanging a few pleasantries, Jiang Ping carried the three little girls into the carriage one by one. Then, he boarded the carriage himself. After notifying Qiu Chi, the carriage headed out of the city. At the city gate, Zi Yue and Feng Dan were waiting for them. They heard that Jiang Ping and the others were leaving today. Feng Dan was afraid that the person would not even greet them. In order to hurry, they set off before dawn. So she had been waiting for a long time. Zi Yue had been standing there with her for a long time. Feng Dan’s eyes were a little unfocused. From time to time, she would tiptoe and look into the city. “Yue’er, do you think he won’t leave through this door?” Zi Yue held onto Feng Dan’s hand and said. “Don’t worry. If he doesn’t leave through this city door, they will have to take a long detour, so they will definitely appear.” Feng Dan was slightly relieved after hearing this, and she replied softly. A moment later, Feng Dan said to Zi Yue. “Yue’er, I’ve decided. When I see him later, I’ll tell him how I feel.” “What do you think?” When Zi Yue heard this, she was stunned for a moment and did not reply. Feng Dan saw that Zi Yue did not reply for a long time, so she patted her shoulder. “Yue’er?” “Ah…” “I’m asking you. What do you think?” Zi Yue turned her head away so that Feng Dan couldn’t see her expression. “Sure, you decide. You don’t have to ask me.” Feng Dan replied unhappily. Soon, the sound of horse hooves could be heard. Jiang Ping’s carriage appeared in their sight. When the carriage arrived in front of Feng Dan and Zi Yue, Qiu Chi pulled the reins and stopped the carriage. In the carriage, Jiang Ping poked his head out and asked. “Old Qiu, what’s wrong?” Qiu Chi raised his head in the direction of the two women. Jiang Ping looked in his direction. Then, he jumped off the carriage and said to Qiu Chi. “You can drive the carriage first. I’ll catch up with you later.” Liu’er’s little head poked out of the window. “Daddy, where are you going?” Jiang Ping said. “Be good, Daddy will catch up with you later.” The little girl replied with an “oh” and withdrew her head. Then, Qiu Chi continued to drive the carriage forward. Jiang Ping walked in front of Feng Dan and Zi Yue. He cupped his hands and bowed. “Thank you, ladies, for coming to the city gate to see us off.” Zi Yue also cupped her hands and said. “Mr. Jiang, you have given us spirit stones. This is the least we could do.” Feng Dan nodded as well. Jiang Ping smiled and was about to bid farewell to the two women. However, Feng Dan interrupted Jiang Ping, who was about to speak. “Mr. Jiang, I want to talk to you about something.” As soon as Feng Dan said this, Zi Yue sensibly lifted her feet and left the two of them. Only when she reached a place where she couldn’t hear their conversation, then did Zi Yue stop. Then, she turned her back and didn’t look at them. Seeing Zi Yue avoid them, Jiang Ping was a bit puzzled and asked. “May I know what Miss Feng wants to say to me?” Feng Dan’s face turned red before she could speak. Zi Yue turned her back to the two of them and bit her lower lip with her teeth. No one knew what she was thinking at this moment. Seeing that Feng Dan didn’t speak for a long time, Jiang Ping reminded her. “Miss Feng?” Only then did Feng Dan stammer out that sentence. “I don’t know if Mr. Jiang can see it, but do you know who am I thinking of?” After listening to Feng Dan’s words, even Jiang Ping, who was not familiar with the relationship between a man and a woman, would not be so stupid as to not understand the meaning behind her words. Jiang Ping was very surprised. After all, he was a father of three children. Could it be that he had great charm? He pretended not to understand and said. “Miss Feng, don’t joke around. How would I know who Miss Feng’s sweetheart is?” But Feng Dan didn’t give him the chance to play dumb. She slowly said one word to Jiang Ping. “You.” Jiang Ping was a little embarrassed at this moment. He knew why Zi Yue wanted to avoid them. But when he first met the two women, he had always thought that their relationship was not ordinary. Jiang Ping slowly came over and said to Feng Dan. “This is the first time a woman has expressed her feelings to me.” “But I have to reject you and tell you something.” “I might not be able to express accurately. Let me say it first, and you can listen to it first.” Feng Dan, who had already thought of the outcome, was still very disappointed when she heard what Jiang Ping said. However, she still nodded and was willing to listen to what Jiang Ping had to say. Jiang Ping and Feng Dan spent around the time it takes for an incense stick to burn to talk. Then, Feng Dan felt depressed as she watched the man in front of her leave. Jiang Ping directly caught up with the horse carriage, leaving only his back view for Fusheng City. Zi Yue turned around and saw that Jiang Ping had already gone far away. She was a little worried about Feng Dan, so she ran up to her. She looked at Feng Dan anxiously, wanting to say something, but she didn’t know what to say. Just now, Jiang Ping and Feng Dan had talked a lot. After Feng Dan finished listening, she realized that his words were just to express thank you and sorry. Feng Dan looked at Jiang Ping’s back and muttered. “Looks like this person really doesn’t understand romance. He said a lot of things, but it wasn’t clear.” Feng Dan shook her head self-deprecatingly. When Jiang Ping said the last sentence to her, it left a deep impression on her. She didn’t know which book he copied it from. “Don’t miss a passerby, and focus more on your sweetheart.” After saying that, he looked meaningfully in Zi Yue’s direction. Feng Dan looked at the silly girl in front of her who was so anxious that she did not know what to say. Her finger tapped on her forehead. “Yue’er, I’m fine. Thank you.” Zi Yue finally felt relieved and scolded her jokingly. “Why are you treating me like an outsider? You even thank me.” Feng Dan also followed Zi Yue and said with a smile. “I mean, thank you for liking me.” After hearing Feng Dan’s words that were out of place. Tears instantly flowed down her face. She whimpered. “You finally noticed me?” Feng Dan smiled as she helped her wipe away her tears. “Speaking of which, it’s my fault. If it wasn’t for Fei Cai, who came looking for me last night and told me about it, I wouldn’t have believed it.” “Until Jiang Ping reminded me again.” “I didn’t know that everyone could see it. I was the only one who was confused.” Zi Yue cried so hard that she couldn’t speak. She kept sobbing. Feng Dan patted her head. She hugged her and put her head on her shoulder. “But I’m sorry.” Feng Dan said to Zi Yue again. “We’re both women. How can I marry you?” There were some regrets, some sadness, and some helplessness in her words. Zi Yue didn’t care and hugged Feng Dan tightly. “I don’t care. I just want to be with you.” After that, the two stood at the city gate for a long time and didn’t say anything… Jiang Ping caught up with the carriage. He jumped onto the carriage and went in. Liu’er saw Jiang Ping enter the carriage and asked. “Daddy, where did you go?” Jiang Ping rubbed the little girl’s head. “Daddy and Sister Feng Dan chatted for a while.” At this time, Li Sushang looked at Jiang Ping with a puzzled look. Jiang Ping felt a little scared when he saw Li Sushang staring at him like that. “What’s wrong…” Li Sushang asked. “Did you get involved in a love debt?” Jiang Ping coughed twice, indicating that there were still children in the carriage. Wan’er said nonchalantly. “You guys chat. Anyway, I don’t understand what a love debt means.” “I also don’t know about the matter that Sister Feng Dan likes Daddy.” The other two little girls covered their mouths and snickered. Jiang Ping was a little incredulous. “Who taught you all this!” The three little girls pointed at Lei Jingyun one after another. Lei Jingyun was a little embarrassed. “Hehe, these few girls chased after me to tell them stories a while ago.” “How would I know? I just randomly took a storybook and read it.” Jiang Ping slapped Lei Jingyun’s head. He was so angry that he didn’t know what to say. Li Sushang said from the side. “It’s good for girls to understand love as soon as possible so that they won’t be cheated by others when they grow up.” “But to be honest, have you ever let down my young miss?” Jiang Ping held his forehead. “You don’t trust my character? I rejected her righteously.” Li Sushang nodded coldly. “If I find out that you’ve done something to let down my young miss, I’ll secretly take the three little girls away.” Jiang Ping was helpless and didn’t speak anymore. He just stared at Lei Jingyun fiercely. Lei Jingyun turned around with his back facing Jiang Ping and reflected. The three little girls giggled secretly. In the bamboo house at the back of the mountain of the academy. He Xiangjiang was suddenly startled awake. It was already noon when he saw the sun. He hurriedly put on his shoes and went to his master’s room. “Master, master, it’s time to get up. Didn’t you say we were going on a journey?”. “What time is it? Why aren’t you getting up yet!” The old Taoist priest was still sound asleep. He Xiangjiang’s voice wasn’t even as loud as his snoring. Seeing this, He Xiangjiang quickly went up and slapped his master a few times. Slap! Slap! Slap! He finally woke the old Taoist priest up. “Um… What’s wrong… Is there a fire?”. The old Taoist priest sat up and said in a daze. He Xiangjiang put his hands on his hips and said somewhat angrily. “Didn’t you tell me to wake you up and hurry on our way?” “Take a look for yourself. What time is it?” The old Taoist priest rubbed his eyes and said. “I’ve told you a few times. You need to plan. You have to…” He Xiangjiang continued the old Taoist priest’s words. “You have to be calm in the face of danger!” The old Taoist priest kept repeating these words in He Xiangjiang’s ear every day. It hurt his ears. The old Taoist priest nodded. “So why are you in such a hurry?” He Xiangjiang was puzzled. “Didn’t you say we need to hurry?” The old Taoist priest stretched out his left hand and pinched the joints of the other four fingers with his thumb. Then he said, “There’s no hurry. We can still make it in time.” “Hurry up and pack your luggage. We’ll set off right now.” He Xiangjiang made an “oh” sound. Then he eagerly ran to pack his luggage. On Jiang Ping’s side, they made several stops throughout the journey and arrived at a small town. Because the next stop would take more than half a day to walk. So they planned to spend the night in this small town. The small town was called Longyan Town. Because the spiritual Qi was thin, the people who lived here were all ordinary people. But Jiang Ping found that the streets were dead and empty. And the shops on the street were all closed. It was as if they were lifeless. It was very strange. Jiang Ping was a little puzzled but in order to settle the food and lodging for the night. He chose to find an inn and knock on the door. Bang bang bang! “Is anyone home?” “Boss?” Seeing that no one had responded for a long time, Jiang Ping planned to knock on the next inn. Just as he turned to leave. The inn’s door was cracked open. Behind the crack was an eyeball scanning the surroundings. Then, a voice came from behind the door. “Who are you!” Hearing the voice, Jiang Ping turned his head with a smile and said with cupped hands. “I came from Fusheng City and passed by the small town to stay for the night.” After Jiang Ping said that, the door of the inn opened wider. Then, the head of the innkeeper popped out. After glancing at Jiang Ping and his group, he looked around again. Finally, he waved at Jiang Ping, indicating for them to come in. After Jiang Ping entered with his group, he was just about to ask the innkeeper what was going on in Longyan Town. But the innkeeper spoke first. “A room costs 50 coins. No bargaining. If you want to stay, stay. If you’re not staying, then leave.” Normal inns were priced more than 10 coins, and the better ones were at most 30 coins. The innkeeper asked for 50 coins, and bargaining wasn’t allowed. If it were any other time, Jiang Ping would have turned around and left. However, Jiang Ping wasn’t angry. When he entered this small town, there was no one on the street, and it was very strange. Therefore, no matter how many unreasonable things happened next, Jiang Ping wouldn’t find it strange. Jiang Ping smiled and handed the money to the innkeeper. Then, he planned to ask him what happened in this town. The innkeeper sighed and was about to speak. Suddenly, a rough voice came from the sky. “What kind of lousy place is this? There isn’t even a proper place to spend money!” Then, a big man descended from the sky. He landed on the street. This big man was a cultivator. Because he was escaping from his enemies’ pursuit. He had been hiding in this small town for a period of time. Occasionally, he would vent his anger in the small town when he was feeling oppressed. Whenever this happened, innocent people would suffer. Regardless of whether it was men, women, young or old, as long as he did not like them, he would slap them to death. This brawny man was shirtless. He looked muscular and had a mustache. He looked ferocious. At this moment, he was running amok on the street. While searching for people who were alone, he roared. “What kind of lousy place is this? I have a lot of spirit stones in my hands and nowhere to spend them.” “If I wasn’t hunted by my enemies, hmph.” “In this life, I would never come to this small town.” Jiang Ping had already brought the little girls and the group to the inn. At this moment, he was watching this brawny man’s every move through the window on the second floor of the inn. Although the brawny man was brutal, he did not dare to completely destroy this small town. If the commotion was too big, the enemies who were chasing after him would definitely notice. At that time, he would not know where to hide. Jiang Ping leaned against the window and watched. Behind him stood Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun looked closely at the brawny man for a moment. “His cultivation is on par with mine, Master…” Jiang Ping waved his hand. “Let’s take a look first.” At this moment, the three little girls beside Jiang Ping were jumping up and down in front of the windowsill. They were all very curious. What did the owner of such an unpleasant voice look like? Jiang Ping asked Qiu Chi to bring over a stool. He asked the three little girls to stand on the stool and look out of the window. On the street, the brawny man was looking for people who were alone. He wanted to kill them with a slap to relieve his anger. After searching for a long time, he still couldn’t find anyone. Just as he was about to rush into the houses on the street to search. He accidentally kicked a wicker basket. Then, he heard a scream. “Ah!” The brawny man lifted the wicker basket and found a mother and child hiding inside. The woman looked young, and the child in her arms was less than a year old. “Why are you hiding here? It’s so easy for me to find.” The brawny man revealed an evil smile. He reached out and grabbed the child in the woman’s hand. The brawny man wanted to snatch the child away. But the woman hugged the child tightly and refused to let go. Then, she cried and begged for mercy. “Please, let me and my child go.” “The child’s father was killed by you a few days ago. We’re the only ones left.” “I beg you to let us go. I beg you.” At this time, Jiang Ping roughly understood the reason why this small town was so lifeless. Jiang Ping disapproved of these cultivators’ cruel actions. <b>e we</b>  There were still many people in this world who had achieved some small success in their cultivation. They regarded themselves as gods. They would easily destroy a city. This was already a common occurrence, but Jiang Ping looked down on these people from the bottom of his heart. When the three little girls saw how brutal this brawny man was. He didn’t even let go of the child, who was still in her swaddling clothes. Wan’er couldn’t hold her anger and shouted towards the street. “Big guy, how is bullying a child considered capable?” “Such a big guy bullying the weak. It’s so embarrassing.” The brawny man heard the voice and looked over. He saw Jiang Ping and the three little girls poking their heads out of the window. He smiled meaningfully. He licked his lips. He also let go of the hand that was grabbing the child and walked towards the inn. The innkeeper was frightened by these foreigners. He quickly cursed. “Don’t get me involved if you want to die.” “I shouldn’t have opened the door and let you in…” “It’s over, it’s over, it’s over…” He stomped his feet as he spoke. Lei Jingyun quickly went up to comfort the innkeeper. “Calm down.” “If anything happens, we’ll take responsibility.” The innkeeper was so angry that his eyes were red. “Take responsibility!” “How can you take responsibility!” “Everyone has to die. Are you going to hell to take responsibility?” Lei Jingyun quickly smiled and patted the innkeeper on the back, trying to calm his anger. Seeing the brawny man getting closer and closer. Lei Jingyun asked Jiang Ping. “Master, do you want me to do it?” “I haven’t practiced since I advanced.” Jiang Ping didn’t turn around. He stared at the brawny man who was approaching him aggressively and said. “Okay.” Lei Jingyun smiled after hearing that. Then he said to the innkeeper. “Don’t worry. Only one person will die today, but it won’t be us.” Then he went downstairs alone. At this time, Wan’er, Yan’er, and Liu’er were still cursing at the brawny man by the window. Some of the curses were words that Jiang Ping had never heard before. In any case, it was as bad as it could be. Jiang Ping saw that they were cursing enthusiastically, so he couldn’t stop them. He could only sigh. It takes a lifetime to learn well, and it only takes a day to go astray. Lei Jingyun walked out of the inn. He picked up a stone by the roadside. He threw it at the brawny man’s head. The brawny man tilted his head and dodged the stone. Lei Jingyun pretended to be surprised. “I thought you were so big that your movements wouldn’t be nimble.” “I didn’t expect you to react so quickly.” The brawny man panted heavily and shouted at Lei Jingyun. “Do you want to die!” The people hiding in Longyan Town had their ears deafened by the roar. The innkeeper was so frightened that he was slumped on the ground. It was Qiu Chi who dragged him from the ground to the stool. The innkeeper kept repeating. It’s over, it’s over, it’s over… Wan’er saw that Lei Jingyun had attracted the big guy’s attention. She raised her arms and shouted, “Old Uncle Lei, beat him up!” Yan’er and Liu’er also cheered for Lei Jingyun. Seeing this, Lei Jingyun smiled and waved at the window upstairs. Then the brawny man launched a sneak attack on him and kicked him far away. The three little girls covered their eyes almost at the same time. They couldn’t bear to look at him. Lei Jingyun got up from the ground and felt a little embarrassed. Jiang Ping felt embarrassed and took out the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk from his storage space and threw it at Lei Jingyun. After Lei Jingyun took the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk, Jiang Ping shouted. “Take him out and beat him up. Don’t destroy this town!” Yan’er followed up with Jiang Ping’s words. “Don’t embarrass us anymore!” Wan’er even threatened Lei Jingyun. “If you can’t win, I’ll beat you to death.” Lei Jingyun was full of confidence with the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk in his hand. But after hearing the words of the two little girls, he also felt a little ashamed and embarrassed to raise his head. He shouted at the big guy. “Let’s go out and fight, can we?” The brawny man snorted coldly. “After I kill you, I will come back and kill them.” After saying that, the brawny man looked at the window on the second floor of the inn. Liu’er saw the brawny man looking over. She directly spat on the ground floor. “Bah, Old Uncle Lei will beat you up all by himself, alright!” Not only was the brawny man not angry, he even laughed maniacally. “Hahaha!” “Follow me!” After saying that, he jumped up from the spot. His figure disappeared from the street! Lei Jingyun placed his hands behind his back and said to the second floor of the inn. “Ladies, I’ll be right back.” Wan’er embarrassed him and shouted. “Hurry up and go. Stop pretending to be an expert, or else I’ll beat you up!” Lei Jingyun was embarrassed at first before he sighed. With the tip of his toes, he also flew out of the small town. After that, only silence was left on the street. The three little girls kept shouting that they wanted to follow him and watch Lei Jingyun beat up the bad guys. But Jiang Ping refused, saying that the fight would be over soon, and there was nothing to see in a fight. The little girls’ spirits instantly fell. Jiang Ping walked down the stairs and came to the mother and daughter’s side. “It’s alright. You can go home now.” “That person won’t have the chance to find trouble with you in the future.” The woman was still sobbing. She didn’t know if the young man in front of her was telling the truth or not. m . But now that they had been rescued, she quickly thanked him and carried the child in her arms. She fled in a hurry. Jiang Ping let Qiu Chi and Li Sushang watch over the little girls. He then flew out of the town. Outside the small town, Lei Jingyun was fighting with the brawny man. The brawny man attacked fiercely and quickly, leaving no room for maneuver. However, Lei Jingyun had the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk in his hand, so the brawny man couldn’t get close to him. He was like a dog, slipping around. Jiang Ping landed not far away from the two and watched. From time to time, he would remind the brawny man of his slip-up. “There’s too much space behind you, and it will be easy to ambush!” “Your right foot wasn’t stable when you landed!” “Your punches are filled with brute force, there’s no dexterity at all!” When the brawny man was being ridiculed like this. He was already angry that he was slipping around like a dog, and now he was even angrier. His eyes were red as he charged towards the golden brick wall that Lei Jingyun had created using the eight trigrams disk. Bang bang bang! The brick walls were shattered one after another. He stretched out his hand and swung his fist. At this moment, he was only three steps away from Lei Jingyun. <b>nan</b>  This was the first time that the brawny man had gotten close to Lei Jingyun since the two of them started fighting. A long blade pierced through his body from his back. The brawny man turned his head in surprise. Then, he fell to the ground, gasping for his last breath. Jiang Ping put away his blade. “I told you, be careful of sneak attacks!” The brawny man lay on the ground, and blood kept coming out of his mouth. He pointed his finger at Jiang Ping, his eyes full of unwillingness. “Despicable!” Jiang Ping looked at him, then raised his foot and stepped on his head. “You are allowed to bully the weak, but I am not allowed to win by outnumbering you?” “Why are there so many shameless cultivators in the world!” “When you killed people in that small town, did you ever think that you would end up like this?” The brawny man no longer had the strength to speak, but his eyes were still fixed on Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping saw that it was a waste of breath to reason with such a person. He withdrew his foot and gave Lei Jingyun a look. Lei Jingyun nodded and returned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping turned around and walked away. Lei Jingyun stayed behind. He broke the muscles and bones of that brawny man one by one. This kind of person shouldn’t die too comfortably. Then he completely sealed his spiritual energy. Letting his blood flow dry and die. Jiang Ping went back to the small town and took a deep breath. He wrapped his spiritual energy around his voice and shouted. “That man is dead. You don’t have to hide anymore!” as one The street was still empty, and no one responded. After waiting for a while, Lei Jingyun dragged the brawny man back and threw him to the ground. Jiang Ping kicked him out onto the street and shouted again. “If you don’t believe me, come out and take a look. The person who bullied you usually is already dead.” Then, many people came out to the streets one after another. At first, everyone was very careful. They stared at the corpse on the street. After confirming that this was the person who killed innocent people in the town earlier. Then, someone cautiously went forward to check his breathing. After seeing that there was really no danger, they began to cheer loudly. “It seems like he’s really dead!” “We don’t have to be afraid anymore!” “We can finally continue to do our business!” The innkeeper slumped on the stool. He only came back to his senses when he heard the loud cheers outside. He hurriedly ran to the window and looked down. When he saw the residents of the town cursing at the corpse on the street. Some people even threw things and spat at the motionless corpse. Only then did the innkeeper realize. What these people said just now was that if something happened, they would take responsibility, and they weren’t just making ignorant threats. The innkeeper hurriedly kowtowed to Qiu Chi, Li Sushang, and the three little girls in the inn. The three little girls were still indignant because Jiang Ping had secretly gone to watch the battle without them. Seeing the innkeeper’s action, the three little girls were really frightened. Wan’er jumped down from the stool. She was flattered. Qiu Chi quickly went up to help the innkeeper. The innkeeper said with tears streaming down his face. “Benefactor, you are my benefactor!” “Because of that strange man, no one has dared to go out for a long time in our small town.” “If it weren’t for you people, everyone would have died.” “You are my benefactors.” As he spoke, his snot and tears flowed. Qiu Chi hurriedly said, “It’s not to that extent. Boss, you’re indeed a sentimental person.” The three little girls saw that the innkeeper was a little too enthusiastic, so they quickly ran downstairs to find their father. The three little girls ran to Jiang Ping’s side. There was a group of people in front of Jiang Ping, venting their anger on the brawny man’s corpse. Wan’er also wanted to squeeze in and take a look. Just as she was about to dash out, Jiang Ping grabbed her by the back collar. “Don’t go. This scene is not suitable for children to watch.” Liu’er asked carefully. “Daddy, did you kill someone?” Jiang Ping was stunned. But he still told the truth. “Yes.” “And daddy told you that you will all grow up in the future.” “When you grow up, it is inevitable that you will leave me. In the future, when you leave daddy, you will encounter such evil people.” “Do you know what to do?” Wan’er waved her small fists and answered. “Beat him up!” Yan’er shook her head and said. “I think we should first analyze the situation. If we can’t defeat our opponent, we shouldn’t be rash. In the end, we might mess up even though we had good intentions.” Liu’er didn’t catch the main point of Jiang Ping’s words. As soon as she heard Jiang Ping say that they would leave him. She immediately hugged her father’s thigh and said pitifully. “I don’t want to leave daddy!” Jiang Ping first patted Liu’er’s head and comforted her. “Okay, okay, okay, you won’t leave me!” Then, he said to Wan’er. “Wan’er, you have a temperamental personality, and you’re hot-blooded, but daddy has to remind you.” “Just like what Yan’er said, you can’t act rashly. Under the premise of serving justice, you must first ensure your own safety.” “Do you understand?” Wan’er nodded her little head. “I understand.” Then, he smiled at Yan’er. “Yan’er doesn’t let daddy worry the most, so you have to remind Wan’er and Liu’er often on daddy’s behalf, okay?” Yan’er’s gaze was firm as she acknowledged. Jiang Ping then hugged the three little girls in his arms. “You must be hungry. Come, let’s go and eat.” “Yay! We can eat now!” “Rice! Rice! Rice!” “Woohoo!” The three little girls shouted excitedly. Just as Jiang Ping was about to carry the three little girls back to the inn. The mother and daughter that they had just saved stopped Jiang Ping. “Benefactor!” The people on the street all looked at Jiang Ping in unison. Jiang Ping didn’t want to be surrounded by this group of people, so he pointed at Lei Jingyun beside him. “This is your benefactor. I’m just a handyman.” Lei Jingyun was a little stunned. This credit was given to him? Then the residents of the small town rushed up to him one after another, lifted Lei Jingyun, threw him high into the air, and caught him. They cheered! “Thank you, benefactor!” “Benefactor is mighty!” Lei Jingyun had spent the first half of his life in Chuanyun Sect. The love and respect he received in the past were only because those people had a lower status than him, so they pretended to respect him. The residents of this small town thanked him from the bottom of their hearts. He had never received such treatment before. Even though he had been thrown up and down. The smile on his face could not be hidden, and it was clear. The corners of Jiang Ping’s mouth curled up. He turned around and walked towards the inn. He arrived at the second floor of the inn. The boss was so enthusiastic that he insisted on refunding the fees that Jiang Ping had paid just now. Jiang Ping had repeatedly rejected him, but to no avail, so he had no choice but to be thick-skinned and accept it. The innkeeper said to Jiang Ping and the others with a bright smile on his face. “Benefactors, you must be hungry. I will cook for you now.” “I guarantee that after you eat, even if you forget Longyan Town, you won’t forget the food in my inn.” Jiang Ping said with a smile. “Okay, then I’ll have to trouble you, Boss.” He Xiangjiang and his master hurried on their way. They finally arrived at Longyan Town. They hadn’t even stepped into the small town yet. They heard gongs, drums, and firecrackers in the small town. He Xiangjiang took out a calendar from his bag. He was puzzled. “It’s not a festival today. Why does it feel so lively in the small town?” The old Taoist priest said indifferently. “Can’t they celebrate the new year ahead of time?” “Stop nagging. Go, go, go. I’m hungry.” He Xiangjiang left his master, who only knew how to eat all day long. Then, he walked into the small town. In the small town, the shops were decorated with lanterns and streamers, and everyone’s face was full of smiles. The master and disciple randomly found an inn, and then they went in and sat down. The waiter of the shop came up to them with a smile. <b>ir s</b>  <b>n</b>  “Dear guests, today our small town has been reborn. The boss is happy, and he will give all guests a 20% discount today!” He Xiangjiang first thanked the waiter. Then he asked. “What happened to this small town? What do you mean by reborn?” The waiter said with a smile. “You just arrived in town, right? There’s no harm in telling you. In our town, a fierce-looking…” After the waiter told him the whole story, He Xiangjiang understood the reason. The old Taoist priest asked his disciple impatiently. “Are we going to order food? I’m starving!” He Xiangjiang ordered two dishes casually and told the waiter that he would spend the night here and told the waiter to arrange a room for him. The waiter replied loudly, “Okay,” and then went to work. After the waiter left, He Xiangjiang said with a face full of envy. “Chivalrous and righteousness!” “It sounds very cool!” The old Taoist priest said disapprovingly. “This is nothing. When I was young, I traveled the world and did many things like these.” “You don’t even know how many girls’ eyes I attracted because of my hot-blooded behavior.” He Xiangjiang rolled his eyes at his master. “Master, you’re bragging again!’ The old Taoist priest immediately sat up straight when he heard his disciple slander him like this. “Hey, don’t doubt it. When we get to the Taoist temple, you can ask your senior brothers to see if it’s true or not.” He Xiangjiang picked up the teacup on the table and took a sip, ignoring the old Taoist priest. Seeing that he was being snubbed, the old Taoist priest also picked up the free peanuts given by the inn and threw them into his mouth one by one. Jiang Ping and the others were already sitting at the dining table, waiting for the innkeeper to serve the dishes. At this time, Lei Jingyun had not returned yet, and he was probably forcefully dragged back by the enthusiastic town residents to receive him. Every time it was mealtime, the three little girls would use chopsticks to knock on the porcelain bowl. It was as if they had starved to death. They shouted. “I’m hungry!” “I don’t have any strength left!” “My stomach is growling!” Jiang Ping’s knuckles lightly knocked on the table. The three little girls immediately stopped what they were doing and shut their mouths. Jiang Ping said to the three little girls. “I don’t care about you guys when we’re at home. Now that you’re outside, you have to understand the dining etiquette.” After the three little girls were taught a lesson, they quickly lowered their heads and didn’t say a word. Soon, the innkeeper held a tray in his hand. On the tray were plates of delicious dishes. They were all the innkeeper’s specialty dishes. The innkeeper shouted. “Sorry to keep you waiting. The dishes will be served!” After the dishes were served, the innkeeper spoke as he wiped the oil stains on his apron. “All the dishes are served. You can start eating now!” However, no one made any move at the dining table. The three little girls didn’t dare to start eating without Jiang Ping’s instructions. Otherwise, they would get lectured like what happened earlier. Jiang Ping smiled and waved at the innkeeper. “Boss, come and sit with us. Let’s eat together.” After hesitating for a moment, the innkeeper also brought a stool and sat down. After Jiang Ping indicated that they could start eating, everyone started to move. The innkeeper wasn’t bragging. Although the dishes on this table weren’t as delicious as Jiang Ping’s exclusive menu. But they were still considered the best dishes in the world. The three little girls ate until their mouths were full of oil. While eating, they didn’t forget to praise the innkeeper for being a good cook. Seeing the three little girls praising him. The innkeeper’s mouth was almost curled up to his eyebrows. He didn’t eat much, and he kept smiling. When everyone was almost finished eating, Lei Jingyun then walked into the inn with staggering steps. Lei Jingyun’s face was flushed red, and he drank quite a bit. Seeing Lei Jingyun like this, Jiang Ping let Qiu Chi help him to his room to rest first. Lei Jingyun shook off Qiu Chi’s hand that was supporting him. He shouted. “Don’t stop me, I can still drink. Little lady, continue to pour the wine.” What a guy! Once he said this, other than the three little girls present, everyone definitely knew that Lei Jingyun had been dragged to a brothel to have fun. Jiang Ping coughed. “Cough cough, Qiu Chi, hurry up and drag him back to his room before he starts talking nonsense!” Li Sushang was a girl, after all, so she quickly stood up and led the three little girls back to their room. Lei Jingyun pushed Qiu Chi’s hand away again and again. He kept muttering to himself, “The young lady of the brothel…” Jiang Ping saw that if he continued to speak, his words would become obscene. He hurriedly went forward and knocked him unconscious. Then he had Qiu Chi drag him back to the room. After Qiu Chi carried Lei Jingyun onto the bed, he walked out of the room and turned around to look at Lei Jingyun, who was lying on the bed. He secretly laughed. He didn’t expect this old man to remember to keep up with his love life despite his old age. Jiang Ping saw that it was getting late. After thanking the innkeeper for his hospitality. He walked back to his room. In another inn, He Xiangjiang and his master had just finished their meal. The old Taoist priest wanted the waiter to serve him a pot of wine. However, He Xiangjiang, who was in charge of housekeeping, refused him righteously. “We exchanged that stone for money in Fusheng City so that we wouldn’t starve to death.” “Master, since you don’t do housekeeping, you don’t even know how expensive rice, oil, and salt are.” The old Taoist priest pretended not to hear it and stood up to return to his room. In order to save money, the master and disciple only booked one room in the inn. As soon as they entered the room, the old Taoist priest lay down and slept without taking off his shoes. No matter how much He Xiangjiang called him, he was unmoved. When he slept, the old Taoist priest’s snoring was like thunder. It was so noisy that He Xiangjiang couldn’t even close his eyes. The young Taoist priest tossed and turned and stood up. And decided not to sleep on the bed. He walked directly to the table in the room and wanted to lie down for a while. As soon as he lay down, the old Taoist priest began to talk in his sleep. “Xiangjiang, you have to learn Taoist skills from master well. Only then can you stand out in the future and be filial to your parents…” He Xiangjiang heard his master calling him. He turned around. He found that the old Taoist priest was still sleeping soundly. The young Taoist priest muttered to himself. “It seems that he is talking in his sleep again.” When he was lying on the table to sleep again, the old Taoist priest started talking in his sleep again. This time, the old Taoist priest used a dialect, which the young Taoist priest could not understand, and he felt annoyed. He wanted to wake his master up and discuss whether he could sleep first after he fell asleep. After walking to the bedside, he looked at his master’s grizzled hair and beard and thought of how old his master was. His master needed to sleep even more while he was still young. It didn’t matter if he didn’t sleep for one night. So, the young Taoist priest walked out of the room and came out to relax. When He Xiangjiang walked out of the room, the old Taoist priest’s thunderous snoring stopped. The old Taoist priest opened one of his eyes and after confirming that his disciple had really gone out, he smiled meaningfully. He kicked off his shoes, turned over his body, and finally fell asleep. He Xiangjiang walked on the streets of Longyan Town. He remembered that he had already left home, and he was very, very far away. He didn’t know if his mother’s illness had gotten better. He didn’t know if his father was feeling tired from the autumn harvest recently. The young Taoist priest walked on the streets of Longyan Town, his mind already drifting back to his hometown. In the room of the three little girls, Wan’er’s eyes were still open. For some reason, she just couldn’t fall asleep tonight. She was in a bad mood. She didn’t have anything on her mind, but her heart was so restless that she couldn’t close her eyes. The little girl quietly climbed out of bed. She tiptoed out of the room. Then, she quietly closed the door. Just as she was about to turn around and go downstairs, she heard her father’s voice. “Little rascal, where are you going?” Wan’er turned around to face her father. She smiled and scratched her head. “I can’t sleep. I want to go out for a walk.” Jiang Ping waved his hand and asked the little girl to come over. He asked, “Why? Is there something on your mind again?” Wan’er shook her head and said. “I just simply can’t sleep.” “Daddy, please let me go out for a walk. I won’t cause any trouble, and I’ll be back soon.” Hearing the little girl’s assurance, Jiang Ping nodded and rubbed her head. “Go. Take care of yourself.” The little girl nodded and went downstairs happily. After seeing Wan’er go out, Jiang Ping didn’t go back to sleep. Instead, he went back to his room, opened the window, went out through the window, and flew to the sky above Longyan Town. The little girl was skipping. After coming out of the room, she breathed in the evening breeze. Her restless heart instantly became much happier. She hummed the little song that Jiang Ping usually sang to them. “Little rabbit, be good. Open the door. Open it quickly. I want to come in…” While walking on the street, she saw a pebble lying on the side of the road. Wan’er, for some reason, stepped forward and kicked the pebble away. The little girl hummed, and the pebble flew high. After a moment, there was no sound of the pebble falling to the ground. Instead, she heard someone moan. “Ouch!” Then, the young voice sounded again. “Who threw the pebble around? It hurts so much.” Wan’er saw that she seemed to have gotten into trouble. She had planned to sneak away before the other party noticed her. But she remembered that she had promised her father that she would never cause trouble. The little girl made up her mind. She looked for the voice and wanted to apologize to the other party. The voice came from the alley next to her, so Wan’er turned around and looked into the alley. She vaguely saw a figure about her height. Without saying anything, the little girl bowed deeply to the figure in the alley. “I’m sorry, I didn’t do it on purpose.” Then the figure in the alley gradually became clear and slowly walked towards Wan’er… Wan’er was still bowing and apologizing to the figure. “I’m really sorry. I accidentally kicked that pebble.” He Xiangjiang didn’t see the little girl who was bowing clearly. He just felt that the voice sounded familiar. So he walked out of the alley. He wanted to see who the owner of the voice was. When he stood in front of Wan’er, he saw a person dressed in red. Although Wan’er did not raise her head, He Xiangjiang immediately recognized the oppressive aura emanating from the little girl. He wanted to sneak away because he was afraid that this indiscriminate little girl in front of him would beat him up again if she saw him. He turned around and wanted to run. Wan’er was still bowing, and she saw He Xiangjiang’s two feet were already in front of her. But he didn’t say anything. She felt strange, so she raised her head, wanting to see who it was. When she raised her head, she happened to see He Xiangjiang’s stealthy turning action. Wan’er stood straight and asked. “Are you the young Taoist priest from the bamboo forest?” He Xiangjiang saw that the little girl recognized him, and he secretly cursed in his heart. He raised his legs and wanted to run. Wan’er saw this and subconsciously grabbed the corner of He Xiangjiang’s clothes. He Xiangjiang did not stop running and fell forward. He fell heavily onto the floor. “Ouch!” Wan’er quickly went over to help him up. After helping He Xiangjiang up, the little girl shouted happily. “It’s really you, young Taoist priest!” The young Taoist priest endured the pain and forced a smile on his face. “Yeah, what a coincidence.” Wan’er pointed at He Xiangjiang’s face. “Why is your nose bleeding?” After hearing this, the young Taoist priest quickly reached out and wiped his nose with his sleeve. He looked at his sleeve under the moonlight, and it was dark red. Only then did the young Taoist priest realize that the fall was quite serious. The young Taoist priest hurriedly raised his head to prevent his nose from bleeding again, and then he asked the little girl if she had a rope. Wan’er was anxious and touched her purse. “Why would I have a rope!” He Xiangjiang pointed at the little girl’s head and said. “The headband is fine too.” Wan’er reached her hands to the back of her head, pulled out her headband from her hair, and handed it to He Xiangjiang. He Xiangjiang wrapped the headband around his left thumb and tied a knot with his teeth and right hand. Then, he wiped the blood from his nose. After a while, the blood stopped dripping like water. Seeing how it worked like magic, Wan’er asked. “Why does it stop flowing after you tie your thumb?” He Xiangjiang stood up from the ground and replied as he moved far away from the spot where his blood had dripped from his nose. “I don’t know what the principle is either. My mother taught me this.” Wan’er pressed on. “Then didn’t you ask your mother what’s going on?” He Xiangjiang said. “I did. My mother said that the method would work, but she didn’t tell me about the principle.” Wan’er responded with an “oh” and then asked. “Why are you here?” He Xiangjiang told the little girl that he came out for a walk because he couldn’t sleep. Wan’er raised her hand to pat his head. The young Taoist priest quickly raised his hands to cover his head. The little girl saw that his sleeves were stained with blood, so she withdrew her hands. She said with some disdain. “I’m asking why you’re in this small town.” He Xiangjiang finally realized what was going on. “My master and I are on our way. We passed by here, so we’re here.” “What about you?” Wan’er said proudly. “It’s none of your business.” The young Taoist priest did not continue asking. He only responded with an “oh” and did not say anything Wan’er looked at the stupid little boy in front of her and felt a little helpless. “You said that you couldn’t sleep? Why couldn’t you sleep?” The young Taoist priest wanted to say that it was because his master was snoring in his sleep, but the words were on the tip of his tongue. “Because I’m homesick.” Wan’er said with some contempt. “How old are you? Why are you still homesick? I’ve also left my home in Fusheng City, but I’m not homesick?” He Xiangjiang was rendered speechless. He could only lower his head silently and then ask. “What about you? Why are you not asleep when it’s already so late?” Wan’er herself did not know why she could not fall asleep and could not answer. She waved her small fists and said. “It’s none of your business.” Then He Xiangjiang fell silent. The two of them were silent for a moment. Wan’er suddenly said. “You’re in a bad mood, right? Come, I’ll take you somewhere.” Without waiting for the young Taoist priest to agree, Wan’er took his hand and walked. The two stopped and walked into the small town. Every time they reached a place with walls, the little girl would stop and look at it for a moment, then shake her head and walk to the next wall. He Xiangjiang did not understand and asked. “Where are we going?” Wan’er said without turning her head. “Don’t talk. Just follow me.” Until she saw an uneven mud wall and the distance between the roof wasn’t much. Wan’er pointed to this wall. “Come!” He Xiangjiang asked in puzzlement. “Come for what?” Wan’er frowned and said. “We’re climbing up! What do you mean by come for what!” He Xiangjiang couldn’t react in time. “Huh?” Wan’er urged him. “Hurry up, don’t force me to slap you.” He Xiangjiang could only obey and stand in front of the wall. However, no matter how hard the young Taoist priest tried, he would always fall halfway. When Wan’er saw this, she reached out to support He Xiangjiang. She even complained. “You’re so stupid. Step on my hand and go up.” Then, Wan’er lifted He Xiangjiang with her hand and finally lifted him with great difficulty. He Xiangjiang climbed up to the roof with trembling hands and feet. He even turned his head to look at Wan’er. “Then what about you?” Wan’er put her hands on her hips and said. “Just mind your own business.” After He Xiangjiang sat firmly on the roof. Wan’er began to reach out and climb up. In no time at all, she climbed up. Then, she walked straight to the young Taoist priest. He Xiangjiang saw the little girl walking on the roof as if it was flat ground. He looked at the little girl with envy. The little girl stood next to He Xiangjiang and then gave He Xiangjiang a gentle slap on the head. “Idiot, you’re sitting the opposite way.” He Xiangjiang grunted in acknowledgment and slowly moved his buttocks and turned his body. Then, Wan’er also slowly sat down beside He Xiangjiang The two of them faced the moon. Wan’er said. I used to like to do this when I was in a bad mood. I climbed up the roof and looked at the moon for a while. My mood would become better.” “You should try it too.” He Xiangjiang nodded and looked at the moon. After a while, he turned his head and said to Wan’er. “It doesn’t seem to be working. I still miss home.” Wan’er thought for a moment and said. “It can’t be. Usually, when I’m unhappy, after sitting for a while, I’ll feel better.” “Why don’t you try and quietly say what you’re unhappy about?” He Xiangjiang nodded seriously. He turned to face the moon and whispered. “Father, Mother, Xiangjiang misses you…” Before he could finish his words, the young Taoist priest cried. Wan’er saw that He Xiangjiang was crying again and slapped his head impatiently. The young Taoist priest hurriedly stopped crying Wan’er said in disdain. “Why are you always crying?” “Don’t you feel tired?” The young Taoist priest sobbed as he said. “How would I know? The atmosphere has already built up. I feel that if I don’t cry, I’ll be letting myself down.” Wan’er was amused by He Xiangjiang’s words. “Hahaha, you may be a little silly, but you’re quite interesting.” He Xiangjiang did not understand what the little girl sitting next to him was laughing about. So he asked. “You left home too. Don’t you miss your parents?” Wan’er’s laughter suddenly stopped. “My daddy left with us. As for my mommy…” “I haven’t seen her since my sister was born.” “I don’t even remember what she looked like.” He Xiangjiang asked softly. “Then, why don’t you cry too?” “To build up the atmosphere?” Smack! He was being slapped again. “Are you out of your mind?” “Are you not feeling sad anymore?” Wan’er asked angrily. The young Taoist priest was a little stunned, then he thought about it carefully. “I was sad when I looked at the moon just now, but I feel better after talking to you.” Wan’er stared at the young Taoist priest in front of her. “Then you are pretty strange.” He Xiangjiang said disapprovingly. “Really? I feel strange too.” The young Taoist priest often wondered if there was something wrong with him. He left his home which was so far away, just to follow the old Taoist priest to a Taoist temple that he had never heard of. The old Taoist priest had said that there would be a way to cure his mother’s illness in that Taoist temple. At that time, he had agreed without thinking. The young Taoist priest tilted his head and asked. “Hey, by the way, what’s your name?” “I was afraid of you last time, so I didn’t ask in detail.” Wan’er held the roof with both hands and leaned back slightly, looking at the moon. “My name is Jiang Wan. Jiang stands for the river, and Wan stands for gentle. You can call me Wan’er.” The young Taoist priest’s eyes lit up. “Your name sounds really nice.” Wan’er complimented him. “Yours is not bad either, He Xiangjiang. It’s easy to write since it only has a few strokes.” “Every time I use a pen to write my name, my hand would shake uncontrollably when I write the word ‘Wan’.” “It’s always crooked when I write it.” He Xiangjiang asked doubtfully. “Do you not like writing?” Wan’er shook her head. “I don’t. I don’t like studying either. Otherwise, why do you think I ran into you at school that day?” “I was just looking for an excuse not to listen to the teacher’s nagging in school.” He Xiangjiang also turned his head to look at the moon. “Then you really don’t know what’s good for you. I’ve wanted to study since I was young, but my family was poor, so I couldn’t even attend the academy.” “The words I can read now are all taught by my master.” As expected, there was a slap. The young Taoist priest received another slap on the head. The little girl said angrily. “Who do you mean by don’t know what’s good for you!” The young Taoist priest quickly admitted his mistake to avoid the next few slaps. He Xiangjiang suddenly asked Wan’er. “Wan’er, what business does your family do? They must make a lot of money.” The young Taoist priest could not help but ask curiously when he thought of how valuable the stone Wan’er threw to him was. Wan’er said. “I don’t know. My father didn’t tell me. I don’t know either.” “What about you? You kept mentioning your parents just now. What do your parents do?” He Xiangjiang scratched his head. “My family lives by the river. My father usually fishes for a living.” “That’s how I got my name. My parents hope that I can go to a wider place in the future. Just like how the river flows into a bigger river, and the big river flows into the sea.” After saying that, the young Taoist priest’s ears turned red. He was afraid that Wan’er would look down on him. However, the little girl did not look down on the young Taoist priest because of that. Wan’er raised her head and looked at the stars in the sky. “Your dream is being realized now. You’ve left your hometown. Isn’t it like the river flowing into a bigger river?” The young Taoist priest nodded and then shook his head. “But I don’t want to leave my parents at all.” Wan’er was puzzled and turned her head to ask. “Then why do you have to leave home?” He Xiangjiang’s eyes were gloomy as he said sadly. “That day, my mother was already terminally ill, and all the money in the house had been used to treat my mother’s illness. After taking the last dose of medicine, there was no money in the house to buy more medicine “Then a person came to my house and told me that if I acknowledge him as my master and followed him to a Taoist temple, he will leave a sum of money for my family.” “He paid for my mother’s treatment. He also told me that the Taoist temple he was taking me to might have a way to treat my mother.” “After that, I followed that person and called him master…” He Xiangjiang only told her what he knew. What he did not know was that after he followed his master out of the village. His master quietly returned. It was unknown what method he used, but He Xiangjiang’s mother’s illness had mostly healed overnight. She could get out of bed and walk the next day… The young Taoist priest didn’t know that the path his master had taken him on was the best choice he had made in his life. Wan’er turned her head to look at He Xiangjiang. “I didn’t expect you to be so responsible even though you’re always crying.” He Xiangjiang grinned. “Thank you for the compliment.” “Wan’er.” “Yes?” “Thank you for talking to me tonight.” Wan’er waved her hand. “It’s nothing.” After a long silence, Wan’er called He Xiangjiang. “Young Taoist priest.” He Xiangjiang replied. “Yes?” Wan’er looked at the stars in the sky and said. “I’m sorry.” The young Taoist priest was a little puzzled, so he asked. “Why?” The little girl blinked her eyes and said in a clear voice. “I dirtied your clothes when we met for the first time. Then, I stained your sleeves with blood the second time we met.” “I’m sorry…” He Xiangjiang said indifferently. “It’s okay, I’ll wash them again.” Then the two sat next to each other. He Xiangjiang also imitated Wan’er and supported himself with his hands. He looked up at the stars. In the sky of Longyan Town. Jiang Ping was staring at a roof. On the roof, two little fellows were talking about their worries. Just now, when Wan’er was about to go out, Jiang Ping sensed that someone was spying on his inn with spiritual energy. Jiang Ping was afraid that a cultivator was plotting something. So, he walked through the door and bumped into Wan’er sneaking out. Then he secretly followed the little girl in the sky, and that’s when he saw this scene. It seemed that the prying just now wasn’t malicious, but he was too sensitive. Looking at the backs of the two little fellows. Jiang Ping sighed in his heart. Many years later, if the two little fellows remembered the conversation on the roof tonight. They will feel it deeply. Then he shook his head and realized. It feels like this little guy was trying to kidnap his daughter! Jiang Ping slowly landed behind the two little fellows and spoke. “Wan’er, it’s time to go back!” Wan’er and He Xiangjiang turned their heads around at the same time. The little girl was overjoyed and said in surprise, “Why are you here?” Wan’er pointed at Jiang Ping and said to the young Taoist priest beside her, “This is my Daddy.” The young Taoist priest nodded and said, “Oh.” He then performed a meridian technique with both hands and bowed to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping clasped his hands in front of his chest and bowed back. Wan’er said, “I’m going back. You should go back and sleep early too.” He Xiangjiang verbally acknowledged with a single note. Jiang Ping then held Wan’er’s hand and wrapped her with his spiritual energy. And they flew in the sky together. Before leaving, the little girl waved at the young Taoist priest. The young Taoist priest responded with a smile. After both of them had gone far, He Xiangjiang finally reacted. He was on the roof! How could he go down alone? Jiang Ping flew back to the inn with Wan’er. After they landed, Wan’er asked Jiang Ping for money for the first time. Jiang Ping was a little surprised. In the past, these girls would not carry their own money. When they went out to buy things, they would usually ask him or Li Sushang to pay. Jiang Ping then asked the little girl, “What do you need the money for?” Wan’er said impatiently, “Don’t bother about it, Daddy. Give me the money quickly.” Jiang Ping sighed and teased, “This little girl hasn’t even grown up, and she begins to favor an outsider.” Wan’er said angrily, “Daddy!” Jiang Ping smiled as he took out a purse from his storage space. “Alright, alright, alright. Here, take it!” Wan’er happily took the purse, turned around, and returned to her room to sleep. Jiang Ping felt a little helpless but could only shake his head and follow. The following morning, Jiang Ping had everyone packed up their things. And they continued to set off. Before they set off, Wan’er said that she wanted to buy something. Li Sushang wanted to go with her, but Wan’er refused. Wan’er went to a tailor shop alone. “Shopkeeper, I want to buy a piece of cloth!” The shopkeeper lowered his head and looked at the little girl. “What kind of material do you want?” Wan’er looked around the shop. “I don’t know either. Get me the best ones.” The shopkeeper grinned and asked her to wait for a while. In a short while, the shopkeeper came out with a few pieces of cloth. “All the best ones are here. Little girl, which color would you like to pick?” Wan’er browsed through the selection of cloths. In the end, she chose a color that she liked. “Shopkeeper, wrap it up.” “Alright!” After the shopkeeper wrapped the cloth, Wan’er casually left the purse that Jiang Ping gave her last night behind. Then, she turned around and crossed the threshold to leave the shop. The shopkeeper picked up the purse and opened it. The money inside was enough to buy his entire shop. He hurriedly stopped the little girl. “Hey, little girl, I haven’t given you the change.” “You have given too much. There’s no need to pay so much for just a piece of cloth.” Wan’er turned around. She stood at the door and asked, “Really? I don’t know. Then, hurry up and give me the change.” The shopkeeper took out a piece of silver from the purse and returned the purse to the little girl. Wan’er took the wallet and asked, “That’s it? It’s so cheap?” The shopkeeper was also stunned. His shop had been opened for so many years. And the street was full of people who had found it expensive. It was the first time he saw someone who found it cheap. “Yes, this small piece of silver is enough.” Wan’er nodded, then turned around and left. Actually, the shopkeeper had found this little girl to be rich, generous, and innocent-looking. He had already secretly profited because usually, a piece of silver would be sufficient to buy two pieces of cloths that the little girl was holding in her hands. Wan’er never had to pay for things herself, so there was no way she could understand the market situation. She paid for it in a muddle-headed way and even felt that it was cheap. The little girl even thought to herself as she walked back to the inn. The young Taoist priest couldn’t even afford such cheap cloth. It seemed that his family was really poor. Wan’er secretly made up her mind that if she ever saw the young Taoist priest again in the future, she would treat him better. She couldn’t use so much strength when beating him. Alright, that had been decided! The carriage was already set up at the inn’s entrance when she was bouncing her way back. Jiang Ping just happened to walk out of the inn with Yan’er and Liu’er. Yan’er saw Wan’er bouncing back, holding a package in her hand. So, she asked, “Wan’er, what’s that in your hand?” Wan’er hugged the wrapped cloth tightly and turned her body sideways. “This is my little secret. I won’t tell you.” Seeing that Wan’er didn’t want to tell them, Yan’er said indifferently, “Tsk, who cares?” Wan’er then walked to Jiang Ping’s side. She secretly handed the package to him. “Daddy, help me to keep it well. Don’t let others know.” Just when Jiang Ping was about to reach out to take it, the little girl withdrew her hand that was handing the package to him. She then added another sentence. “Of course, Daddy, you can’t secretly open it and take a look.” Jiang Ping chuckled, “Alright. I won’t look at it. Give it to me.” Jiang Ping took the parcel from the little girl’s hand and put it into his storage space without looking at it. Wan’er then secretly felt relieved. After listening to the conversation between the little girl and the young Taoist priest last night, Jiang Ping could guess what was inside the package without even looking. After Qiu Chi and Li Sushang also came out, Jiang Ping looked around and asked, “Where’s Old Lei?” Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun’s rooms were closest to each other. Qiu Chi then said, “I called him just now. He was already awake. Maybe he’s still drunk. He should be tidying up now, right?” As soon as he finished speaking, Lei Jingyun slowly walked out of the inn while patting his head. Jiang Ping looked at him with a playful smile. “Old Lei, you had quite some fun last night.” Qiu Chi also joked, “Yes, I didn’t expect Old Lei to be so playful at such an old age!” Lei Jingyun immediately understood after hearing their words. His ears turned red as he asked, “I didn’t say any drunken words last night, did I?” Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi looked at each other and smiled. Then the two of them waved their hands and said a few “no” in succession. Lei Jingyun’s face turned even redder after seeing them like this. Who would believe them when they said “no” like this? Jiang Ping patted Lei Jingyun’s shoulder and said, “Stay away from the three little girls in the future. I’m afraid that you’ll be a bad influence.” Qiu Chi also stepped forward and patted Lei Jingyun on the other shoulder, “Stay away from me too. I’m not mentally strong enough. I’m afraid I’ll follow you one day.” Lei Jingyun looked at the two of them and hurriedly explained, “What are you talking about? I was only invited to a restaurant by the town’s residents last night and drank some wine.” Jiang Ping withdrew his hand from Lei Jingyun’s shoulder and asked, “Really? Then what about the young lady?” Lei Jingyun couldn’t say anything. Although he went to a brothel, he didn’t do anything He only drank wine. But now, it seemed that they had firmly believed that Lei Jingyun was that kind of person. Lei Jingyun felt helpless. It seemed that in the days to come, this matter would be used as a joke by Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi. A joke to disgust him. Li Sushang said from the side. “Alright, alright. The three girls are still here. You guys should restrain yourselves.” Lei Jingyun hurriedly explained. “No… I really didn’t…” Li Sushang glared at Lei Jingyun, and he didn’t dare to speak anymore. Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi were still snickering. In the end, Liu’er tugged at the corner of Jiang Ping’s clothes. She asked when they would set off. Jiang Ping and Qiu Chi finally stopped laughing. Then, they got into the carriage and continued to move in the direction of Xianlai Island. In Longyan Town, in a particular inn. A low-spirited young Taoist priest was dragging himself up the stairs. After pushing open the door of his room, he saw that his master had already woken up and was preparing to pack his things. The old Taoist priest saw He Xiangjiang walk in. He stared at He Xiangjiang’s haggard face with dark circles under his eyes. He asked. “Where did you go last night? Why did you end up like this?” He Xiangjiang said in a tired voice. “I was admiring the moon!” He wouldn’t tell the old Taoist priest that he was stuck hanging on the roof all night because he didn’t dare to climb down, and in the end, he even fell off the roof. The old Taoist priest was a little curious. “Admiring the moon? When did you have the leisure time to do such a thing?” He Xiangjiang walked to the table, opened the baggage on the table, took out his clothes, and prepared to take off what he was wearing. “I was in a good mood, so I went.” The young Taoist priest said weakly. When the old Taoist priest saw He Xiangjiang was going to change his clothes, he found that his sleeve was stained with blood. “Why did you end up in this state after admiring the moon?” The old Taoist priest used two fingers to pinch He Xiangjiang’s sleeve. After He Xiangjiang put on his clothes, he said. “This is my nosebleed.” The old Taoist priest released his fingers that were pinching the clothes with a look of disgust. “Hey, I don’t know if you’re admiring the moon, but you must have gone to do something bad secretly.” He Xiangjiang didn’t have the strength to refute his master and just asked. “Master, can we leave later?” “I want to sleep for a while.” The old Taoist priest nodded and said. “Go to sleep then. We can make it in time anyway.” “Get me some money while you’re at it. I want to drink.” He Xiangjiang pointed at the baggage on the table and said. “Take it from the bag. Don’t spend it all.” After saying that, he collapsed on the bed and fell into a deep sleep. The old Taoist priest did not go through the baggage on the table to get the money immediately. Instead, he walked to the bedside first and covered He Xiangjiang with the quilt. Then, he muttered. “He’s so stupid that it’s so cute. He doesn’t even know how to shout for help when he’s stuck hanging on the roof.” After shaking his head, he took a few copper coins from the table, walked out of the door, and gently closed the door. Jiang Ping and his group had already left Longyan Town for some distance. After walking for about thirty miles, Qiu Chi stopped the carriage and let the horses rest for a while. The three little girls in the carriage naturally wouldn’t sit still inside. As soon as the carriage stopped, they immediately jumped out. This time, they didn’t take the official road, but the forest path. It was because the little girls kept clamoring all day long as they wanted to watch the scenery. So they chose the path that was quieter but had a better view. Once they got off the carriage, the three little girls seemed to feel liberated. They ran all over the mountains and plains. Jiang Ping told them to be careful not to fall and didn’t bother them anymore. The little girls walked into the forest. Wan’er held her two younger sisters’ hands and said. “When I left home on my own previously, I had experience going into the mountains. I’ll take you with me.” The two little girls were both curious and afraid of the forest, so they carefully followed Wan’er. Wan’er told her two younger sisters. When she had entered the mountains, she had maintained order in the mountains. By maintaining order, she meant that she was using her pair of fists to beat up the fierce carnivorous beasts that they did not dare to come out to hunt. She had been eating wild fruits in the mountains for an entire month. “I heard from daddy that there will be very fierce monsters in some mountains.” “Sister Wan’er, do you think we will encounter them?” Liu’er hid behind Wan’er and asked with fear and trepidation. Wan’er held Liu’er’s hand and used more strength to hold it tightly. “It’s okay, don’t be afraid. Even if there is such a monster, I will protect you.” Although Yan’er was also a little afraid, she still did not want to lose to Wan’er. Thus, she patted her small chest and said. “It’s okay. I will protect Liu’er too.” At this time, Liu’er was not so afraid. She straightened her body and followed behind Wan’er. After walking for a long distance, the three little girls realized that nothing dangerous had happened. Thus, they let down their guard. Wan’er said, “There don’t seem to be any ferocious beasts in this forest. Looks like I can’t show off to the two of you.” Yan’er also asked curiously. “It’s not just the ferocious beasts that Wan’er mentioned. I don’t even hear the chirping of birds.” The three little girls looked around and realized that apart from the three of them, there were no other living creatures in this forest that could move. Jiang Ping leaned against the carriage and seemed to have noticed something. He wanted to call Lei Jingyun over for a discussion. Just as he lifted the curtain of the carriage, Lei Jingyun walked over and asked. “Master, you noticed it too?” Jiang Ping nodded. “This forest is a bit strange. We’ve been here for so long, and besides the flowers and trees, there’s also us.” “There’s no life at all.” Lei Jingyun acknowledged and then said. “I also found something strange just now. I used my spiritual energy to probe the surroundings and found that this forest is dead silent.” Jiang Ping pondered for a moment. He immediately shouted to Qiu Chi who was not far away. “Old Qiu, has the horse rested well?” Qiu Chi stood on the spot and raised his hand to make a gesture, indicating that the horse could continue on its journey. Jiang Ping said to Lei Jingyun. “Go and bring Wan’er and the others back. We’ll leave now.” “I don’t know what happened in this place, but it’s always right to avoid it.” Lei Jingyun nodded, turned around, and was about to head into the forest. Suddenly, a low roar sounded throughout the entire forest. It sounded like the cry of some kind of fierce beast. Without thinking, Jiang Ping directly flew into the air and flew into the depths of the forest. Lei Jingyun told Qiu Chi and Li Sushang to stay where they were while he followed him in the air. After the three little girls heard the low roar, they were a little surprised. Yan’er said to the other two at this time. “The roar is so terrifying. Why don’t we go back?” Liu’er was timid, so she quickly nodded and said yes. Wan’er saw that her two younger sisters were not willing to go forward, so she could only nod and take them back. Just as they were about to turn around. Suddenly, a strong gust of wind came from the depths of the forest. Then, there was a loud thump. It was as if there was a huge elephant treading on the ground. Yan’er hurriedly urged. “Let’s hurry up and leave.” Wan’er did not hesitate. She held the hands of her two younger sisters and ran back. However, the further they ran, the closer the thumping seemed to be. Soon, the footsteps had reached behind the three little girls. Then, behind them, there was a roar that was even louder than before! Liu’er was frightened. She stumbled, and the three little girls tripped and fell to the ground. After the three little girls fell to the ground, they turned around. When they saw the huge beast in front of them, they were deeply shocked. Just as they were panicking, Jiang Ping appeared in time and picked up the three little girls. Then, he tiptoed. He floated in the air and kept his distance from the ferocious beast. The beast in front of him was as tall as a three-story building. It was about six feet long and looked like a wild boar. It had two big ears and brown sideburns. It had four fangs sticking out of its mouth! Its fangs were as thick as an adult’s thigh! Jiang Ping understood why the forest was so quiet. Lei Jingyun had just arrived. He looked at the wild boar-like beast in front of him! He frowned slightly. Jiang Ping asked Lei Jingyun, who had just arrived. “Do you recognize what this is?” Lei Jingyun nodded. “I’ve read about this wild boar-like beast in an ancient book, and it’s called ‘Tooth Pig’, but…” Jiang Ping continued to ask. “But what!” Lei Jingyun and the huge wild boar called “Tooth Pig” looked at each other. “But this is not a ferocious beast.” “It’s an auspicious beast. It’s also known as Dangkang. It’s said that the appearance of this auspicious beast signifies a great harvest for the people.” “Besides, don’t look at how fierce and ugly it is, but it’s actually gentle.” “I was wondering why this Dangkang was so irritable!” Jiang Ping listened to Lei Jingyun’s words as he carefully examined the auspicious beast named Dangkang. When Jiang Ping’s gaze landed on the auspicious beast’s abdomen, he pointed and asked. “Look at its stomach. Doesn’t it look like it’s pregnant?” Lei Jingyun followed Jiang Ping’s gaze and looked over. “Looks like it, and it’s not just pregnant with one.” Dangkang listlessly looked at Jiang Ping and the others who were floating in the air. Then, it slowly lowered its body. Its eyelids drooped slightly. Then, it slowly closed its eyes. It was panting heavily as if it had used up all its energy Jiang Ping frowned slightly. Lei Jingyun also saw the clues and said in surprise. “It seems to be having difficulty giving birth.” Jiang Ping nodded, landed on the ground, and put the three little girls down. Liu’er asked Jiang Ping. “Daddy, what are you going to do?” Jiang Ping smiled at Liu’er but didn’t answer. Then he walked up and looked at the Dangkang with its eyes closed. Jiang Ping said to it. “If you want our help, move your paw.” The Dangkang, which was lying on the ground, scratched the ground slightly with its paw. The three little girls behind him shouted, pointing at its paw in surprise. “It’s moving.” “Daddy, look.” Jiang Ping stretched out his hand behind him, indicating that he had seen it. Then he asked again. “How do you want us to help you?” Dangkang tried hard to turn its body. It lay down on its side, revealing its belly. Then it opened its eyes forcefully and raised its head slightly to look at its belly. Jiang Ping asked calmly. “Are you sure?” Dangkang’s head moved a little and nodded at Jiang Ping Jiang Ping acknowledged and walked past the auspicious beast. He came to its abdomen. He shouted to the three little girls behind him. “Wan’er, Yan’er, Liu’er, turn around.” The three little girls nodded and did as he said. They turned their backs on Jiang Ping and Dangkang. Jiang Ping took out the Sky Piercer Blade from his storage space. Then he made a few gestures to the abdomen. He pressed the back of the knife and tried to stab into Dangkang’s abdomen. However, the skin and flesh of this auspicious beast were very firm and hard. Therefore, Jiang Ping tried his best but failed to pierce through it. He could only infuse spiritual energy into the blade. Only then did the tip of the blade slowly cut into Dangkang’s abdomen. When the tip of the blade stabbed in, the body of this auspicious beast trembled. Immediately after, it let out a muffled groan. Jiang Ping hardened his heart and directly cut open its abdomen. A one-meter long cut was made. Jiang Ping rolled up the sleeves on his hands and extended both of his hands into the cut. Very quickly, Jiang Ping’s hands which were covered in blood and mucus were slowly pulled out. In his hands was a small Dangkang. It was about the size of a child’s head. Jiang Ping placed the Dangkang on the ground. He reached in again and took out two small auspicious beasts. After confirming that there were only three auspicious beasts inside, Jiang Ping carried the three Dangkangs to their mother. The three small ones couldn’t open their eyes. They sniffed and stumbled to their mother’s side. They used their small heads to worship their mother. The dying auspicious beast tried its best to open its eyelids as if it wanted to express something to Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping nodded. “No need to say it, I know.” Then, the mother auspicious beast slowly closed its eyes. Its chest was no longer heaving due to its breathing, and it directly stopped breathing. The three little auspicious beasts seemed to feel that their mother was no longer breathing They whimpered and cried out. Jiang Ping sighed and didn’t say anything. He stretched out his right hand and gathered his spiritual energy in his palm, creating a big pit in the open space not far away. The little girls were attracted by the sound of the explosion. They ignored Jiang Ping’s warning and turned around. They saw that the mother auspicious beast was no longer breathing. The three little ones were still whimpering and offering to their mother’s head. The three little girls were tacitly silent and didn’t say anything. Jiang Ping squatted by the side as if he was waiting Lei Jingyun looked at Jiang Ping’s actions and seemed to understand something. He walked up and said. “Usually, when a Dangkang is born, it needs two hours before it can open its eyes.” Jiang Ping nodded and said. “It’s okay. Then we’ll wait.” The three little girls also ran past Jiang Ping at the same time. They also imitated Jiang Ping and squatted down, looking at the three little auspicious beasts. About two hours later. The three auspicious beasts could open their eyes. They looked at their mother lying on the ground peacefully. The three little auspicious beasts that had stopped crying started to sob again. Jiang Ping said to the three little auspicious beasts. “This is your mother. The reason why I am waiting for you to open your eyes is that she is very great. I want you to remember what she looks like.” After saying that, he stood up. The three little auspicious beasts ran away one after another and turned around to look at their mother. It was as if they wanted to remember their mother’s entire appearance. Then, with a wave of Jiang Ping’s hand, the mother auspicious beast that had died due to dystocia appeared at the bottom of the pit. The three little beasts also jumped to the side of the pit. Jiang Ping said calmly. “A loving mother loves her child, not because she wants her child to repay her.” With another wave of his hand, the pit was filled with soil and buried the mother Dangkang Jiang Ping squatted down and said to the three little beasts. “Your mother let you follow me, so I will take good care of you.” “I also hope that you will listen to me, although I am not your mother and have no right to discipline you.” “But I just feel that you don’t want to disappoint her.” As he spoke about her, Jiang Ping extended his finger and pointed at the pile of dirt that had just been buried. The three little beasts seemed to understand Jiang Ping’s words. They surrounded Jiang Ping’s feet and used their heads to worship Jiang Ping Jiang Ping stood up and said to the three little girls and Lei Jingyun. “Come, let’s go back!” On the way back, the three little girls had been staring curiously at the three little Dangkangs. The three auspicious beasts were not afraid. Instead, they would run around the little girls from time to time and play with them. Lei Jingyun said to Jiang Ping with a big smile on his face. “Congratulations, Master. You’ve gained three Dangkang.” “When these three Dangkang grow up, their combat strength will be even higher than that of earth immortal realm cultivators.” Jiang Ping said indifferently. “I didn’t bring them with me so that they could fight for me.” “From now on, these three auspicious beasts are our family. Just like you and Qiu Chi, both of you are our family.” Lei Jingyun stopped in his tracks when he heard the last sentence. Even if he became an outer sect elder in the Chuanyun Sect, the sect master would not regard him as family. Lei Jingyun had always treated himself as a servant in the Jiang Mansion. Now that he heard the word “family”, he was about to burst into tears. Jiang Ping knew what Lei Jingyun was thinking at this moment, so he said without turning his head. “Old Lei, don’t think too lowly of yourself. If you don’t believe me, you can ask Wan’er.” When Wan’er’s name was suddenly mentioned, she asked somewhat blankly. “Ah! Ask what?” Jiang Ping said with a chuckle. “I’m asking if Old Uncle Lei is considered a family member in your heart!” Wan’er said loudly. “Of course, he is. There’s also Auntie Sushang and Uncle Qiu. Aren’t they all our family!” Yan’er and Liu’er, who were beside, quickly agreed. Lei Jingyun was overjoyed. He thought of something and struck while the iron was hot. “Then Wan’er, can you stop hitting my head in the future?” Wan’er answered seriously. “I can be gentler.” Lei Jingyun almost stumbled after hearing that. Jiang Ping patted Lei Jingyun’s shoulder and laughed loudly. After returning to the resting point, Li Sushang and Qiu Chi saw that a few of them had returned with three wild boars. Qiu Chi then asked. “Eh, what’s with these three ugly wild boars?” Jiang Ping hurriedly stopped him from continuing “You have to be careful with your words. These three little things can understand human language.” Qiu Chi lowered his head and looked at the three auspicious beasts in disbelief. He only saw that the three Dangkangs were staring at him fiercely. That gaze seemed to have a deep blood feud with him. Liu’er saw this and hurriedly scared Qiu Chi. “Quick, quickly apologize. Otherwise, they will eat you later.” Although Qiu Chi was skeptical, he still admitted defeat. He squatted down, clasped his hands together, and faced the three little things. He apologized respectfully. Liu’er and the two little girls covered their mouths and laughed. After the carriage was set up, they all got into the carriage. Qiu Chi shook the reins, and the carriage continued to move forward. In the carriage, the three little girls and the three little fellows were playing together. They were having a lot of fun. Suddenly Wan’er spoke. “Daddy, can I keep one? I like them very much.” Jiang Ping raised his chin and beckoned at the three little fellows. “You have to ask them. It’s not up to me.” Wan’er lowered her head and asked seriously. “Do any of you like me too?” The three little Dangkangs surrounded one another and squeaked. Then, one of them was pushed out by the other two. The auspicious beast that was pushed out slowly walked towards Wan’er. When it reached Wan’er’s feet, it stretched out its head and caressed Wan’er’s instep. Wan’er happily carried him up. “Good! From now on, you’ll follow me!” When Yan’er and Liu’er saw this, they wanted to have one as well. They looked at Jiang Ping, and he pointed at the remaining two. Then, she imitated Wan’er and asked the two of them. “Are there any of you willing to follow me?” Then, the other beasts each chose a little girl. They walked over and rubbed against the instep of their feet, just like Wan’er’s. Jiang Ping saw that his three daughters were all holding an auspicious beast in their arms, and he said to them solemnly. “You have to think carefully. This is not as simple as raising pets. You have to treat them like family.” The three little girls nodded seriously at Jiang Ping. Then, Lei Jingyun said to everyone. “Since they are family, they should have a name. Ladies, why don’t you try to give them a name?” Yan’er was the first to raise her hand. “I’ll go first, I’ll go first!” “Since you were born in the mountain forest, I’ll give you the name ‘Mountain Stream’!” Yan’er raised the auspicious beast in her hand and said to it. The auspicious beast seemed to be very satisfied with its name and made a gurgling sound. Lei Jingyun gave it a thumbs up. “This name sounds nice and has a meaning.” Then, he looked at Wan’er and Liu’er. Liu’er was the second to raise her hand and looked at the auspicious beast in her hand. She quickly thought of something and said. “Looking at the gray fur all over its body, I think it should be called ‘Little Gray’.” Then, she turned her head to look at the crowd and asked. “How is it?” Lei Jingyun gave a far-fetched compliment. “This is also a good name. It sounds… playful!” Jiang Ping didn’t say anything and thought to himself. Old Lei was great at praising. He could even use words like “playful”. The name Little Gray was just like how he named his yellow dog, Little Yellow in his previous life… Liu’er was very satisfied with the name she gave Little Gray. She raised Little Gray high and giggled. After that, everyone looked at Wan’er. Wan’er was blushing. She wasn’t as literate as Yan’er, nor was she as eccentric as Liu’er. Just thinking of a name was enough to hold her back for a long time. At this moment, she really regretted that she did not study properly in school. Jiang Ping saw that Wan’er could not think of anything for a while, so he helped her out. “It’s alright. There’s still a long way to go. Let’s think about it slowly.” At this moment, Wan’er seemed to have settled down and said. “It’s called ‘Bamboo’.” “I named it ‘Bamboo’.” After Jiang Ping and Lei Jingyun heard it, they were both very curious as to why she chose such an unrelated name. However, Wan’er only replied. “I think the name sounds great.” Actually, it was because the little girl had just regretted not studying seriously in school, and she recalled how she had met the young Taoist priest, He Xiangjiang in the academy. The little girl had a deep impression of the young Taoist priest’s strange behavior of staring at the bamboo that day. That was why she had blurted out the word “Bamboo”. The auspicious beast in Wan’er’s hand happily rubbed against Wan’er’s palm. Jiang Ping saw that Wan’er and Bamboo liked this name very much, so he didn’t ask any further. At this moment, Li Sushang spoke from the side. She asked Jiang Ping. “Is there any way that these three auspicious beasts can follow the three little girls without being seen by others?” “Otherwise, if we bring these three auspicious beasts out on the streets, I’m afraid that if someone sees them, it will be troublesome.” The three little auspicious beasts understood Li Sushang’s words. When they heard that they would bring trouble to the three little girls, they all lowered their heads… Jiang Ping smiled knowingly. “I’ve thought of this long ago.” Then, he took out three bracelets from his storage space. These were the signing rewards that he received from the system last night. That was why the system was really hard to figure out. Usually, it was just spirit stones. Once it gave something strange, it was a sign that something was going to happen. Jiang Ping handed the three bracelets to the three little girls. “These three bracelets are a storage space that can hold living things.” “Wear them on your hands and use your spiritual energy to activate them. Then, you can use the storage space freely.” After saying that, Jiang Ping said to the three auspicious beasts. “In the future, when you are outside, you can only stay in the storage space.” The three little beasts nodded slightly. Their expression was firm. As if they were saying that they would not feel aggrieved. After the three little girls put on the bracelets, they used their spiritual energy to activate them. With a thought, they put the three little auspicious beasts into the storage space. Then with a thought, the three little auspicious beasts turned into a stream of light and came out of the storage space. The three of them thought it was very magical and called it fun. Then, they tried to put other things into the storage space. They were never tired of it. Jiang Ping smiled when he saw the little girls’ playful behavior. In Longyan Town, in a particular inn. The old Taoist priest entered the room with a pot of wine in his hand. Then, he woke up his disciple. He Xiangjiang sat up in a daze. Then, he asked. “Are we leaving?” The old Taoist priest nodded. “Hurry up, or we won’t reach the next stop even if it’s dark.” He Xiangjiang quickly got up and packed his things. He saw that the clothes he had changed out of in the morning were neatly placed on the table. He Xiangjiang picked up the folded clothes. He asked. “Master, you washed these clothes for me?” The old Taoist priest smiled. “Did you think that your little lover washed them for you?” He Xiangjiang was puzzled. “Lover? What lover!” Seeing that he had spilled the beans, the old Taoist priest hurriedly laughed. “It’s nothing. I was just talking nonsense.” “Hurry up and pack up. We’ll take the official road. Hurry up.” He Xiangjiang smiled and thanked his master. Then, he packed his clothes and headed to the next stop. By the time Jiang Ping and the others reached the next stop, it was already dark. When they reached the city gate, Wan’er stuck her head out of the window. She pointed at the signboard on the city gate and read. “Yellow, and what city!” Jiang Ping replied unhappily. “Yellow Clouds City. I’ll let you read more books.” The little girl interrupted with a chuckle. “Daddy, are we staying here tonight?” Jiang Ping nodded. Then, just as the carriage was about to enter the city. A few guards blocked the way. The guards who blocked the way were also polite. They went forward and cupped their hands. “Everyone, because the city was attacked by an unknown cultivator a few days ago, we have to carefully inspect the people who are not from Yellow Clouds City. No offense.” Jiang Ping opened the curtain of the carriage. “It’s okay. Brother, if you need our cooperation, just say it.” “We will cooperate.” The guard who led the conversation cupped his fists at Jiang Ping again. After the inspection, Jiang Ping returned to the carriage. Li Sushang said uneasily. “There won’t be any more problems, right?” Jiang Ping shook his head. “I don’t know, but we will stay for one night and leave tomorrow morning. We won’t cause any trouble.” Li Sushang nodded. Jiang Ping found an inn where they could stay. He also asked the waiter for some information. “What happened in this city? Why are the guards at the gate so strict?” The waiter was busy with miscellaneous work at that time. Therefore, he didn’t pay attention to Jiang Ping. Seeing this, Jiang Ping tactfully took out a piece of broken silver from his pouch. The waiter, who was greedy for money, immediately told the truth. It was said that a few days ago, an unknown cultivator attacked the eastern district of Yellow Clouds City at night. All the forces in the city didn’t react in time. When it passed, only ruins were left. Jiang Ping asked the waiter if he knew the truth about the attack. The waiter shrugged. He said that he only knew these. If he wanted to know more, he could ask the mayor, but the mayor had to agree. Of course, he would not ask the mayor. After all, he was only passing by for one night. He did not care about what the place would become. Jiang Ping smiled and thanked the waiter. Then, he led everyone to the second floor to choose a room. After choosing a room, Lei Jingyun knocked on Jiang Ping’s door. He asked if Jiang Ping needed him to go to the mayor’s mansion to ask around. Jiang Ping didn’t agree and said it was better not to cause trouble. Then he told Lei Jingyun to look after the little girls tonight and make sure they didn’t go out and run around. Lei Jingyun said okay and left. Lei Jingyun came to the three little girls’ rooms. He saw that the three little girls had just put the three auspicious beasts back into their bracelets and then wanted to go out and play. Lei Jingyun hurriedly stopped them. He also passed on Jiang Ping’s words to the three little girls. Yellow Clouds City was more than twice the size of Fusheng City. It was the first time the three little girls had seen such a big city. They definitely had to have a good time, so the three little girls sat around the table with sad faces and didn’t say a word. After Jiang Ping’s family had dinner, they went back to their rooms early to sleep. However, He Xiangjiang and his master arrived at the city gate at this time. It was late at night, and because of the attack on Yellow Clouds City. The city gate had been closed long ago. The master and disciple looked at the city gate and exchanged glances. “Master, what should we do?” The old Taoist priest said in a bad mood. “It’s all because of you. You didn’t come back at night and had to sleep in broad daylight.” He Xiangjiang didn’t refute and admitted that he was in the wrong. “Then who would have thought that this city gate would be closed so early?” “What’s wrong with Yellow Clouds City? According to the regular opening and closing time of the city gate, it will close between 1 am and 3 am, but it will always open between 5 am to 7 am!” The old Taoist priest looked at the city gate and said. “There’s nothing we can do. Tonight, the two of us can only spend the night outside the city gate.” He Xiangjiang had no other choice but to agree. Then, the master and disciple found a relatively clean place at the foot of the city wall and sat down against the city wall. The people in Yellow Clouds City fell asleep one after another. Only the mayor’s mansion was brightly lit. A middle-aged man sat at the main seat in the mayor’s mansion. The middle-aged man was tall and wore a scholarly robe. He looked very much like a teacher in a school. In the hall, other than the middle-aged man, there were also representatives of the major forces in Yellow Clouds City. The middle-aged man frowned and shouted in the hall. “I don’t care what disputes you have.” “This matter concerns the survival of Yellow Clouds City. If you are not willing to lower yourselves and work together.” “Then the forces that you have worked hard to cultivate and maintain will be destroyed together with Yellow Clouds City!” These words were clearly aimed at the leaders of Yellow Clouds City. These gang representatives, who usually flaunted their might, did not say a word at this moment. This was because ever since the eastern district of Yellow Clouds City had been attacked, the culprit had not been found. A large part of the reason was that most of these factions did not like each other. Usually, they fought tooth and nail for some benefits. They simply cannot put aside their dissatisfaction with each other to cooperate, so they delay the progress… The leaders looked at each other. The mayor Lu Zhiheng, who was sitting in the main seat was a little angry. He slapped the armrest of the chair and shattered it. “Are you all mute!” Zhou Nan, the sect master of the first-rate Red Robe Gang in Yellow Clouds City, stood up. He cupped his fists and said to Mayor Lu Zhiheng. “Mayor, it’s not that we don’t want to, it’s just that the eastern district has been destroyed.” “How can we find out? The cleverest housewife cannot cook without rice.” As soon as he said that, Lu Yuxiang, the sect master of the Dragon Spring Sect, who was also a first-rate force in Yellow Clouds City, also stood up. “It’s not that we don’t have any clues.” “When the eastern district was attacked that night, a disciple of our Dragon Spring Sect happened to witness the scene of the attack.” “According to what the disciple of our Dragon Spring Sect saw, the person who attacked was at least at the earth immortal realm.” Zhou Nan snorted coldly. “Lu Yuxiang, what do you mean?” Lu Yuxiang curled the corner of his mouth. “What? You don’t allow our Dragon Spring Sect to find clues that the Red Robe Gang can’t find?” Zhou Nan side-eyed Lu Yuxiang and said. “Do you know what you’re talking about?” “You’re talking about the earth immortal realm. Do you think the earth immortal realm is like cabbages?” “That they are everywhere!” Lu Yuxiang said in a weird tone. “Oh? Sect Master Zhou, you mean you already know who the murderer is?” Zhou Nan roared angrily. “You!” Lu Zhiheng, who was sitting on the main seat, scolded. “If you guys continue to quarrel, I’ll kill you and throw you out of the city!” As expected, after the mayor spoke, Lu Yuxiang and Zhou Nan obediently sat back down. They were not the only ones who did not dare to provoke the mayor. Everyone present did not dare to provoke Lu Zhiheng. This was because the mayor, Lu Zhiheng, was a cultivator at the middle stage of the earth immortal realm. Although they were also in the earth immortal realm, they were only at the initial stage of the earth immortal realm. In the realm above the nascent soul realm, the difference between every three minor realms could only be described as the difference between clouds and mud. After an ordinary person attained the earth immortal realm, their advancement would become extremely slow. Lu Zhiheng coughed twice and then asked Lu Yuxiang. “Yuxiang, are you serious about what you said about the person who attacked them being at least at the earth immortal realm?” Lu Yuxiang, who had just sat down, stood up again. “Yes, I didn’t hide anything from you.” Lu Zhiheng raised his teacup, but he didn’t drink it. Instead, he rubbed the teacup with his fingers. After a while. Finally, Lu Zhiheng opened his mouth. “Pass down my order. From today onwards, the entire city will be on alert. You are only allowed to enter, and you are not allowed to leave!” Everyone in the hall shouted in unison. “Yes!” Then, with a wave of Lu Zhiheng’s sleeve, the representatives of the leading forces in Yellow Clouds City all left. Zhou Nan also stood up and was about to leave. Lu Yuxiang was still sitting in the same spot, holding his teacup with a smile on his face. When he passed by Lu Yuxiang’s seat, Zhou Nan snorted coldly. Then he flung his hand and left. After Zhou Nan had walked far away, Lu Yuxiang stopped drinking tea and revealed a meaningful smile. Then, he stood up and walked out of the hall. The sky was just beginning to brighten. The master and disciple who had slept outside the city gate the whole night were extremely hungry. He Xiangjiang had been squatting at the city gate since early in the morning, hoping that the city gate would open. When the city gate opened, He Xiangjiang hurriedly woke up the old Taoist priest. “Master, Master, I’m hungry. Quick, quick, the city gate is open. Let’s go into the city to eat something before we set off.” The old Taoist priest’s stomach was also growling Then, the master and disciple walked into the city gate. After entering the city gate, the master and disciple discovered something unusual. Why were there so many guards guarding the city gate? The master and disciple were so hungry that they did not have time to think carefully. They entered the city and found a breakfast shop. They bought a few steamed buns and a big bag of bean juice from the boss and began to wolf down the food. While he was eating halfway, He Xiangjiang found that the bulletin board in the city was surrounded by many people, and there were noisy discussions. “Master, what’s going on over there? Why are there so many people?” He Xiangjiang gnawed on a steamed bun and looked at the bulletin board. The old Taoist priest paid no attention to it and only focused on gnawing on the steamed bun. Seeing that his master did not react, He Xiangjiang spoke again. “Why don’t we go over and take a look?” The old Taoist priest waved his hand in disdain. “If you want to go, go by yourself. How old are you? You still like to join in the fun.” He Xiangjiang could only gnaw on the steamed bun as he walked towards the bulletin board. Before he reached the bulletin board, he heard the discussions of the crowd. “On what basis? Why can’t we leave?” “That’s right, that’s right. I still have to go back to my parents’ house.” “Is it because of the attack on the eastern district a while ago?” “Who knows? Anyway, it’s great now. Once you enter, you can’t leave.” When He Xiangjiang heard the discussion, he became even more curious. He wanted to go to the bulletin board to take a look. But unfortunately, the young Taoist priest had never cultivated before. Facing a human wall formed by a group of adults, no matter how hard the young Taoist priest tried, he could not get in. The young Taoist priest could only give up and gently patted a person’s arm. “Uncle, I can’t squeeze in. Can you tell me what is on the bulletin board?” “Oh! The general meaning of the bulletin board is that from today onwards, people are only allowed to enter Yellow Clouds City, but no one is allowed to leave.” He Xiangjiang exclaimed in surprise. Then he politely thanked the middle-aged man who had answered his question. Then, he hurriedly ran back to the old Taoist priest’s side. “Master, Master, this is bad!” The old Taoist priest rolled his eyes at the young Taoist priest who was running towards him. “What’s the matter? The bulletin board says that the world is going to be destroyed?” He Xiangjiang said unhappily. “No!” Then, he repeated what the middle-aged man had told him to the old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest only responded with an “oh” calmly. He Xiangjiang said a little angrily. “Oh? Master, didn’t you say that we have to hurry on our way? Now that we can’t leave Yellow Clouds City, how can we catch up with the ferry?” The old Taoist priest dug his ears and said. “Then should we force our way out?” He Xiangjiang was dissatisfied. “Master, don’t joke anymore.” The old Taoist priest yawned. “Since we can’t get out, then let’s just take it as it is. Why don’t we find an inn and sleep in peace?” “I didn’t sleep well last night leaning against the city wall. I need to catch up on my sleep.” Without waiting for He Xiangjiang to agree, he stood up and wanted to find an inn. After the old Taoist priest took two steps, He Xiangjiang looked at his open-hearted master, who was indifferent. Feeling helpless, he sighed and finished the last two mouthfuls of steamed bun. Then, he followed him. On this day, Jiang Ping got up and planned to go downstairs to find the waiter to prepare breakfast for the group. When he went downstairs, he saw the waiter putting up a notice at the entrance of the inn. Jiang Ping first greeted him. Then, he asked the waiter to prepare breakfast. But the waiter said to him. “Master, you only paid the room fee for one night. If you still want to stay for the next few days, you have to inform us in advance.” Jiang Ping shook his head. “No, we’ll leave the city after breakfast.” The waiter smiled awkwardly. “Maybe you won’t be able to leave the city today…” Jiang Ping looked at the waiter in confusion. The waiter stretched out his hand and pointed at the notice he had just posted at the entrance of the inn. Jiang Ping moved closer to take a look. The more he looked down, the tighter his eyebrows became. In the end, his two eyebrows seemed to have been knitted together. After Jiang Ping finished reading, he stood where he was and thought for a moment. Then, he turned around and asked the waiter. “Is there any explanation for the sudden lockdown of the city? What caused it?” The waiter shrugged and spread out his hands. “How would I know? How would we, the commoners, know about the notice given by the mayor’s mansion?” “But when I went to the market to stock up earlier, I heard everyone talking about it.” “They said that the lockdown of the city this time was most likely because of the destruction of the eastern district some time ago.” Jiang Ping nodded and asked the waiter to prepare breakfast first. Then, he gave the waiter some money in advance. He said that if he continued to stay in the inn, he could deduct the fees from it. If he didn’t, he would inform the inn. After explaining, Jiang Ping took the stairs and went up to the inn’s second floor. He knocked on the door of Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi’s room, but Jiang Ping didn’t go in. He just told them to get dressed and come to his room. Jiang Ping sat in the room until Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi came in. Jiang Ping let them take their seats. After the two of them sat down, Qiu Chi picked up the teapot and poured a cup of tea. Then Lei Jingyun asked. “Master, what’s so urgent?” Jiang Ping told them what was written on the notice and the conversation with the waiter. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi listened carefully. The more they listened, the more they frowned, just like Jiang Ping just now. After Jiang Ping finished, he asked them what they thought. Qiu Chi shook his head and said he would follow the arrangement. Lei Jingyun took the teapot in front of Qiu Chi and poured himself a cup of tea. He didn’t forget to fill the cup in front of Jiang Ping. “Master, I think it’s not impossible to solve this problem.” “We can go to the mayor’s mansion and explain the situation to him.” “You’re at the earth immortal realm after all. He wouldn’t dare to disrespect you.” Jiang Ping nodded. “I thought so too, but I’m afraid that the mayor has no consideration of others’ feelings.” “So I called you two here to discuss with you.” “After all, we’re in a hurry this time. If we miss the ferry, we’ll have to wait for at least a month.” “If we can’t negotiate with the mayor’s mansion, then we might have to be impolite…” Seeing that Jiang Ping didn’t continue, Lei Jingyun guessed. “Force our way out?” Jiang Ping nodded. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun obviously had no objections. Therefore, the three of them were not asking for each other’s opinions in this conversation. Instead, they were discussing with each other so that they could be prepared. Then, Jiang Ping said to the two of them. “I’ll go to the mayor’s mansion in a while.” “The two of you will wander around Yellow Clouds City and try your best to find out the combat strength of the major sects in this city.” “If we really have to force our way out, we must know ourselves and our enemy.” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi replied in unison. However, Jiang Ping told them not to be in a hurry. It was not too late to take action after eating breakfast. The three of them headed downstairs together. At this moment, the three little girls were dragged out of the room by Li Sushang. It seemed that the three little girls were obviously half awake. They came down unwillingly to eat breakfast. At the dining table, Jiang Ping looked at the three little girls’ listless expressions. He stuffed a steamed bun into each of their mouths. “Hurry up and eat. After you finish eating, you can go back to sleep.” Wan’er said weakly when she thought of the fact that she still had to hurry on the road after eating “How can I fall asleep when the carriage is so bumpy?” Jiang Ping told the three little girls that they wouldn’t be able to leave for the time being today. He told them that they could go back to their rooms and continue to rest after eating. The three little girls’ eyes lit up. Liu’er asked Jiang Ping again if what he said was true. Jiang Ping nodded. Then he said to Li Sushang and the three little girls. “After you finish eating, go back to your rooms and stay there.” “Sushang, keep an eye on them. Don’t let them go out and run around.” Li Sushang nodded and said she understood. After everyone finished eating, Jiang Ping nodded to Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi, and the three of them walked out of the inn. The three little girls couldn’t wait to go back to their rooms to sleep. After the three of them left the inn, they went their separate ways. Not far after Jiang Ping walked out of the inn, he heard a familiar voice behind him. “Master, wait for me!” He turned around and saw an old Taoist priest walking in front of him, taking the lead to enter the inn. Behind him was a young Taoist priest carrying a bag. Jiang Ping looked at the back of the young Taoist priest and felt a little familiar. But he didn’t think too much about it. Because the most important thing right now was to go to the mayor’s mansion. The master and disciple walked into the inn where Jiang Ping was staying The old Taoist priest spoke to the waiter. “Little brother, we will be staying in the inn. Are there any vacant rooms now?” The waiter smiled and said that there were. He Xiangjiang continued. “Two rooms!” “We want two rooms.” He Xiangjiang thought of the scene of the old Taoist priest grinding his teeth, snoring, and talking in his sleep. He thought to himself that he wouldn’t save this money no matter what. He has to have two rooms. Otherwise, in the end, he won’t be able to sleep well and will be blamed. The waiter apologized to the master and disciple and said. “I’m really sorry. Yesterday a group of customers came to the inn and there were men, women, old and young. They asked for six rooms at once, so we only have one room left.” He Xiangjiang said with a frown. The old Taoist priest urged He Xiangjiang to take out the money. “Hurry up. There are so many inns ahead, but there are no vacant rooms. Since there are rooms here, what does it matter if it’s crowded?” “As your master, I won’t despise you.” He Xiangjiang reluctantly took out his pouch from his bag. “But I despise you.” Although he said he despised his master, he still obediently paid the money. Yellow Clouds City was considered a city with frequent business transactions. Every day, there would be people from other places swarming into the city. Because of the sudden lockdown of the city, many people who were going to leave the city today could not leave, so they could only continue to stay in the inns. Thus, the master and disciple had gone to a few inns, but all of them had no more empty rooms. Although there were many inns in Yellow Clouds City, the master and disciple did not want to go around anymore. After paying the fee, the waiter brought them upstairs On Jiang Ping’s side, it was his first time in Yellow Clouds City, so he was not familiar with the roads. At this time, it was not convenient to fly to the sky to find the way. It would be easy to become the focus of everyone’s attention. Therefore, Jiang Ping could only ask for directions as he walked. “Hello, Big Brother. Which direction is the mayor’s mansion?” Jiang Ping gently patted a man’s shoulder. The man did not directly answer Jiang Ping’s question. Instead, he narrowed his eyes and looked at him for a while before asking. “Why do you want to go to the mayor’s mansion?” The man became curious instead. “The mayor has already ordered the city to be on lockdown. What’s the use of discussing?” Jiang Ping replied. “I have to try.” The man started to feel that Jiang Ping was more and more interesting. He told Jiang Ping that he would lead the way. On the way, the man told Jiang Ping that his name was Lu Yuxiang. He was the sect master of the Dragon Spring Sect in Yellow Clouds City. Jiang Ping was not surprised. Because of the aura that Lu Yuxiang exuded. Jiang Ping had long known that this person must have a great background. Seeing Jiang Ping’s calm reaction, Lu Yuxiang confirmed his guess. A person who dared to go to the mayor’s mansion at this juncture, even if he was not the head of a large sect. He was still a cultivator with decent cultivation. Lu Yuxiang brought Jiang Ping to the gate of the mayor’s mansion and said with a smile. “This is the mayor’s mansion. I still have important matters to attend to, so it’s not convenient for me to send you in.” Jiang Ping nodded and cupped his fists to express his thanks. Lu Yuxiang greeted the guards of the mayor’s mansion. He told Jiang Ping to go directly into the hall and wait. Jiang Ping was brought into the hall by the guards. However, Lu Yuxiang did not leave at this time. Instead, he was at the gate of the mayor’s mansion and used his spiritual energy to secretly investigate. Before Jiang Ping stepped into the hall, he removed the spell that concealed his cultivation. After all, he was here to talk. No matter what, he had to make people look him in the eye in order to have the right to speak. That was why Jiang Ping revealed his cultivation as soon as he came in so that he would not be sent back before he even met the mayor. Lu Yuxiang noticed the cultivation that Jiang Ping had released when he entered the hall. He was secretly delighted. Only then did he walk towards the Dragon Spring Sect with satisfaction. Jiang Ping waited in the hall. The guards of the mayor’s mansion saw that Jiang Ping was a big shot in the earth immortal realm. So they served him nicely. The tea leaves they used were the ones that their mayor usually used to entertain distinguished guests. Jiang Ping lifted the lid of the teacup and used the lid to scrape away the tea dust. He took a sip. Then he stopped drinking. After all, Jiang Ping didn’t usually drink tea, so he couldn’t taste the quality of the tea leaves. He drank a sip because he didn’t want the guards to gossip about him. Saying that he was arrogant. Soon, the mayor of the mayor’s mansion, Lu Zhiheng, walked in from the hall. Lu Zhiheng did not sit at the main seat. Instead, he sat on the chair to the right of Jiang Ping “Sir, I heard that you have something to discuss with me?” Before he entered the door, Lu Zhiheng had already sensed Jiang Ping’s cultivation. They were both in the earth immortal realm, but he was in the middle stage, which was a small realm higher than Jiang Ping. However, he could not be rude to a guest who came from afar. Lu Zhiheng asked Jiang Ping respectfully. Jiang Ping first smiled and cupped his fists at Lu Zhiheng. Then, he said. “There is indeed something to discuss.” “Mayor, I’m here to talk about the city’s lockdown.” Lu Zhiheng was a little vigilant. At the moment, locking down the city was an extremely sensitive matter. The person in front of him could not be a hothead, right. Moreover, Jiang Ping was in the earth immortal realm. According to Lu Yuxiang, the person who attacked was in the earth immortal realm. Therefore, the smile on Lu Zhiheng’s originally smiling face suddenly disappeared. Jiang Ping continued to speak. “My family and I just arrived in the city yesterday. We wanted to leave today and continue on our journey.” “But I didn’t expect that the whole city was talking about the matter of the city gate being closed.” “However, we’re in a hurry now, and we don’t dare to barge through the city gate directly. I’m afraid we’ll offend the mayor.” “Therefore, my visit today is to ask if the city gate can open for us and let us leave.” The mayor, Lu Zhiheng, forced a smile on his face. “Brother Jiang, I can’t decide on this matter.” “This is the result of discussion among the major forces in the city.” “Seeing that you’re also a practical person, I’ll tell you the truth.” “The main reason for locking down the city this time is because of the attack on the eastern district. According to the relevant clues, the person who attacked was at least at the earth immortal realm…” Lu Zhiheng did not need to say anything else. Jiang Ping had already understood the meaning behind Lu Zhiheng’s words. The person who attacked was in the earth immortal realm, and he was also in the earth immortal realm, so he was also included as a suspect. Therefore, it was not convenient for Lu Zhiheng to show mercy. Jiang Ping spoke again. “We just entered the city yesterday.” “Mayor, if you don’t believe me, you can ask the guards guarding the city gate.” However, Lu Zhiheng did not feel anything when he heard this explanation. He rejected Jiang Ping. “Brother Jiang, I just told you that the eastern district was attacked.” “Even if you say that you’ve never been to Yellow Clouds City, it still doesn’t make sense. After all, the murderer hasn’t been caught yet. You suddenly appeared and told me that you want to leave the city.” “Even if I agree, the representatives of the other forces also have to agree with me.” “When that time comes, how can I continue to be the mayor?” Lu Zhiheng had lost his patience. As he spoke, he stopped suppressing his cultivation at the middle stage of the earth immortal realm. He wanted Jiang Ping to back off. After Jiang Ping understood, he stood up and bowed to Lu Zhiheng again. “Since it’s difficult, I won’t bother you anymore.” After saying that, he turned to leave. Lu Zhiheng also stood up and smiled. After Jiang Ping walked out of the mansion, Lu Zhiheng beckoned for his guards. “Send a few people to keep an eye on him. I want you to report his every move in the city.” The guard knelt on one knee and was about to take action after receiving the order. Then, Lu Zhiheng stopped him. “Remember to bring an artifact that can shield your aura. That person is in the earth immortal realm. It’s best to be careful.” After saying that, he waved his hand to dismiss the guard. After Jiang Ping left the mayor’s mansion, he did not return to the inn directly. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun were gathering intelligence at this time, so he had nothing to do when he returned. Therefore, Jiang Ping planned to take a walk in the eastern district. He wanted to see how bad the situation was in the attacked eastern district, which made the entire city care so much. Jiang Ping still asked for directions to the eastern district. Since the day of the attack, the eastern district had been sealed off, and no one was allowed to enter or leave. When he was about to arrive, a guard had already stood out to stop Jiang Ping from continuing forward. Jiang Ping had no choice but to change direction. However, Jiang Ping did not leave. Instead, he used some tricks to conceal himself for a short period of time and sneaked in when the guards were not paying attention. After Jiang Ping disappeared from where he was, a few spies who had followed Jiang Ping out of the mayor’s mansion hurriedly rushed out. Those spies guessed that Jiang Ping must have sneaked into the eastern district. Thus, they discussed and a group of people followed, while another group stood in place and waited for orders. Standing in front of the pile of ruins. Jiang Ping fell silent. It wasn’t because of the power that the person who ambushed them had caused to the eastern district. It was because Jiang Ping saw the collapsed buildings and charred roads that were beyond recognition. Bodies were lying on the ground. These corpses had been burned to the point where it was impossible to tell if they were men or women. However, judging from their bodies, there were old and young among these people who had died tragically. Jiang Ping was secretly distressed as he muttered to himself. “Heaven and earth are inhumane, treating all living things as insignificant. The emperor is inhumane, and the common people are treated like straw dogs.” This was the world. As long as you were strong enough, you could control the life and death of these ants. Other than those who were ants, no other cultivator would feel that this was inappropriate. However, Jiang Ping was a little angry. He turned around and walked back. When he reached the checkpoint, Jiang Ping used a concealing spell to deceive the guards and left. In the inn, the old Taoist priest promised He Xiangjiang that he would sleep after he fell asleep. Perhaps he was frightened by the old Taoist priest’s snoring. He Xiangjiang fell asleep right after he touched the bed. The old Taoist priest took out a stick of incense and lit it, letting it burn slowly. The smell of incense drifted in the room. He Xiangjiang slept even more deeply… Then the old Taoist priest quietly walked out of the door. Standing at the inn’s door, the old Taoist priest hesitated for a moment, not knowing which direction to go. So he took out three copper coins from his pocket. He squatted down and threw the three copper coins on the ground. Then he picked up the three copper coins again and threw them out again. After doing it six times in a row, the old Taoist priest stood up and resolutely walked towards a road. After that, every time the old Taoist priest passed by an intersection. He would take out the copper coins. Then he would throw it six times. Every time he stood up, he would pick a path without hesitation and walk away. After Jiang Ping left, the old Taoist priest also arrived in the eastern district. However, the path the old Taoist priest took was very hidden. Even people who had lived in the city since they were young might not be able to find this path. Because in theory, this path was not considered a path… The old Taoist priest climbed up from a well that had been dry for a long time. When he was on solid ground. The old Taoist priest stretched his body before he began to look around. Looking around, the old Taoist priest frowned. His expression was a little sad and indignant. After getting close to the corpses, he was a little confused. Then, the old Taoist priest took out a small bowl from somewhere and lit a few incense sticks. He took down the wine jug at his waist and poured wine into the small bowl. Then, he lit the incense and candles. He muttered to himself. The man rode the white crane, and the woman rode the Green Luan. It was a carefree and never-night day, a quiet and ever-bright place. He prayed and was welcomed by the merciful light of the east pole. Elder Nandan pointed to the path of the clouds to reincarnate. Returning to the world of 3,000 gold, where one would always be safe and happy. The twelve Jade Towers of Tianjing, where one would live… What the old Taoist priest chanted was the mantra of salvation that belonged to his sect. The old Taoist priest, who could not bear to see the suffering of the human world, saw the corpses one after another. The old man’s expression was sorrowful. After he finished chanting the mantra, the old Taoist priest slowly stood up. His gaze was firm as he surveyed the surroundings again. Only then did he slowly climb down the dry well. After Jiang Ping returned to the inn, he entered his own room. His fingers tapped on the table as if he was planning something. Around the afternoon, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi hurried back. The two of them had been on the move for a whole day for the same purpose. It was to find out the background of Yellow Clouds City. Qiu Chi depended on his approachable face to ask around Addressing everyone as brothers, and then slowly got the information out of them. Lei Jingyun went to the teahouse where people gathered and talked after they had eaten their fill. At that place, Lei Jingyun just sat and listened to the topics discussed by the people in the teahouse. If they talked about topics that he wanted to find out about, Lei Jingyun would sit down and order a pot of tea or a plate of pastries for the table. Then he would listen to their conversation. Jiang Ping knew that the two of them had not eaten lunch all day outside, so he had the waiter prepare pastries and put them on the table early. As soon as Qiu Chi entered the door, he picked up the pastries and ate them. However, Lei Jingyun, who had stayed in the teahouse for half a day, saw the pastries. Then, he moved the pastries further away from him, afraid that he would feel nauseous. Lei Jingyun first opened his mouth to ask Jiang Ping “Master, how are things on your side?” He knew that as long as Jiang Ping’s side went smoothly, their investigation wouldn’t be very important. However, Jiang Ping shook his head. Then, he told the two of them about what had happened at the mayor’s mansion today. Lei Jingyun stroked his beard with his two fingers and pondered. Jiang Ping asked the two of them. “What about you two?” After Qiu Chi drank a large cup of tea, he told them about the information he had gathered today. The information on the situation that Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi had gathered was about the same. Therefore, while Qiu Chi was talking, Lei Jingyun was on the side to fill in the gaps. There were only three first-rate forces in Yellow Clouds City. The rest were either unrated forces. Or they were affiliated with these three forces. These four forces were the Red Robe Gang, the Heaven’s Gate Sect, and the Dragon Spring Sect. Of course, this did not include the mayor’s mansion, which could cover the sky with one hand. Besides the Heaven’s Gate Sect, the other two leaders of these three forces were at the initial stage of the earth immortal realm. The Red Robe Gang and the Dragon Spring Sect had never been on good terms with each other. The two forces would often fight whenever they saw each other. Although the sect master of the Heaven’s Gate Sect was at the nascent soul realm’s divine baby cultivation, he was good at doing business. The Heaven’s Gate Sect also relied on doing business, so its position in the first-rate forces was more stable than the other two. After Jiang Ping heard this, he held his chin and thought. Lei Jingyun asked. “What do you mean?” Jiang Ping was also in a difficult situation. Because the opponent’s lineup was not weak, and if he successfully broke out of the city. The suspicious mayor would definitely think that he was the murderer of the attack. Therefore, his group would definitely be hunted down. Moreover, Jiang Ping had his family with him, so he couldn’t run far. After Jiang Ping told the two of them what he was thinking, everyone fell silent. A moment later, Qiu Chi said helplessly. “We can’t even run away. If we stay here, we’ll be delayed. What can we do?” Jiang Ping let the two of them go back to their rooms to rest, saying that he was thinking of a solution. The guards from the mayor’s mansion followed Jiang Ping into the inn. They also saw Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi following him. One of them went back to the mayor’s mansion to report. The rest stayed behind to observe. When the guard who went back to report was about to arrive at the mayor’s mansion, Lu Yuxiang walked out of his Dragon Spring Sect with a smile. Then, he also walked towards the mayor’s mansion. “Report!” Lu Zhiheng called the guard who came back to report to the hall. The guard reported where he had followed Jiang Ping today. Jiang Ping’s every move was clearly reported. Lu Zhiheng’s eyes narrowed slightly as he asked. “He went to the eastern district?” “Yes, that person was already stopped by the guard on the way to the eastern district.” “Then, he used an unknown spell to sneak in.” Lu Zhiheng was confused. Normally, normal people would not go near the eastern district at this time to avoid trouble. Just as Lu Zhiheng was deep in thought, Lu Yuxiang stepped into the hall and shouted. “Mayor, I have sent someone to gather some information. I feel that it is rather suspicious, but I can’t be sure, so I came to discuss it with you.” Lu Yuxiang’s eyes were anxious as he said this, and there was some sadness in his words. Lu Zhiheng’s thoughts were interrupted. When he saw Lu Yuxiang walk in, he was a little impatient and was about to open his mouth to rebuke him. Lu Yuxiang spoke first. “The information that I have gathered is about the attack on the eastern district.” The impatience on Lu Zhiheng’s face disappeared completely. He was eager to know the information that Lu Yuxiang was talking about. “Tell me quickly!” Lu Yuxiang said. “I sent someone to secretly investigate the city today to see if there were any suspicious people.” “Then, I found that two people had been investigating the city today to find out the background of our Yellow Clouds City.” “Although the two of them acted separately, I found out that the two of them walked into the same inn in the end.” Lu Zhiheng quickly asked. “Which inn did they enter!” When Lu Yuxiang mentioned the name of the inn, the guard who was still standing at the side was stunned. Then, the guard who came back to report to Lu Yuxiang said. “May I ask, Sect Master Lu, are the two of them an old man and a middle-aged man?” Lu Yuxiang nodded in surprise. Then, the two of them confirmed the appearance of the two people, their clothes, and other details, and the guard said to Lu Zhiheng, who was sitting on the main seat. “Mayor, the two people that Sect Master Lu described are with the person that you asked us to follow in secret.” Lu Zhiheng had some guesses as he listened to the conversation between the two people in the hall. However, when he heard that the attendant had confirmed it, Lu Zhiheng was still a little surprised. After thinking for a moment, he gave the order to inform the Red Robe Gang and the Heaven’s Gate Sect. To go to the inn and take down the person first. After saying that, Lu Zhiheng hurried out of the hall and asked Lu Yuxiang to follow him. When Lu Yuxiang followed behind Lu Zhiheng, he had an evil smile on his face. It was true that he had sent his men to investigate this matter. However, he wasn’t investigating without a purpose. But it was after he had seen Jiang Ping. He immediately sent people to carefully investigate Jiang Ping’s background, when he had entered the city, and who was with him. Therefore, Lu Yuxiang just happened to run into Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi, who were out to scout for news. Ever since Jiang Ping stepped into the hall of the mayor’s mansion and released his own cultivation. Lu Yuxiang came up with a good plan. A good plan to find a scapegoat. He used the sudden appearance of Jiang Ping’s group to cover himself up. Just in case the mayor’s mansion found out that he was the real culprit of the attack in the eastern district. Lu Yuxiang knew the mayor’s personality very well. He was cautious, careful, and would rather kill the wrong person than let them go. That was why Lu Zhiheng wanted to go to the inn to capture Jiang Ping. Before Lu Yuxiang left the hall, he turned around and looked at the seat that Lu Zhiheng had sat on. He thought to himself that when he sat in that seat in the future, he would definitely change that chair to something more imposing The attack not long ago was actually intentional by Lu Yuxiang. Because of his ambition, he did not want to be suppressed by the mayor’s mansion. He also did not want to fight with the Red Robe Gang’s sect master all day long. Hence, he obtained a cultivation method that could absorb the spiritual Qi in a person’s body to increase his own cultivation by chance. And it did not have any side effects. The people that were born in this world, regardless of whether they could cultivate or not, their bodies would carry a trace of spiritual Qi essence. This cultivation method was able to purely absorb the spiritual energy essence. The more a person could not cultivate, the more improvements it would have for the cultivation method and their own bodies. Therefore, under the drive of profit, this attack happened. Lu Yuxiang had already absorbed the essence into his sea of Qi. There was no need for him to refine it on his own. The cultivation method in his body would operate on its own and then absorb all the spiritual energy in his sea of Qi. In less than a day, the spiritual energy in his body would be completely refined. Therefore, he only needed to divert the attention of the mayor’s mansion to another place. As long as nothing went wrong, the person who would sit in that position and show off in two days would no longer be Lu Zhiheng. It would be him, Lu Yuxiang. The more he thought about it, the more excited Lu Yuxiang was. He almost laughed out loud. Soon, the Heaven’s Gate Sect and the Red Robe Gang were on their way. Lu Zhiheng thought about it and decided to wait for them. After all, if it was a life-or-death duel, it would not be a problem to deal with one initial stage earth immortal realm with Lu Zhiheng and Lu Yuxiang around. However, if Jiang Ping, who was at the initial stage earth immortal realm, insisted on running away, it would be a headache for him when everyone was in the same realm. Lu Zhiheng and Lu Yuxiang were waiting at the door. When the sect master of the Red Robe Gang, Zhou Nan, and the leader of the Heaven’s Gate Sect, Wang Xin, arrived. Lu Zhiheng told them the reason why he had summoned them. Zhou Nan was a little hesitant. “Mayor, isn’t this a little too casual?” After saying that, he looked at Lu Yuxiang with a puzzled look. When Lu Yuxiang saw Zhou Nan looking at him, he was a little afraid that he had been targeted. So, he took the opportunity when Zhou Nan didn’t say anything else. He spoke first. “Mayor, how can this be considered casual?” “If Jiang Ping is really the mastermind behind the scenes, then wouldn’t we give him a chance to escape?” “Don’t forget, he had people to investigate the background of our Yellow Clouds City today. He was clearly looking for an opportunity to escape.” “Besides, even if the murderer isn’t him, we can just apologize to him. With your cultivation, I don’t believe that he would dare to disobey.” Lu Zhiheng, who had been manipulated by Lu Yuxiang once again, did not say anything more. He immediately ordered the people to rush to the inn. Zhou Nan saw that Lu Yuxiang was targeting him again, so he glared at him. Lu Yuxiang ignored him and left without even looking at Zhou Nan. After the old Taoist priest returned to his room from the eastern district, he had a feeling that something was going to happen. So he stretched out his left hand and counted with his fingers. The old Taoist priest who had obtained the result of the divination frowned, turned around, and left the room, then pushed open the door of the next room. At this time, Jiang Ping was worried about his journey. Seeing an old man walk into his room without knocking on the door. Jiang Ping was a little surprised and didn’t know what to do. He opened his mouth and asked. “Who are you, Sir?” The old Taoist priest didn’t answer his question directly. Instead, he sat down by himself, then picked up the tea on the table and drank it… Lu Zhiheng brought the leaders of Yellow Clouds City to the inn. With a wave of his hand, the attendants behind him spread out and surrounded the inn. Lu Yuxiang gave his subordinate a look. The subordinate understood and shouted at the inn. “Jiang Ping, you are surrounded. Hurry up and come out and surrender.” Jiang Ping didn’t come out. The guests in the inn were shocked. The inn was in an uproar. The waiter walked out of the inn and wanted to see who was causing trouble in front of his door. When he saw the crowd, the waiter’s arrogant and domineering stance was immediately switched to him bending down. “Gentlemen, this is a small business. Let’s talk it out.” The guard who shouted just now stepped forward and grabbed the waiter’s collar. He scolded him angrily. “You, go and call Jiang Ping out.” “Otherwise, not only this inn, even you will die.” Then, he pushed him away. The waiter hurriedly ran into the inn. He first went up to the second floor and knocked on Jiang Ping’s door. As he knocked, he shouted. “Darn it, Jiang Ping, who did you offend?” “You’ve put me in trouble.” After Jiang Ping opened the door, he looked calm. Then, he glared at the waiter. The waiter’s heart skipped a beat. Then he said. “Well, Jiang… There’s someone outside looking for trouble with you.” Jiang Ping nodded. Then he walked downstairs. When the waiter saw Jiang Ping go out, he quickly found a water tank in the inn, poured the water out, and then went in to hide. He couldn’t run away, but now the outside was surrounded. This scared waiter thought he should hide if he could. As for whether his boss knew that the inn was in danger, he couldn’t care about it anymore. Jiang Ping walked down the stairs one step at a time. Then he stood at the entrance of the inn under everyone’s gaze. Jiang Ping looked around the crowd, and finally, his gaze stopped on Lu Yuxiang. Lu Yuxiang felt a little guilty, so he didn’t dare to look at Jiang Ping. Seeing this, Jiang Ping sneered. “Sect Master Lu, it’s not fair to do things like this, right?” Lu Zhiheng was a little confused. Why would Jiang Ping say such a strange thing? Of course, Lu Yuxiang wouldn’t lead the trouble to himself. So he explained. “What? Your identity is strange. Can’t I send people to investigate you?” Jiang Ping squinted at Lu Yuxiang. Although Lu Yuxiang was facing him, he still didn’t dare to look at him. Then, Jiang Ping smiled and said loudly. “What a good trick, Sect Master Lu.” Lu Zhiheng didn’t understand what the two were talking about at all, but Lu Zhiheng was cautious. What he was thinking now was to take down the young man in front of him first, then turn back and carefully investigate Lu Yuxiang. At this time, Lu Yuxiang was also fanning the flames. “Mayor, don’t talk to him anymore. We don’t know if he has a backup plan, so let’s end it as soon as possible to avoid future trouble…” Lu Zhiheng was already suspicious of Lu Yuxiang, so he reached out his hand to stop him from continuing. “Do I need you to say it!” Zhou Nan, the sect master of the Red Robe Gang, heard the conversation between Jiang Ping and Lu Yuxiang. Then, because of Lu Yuxiang’s abnormal behavior today. He couldn’t help but have some doubts. However, he understood Lu Zhiheng’s personality. If he said that Lu Yuxiang had a problem, he would only be scolded by Lu Zhiheng. In any case, Lu Zhiheng only wanted to take down Jiang Ping. He just had to help him capture Jiang Ping, and then he could tell Lu Zhiheng what he was thinking. Lu Zhiheng looked at Jiang Ping and said. “Brother Jiang, I’m sorry to offend you. It’s just that my men saw your strange behavior today.” “So, we have to ask you to come with us.” “Don’t worry. You’re just a guest at my residence. If the truth comes out, and it has nothing to do with you.” “Our Yellow Clouds City will definitely compensate you.” Jiang Ping sneered. “A guest? What kind of guest?” “Don’t tell me you want me to go to your mayor’s mansion and put me under house arrest?” Lu Zhiheng said. “Brother Jiang, don’t worry. We will definitely treat you well.” “The food is no worse than the food in the inn, and you can have a beautiful woman to accompany you.” Lu Zhiheng only said that he would not mistreat Jiang Ping, but he did not deny the matter of house arrest. He just avoided mentioning it. Because according to Lu Zhiheng’s idea, after he brought Jiang Ping back, he would definitely seal his cultivation. Otherwise, if he placed an earth immortal realm under house arrest, perhaps one day, his mayor’s mansion would be turned upside down. As long as Jiang Ping’s cultivation was sealed, everything would be fine. Jiang Ping could clearly see that the mayor of Yellow Clouds City had some ulterior motives. He asked with a smile. “What if I don’t go?” Lu Zhiheng also answered with a smile. “There will be a way for you to go.” “Oh?” Jiang Ping said meaningfully. At this time, the scum Lu Yuxiang spoke again. “Mayor, Jiang Ping has his family with him, and he has three daughters.” “Why don’t we invite his daughters to the mayor’s mansion first?” When Jiang Ping heard this, the smile on his face disappeared. He glared at Lu Yuxiang fiercely. The moment Lu Yuxiang made eye contact with Jiang Ping, he felt a lingering fear in his heart. A moment later, Lu Yuxiang thought to himself. He was going to see if Jiang Ping still dared to flaunt his power after he was done absorbing the spiritual energy in his body. Lu Zhiheng looked inside the inn with interest. He could see the second floor from the door. In a room on the second floor, there was a crack in the door, and three heads poked out. The three little girls had already woken up. Their first reaction when they heard the noise outside was definitely curious. So, they all poked their heads out to take a look. The little girls had just taken their first look. Lei Jingyun walked over and blocked the three little girls’ line of sight. He pushed the door open, and after entering, he dragged the three little girls back to the bed. Then, the door was shut tightly. “Why aren’t the three of you sleeping?” Wan’er pointed outside. “It’s too noisy, I can’t sleep.” Lei Jingyun explained to them. “Your daddy is busy outside, so you can’t go out and run around.” The three little girls were about to retort. Lei Jingyun took out a stick of incense from somewhere and lit it up. The three little girls couldn’t raise their eyelids after smelling the fragrance. Lei Jingyun looked at the stick of incense in his hand with a smile. He murmured. “It’s quite useful.” If Jiang Ping was standing in front of Lei Jingyun, he would have noticed that there was something different about Lei Jingyun. Jiang Ping was a little displeased when he saw the playful look in Lu Zhiheng’s eyes. “Don’t tell me that the mayor wants to lay his hands on the little girls?” “That doesn’t fit the mayor’s decent status.” Lu Zhiheng smiled. “There’s no need for that. We’re only here for you. Innocent people won’t get involved.” “I just looked at those three little girls and thought they were cute. I don’t have any other intentions.” Jiang Ping was a little curious. “Oh?” Lu Zhiheng said with a faint smile. “Because I had a daughter before, but later she…” When Lu Zhiheng mentioned his daughter, Jiang Ping noticed that the corner of Lu Yuxiang’s eyes twitched. Lu Yuxiang, who had been behind Lu Zhiheng all this time, was getting impatient. If this dragged on, it would be very disadvantageous for him. “Mayor, stop talking nonsense. If you find it troublesome, I’ll go first.” After saying this, Lu Yuxiang walked out from behind Lu Zhiheng. Without waiting for the crowd to react, Lu Yuxiang directly attacked Jiang Ping. The palm wind directly chopped towards Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping directly raised his foot and kicked forward. Causing Lu Yuxiang to be kicked two steps back. Jiang Ping laughed. “Sect Master Lu, are you this anxious that you’re revealing such a big flaw to me?” Lu Yuxiang was furious, and spiritual energy was wrapped around his legs. He shouted in a low voice. “Want to compete with me in leg kung fu?” “Come.” He raised his leg and directly aimed towards Jiang Ping’s head. Jiang Ping extended his arm to block, but he was still repelled by Lu Yuxiang’s attack. After he stabilized himself, Jiang Ping moved his arm which was in pain. Then, he said to the crowd. “Why don’t we fight somewhere else?” “We can’t let go here.” Lu Zhiheng knew that Jiang Ping would not compromise. As the mayor, he could not fight with him in a crowded place. So, he said to Jiang Ping. “Then, Brother Jiang, where do you think we should fight?” Jiang Ping looked to the east. “Didn’t the eastern district become a wasteland? Let’s go there. Even if we destroy the place, you won’t feel sorry.” Lu Zhiheng smiled. “That’s exactly what I was thinking.” As soon as he finished speaking, Jiang Ping stood up in the air and flew towards the eastern district. Lu Zhiheng was afraid that he would run away. So, he quickly followed. As he chased after Jiang Ping, he shouted. “Don’t play any tricks. Your family members are still at the inn.” “I said before. This matter is only targeted at you. But if you run away, I can only invite your family members to my residence.” Jiang Ping flew in the air and turned his head to reply. “Don’t worry, I, Jiang Ping, haven’t done anything wrong. There’s no need for me to run away.” Then, Jiang Ping and Lu Zhiheng landed in the eastern district. Zhou Nan and Wang Xin from the Heaven’s Gate Sect also followed the two to the eastern district. Lu Yuxiang remained in the inn. He did not follow Lu Zhiheng. Instead, he walked straight into the inn and poured himself a cup of tea. After drinking it, he slowly walked to the second floor. Jiang Ping, Lu Zhiheng, and the rest arrived at the eastern district, but they did not start fighting When the two of them saw that Lu Yuxiang did not follow them, they looked at each other and smiled. Jiang Ping spoke first. “I believe the mayor has also noticed it.” Lu Zhiheng nodded, and then his smile disappeared. There was more anger on his face. In fact, when Jiang Ping was in front of the inn’s door just now, he had used his spiritual energy to send a telepathic transmission to Lu Zhiheng. He told him his guess and Lu Yuxiang’s abnormality. The gist of it was that Lu Yuxiang was most likely the murderer of the attack on the eastern district. At first, Lu Zhiheng did not believe it because Lu Yuxiang had no reason to attack the eastern district. Not only did he not get any benefits, but the eastern district was also a part of his territory. Was there something wrong with him that he would do such a thing? However, Jiang Ping asked him through telepathic transmission, “What if he could increase his cultivation?” “Do you think he will attack the eastern district?” Lu Zhiheng thought about it and realized that Lu Yuxiang’s behavior during this period of time was indeed strange. He had become more attentive to him and listened to everything he said. Moreover, he was the most active in searching for the eastern district murderer. However, Jiang Ping’s words still could not convince Lu Zhiheng. It was not until Lu Yuxiang attacked Jiang Ping just now. Although it was only for a moment, Lu Zhiheng could clearly sense the change in Lu Yuxiang’s cultivation. It was the aura of the middle stage of the earth immortal realm. It was the same as his cultivation. At that moment, Lu Zhiheng suddenly understood a lot. Thus, the two of them came to the eastern district to put on a show. Jiang Ping cupped his hands and said. “Then, mayor, you should believe everything I say now, right?” Lu Zhiheng nodded and said to the two people behind him. “Lu Yuxiang is the murderer who attacked the eastern district.” Wang Xin, who knew nothing, was shocked and stammered with questions. “Why… why did he do that?” Zhou Nan, who had noticed it a long time ago, was also a little incredulous after hearing it. At this moment, the two of them were waiting for Lu Zhiheng’s answer. Lu Zhiheng shook his head. “I don’t know, but it should be helpful for his cultivation growth.” Zhou Nan asked. “What about now?” “Should we go back and arrest him?” Lu Zhiheng stretched out his hand. “Don’t alert him yet. Lu Yuxiang is at least at the middle stage of the earth immortal realm.” “Moreover, if we fight in the city, we’ll cause more casualties than in the eastern district.” Jiang Ping had a good impression of this mayor who cared about the people. However, this mayor was a little stubborn… Lu Zhiheng turned around and asked Jiang Ping. “Brother Jiang, I’ve offended you before. What do you think we should do now?” Jiang Ping waved his hand in response to Lu Zhiheng’s apology. Then, he smiled. “Let’s wait and see.” Lu Zhiheng’s face was full of doubt. “But Brother Jiang’s daughters are still at the inn. Lu Yuxiang is not a kind person. I’m just afraid…” Jiang Ping looked in the direction of the inn. He smiled slightly. “I’m not the only one staying at the inn…” Hearing Jiang Ping’s irrelevant answer, Lu Zhiheng was even more confused. However, since Jiang Ping was not in a hurry, he felt that Jiang Ping should have other tricks up his sleeve. Therefore, he could only hold back his temper and follow what Jiang Ping suggested, to wait and see. The reason why Jiang Ping was so calm was that before Lu Zhiheng and the others arrived at the inn. An old Taoist priest quietly opened his door. “May I know who you are?” Jiang Ping asked the strange old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest didn’t treat himself as an outsider. He poured himself a cup of tea and then answered Jiang Ping’s question. “Hehehe, I’m just an old man.” Jiang Ping frowned and looked at the old man who called himself an old man. He felt that the person in front of him was definitely not simple. Therefore, Jiang Ping goaded him. “If you don’t want to say it, then I’ll have to ask you to leave.” The old Taoist priest said with a smile. “There’s no need to goad me. I’m here to tell you about leaving the city.” Then, the old Taoist priest told Jiang Ping. If he wanted to leave the city now, he wouldn’t be able to break out. He would easily become the target of public criticism. Therefore, he could only help the mayor find the murderer who attacked the eastern district. “Who is it?” Jiang Ping asked curiously. “Does senior know who the murderer is?” The old Taoist priest didn’t say anything. He just used his finger that was dipped in tea. He wrote a name on the table. Then, he used his spiritual energy to tell Jiang Ping what to do next. If an ordinary person met this old man, they would definitely think that he was sick. In fact, Jiang Ping was also skeptical. Because the old man also told Jiang Ping what would happen next. After saying that, he directly turned around and left without waiting for Jiang Ping to agree. Before he left, he only gave a piece of advice that he should just do as he was told just now… At first, Jiang Ping didn’t want to leave his fate in the hands of others. He still planned to follow his idea. It wasn’t until the old Taoist priest’s prophecy came true, one by one. Lu Zhiheng had brought people to arrest him, and what he would say and the things he would do to him. It was exactly the same as what the old Taoist priest had described to him. When Jiang Ping was at the entrance of the inn just now, he looked calm on the surface. In fact, he was already extremely amazed in his heart. The old Taoist priest was even right about the time when the three little girls would wake up and stick their heads out. Therefore, Jiang Ping decided to trust the old Taoist priest. He brought Lu Zhiheng and the others here and let the old Taoist priest handle the rest. In the inn, Lei Jingyun was in the room of the three little girls, holding an incense stick in his hand. He touched his cheek with his right hand, then gently tore off a piece of skin. Lei Jingyun, who was standing in the room, changed his appearance. The old Taoist priest put away the skin, then found something to set up the incense stick in his hand. He rubbed his face after he had just peeled off the skin. Looking at the copper mirror in the room, he said to himself shamelessly. “I still look better.” At this time, the real Lei Jingyun was still in his room, smelling the incense and sleeping soundly. Of course, it was the same for Qiu Chi. The old Taoist priest stretched and said helplessly. “Let’s get to work.” Lu Yuxiang slowly walked upstairs to the room of the three little girls. At this time, there was no need for him to capture Jiang Ping’s three daughters. He believed that Jiang Ping and Lu Zhiheng would be fighting fiercely in the eastern district. This was enough time for him to advance to the late stage of the earth immortal realm. It would be a piece of cake for him to deal with them. The reason why he was getting close to the three little girls’ rooms was that he thought that they looked so dainty at such a young age. In time, when they grew up, their looks would definitely not be bad. Moreover, no one in this inn could compete with him now. Lu Yuxiang was already thinking about what the three little girls would look like when they grew up. That feeling was definitely something that the daughter of the mayor could not compare to. Licking his tongue, he approached the rooms of the three little girls. Lu Yuxiang stretched out his hand, wanting to push the door open. The old Taoist priest stood behind the door. Although he could not see outside the door, he seemed to know Lu Yuxiang’s every move like the back of his hand. Before Lu Yuxiang’s hand touched the door frame, a voice came from the room. “I advise you not to push open this door.” Lu Yuxiang was stunned for a moment. “Who are you? What’s your business?” As far as Lu Yuxiang knew, all the top fighters in Yellow Clouds City, except for him, were now in the eastern district. Therefore, he spoke a little presumptuously. The voice from inside the door sounded again. “If you open this door, then it’s my business.” Lu Yuxiang refused to believe it. Although he had not fully absorbed the essence of the spiritual energy, he had at least advanced to the middle stage of the earth immortal realm during this period of time. If he showed the crappy mayor, Lu Zhiheng, this level of cultivation, he wouldn’t even dare to talk to him like this. Lu Yuxiang withdrew his hand in anger. He directly raised his foot and kicked. A bang was sounded. The door frame shook from the kick. The entire inn shook along with it. The dust on the beam fell like falling snow. However, the door in front of Lu Yuxiang wasn’t kicked open by him. Lu Yuxiang withdrew his foot, wanting to use all his strength to kick again. However, when Lu Yuxiang’s second kick was sent out. It had not even touched the door. The door opened! Lu Yuxiang stumbled and fell to the ground. The old Taoist priest sat on the stool in the room, holding the teapot and pouring it into his mouth without using a cup. “See, I told you not to open the door, but you refused to listen and fell so hard.” Lu Yuxiang was furious and wanted to stand up. However, he found that the place where he was lying on the ground was lit up with lines. It made him unable to stand up at all. Lu Yuxiang raised his head and said. “You old thing, you are extremely sinister. You used a restriction to trap me.” The old Taoist priest did not think much of it. “How can I be compared to you when it comes to being sinister?” “Also, this is not a restriction; this is a formation.” Then, the old Taoist priest pointed his finger at Lu Yuxiang. Lu Yuxiang curled up. Moreover, the cultivation of the middle stage of the earth immortal realm couldn’t be unleashed at all. Lu Yuxiang lay on the ground and stared at the old Taoist priest fiercely. “This formation can only trap me for fifteen minutes at most.” “I have the cultivation of the earth immortal realm. You won’t be able to kill me.” “In the end, you still have to die.” The old Taoist priest shook his head and answered with a frown. “Who told you that I was going to deal with you?” After saying that, the old Taoist priest put down the teapot in his hand, walked out of the room, and waved his hand. Lu Yuxiang, who was lying on the ground, actually floated up and followed the old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest brought Lu Yuxiang out of the inn. Then, they flew straight up into the sky. No matter how much the old Taoist priest flew, Lu Yuxiang, who was behind him, was always supported by the formation. He never left the old Taoist priest by more than five steps. Jiang Ping, Lu Zhiheng, and the others stood in the ruins of the eastern district. They slowly raised their heads. Before they arrived, the old Taoist priest’s voice was heard. “My little friend Jiang Ping. Catch.” Then, Lu Yuxiang fell from the sky just like that. Before Lu Yuxiang landed on the ground, he used his cultivation and physique to break out of the formation. Only then did he avoid the pain of landing on his face first. Jiang Ping was puzzled and shouted to the sky. “Senior, what is this!” The old Taoist priest slowly landed and said awkwardly. “This kid’s cultivation is too high. My formation can’t hold him, so I brought him here.” “I’m not good at fighting. You guys do it.” After saying that, the old Taoist priest slowly moved behind Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping was stunned. This was too much of an “expert” style, wasn’t it? After Lu Yuxiang landed on the ground, he was very alert. He immediately hid. He didn’t know why Jiang Ping and Lu Zhiheng didn’t start fighting. But in the current situation, he had a premonition that if he was caught, he would definitely die. Before Lu Zhiheng and the others could react, they couldn’t see Lu Yuxiang anymore. Therefore, Lu Zhiheng shouted at Zhou Nan and Wang Xin behind him. “What are you waiting for? Go after him!” The two people behind him dashed out like cats. They flew up into the sky and searched everywhere. Of course, Jiang Ping would not fall behind. Just as he was about to make a move, the old Taoist priest grabbed his arm from behind him. He looked at the old Taoist priest with some confusion. The old Taoist priest only smiled. Jiang Ping asked when he saw this. “Senior, do you have another way?” The old Taoist priest nodded. Then, a talisman appeared in the old Taoist priest’s hand. With a thought, the talisman in his hand burned. A series of ghost cries and wolf howls sounded in this world. The three people who were searching for Lu Yuxiang were all shocked. They couldn’t see anything in front of their eyes. But they felt that there were thousands of people in this area! The three of them stopped and returned to Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest reminded everyone. “The aura on that fellow is still increasing. Maybe he’s going to break through to the late stage of the earth immortal realm!” The late-stage earth immortal realm! Except for Jiang Ping, everyone else was shocked. Although he was only one or two minor realms higher than them, the difference was like the difference between heaven and earth. The reason why Jiang Ping wasn’t surprised was that he had a premonition in his heart. The corners of the old Taoist priest’s mouth rose slightly. “Found it.” Then, he took out another talisman. The talisman burned, and a burst of yellow smoke appeared in front of them, and then there was a bang. Lu Yuxiang appeared out of thin air. This time, not only the crowd, but even Jiang Ping felt that it was somewhat magical. This was similar to the earth shrinking formation that Jiang Ping had set up outside Fusheng City. Jiang Ping looked at the old Taoist priest with interest. The old Taoist priest waved his hand. “It’s just a little trick.” Lu Zhiheng first used his spiritual energy to sense Lu Yuxiang’s cultivation. Then, he directly rushed forward. The two people behind him did not want to be outdone. They cooperated with Lu Zhiheng to launch an attack Seeing this, Jiang Ping did not give Lu Yuxiang a chance to think. He clenched his fist and punched. Lu Yuxiang did not realize why he was here at this moment. He saw Jiang Ping and Lu Zhiheng were going to attack him. Lu Yuxiang had not reached the late-stage earth immortal realm yet. Otherwise, Lu Zhiheng would not dare to attack him even if he had ten guts. Lu Zhiheng had checked to see if Lu Yuxiang had reached the late stage. After knowing that Lu Yuxiang had not reached the late-stage earth immortal realm, he refused to give Lu Yuxiang another chance. If he was at the late stage of the earth immortal realm, it would be a headache for the few of them! Lu Yuxiang immediately retreated. While retreating, he thought of a way to deal with Lu Zhiheng. First, he dodged Lu Zhiheng’s hand attack. Then, he flew up into the sky. The few of them saw that Lu Yuxiang was as difficult to deal with as a loach. They looked at each other and flew up into the sky with tacit understanding. Then, they surrounded Lu Yuxiang. After surrounding Lu Yuxiang, they displayed their own moves. Jiang Ping summoned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk and turned it towards Lu Yuxiang. All kinds of elemental attacks were thrown towards Lu Yuxiang. Lu Zhiheng grabbed a long spear out of thin air. After holding the long spear and rotating it in a circle, he swept it towards Lu Yuxiang. Zhou Nan only used his bare hands to form a boxing stance. He punched towards Lu Yuxiang. That punch was swift and agile as if it could break through the wind. And Wang Xin, whose cultivation was only in the nascent soul realm. He took out many spiritual artifacts and immortal artifacts from his storage space. Among them, there were as many as three immortal artifacts. And there were countless spiritual artifacts. Jiang Ping looked towards Wang Xin and saw that Wang Xin was surrounded by spiritual artifacts and immortal artifacts, which wrapped him up like an iron chariot. He secretly praised. “With money, one can really do whatever they want.” Jiang Ping thought to himself that after this matter was over, he would definitely buy more immortal artifacts and spiritual artifacts. Otherwise, he didn’t know where to spend the large pile of spirit stones in his storage space. Jiang Ping felt a little envious when he saw Wang Xin’s imposing manner. Just like that, the four people didn’t hold back, and all used their special skills. Seeing how the four of them was not giving him any chance. Lu Yuxiang took out a big bell from his storage space. The big bell enveloped Lu Yuxiang. It helped him block the attacks of the four of them. Jiang Ping and the others poured their spiritual energy into their bodies. They did not dare to slack off. Only Lu Zhiheng was stunned when he saw Lu Yuxiang take out the big bell. He gifted the big bell to his daughter on her 18th birthday. Although it was only a low-grade immortal artifact, its defense was surprisingly strong. In terms of defense, it was enough to rank among the middle-grade immortal artifact. From Lu Yuxiang’s current state, it was the best explanation. Everyone’s attacks and moves all smashed onto the big bell. Every time the big bell blocked the attacks, it would tremble violently and emit waves of sounds. However, not even a trace of spiritual energy could bounce onto Lu Yuxiang’s body. Jiang Ping looked at the stunned Lu Zhiheng and roared. “He’s trying to break through, quick!” Only then did Lu Zhiheng regain his senses. He immediately adjusted his state of mind and crazily urged his spiritual energy to smash towards the big bell. Under the joint efforts of everyone, the big bell finally formed many cracks. Then, it was hacked down by Lu Zhiheng’s long spear. Clang! The big bell finally broke. Lu Yuxiang, who was sitting cross-legged inside the big bell, slowly opened his eyes. He took a deep breath. He exhaled a mouthful of turbid air. It seemed that Lu Yuxiang had successfully advanced. Lu Yuxiang smiled faintly. “Everyone, sorry for the wait.” He floated in the air and stood in mid-air. He stretched his body and then released all of his cultivation. Everyone present, especially Wang Xin, who was only in the nascent soul realm, felt a sense of pressure. Lu Yuxiang clenched his fists and looked down at his own fists. Then, he laughed loudly. “Hahaha!” “I’ll see what you can do to me now.” “After I’m done with you, I’ll wipe out Yellow Clouds City.” “When the time comes, I might even dare to try for that heaven ascension realm that makes people shy away.” Jiang Ping looked at Lu Yuxiang in front of him and frowned. Zhou Nan and Wang Xin both looked troubled. Lu Zhiheng, who was holding a long spear in his hand, ignored them and roared at Lu Yuxiang. “Does my daughter’s death have anything to do with you!” Lu Yuxiang did not answer. Instead, he smiled and pointed at the broken piece of the big bell on the ground. This was already an explanation. Lu Zhiheng raised his eyebrows and pointed. He held the long spear and rushed towards Lu Yuxiang. He raised the spear with both hands. Like thunder, the spear fell on Lu Yuxiang’s head. The body of the spear was crackling with lightning When Jiang Ping saw that Lu Zhiheng was so brainless, he rushed out. He thought to himself, “This is bad.” ms He immediately turned the eight trigrams disk. The direction of Zhen! Lightning! The lightning that Jiang Ping summoned struck the spear in Lu Zhiheng’s hand. The spear was assisted by the lightning, and it fell even faster. But Lu Yuxiang’s reaction was even faster. He raised his hand and held the spearhead. He allowed the lightning to flow through his body. Lu Yuxiang did not feel any pain. With an attack of this level, he would be injured if he had not reached the late-stage earth immortal realm just now. However, Lu Yuxiang, who was already prepared, easily grabbed the spearhead and threw Lu Zhiheng to the ground. Lu Zhiheng’s spear was thrown away from his hand and hit the ground. He hit the ground and created a big well. Lu Yuxiang didn’t care at all and directly threw the spear that he took away from his hand. The old Taoist priest on the ground saw that the situation was not good. He quickly reached out his left hand and made divination. The old Taoist priest who got the divination had a bitter expression. Then he shouted at Jiang Ping in the sky. “My little friend Jiang Ping, come back quickly. If you can’t beat him, Let’s run!” Fortunately, Jiang Ping was flying in the air. Otherwise, if he had heard the old Taoist priest’s words while standing on the ground, he would have been so shocked that he would have staggered. To think that he addressed him as a senior! Jiang Ping cursed in his heart. The old Taoist priest did not use his spiritual energy to transmit his voice. Instead, he shouted directly into the sky. Therefore, not only Jiang Ping but everyone present heard him. Zhou Nan and Wang Xin were actually thinking about how to escape unscathed. Then, they would leave Yellow Clouds City with their families. Lu Yuxiang obviously knew what they were thinking. He stretched out his finger and pointed at them. “None of you can think of leaving today!” Zhou Nan and Wang Xin were a little afraid when they heard this. Especially Zhou Nan. He already had a grudge against Lu Yuxiang, and now his face was even more ashen. Jiang Ping was currently thinking of countermeasures in his heart. Suddenly, he had an epiphany. He thought that the old Taoist priest had deliberately not used his spiritual energy to shout at him. He must be trying to do something! Before Jiang Ping could think about it, Lu Yuxiang took out a whip from his storage space. He hurled it fiercely at Jiang Ping. The whip swung in the air, and a series of crackling sounds rang out. Jiang Ping dodged while trying to find a way to escape Lu Yuxiang’s attack range. Zhou Nan and Wang Xin saw that they would die either way. They attacked Lu Yuxiang without caring about anything Zhou Nan punched. His fists were thick and powerful. Wang Xin activated the three immortal artifacts, and they flew towards Lu Yuxiang. After the immortal artifacts escaped from Wang Xin’s hands, they began to fight on their own. Lu Zhiheng, who had been thrown to the ground, returned with a spear in his hand. However, his hair had already spread out and was in a mess. He held the spear tightly with both hands and stabbed towards Lu Yuxiang while roaring furiously. “I’ll take your damned life!” Lu Yuxiang swung his whip at Jiang Ping, then turned around and swung it at Lu Zhiheng. In his opinion, the only one who could cause him any harm was Lu Zhiheng, who was at the middle stage of the earth immortal realm. However, Jiang Ping was only at the initial stage of the earth immortal realm at the moment, so he would definitely not pay attention to him. Seeing that, Jiang Ping immediately retreated and flew towards the old Taoist priest. Lu Zhiheng saw Lu Yuxiang’s whip coming straight at him. The spear that was thrust forward was being used to shield his head. He used this to block the attack of the whip. However, Lu Zhiheng was already very close to Lu Yuxiang. Lu Zhiheng’s head was blocked by the long spear, but the whip still hit his back. Lu Zhiheng was in pain. He almost lost his balance and was about to fall to the ground again. At this time, Zhou Nan’s fist wind and Wang Xin’s immortal artifact were blocked by Lu Yuxiang with only one hand. He couldn’t even get close to Lu Yuxiang, let alone hurt him. Jiang Ping landed in front of the old Taoist priest. “Senior, do you have any ideas?” The old Taoist priest nodded and didn’t say any nonsense. He reached out his hand and took out a pill. “This is a medicinal pill that can increase your cultivation. The spiritual energy contained in this pill is equivalent to fifty top-grade spirit stones.” “However, this pill is somewhat difficult to absorb…” Jiang Ping didn’t hesitate and directly took the medicinal pill from the old Taoist priest’s hand. He didn’t explain and directly swallowed it. The old Taoist priest panicked! “I’m not finished yet. This pill might have side effects!” Jiang Ping widened his eyes and asked. “What side effects!” The old Taoist priest didn’t dare to look at Jiang Ping and said. “After you eat this, you will think that you are a woman…” Jiang Ping cursed. “Why didn’t you say so earlier!” If he had known that this pill would have had such side effects, Jiang Ping would have rather died in battle than eaten it. The old Taoist priest said to Jiang Ping righteously. “But don’t worry, this side effect is only temporary. It won’t last for long!” Jiang Ping really wanted to slap this old Taoist priest to death. However, he still had more important things to do. Because he could already feel the medicinal pill that he had just swallowed was starting to heat up in his stomach. Jiang Ping directly threw the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk to the old Taoist priest and asked him to go up and help. He sat cross-legged on the spot and started to operate the great void celestial technique. It was precisely because Jiang Ping had the great void celestial technique that he dared to take the medicinal pill that the old Taoist priest said was hard to cultivate. The great void celestial technique gathered all the spiritual energy that the pill emitted from his body. But he did not directly absorb the spiritual energy and use it to replenish his cultivation. Instead, he kept it in his sea of Qi. The old Taoist priest looked at Jiang Ping who was sitting cross-legged with his eyes closed. Then he looked at the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk that Jiang Ping stuffed into his hand. The old Taoist priest was very depressed. He was not a cultivator who was good at fighting However, the urgency of the situation did not allow him to hesitate any longer. Because at this time, the screams of Lu Zhiheng and the other two people kept coming from the sky. The old Taoist priest jumped up. He carried the eight trigrams disk and flew into the sky. Lu Zhiheng and the other two people had already been beaten to a pulp by Lu Yuxiang’s whip. Especially Lu Zhiheng. He only had one thought in his mind, and that was to kill Lu Yuxiang to avenge his daughter. However, his repeated charges only resulted in the marks of whips on his body. However, he did not retreat. The more he fought, the braver he became. Finally, when Lu Yuxiang was dealing with Zhou Nan and Wang Xin, he found the right opportunity. He stabbed towards Lu Yuxiang’s chest. Lu Yuxiang realized that he could not dodge in time, so he could only turn sideways and use his shoulder to catch Lu Zhiheng’s shot. Although the spearhead pierced through his shoulder, it did not cause any obstruction to him. With a shake of his shoulder, the spear in Lu Zhiheng’s hand was flung away. After the old Taoist priest flew into the sky, in order to attract Lu Yuxiang’s attention, he directly cursed. “Kid, is that all you have?” “Back then, your father, I, was several times more powerful than you when I was young.” “Look at you, facing two mere earth immortal realms, and a nascent soul realm cultivator has already made your shoulder bleed non-stop.” “You’ve really embarrassed me.” Lu Yuxiang followed the mocking voice and looked over. He saw the old Taoist priest holding the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk, and he was also the one who trapped him in the inn just now. The anger in his heart was ignited spontaneously. He directly raised his hand and swung it down, whipping the old Taoist priest. He said as he attacked. “Then let me see, what realm are you in to boast?” The old Taoist priest put his hands behind his back, and an earth-shrinking talisman appeared between his two fingers. The talisman burned, and the old Taoist priest disappeared on the spot. Then he appeared behind Lu Yuxiang and turned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. He used fire among the five elements. The Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk was like a fish back in the water in the old Taoist priest’s hands. The power it displayed was much stronger than when Jiang Ping used it. The flame that appeared out of thin air attacked Lu Yuxiang’s body. Soon, the entire ball of flame surrounded Lu Yuxiang. The old Taoist priest turned the eight trigrams disk slightly again. Zhen, Xun for Wood, fuel the fire! Then, the big fire that surrounded Lu Yuxiang became even fiercer. But this fire still did not stop Lu Yuxiang’s movements. After this fire surrounded him, Lu Yuxiang directly used his spiritual energy to protect his body. Then, he waved his whip at the old Taoist priest without stopping. The old Taoist priest was even more cunning. He actually took out several earth-shrinking talismans consecutively. His figure flashed and appeared, and it was hard to figure out. At this time, Jiang Ping’s head was sweating, his brows were tightly knitted, and he was concentrating on gathering the spiritual energy emitted by the medicinal pill. The old Taoist priest was as cunning as a loach. Lu Yuxiang could do nothing to him. Although the old Taoist priest’s attack could not cause much damage to Lu Yuxiang, at least it could effectively exhaust him. Seeing how the old Taoist priest was so difficult to deal with, Lu Yuxiang began to feel anxious. Because when the old Taoist priest replaced Jiang Ping when he escaped just now. Lu Yuxiang was already feeling uneasy. Who knew if Jiang Ping had any backup plans. After all, he was a foreigner, and he didn’t know his background, so he was still a little worried. Lu Yuxiang changed his battle plan. He planned to defeat Lu Zhiheng and the other two first, then focus on dealing with the old Taoist priest. Lu Yuxiang directly targeted Wang Xin, who was the weakest. He charged straight at Wang Xin. No matter how many spiritual artifacts Wang Xin had, Lu Yuxiang would break them with one punch after another. In a flash, he arrived in front of Wang Xin. He punched Wang Xin in the chest without using the whip in his hand. And Wang Xin was punched out of the battlefield. After taking a punch from Lu Yuxiang, Wang Xin retreated repeatedly and finally fell to the ground. If it weren’t for the fact that he was wearing a golden silk soft armor immortal artifact, this punch would have shaken the foundation of his cultivation. After receiving the punch, Wang Xin no longer had the strength to fight. He had no choice but to withdraw from the battlefield and take out a bunch of medicinal pills to treat his injuries. Then, Lu Yuxiang turned his target to Zhou Nan. Zhou Nan knew very well that his ending wasn’t any better than Wang Xin’s. He also didn’t want to clash with Lu Yuxiang. When Lu Yuxiang rushed towards him, Zhou Nan immediately used all his strength to defend. The moment Lu Yuxiang raised his fist, he even said that he knew what was good for him. After that, Zhou Nan was also knocked to the ground. When the old Taoist priest saw that Lu Yuxiang wanted to break through them one by one, his heart began to become anxious. He lowered his head and looked at Jiang Ping, who was still sitting cross-legged on the ground. Then, he gritted his teeth and took out a Peach Wood Sword from his storage space. He sighed, bit his finger, and smeared the blood on the Peach Wood Sword. This method worked on ghosts, monsters, and ferocious beasts, but this was the first time the old Taoist priest was using it on humans. He didn’t know if it would work. He decided to give it a try. He waved the Peach Wood Sword and slashed at Lu Yuxiang. As the Peach Wood Sword fell, invisible sword energy burst out. At this time, Lu Yuxiang was raising his whip and continuously lashing it at Lu Zhiheng. Lu Zhiheng was retreating as he fought, and he was hit by the whip from time to time. It felt like he was poking his body with burning charcoal! The burning pain! However, Lu Zhiheng did not retreat. He did not even care about it. He allowed the whip to land on his body. Sometimes, he even deliberately received the whip from Lu Yuxiang. He wanted to find the right time to backstab Lu Yuxiang. When Lu Yuxiang was careless, he was also stabbed by Lu Zhiheng. However, the most serious injury on Lu Yuxiang’s body was the shoulder that Lu Zhiheng had stabbed when he was not expecting it. Lu Zhiheng’s attack only caused some superficial injuries to Lu Yuxiang. The old Taoist priest’s sword had already reached Lu Yuxiang’s side. When Lu Zhiheng saw that the old Taoist priest was going to sneak attack Lu Yuxiang, he deliberately attacked Lu Yuxiang. He did not care about any spear attack and just waved his long spear like a mad dog. He directly aimed at Lu Yuxiang, chopped, and slashed. Seeing this, Lu Yuxiang directly twisted the long spear with his whip. Then, he waved his whip, and the long spear was knocked away by Lu Yuxiang. Lu Yuxiang found an opportunity to directly kick Lu Zhiheng away, then released his spiritual energy to block the sword energy. But unexpectedly, the sword energy directly passed through Lu Yuxiang’s spiritual energy defense. It hit his face. Lu Yuxiang panicked. He didn’t know how to deal with this strange sword energy! He closed his eyes! In the blink of an eye, the sword energy landed on Lu Yuxiang’s body! Just when Lu Yuxiang thought that this time he was doomed. He opened his eyes. He looked at himself. There was no change at all! The old Taoist priest frowned. Did it fail? Could it be that this method did not work on humans? Lu Zhiheng had just been kicked away and stopped moving. He was also a little puzzled. He had just given the old Taoist priest a chance to launch a sneak attack, but it did not work at all? Wouldn’t that mean that he had been kicked in vain? Lu Yuxiang also laughed out loud. “Stinking Taoist priest, this is the result of your painstaking sneak attack?” As soon as he finished speaking, Lu Yuxiang felt a splitting headache! The whip in his hand slipped out of his hand and fell to the ground. He covered his head with both hands and grabbed his hair tightly. Then, he cried out in pain! At this moment, he felt that his soul wanted to leave his body. The intense pain caused him to curl up in the air. The old Taoist priest and Lu Zhiheng saw this. They felt that there was a chance! They struck while the iron was hot and flew to Lu Yuxiang’s side. Lu Zhiheng punched and kicked Lu Yuxiang with his bare hands. The old Taoist priest activated the eight trigrams disk. He summoned a mountain to coordinate with Lu Zhiheng. Lu Zhiheng kicked Lu Yuxiang out like he was kicking a rubber ball. Lu Yuxiang curled up his body and smashed through the mountains. When the mountains collapsed, his body was also covered with many wounds. Lu Yuxiang could not care about these things anymore. He had a splitting headache. He wished that he could crack open his head and see what was going on inside. He allowed his body to smash through the mountains. The old Taoist priest turned the eight trigrams disk again. All kinds of five elements rushed towards him! It rained down on Lu Yuxiang like a downpour. Lu Zhiheng stretched out his hand and summoned back his spear. He held the spear and turned it. Finally, he made a sudden thrust towards Lu Yuxiang. It sounded like the roar of a dragon. The spiritual energy released by the spearhead turned into a huge dragon head. The dragon’s head opened its mouth wide and charged towards Lu Yuxiang. Lu Yuxiang was still wailing. The two men’s attack arrived in an instant. Boom! Lu Yuxiang was drowned in the explosion. The old Taoist priest and Lu Zhiheng had almost exhausted themselves. They thought that if they could not seriously injure Lu Yuxiang this time, they would not be able to do anything. The smoke caused by the explosion slowly dissipated. Lu Yuxiang’s figure appeared. At this moment, his facial features were bleeding, and his shirt had turned to dust. His upper body was exposed. Numerous small wounds on his body appeared after he had crashed through the mountains. Lu Yuxiang spat out a mouthful of blood. Even though he was in such a sorry state, however, there was not a trace of despair on his face. Instead, he began to laugh loudly. “Hahaha, things are starting to get interesting.” Lu Yuxiang’s voice was very loud, causing even Jiang Ping, who was silently waiting for his breakthrough below, to hear it. Jiang Ping still had time to grumble in his heart. “Darn it. Why does the villain look exactly like the one in the novel that I’ve read in my previous life?” “What a psychopath!” The old Taoist priest and Lu Zhiheng were no longer able to fight anymore. The two of them looked at Jiang Ping on the ground in tacit understanding. Jiang Ping had already gathered all the spiritual energy of the pill into his sea of Qi. He made a bold decision. It was to absorb all the spiritual energy essence in one go! This was extremely dangerous. Not to mention that no one could restrain Lu Yuxiang now. With Jiang Ping’s method, it was equivalent to a person swallowing ten steamed buns in one breath. It was either choking or bursting to death. However, Jiang Ping did this because after swallowing the medicinal pill. He found that the spiritual energy contained in the pill could only help him break through to the middle stage of earth immortal realm at most. The old Taoist priest had expected that it would be enough for Jiang Ping to advance to the late stage. However, the old Taoist priest didn’t know that Jiang Ping’s cultivation method was like a bottomless pit. This bit of spiritual energy was far from enough. Therefore, when he gathered his spiritual energy, Jiang Ping took out a lot of top-grade spirit stones from his storage space. Then, he was distracted while gathering the spiritual energy scattered around the world. It could be said that he was short of time. Therefore, Jiang Ping didn’t have the time to absorb the spiritual energy essence at all. He could only pile them together and finish them in one bite. Jiang Ping closed his eyes and was aware that the old Taoist priest and the other person were looking at him. From his storage space, he took out the signing rewards medicine that he received from the system and threw them at the two people. Then, he slowly extended a finger towards the two of them. The two of them took the medicine that Jiang Ping threw. They didn’t care if it would be too much for them; they just put them in their mouths and started chewing. As soon as the medicine entered their stomachs, a warm current filled their limbs. They looked at the finger that Jiang Ping extended. The two of them were helpless. The old Taoist priest thought to himself that he had to hold on! Lu Zhiheng’s thoughts were very simple. He was thinking whether Jiang Ping’s extended finger meant that he wanted them to hang on for another fifteen minutes or an incense stick’s time… He should have made it clear. Of course, Jiang Ping did not leave Zhou Nan and Wang Xin behind. At the same time that he threw out the pills, two sets of medicinal pills flew in the direction of Zhou Nan and Wang Xin. After the two of them finished eating the medicinal pills, they gritted their teeth and returned to the battlefield. Lu Yuxiang saw that these people had so many tricks up their sleeves. He was still here, and they were already whispering to each other. “Hey, hey, hey!” “Aren’t you guys a little disrespectful? Whispering to each other in front of me!” “I won’t let you get away with it.” After saying that, he directly rushed towards Jiang Ping, who was sitting on the ground. Jiang Ping felt Lu Yuxiang approach him. His brows were tightly knitted! He still had the time to curse in his heart. These people are useless! Hey! The old Taoist priest’s reaction was the fastest. He took out the Peach Wood Sword again. He bit his finger again and slashed towards Lu Yuxiang’s direction. One had to admit that the recovery effect of the medicinal pill given by Jiang Ping was really strong. The spiritual energy was originally exhausted to the point where not a single drop was left. At this moment, it filled his entire body again. Therefore, this old Taoist priest’s sword energy was even more majestic than the previous one. Lu Yuxiang had suffered just now. He thought that he absolutely could not fall into the trap again. That strange sword energy had almost tortured him to death. Lu Yuxiang directly turned around. He wanted to avoid that sword energy. But after Lu Yuxiang turned around, that strange sword energy actually followed Lu Yuxiang and turned around. Lu Yuxiang tried several times after that. However, no matter how hard he tried to dodge, the strange sword energy was following behind him. The old Taoist priest curled his lips slightly. He moved his fingers slightly. It turned out that the sword energy was not locked on Lu Yuxiang. Instead, the old Taoist priest was controlling the direction of the sword energy behind him. Seeing that the sword energy was so difficult to deal with, Lu Yuxiang ran while thinking of countermeasures. When the sword energy landed on his body just now, he felt that his three souls and seven spirits were about to leave his body. Lu Yuxiang guessed, could it be that this sword energy was targeting souls? What if his soul left his body before this sword energy hit him? Since there was no other way, Lu Yuxiang could only give it a try. It just so happened that Lu Yuxiang knew how to let his soul temporarily leave his body. So he turned around and stopped running. Facing this invisible sword energy that was already in front of him. He formed a hand seal. Lu Yuxiang’s soul directly left his body. He watched as the sword energy hit his body. Because the soul was invisible, no one present could see that Lu Yuxiang’s soul had already left his body. But the old Taoist priest could feel it. But it was too late. The sword energy had entered Lu Yuxiang’s body. Seeing this, Lu Zhiheng immediately wanted to have a follow-up attack like before. After the old Taoist priest noticed Lu Yuxiang’s abnormality, he secretly cried out that it was bad. He was about to shout out to remind everyone. “This is…” Before he could say the word bad, Lu Zhiheng had already rushed out with his spear. Zhou Nan and Wang Xin saw that Lu Zhiheng had made a move and quickly followed. Lu Yuxiang’s soul quickly returned to its original position. Then, he revealed a sinister smile. He swung his whip vigorously. It directly trapped the three of them together. After trapping the three of them together, Lu Yuxiang’s empty left hand directly gathered spiritual energy in his palm. A huge ball of light was directly held in his hand. Then, he threw it at the three people who were tied up. Just when the ball of light was about to hit them. Lu Yuxiang took back his whip. He watched as the three of them resisted the spiritual energy explosion released by him, who was in the late stage earth immortal realm. The spiritual energy exploded. It was as dazzling as the sun. The old Taoist priest quickly covered his eyes with his arm. Lu Yuxiang also turned his head away. Even Jiang Ping, who was sitting on the ground with his eyes closed, felt the light passing through his eyelids. A loud boom could be heard. The huge ball of light in front of Lu Yuxiang exploded. They did not even hear a single scream from the three of them. Lu Zhiheng, Zhou Nan, and Wang Xin fell to the ground again. This time, the three of them were unconscious! No matter how many elixirs and medicinal pills they had, they could not fight anymore! The old Taoist priest was regretful. He felt that he had not made a judgment earlier, which was why Lu Yuxiang had this opportunity. Lu Yuxiang slowly turned around this time. He faced the old Taoist priest. Then, he took out a medicinal pill from his storage space and swallowed it. Although the medicinal pill was not as powerful as the one produced by Jiang Ping’s system, the spiritual energy that he had recovered was enough to finish off the old Taoist priest and Jiang Ping. Lu Yuxiang smiled evilly at the old Taoist priest. However, he did not attack the old Taoist priest directly. Instead, he attacked Jiang Ping suddenly, who was on the ground. This was because he had a strong premonition. The fear that Jiang Ping brought to him was far beyond what Lu Zhiheng and the old Taoist priest could do. Lu Yuxiang drew his whip and swung it directly at Jiang Ping. The old Taoist priest cursed in his heart. Then, he took out an earth-shrinking talisman. He directly drove his spiritual energy to burn. The old Taoist priest stood in front of Jiang Ping to block him. Then, he quickly summoned the Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk. As he turned the eight trigrams disk, an airtight house instantly surrounded the two of them. This house made of gold bricks looked very sturdy on the outside. However, when Lu Yuxiang swung the whip in his hand at this golden house. This seemingly sturdy golden brick house instantly shattered into pieces. Lu Yuxiang raised his whip again. The old Taoist priest gritted his teeth, and blue veins popped out. He spread his hands to block in front of Jiang Ping. He even muttered. “Please don’t let me take this whip in vain.” Just as the old Taoist priest closed his eyes and had already anticipated the worst outcome for himself, the pain from the whip did not arrive. The old Taoist priest slowly opened his eyes. He saw a man in green standing in front of him. Lu Yuxiang finally revealed an unsightly expression. Jiang Ping opened his mouth. “Is the performance over? Is it my turn now?” The old Taoist priest cursed in his heart. This brat, he’s so good at acting cool at such a young age! Jiang Ping grabbed the whip and pulled it back. He pulled Lu Yuxiang over directly. Then, he lifted his leg and kicked Lu Yuxiang out. Lu Yuxiang was kicked far away. Jiang Ping turned around to look at the old Taoist priest. “Senior, how is it? Isn’t my appearance cool?” The old Taoist priest directly raised his leg and kicked Jiang Ping’s butt. Updates by vip novel. com “Don’t be so wishy-washy; hurry up and continue!” Jiang Ping replied with a smile. “Alright!” Then, he directly flew in the direction of Lu Yuxiang. Just now, at the last moment, Jiang Ping made a breakthrough. Yes, it was a breakthrough, not an advancement. Unexpectedly, Jiang Ping broke through to the heaven ascension realm. The heaven ascension realm was the realm that truly did not restrict cultivators. Cultivators below the heaven ascension realm usually relied on absorbing and storing their spiritual energy in their bodies. They would only release it when they were fighting with others. Therefore, most life-and-death battles would exhaust their spiritual energy in the end. However, the heaven ascension realm was different. The heaven ascension realm could directly use the spiritual energy between heaven and earth with a wave of a hand. It was an endless stream. Therefore, there was often a saying among cultivators. “Earth immortals are still mortals. Ascending to heaven is the path of immortals.” It meant that earth immortal realm was not true immortal, while heaven ascension realm was truly the realm of immortals. Jiang Ping arrived in front of Lu Yuxiang and kicked him again. He landed on the ground. “How is it? This is the heaven ascension realm that you’ve been dreaming of!” “I’m sorry, but I advanced one step ahead of you!” “You should work harder in your next life!” Jiang Ping stepped on Lu Yuxiang and mocked him. Lu Yuxiang’s heart was dead as he listened to Jiang Ping’s words. He didn’t understand how Jiang Ping went from the initial stage earth immortal realm to the heaven ascension realm so quickly. However, it didn’t matter whether he understood it or not at this moment. Because Lu Yuxiang knew it very well. He was going to die! Jiang Ping’s every step wasn’t light. He kept stepping Lu Yuxiang into the ground. Then, Jiang Ping directly flew into the air. Then, he stood upright and quickly fell down. One of his two feet stepped on Lu Yuxiang’s chest, and the other stepped on his head. The ground stepped by Jiang Ping was at least a thousand feet deep. In an instant, the ribs on Lu Yuxiang’s chest were all broken. His head also exploded, and brain matter flew everywhere. From the looks of it, he was completely dead. Jiang Ping still kept an eye out and brought the corpse back to the old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest was currently resting with his eyes closed to recover his energy. Jiang Ping threw Lu Yuxiang’s corpse on the ground and asked the old Taoist priest. “Senior, take a look. Is his soul also dead?” The old Taoist priest slowly opened his eyes. Then, he looked at the disgusting scene in front of him. Lu Yuxiang’s chest caved in. His brain...; The old Taoist priest cursed. “Kid, can’t you kill him gently?” “Do you have to be so disgusting?” Jiang Ping scratched his head. “How can you be gentle when killing someone?” The old Taoist priest resisted nausea in his heart. Then, he closed his eyes and used his spiritual energy to check. This was because most cultivators would leave a backup plan for themselves. Even if their physical bodies were destroyed, they would still have a way to preserve a wisp of their souls. As long as they found a suitable host, although it was a bit difficult, it was not impossible for them to rise again. The old Taoist priest opened his eyes again. “One of his three souls and seven spirits are missing. He escaped.” Jiang Ping knew that being cautious was right. Then, he asked the old Taoist priest if there was any way to find the wisp of Lu Yuxiang’s soul that had escaped and kill it? The old Taoist priest shook his head and said that it did not need to be so troublesome. Then, the old Taoist priest took out many talismans. He shook his wrist. The talismans were all ignited. When the talismans were all burned, a series of wails could be heard. Jiang Ping asked curiously. “Senior, what’s going on!” The old Taoist priest looked around, but there was no one around. He answered regretfully. “Because of Lu Yuxiang’s indiscriminate killing of the innocent.” “Many souls of the dead have gathered in the eastern district. When I came to help the souls of the dead, these souls were unwilling to reincarnate.” “I know that they have resentment in their hearts, so I’ve made up my mind to give them an explanation.” “That’s why I’m cooperating with you!” Jiang Ping cupped his hands and bowed with a smile. “Old Senior, you’re a noble person. I really admire you.” The old Taoist priest scolded him in a bad mood. “Don’t give me all this nonsense.” “Hurry up and get rid of this corpse.” After Jiang Ping made an “oh” sound, he grabbed Lu Yuxiang’s ankle with one hand and threw him into the distance. Soon, the cries and wails stopped. Jiang Ping asked curiously. “Is it done?” The old Taoist priest nodded. “Lu Yuxiang only has a wisp of his soul left, and he doesn’t have any fighting strength. How can he withstand the attack of so many vengeful souls? He has brought this upon himself.” Jiang Ping nodded. Then, he walked towards Lu Zhiheng and the other two. The old Taoist priest took out the porcelain bowl and the joss stick. He started to perform a religious ceremony for the souls of the deceased who were unwilling to leave. Jiang Ping took out some medicinal pills from his storage space and fed the three of them. He even scolded them unwillingly. “The three of you are truly blessed to be fed by me.” After he fed the pills to the three of them, Jiang Ping also sensed that the weak vitality in the three of them was slowly recovering. Then, he took out a water bag from his storage space. After he poured a mouthful of water into his mouth, he spat it out at the three of them. Lu Zhiheng and the other two slowly sensed it. Suddenly, they felt a cold sensation on their faces. They all opened their eyes. They saw that Jiang Ping was spitting water on their faces like rain. Lu Zhiheng quickly stopped him. “Brother Jiang, that’s enough!” Jiang Ping swallowed the remaining water in his mouth when he heard the noise. Lu Zhiheng stood up and looked around, but he didn’t see Lu Yuxiang standing there. He asked. “Brother Jiang, then...;” Of course, Jiang Ping knew what Lu Zhiheng was going to ask. So, before Lu Zhiheng finished his sentence, he pointed in a direction. Then, Lu Zhiheng and the other two looked in that direction. Zhou Nan said in disbelief. “Dead...; dead?” Jiang Ping nodded. Lu Zhiheng said to the two people behind him. “Let’s go and take a look.” Jiang Ping reminded them. “I advise you not to go there now.” Lu Zhiheng asked in puzzlement. “Is he not completely dead?” Jiang Ping shook his head. “It just so happens that he is too dead.” “I was afraid that you would feel uncomfortable.” Lu Zhiheng was confused by Jiang Ping’s words, but he still wanted to go over and take a look. After all, Lu Yuxiang was not only the murderer who attacked the eastern district but also the enemy who killed his daughter. After saying that, he walked straight to Lu Yuxiang. As loyal henchmen, Zhou Nan and Wang Xin had to follow him. Jiang Ping smiled wickedly. He looked in the direction where Lu Zhiheng had walked. Lu Zhiheng and the other two approached Lu Yuxiang’s corpse. Their angry faces turned green. Then, the three of them turned their heads in unison. They bent down and began to vomit. Jiang Ping looked at the three of them and laughed. Lu Zhiheng, Zhou Nan, and Wang Xin struggled to stop nausea in their hearts. They dragged their bodies step by step towards Jiang Ping. When they saw Jiang Ping holding his stomach and laughing out loud. The three of them stared at him fiercely. Jiang Ping quickly waved his hand. “It’s none of my business!” “You insisted on going over yourself!” Updates by vip novel. com However, Jiang Ping’s words did not lessen the hatred of the three people. Jiang Ping smiled. “Besides, you can’t beat me now.” “Ahem, I’m not boasting at all. I’m in the heaven ascension realm.” The three people, with Lu Zhiheng leading, were all surprised. Their eyes were wide open. “What?” “You’re in the heaven ascension realm!” “Weren’t you still in the late stage of the earth immortal realm just now!” At this moment, Lu Zhiheng only had one thought in his mind. Fortunately, he didn’t have any bad blood with Jiang Ping. Otherwise, with this pervert in front of him. He would definitely be doomed. Jiang Ping nodded and said. “Why don’t we have a match to verify it?” The three of them knew that Jiang Ping wouldn’t joke about this. They waved their hands repeatedly. No need, no need. Jiang Ping patted Lu Zhiheng’s shoulder. “Old Lu, I’ll leave this mess in the eastern district to you.” Lu Zhiheng looked around. He nodded and then thought of something. “Brother Jiang, aren’t you still on your way?” “It’s getting dark now. Why don’t you leave tomorrow?” “We have cranes in Yellow Clouds City that are specially used for traveling.” “You will still be on time if you leave tomorrow morning.” Jiang Ping thought for a moment and said. “It won’t be too troublesome, right?” Lu Zhiheng shook his head. Then, the old Taoist priest walked over from behind Jiang Ping. “Prepare it for me too. My disciple and I also have to hurry.” Lu Zhiheng spread out his hands. “Of course!” “By the way, tonight there will be a banquet held in the mayor’s mansion. We invite the two of you to the mayor’s mansion for a chat.” “How about it?” Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest looked at each other. They both nodded. After that, the old Taoist priest went straight back to the inn. Perhaps the two of them had the tacit understanding to chat for a while. Therefore, they didn’t fly but walked back to the inn on foot. On the way, Jiang Ping first asked the old Taoist priest for his name. The old Taoist priest answered with a smile. “My surname is Zhao, and my name is Zhao Tianqian.” After hearing the old Taoist priest’s name, Jiang Ping suspected that the old Taoist priest’s parents had a screw loose. However, he had to be respectful on the surface. “Tianqian...; What a good name! It’s loud!” The old Taoist priest waved his hand and said it was nothing. Then, Jiang Ping thought of the time when he was in Longyan Town. He saw his daughter talking with a young Taoist priest on the roof. He couldn’t help but ask. “Senior, do you have a disciple?” Zhao Tianqian nodded. “Yes, he’s about the same age as your daughter.” Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes and looked at the old Taoist priest. From the old Taoist priest’s reaction, he must have known that his daughter and the young Taoist priest knew each other. Therefore, Jiang Ping asked. “About my eldest daughter knowing your young disciple...;” The old Taoist priest was also a smart man. “In Longyan Town, I do have a part to play.” “But if I tell you that these two little guys have a wonderful fate, do you believe it?” Jiang Ping was puzzled. “A wonderful fate?” “Senior, how did you know?” Zhao Tianqian said meaningfully. “I calculated it...;” Jiang Ping was half-convinced, but he wasn’t thinking about how the old Taoist priest calculated it. Instead, he was thinking that his young disciple was trying to abduct his daughter all day long. It was really like a toad trying to eat a swan’s flesh. He had to think of a way to stay away from the two of them. The old Taoist priest said without turning his head. “There’s no need to think about staying away from us. I’ve told you, this is their fate.” “For example, you are going to Xianlai Island to take the ferry; it’s the same for us.” Jiang Ping’s eyes widened. “Senior, you even know about this?” The old Taoist priest nodded. “Not only that, but I also know that you have two extra tickets.” Jiang Ping was speechless. The old Taoist priest said slowly. “If it weren’t for the unforeseen event in Yellow Clouds City, we would have met on Xianlai Island.” “And you will give us the two extra tickets.” After a while, Jiang Ping came back to his senses and suddenly remembered something. “Senior, since you’re so good at fortune-telling, then...;” Zhao Tianqian reached out his hand to stop Jiang Ping, telling him to stop talking. “You don’t have to ask me about your little daughter. I don’t know either.” “And even if I know, I can’t tell you directly.” “I can only tell you that fortune-telling only has two words, which was no fault.” Jiang Ping didn’t understand what the old Taoist priest said. Just as he was about to open his mouth and ask, the old Taoist priest spoke again. “Talking too much is not good for both of us, especially your little daughter.” Jiang Ping shut his mouth and didn’t mention this matter anymore. Just as he was about to walk to the inn, Jiang Ping suddenly remembered. “Senior, is my Yin-Yang Eight Trigrams Disk still with you?” The old Taoist priest nodded calmly. Jiang Ping took out the extra ticket that Fei Cai had bought for him from the Hundred Treasures House. Then, he handed it to the old Taoist priest. “The eight trigrams disk isn’t of much use to me now. In senior’s hands, it can play a better role.” “Senior, I might as well give it to you.” “And these two tickets, I’ll give them to you as well.” “Please take it as a gift.” Jiang Ping had a very good impression of this old Taoist priest in front of him, and his Taoist skills were superb. He still had to be respectful. Even though he could kill him with one slap. The old Taoist priest reached out and took the two tickets made of gold foil. “At least you’re sensible, kid.” Then the two entered the inn. The old Taoist priest said that he wanted to go back and see his disciple. He also told Jiang Ping to go to the room of the little girls and the others first and put out the sleeping incense. Jiang Ping nodded, and the two went into their rooms. After the old Taoist priest entered the room, he let out a long sigh. Then, he put out the incense in the room. He Xiangjiang, who was lying on the bed, woke up slowly. “Master, why do I feel like I slept for so long?” “My mind is so dark.” The old Taoist priest said angrily. “How could it be not long? Look outside; what time is it already?” He Xiangjiang looked out of the window. He saw that the sun had already set. He hurriedly sat up. “Master, why didn’t you wake me up earlier?” “Is the city gate open now? Can we hurry on our way?” Zhao Tianqian pressed He Xiangjiang’s shoulder and said. “There’s no rush. It doesn’t take long. Master has a friend in Yellow Clouds City, and everything has been arranged.” “We’ll leave tomorrow, and he even prepared tools for us to travel...;” He Xiangjiang was a little doubtful. “Master, since when did you have friends in Yellow Clouds City?” Zhao Tianqian knocked on the young Taoist priest’s head. “I have brothers all over the world, can’t I?” “Hurry up and put on your clothes. I’ll take you out to eat.” He Xiangjiang, who had been knocked on the head, obediently did as he was told. After the master and disciple were done packing, they went to the first floor of the inn and waited for Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping first went to the room of the three little girls. The three little girls were sleeping soundly. Jiang Ping’s gaze swept around the room. Then he found the sleeping incense and extinguished it. The three little girls sat up in a daze. When they saw that their father had returned, the three little girls excitedly went forward to hug their father. “Daddy, why do I feel like I’ve been asleep for a long time?” Updates by vip novel. com “Where did daddy go today? Liu’er misses you so much.” “Daddy, when are we going to set off on our journey? Wan’er has slept enough and has the strength to walk.” After Jiang Ping tricked the three little girls, he said. “We will set off tomorrow. Put on your shoes.” “Daddy will take you out to eat delicious food.” The three little girls nodded repeatedly. They put on their shoes obediently without needing Jiang Ping to urge them. Jiang Ping told the three little girls to wait first while he went to call the others. After saying that, Jiang Ping went to Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi’s side. Before Jiang Ping entered the little girls’ room, he went to wake up Li Sushang first. He asked Li Sushang to take care of the three little girls. However, before Li Sushang could open the door of the three little girls’ room, they rushed out of the room by themselves as they were having a lot of fun. Li Sushang patiently told the three little girls to be careful. Then, she followed the three little girls downstairs. He Xiangjiang was lying on the empty table on the first floor of the inn. “Master, who are we waiting for?” The old Taoist priest said unhappily. “Waiting for your little lover!” “Why are you even more impatient than me!” Before He Xiangjiang could think about what his master said, he heard a clear voice behind him. “Young Taoist priest!” He Xiangjiang turned his head to look. He saw a girl in a red dress with bright little eyes wide open. She looked at him with a surprised expression. Wan’er was still holding her two younger sisters, and the two sisters were also looking at him like porcelain dolls. He Xiangjiang was also a little surprised. “Jiang Wan, why are you here!” Wan’er saw that the person who turned his head was really the young Taoist priest, so she immediately ran towards He Xiangjiang. “I didn’t expect to see you here again.” “You’re lingering everywhere.” Then, Wan’er gave He Xiangjiang a blow on the head. He Xiangjiang covered his forehead and asked. “Why did you hit me again?” Wan’er giggled. “Your head feels better than Old Uncle Lei’s head!” At this time, Jiang Ping came down from the second floor with Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. Lei Jingyun heard someone talking about him and shouted. “Who called me!” Wan’er raised her head and saw Jiang Ping and the other two come down. She pointed at the young Taoist priest and shouted at Jiang Ping and the others. “This is the young Taoist priest. My daddy has seen him before. He’s my good friend!” Jiang Ping waved his hand and said, “I know, I know.”. Her two younger sisters stood in the same place, puzzled. When did their eldest sister have a good friend when she had always been with them? How come they didn’t know! Seeing that everyone had arrived, Jiang Ping greeted them directly. “Let’s go. Let’s talk on the way. Senior, we have a carriage. Come with us.” The carriage wasn’t big, and it was crowded with a pair of master and disciple, Jiang Ping, Li Sushang, and three little girls. Between Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi, one of them drove the carriage while the other walked. Otherwise, if this already crowded carriage was stuffed with more people, it would really become a pyramid. Wan’er sat next to her two younger sisters and the young Taoist priest. Beside the young Taoist priest was his master, and Li Sushang sat on the other side of the three little girls. Jiang Ping was pushed to the outermost side. The young Taoist priest, who had never sat so close to a girl, was blushing. It just so happened that Wan’er was a big-hearted person. She immediately hugged He Xiangjiang’s shoulder and imitated the tone of an adult. “Young Taoist priest, it’s rare that we’re so fated.” “We’ll have a good drink at the dinner table later.” Jiang Ping held his forehead. Well, how could she be cheated by others? It was clearly his own daughter who was more proactive. However, Jiang Ping would not fall behind in the etiquette that he should teach. “Ahem, Wan’er, where did you learn all this nonsense!” Wan’er laughed. “I read it in Old Uncle Lei’s novel. He said that I should learn more words, so he gave me two books to study.” Jiang Ping was helpless. He thought that he must keep a close eye on Lei Jingyun in the future and not let him get close to his daughters. Soon, the carriage stopped at the gate of the mayor’s mansion. The guard at the gate of the mayor’s mansion took the reins sensibly and sent someone in to report. Lu Zhiheng almost jogged all the way here. Zhou Nan and Wang Xin followed behind him. Lu Zhiheng cupped his fists and said. “Old Senior, Brother Jiang, the dishes are all served. We’re waiting for you.” The old Taoist priest also cupped his fists at Lu Zhiheng. Jiang Ping also cupped his fists and replied. “Thank you for your kindness, Mayor.” Lu Zhiheng said unhappily. “Don’t call me mayor all the time. It sounds distant.” Jiang Ping was stunned and asked tentatively. “Then, Brother Lu?” Hearing this, Lu Zhiheng smiled happily. After welcoming everyone into the hall, he didn’t say anything more. After sitting down, Lu Zhiheng said that they did not need to be so polite and started to eat. The few young children did not know what greeting was, so they just ate by themselves. Lu Zhiheng walked down from the main seat and came to Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest. He picked up his glass and drank it up. Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest did not hesitate either. They filled their glasses and drank it up in one go. Then, they all looked at each other and smiled. While Wan’er was eating, she saw her father and others calling each other brothers and toasting each other. She also remembered what she had said in the carriage. She raised her cup. She shouted at the young Taoist priest. “Come, young Taoist priest! I’ll toast to you!” Everyone was surprised and looked at Wan’er. Wan’er held the cup in front of her chest and faced He Xiangjiang. Then, the little girl raised her hand and drank the juice in the cup in one gulp. The young Taoist priest was a shy person. When he saw everyone looking at him, he could neither move nor stay still. Wan’er saw that He Xiangjiang had not moved for a long time. So she asked directly. “What’s wrong, young Taoist priest! Are you not giving me respect?” He Xiangjiang was extremely afraid, scared that everyone would laugh at him. He was even more afraid that the little girl in front of him would beat him up later. So he could only brace himself, pick up the fruit juice in front of him, and drink it in one gulp. The few little fellows were drinking fruit juice, but after He Xiangjiang drank his juice, his face actually flushed red. Those who didn’t know better would think that he had drunk his master’s wine by mistake. Jiang Ping interrupted and told everyone to continue eating. Lei Jingyun, who was focused on tasting the wine, suddenly felt a little guilty. Because when everyone looked at Wan’er, Lei Jingyun sensed that his master was staring at him fiercely...; “Wow! Daddy, look, those white cranes are huge!” Liu’er pointed at the five big white cranes and shouted at Jiang Ping in surprise! The five white cranes were as big as two carriages. They had snow-white feathers, and their crowns and sharp beaks were bright red. According to Lu Zhiheng, three to four people could ride a white crane. The little girls were all shocked when they saw the big white cranes. The young Taoist priest was afraid of strangers, but he hid behind his master and widened his eyes. Jiang Ping smiled at the little girl and rubbed her head. Stroking one of the big white cranes, Mayor Lu Zhiheng spoke. “These five white cranes are the flying beasts that our Yellow Clouds City has been raising for many years.” “They are specially used for traveling and can fly for a long time.” “Brother Jiang, if you want to go to Xianlai Island, you only need to stop at Nanwu City once and rest for a night. Then, you can reach Xianlai Island directly.” Jiang Ping smiled and cupped his fists to thank Lu Zhiheng. “Thank you, Brother Lu. However, how will these white cranes return when we ride them to Xianlai Island?” Lu Zhiheng patted the white crane’s wings and said proudly. Updates by vip novel. com “The ones I have are all professionally trained.” “When you get there, they will return the way they came.” Jiang Ping was also interested in the white cranes. It seemed that he could try raising a few in the future in case he needed to go on a journey again. In the end, Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest asked for three white cranes in total. Lu Zhiheng personally picked the three that flew the fastest and steadiest. “Daddy, how are we going to sit?” Wan’er asked Jiang Ping from the side. Before Jiang Ping could answer, the other two little girls raised their hands and jumped up. They shouted that they wanted to be with their daddy. Jiang Ping said yes to them, and Yan’er and Liu’er finally settled down. Then Wan’er tugged at the corner of Jiang Ping’s shirt awkwardly. “Daddy, I want to ride with the young Taoist priest.” Jiang Ping was stunned. She hasn’t even gotten married, but her arm is already clinging to another person’s elbow? As soon as Wan’er finished speaking, she ran directly to the young Taoist priest’s side. At this time, the young Taoist priest was still hiding behind his master, being submissive. Seeing Wan’er running over, the young Taoist priest was also a little curious. “Young Taoist priest, I want to sit with you!” He Xiangjiang looked at Wan’er, then raised his head to look at his master. It meant that he didn’t have the final say, and he had to ask this old man. Wan’er understood at a glance and also raised her head to look at the old Taoist priest. Seeing the two little fellows looking at him, Zhao Tianqian raised his hand to stroke his beard and said with a smile. “Why not!” Wan’er smiled. He Xiangjiang, who was hiding behind the old Taoist priest, also stood aside and came beside Wan’er. Jiang Ping was speechless and complained in his heart. Of course, he would say okay. That’s his daughter and his disciple. He would like to see if the old Taoist priest could remain calm if their roles were switched. Liu’er grabbed Jiang Ping’s sleeve. “Daddy, is Sister Wan’er not coming with us?” Jiang Ping replied. “It’s okay. Daddy will be fine with you.” Yan’er didn’t say anything. She was holding a book in her hand and reading it with great interest. If it weren’t for Jiang Ping not paying attention to the book in Yan’er’s hand, Lei Jingyun would have been beaten up by Jiang Ping. Because Yan’er was reading the novel that Lei Jingyun showed Wan’er! Jiang Ping picked up Liu’er and said to Li Sushang. “Sushang, it’s good that Wan’er went over. You can come with us.” Li Sushang nodded without any objection. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi, the two brothers in trouble, could only ride on the same white crane. The white crane rose into the air, and the little girls shouted in surprise. Wan’er was the one who shouted the loudest. “Young Taoist priest, look!” “We’re taking off!” However, He Xiangjiang, who was sitting at the back, kept his eyes closed, muttering to himself. Wan’er turned around and saw the young Taoist priest muttering to himself. He didn’t even open his eyes, so she asked the old Taoist priest out of curiosity. “Old Senior, what is He Xiangjiang doing?” The old Taoist priest lowered his head to look at his disciple and said indifferently. “He is afraid. He is chanting the mind-calming mantra.” Wan’er slapped He Xiangjiang’s head in a bad mood. “You have no backbone. What is there to be afraid of? Open your eyes.” He Xiangjiang let out an “oh” and slowly opened his eyes. He saw himself riding a white crane and shuttling through the clouds. The Sun was so big that it seemed as if he could touch it. The sky was so beautiful. Why didn’t he notice this vast sky before? It was actually so beautiful. He Xiangjiang saw this unreal scene and didn’t speak for a long time. While he was in a daze, there was a slap. A piercing pain came from his head again. “I’m asking you a question? Are you mute?” Wan’er took back her hand that had just slapped the young Taoist priest’s head and said angrily. He Xiangjiang was confused. He didn’t notice Wan’er talking to him just now. “Huh? What did you ask me?” Wan’er grabbed his ear and shouted loudly. “I’m asking you, is this your first time flying into the sky!” He Xiangjiang’s head suddenly shrank back. He rubbed his ear. “You don’t have to be so loud.” He complained to Wan’er. “Yeah, it’s my first time.” Then, the young Taoist priest looked up at the clouds, and he reached out to touch them. Wan’er pursed her lips. “It’s not my first time. My daddy took me and flew in the sky for a long time.” He Xiangjiang gave Wan’er a thumbs up. “Then you’re really amazing.” The little girl gave him another slap. “You’re being perfunctory!” He Xiangjiang held his head and didn’t understand how he was being perfunctory. But he couldn’t beat her, so he could only admit defeat obediently. The white crane that Jiang Ping rode was at the front. Yan’er and Liu’er also widened their eyes along the way. Especially Yan’er, who actually put away the book that she couldn’t put down. She exclaimed along with Liu’er. “Wow! Daddy, look at that cloud! It’s so big!” “Daddy, look at that cloud! Doesn’t it look like a lion?” “And that, big white rabbit, big horse!” Jiang Ping looked in the direction where the two little girls were pointing, and he was completely overwhelmed. He quickly said that he saw it. The two little girls sat between Jiang Ping and Li Sushang, and Jiang Ping sat at the front, controlling the white cranes. Before they set off, Lu Zhiheng had already taught them how to ride the white cranes. It was very simple. These white cranes could understand humans, and they could communicate with them using spiritual energy. Therefore, it was easy for Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest to get used to it. On the contrary, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi’s side. Their speed was much slower than the two teams before them. They were almost left behind several times until they couldn’t even see their shadows. “Old Lei, can you do it or not!” “Why are master and the others so fast? You’re crawling like a turtle.” Lei Jingyun retorted. “If you can do it, you can take over!” He had suspected that the white crane beneath him had rebelled. Otherwise, why would it be so disobedient when all of them were communicating with spiritual energy? Or was it because his cultivation was not high enough to control it...; In short, the two of them could only struggle to keep up with the two teams in front. Wan’er saw her daddy flying at the front of the team. She asked Zhao Tianqian carefully. “Old Senior, can we surpass my daddy and the others?” Zhao Tianqian asked back. “Why do we have to surpass them!” The playful little girl raised her arms and shouted. “No reason, just to fight for our honor!” The old Taoist priest beamed with joy. This little girl was to his liking. As expected of the person who was qualified to be his disciple-in-law. He said to He Xiangjiang and Wan’er. “Sit tight. I’m going to speed up!” He Xiangjiang was about to dissuade Wan’er from being so competitive since safety was the most important thing. Before he could say anything, his master told him to sit firmly. Updates by vip novel. com The young Taoist priest could only grab Wan’er’s clothes tightly, afraid that he would fall. Zhao Tianqian also sat upright. Then, he injected spiritual energy into the white crane, indicating that it could be faster. The white crane received the order immediately. With a whoosh, it directly dashed out. Its speed was so fast that He Xiangjiang’s lotus crown was almost blown away by the wind several times. Wan’er was at the front, shouting fearlessly. “Awesome!” Liu’er was still looking at the clouds when suddenly a white thing flashed in front of her eyes. She rubbed her eyes, thinking that she had seen wrongly. Yan’er asked. “Is that Wan’er and the others?” Jiang Ping nodded. Liu’er listened to Yan’er’s words and confirmed that she had not seen them wrongly. “How can they fly so fast!” Yan’er said to Jiang Ping with some displeasure. “Daddy! You don’t need me to tell you what to do, right!” Jiang Ping was stunned for a moment, then he nodded. Then, he urged his spiritual energy and ordered the white crane under his feet to accelerate. Jiang Ping was very helpless. His second daughter had always liked to compete with Wan’er to be the eldest sister since she was young. She wouldn’t be happy if he didn’t allow her to compete with them. Therefore, when Yan’er spoke, Jiang Ping knew that they would arrive at Nanwu City much earlier than planned. Jiang Ping’s crane also rushed out. Qiu Chi pointed to the front and shouted at Lei Jingyun. “Old Lei, look, why are they suddenly speeding up...;” Lei Jingyun looked over. He saw the two white cranes in front flying at an extremely fast speed. Soon, they disappeared from their sight. Lei Jingyun was stunned. What should he do now? It would be dark before he could reach Nanwu City! Lei Jingyun sighed and said. “There’s no other way. Let’s take it slow.” “Fortunately, Mayor Lu has prepared a map for us...;” In the sky, an old white crane was carrying the two of them in the clouds. They were flying unsteadily in the sky...; Jiang Ping and the old Taoist priest were constantly competing with each other. If they were not afraid that the white cranes would die of exhaustion, they would have been able to move faster. Originally, they were supposed to arrive at Nanwu City at sunset, but they arrived at noon. The two white cranes landed outside Nanwu City. Everyone jumped off the white cranes one after another. After they steadied themselves, Li Sushang asked Jiang Ping. “What should we do with these two white cranes?” “We can’t just bring them along, right?” “Isn’t it too eye-catching to enter the city?” Jiang Ping smiled and said. “Did you forget that the little ones still have a storage bracelet that they can keep living things in?” Li Sushang suddenly came to a realization. Jiang Ping called Wan’er and Yan’er over. He told them to release the two auspicious beasts in their bracelets first. First, it was because these little auspicious beasts had not come out for a long time. Second, it was because they were afraid that if they put the white cranes together with them, they would fight. The auspicious beast that belonged to Wan’er was called Bamboo, and Yan’er’s was called Mountain Stream. The two little ones looked dispirited as soon as they were released, and they even looked a little resentful. It was as if they were saying why they had locked them up for so long. However, when the two little girls picked them up, their expressions became visibly joyful. Jiang Ping put the two white cranes into the storage space. Then, he said to the few of them. “Let’s go into the city!” Wan’er felt as if something was missing. She looked around and found that there were no traces of Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. “Where are Old Uncle Lei and Uncle Qiu?” At this moment, Jiang Ping finally reacted. He looked around and then looked at the horizon. “They can’t be lost.” “Forget about them. They have a map anyway. I gave Liu’er’s storage bracelet to them before we left.” “Let’s go in first. Later they’ll come and find us.” Everyone nodded and then went straight into the city. Wan’er carried Bamboo and ran to the front to catch up with He Xiangjiang. “Young Taoist priest, look, this is my...; family!” “His name is Bamboo.” He Xiangjiang looked at the auspicious beast that looked like a wild boar and wanted to stay away from Wan’er. “Wan’er, can you take him away from me? I’m afraid...;” The old Taoist priest looked at Bamboo in the little girl’s arms with great interest. “Oh, it’s an auspicious beast. If I remember correctly, it should be the auspicious beast Dangkang.” Wan’er’s eyes lit up, and she gave Zhao Tianqian a thumbs up. “Old Senior, you know your stuff.” “My two younger sisters and I, each of us have one auspicious beast.” Wan’er took small steps and said proudly. Zhao Tianqian also gave the little girl a thumbs up. “You guys are really lucky!” After entering the city gate, Liu’er and Yan’er kept dragging Jiang Ping around, wanting to take a stroll first. Jiang Ping knew that these two little fellows didn’t have good intentions. They definitely wanted to spend money again. However, under the coquettish attacks of the two little girls, Jiang Ping finally couldn’t resist and agreed to take them around first. Jiang Ping took the little girls and Li Sushang to catch up with Zhao Tianqian in front and asked. “Senior, we’re going to look around. Do you want to come with us?” Zhao Tianqian stretched his body and said. “You guys can go. I’m getting old, so I’ll find an inn to rest first.” Jiang Ping was a bit suspicious. He’s getting old? The battle in Yellow Clouds City that day was pretty awesome. Since the old Taoist priest didn’t agree, Jiang Ping didn’t force him. He gave the old Taoist priest a pouch. “Senior, please help us book a few rooms when you book the inn. I’ll be paying, so you can buy wine with the leftover money?” The old Taoist priest took the pouch with a smile. “Sure, sure, sure!” Then, Jiang Ping wanted to leave with the three little girls. When he called Wan’er, she unexpectedly refused Jiang Ping for the first time. “Daddy, you guys go ahead. I want to find the inn with the Old Senior.” Jiang Ping did not know whether to laugh or cry. This daughter of his was really uncultured! Then, Jiang Ping looked at Zhao Tianqian. The old Taoist priest nodded, and only then did Jiang Ping feel at ease to leave with the other two little girls and Li Sushang. On the way, Wan’er had been carrying Bamboo and walking backward. She kept explaining to Zhao Tianqian and He Xiangjiang about the origin of the auspicious beast in her arms. Zhao Tianqian smiled at everyone and listened to Wan’er patiently. He Xiangjiang deliberately slowed down his pace, wanting to distance himself from Wan’er a little. The young Taoist priest who had stayed in the village since young would retreat a hundred meters when he saw a dog, not to mention this creature that looked like a fierce...; wild boar? Wan’er was talking enthusiastically and did not pay attention to her feet at all. She was walking backward, and then she accidentally stepped on a stone and fell backward. The old Taoist priest did not react in time either. The little girl was lying on the ground with her hands on her waist. And Bamboo, which was in her arms, was gone. “Where did this wild boar come from? It’s so ugly!” A magnetic voice could be heard. Wan’er and the others looked in the direction of the voice. They saw a young master dressed in white with a feather fan in his hand. He looked at the wild boar under his feet. He was about to kick it away. Wan’er shouted. “No!” The elegant-looking young master turned his head and looked over. Wan’er quickly got up and ran in front of the young master. She squatted down and picked up the wild boar to her chest. The young master was almost half a body taller than Wan’er. He looked down at this little girl! “Is this wild boar yours?” The young master asked impatiently. Updates by vip novel. com Wan’er nodded. “I’m sorry. I was careless. It won’t happen again.” The young master said without mercy. “Sorry? Do you know that this wild boar scared me?” “What are the guards thinking? Why did they let someone bring a wild boar in!” The young master’s voice was very loud. The passersby stopped and gathered around to watch the show. Zhao Tianqian and He Xiangjiang also hurried to Wan’er’s side. Wan’er admitted that she was in the wrong and kept bowing. “I’m sorry, I’m sorry.” She apologized several times, but the young master did not appreciate it at all. He raised his leg and wanted to kick Wan’er and the wild boar away. He Xiangjiang saw this and pulled Wan’er behind him. “Young Master, we have apologized.” “And you haven’t lost anything. Why don’t we just treat it as making new friends and let this matter go?” Zhao Tianqian didn’t interrupt because he had always given his disciple free-range education. Many things had to be experienced by this little disciple before he could grow up. “Make friends! Do you know who I am?” “You dare to talk about making friends with me?” That young master suddenly flew into a rage. This was because he saw that this young Taoist priest in shabby clothes actually said something like making friends with him. This was a huge insult to him, the son of the mayor! The surrounding spectators were also discussing animatedly. “Isn’t that the son of the mayor?” “Heh, this is going to be a good show.” “These people are foreigners, right? They even dare to provoke Wen Quanyong!” The young Taoist priest stood in front of Wan’er and looked at the young master in front of him, who was already furious. “What’s wrong? Do we need to look at one’s background to make friends?” He Xiangjiang was a little angry. It was obvious that he looked down on him. Wen Quanyong glared at the young Taoist priest, who was much shorter than him and shouted. “What else can I do? Look at how many holes have been mended in your ragged clothes?” “How dare you! How can you say such a thing?” He Xiangjiang held Wan’er’s hand tightly. If Wan’er didn’t have the ancient divine physique, she would have cried out in pain. Wan’er could feel the young Taoist priest’s emotions. She didn’t want to stand behind the young Taoist priest. She thought that it would be fine if she apologized. Her daddy also said that if she did something wrong, she should apologize first. If the other party was unreasonable, then she would think of a way so that he would be reasonable. Wan’er shouted at Wen Quanyong. “Can you speak a little softer!” “Can you be a little more polite!” This time, Wen Quanyong was also stunned. Why did this little girl’s voice suddenly become so loud? It was as if he was the one who was in the wrong. The people around also cried out in surprise. “Aiyo! This is bad. This time, they have become enemies with the mayor.” “It looks like these foreigners won’t be able to leave.” “The little girl is quite brave. It’s just that her bravery was used at the wrong time!” “Guess what Young Master Wen will do next?” After Wen Quanyong regained his senses, listening to the discussions of the people around him, he felt that he had embarrassed himself. Without saying anything, he directly stretched out his leg towards Wan’er and He Xiangjiang and kicked them. He Xiangjiang had never cultivated before. When he saw the big shoe board coming at him, he closed his eyes in panic. Wan’er didn’t let him have his way. She directly stood forward, holding Bamboo with one hand and clenching her fist with the other. She punched at the big shoe board. Wan’er’s punch didn’t move at all. On the contrary, the aggressive Wen Quanyong cried out when he felt the pain in the soles of his feet. “Aiyo!” Then, Wen Quanyong lost his footing and directly fell to the ground. Wen Quanyong, who was paralyzed on the ground, stretched out his trembling hand and pointed at Wan’er. “You...; you...; just you wait. If you have the guts, don’t go!” Wen Quanyong said with a slight tremble. The surrounding people were all stunned. Hm? If they remembered correctly, the mayor’s son should also be at the late stage of the core building realm! At such an age and with such cultivation, he could be considered a favored son of the heavens! How could he be blocked by a single punch from a little girl? Everyone didn’t understand, and Wen Quanyong didn’t understand either. Just now, the soles of his feet felt like they had been rammed by a cow. He felt an intense pain in his entire right foot. Moreover, according to Wen Quanyong’s perception, this foot most likely had several broken bones. At this moment, he was holding back the pain while listening to the discussions of the people around him. His face was ashen. What made him more concerned was not the pain in his leg but the strange gazes of the people around him. Wen Quanyong was known throughout the entire Nanwu City. A scholar, a genius cultivator. He could be considered to be both civil and martial, although he was used to being arrogant and despotic. No one dared to provoke him in this city. Therefore, this young master didn’t bring a guard with him when he went out. According to him, he went out to look for women, so it was inconvenient to bring a guard with him. Before he encountered Wan’er, he had just left the brothel happily. Wan’er withdrew her fist and patted He Xiangjiang, signaling him not to be afraid. “I already said I’m sorry! I also punched you for bullying the young Taoist priest.” “We’re even!” After saying that, she looked directly at the old Taoist priest. Zhao Tianqian smiled, gave her a thumbs-up, and then left with the two little fellows. Wen Quanyong felt confused as he lay on the ground. They were even? Did she know where this is? Did she know who he was? The onlookers were even more excited than Wen Quanyong. They hadn’t seen such a big commotion for a long time. The last time it was this lively was also a long time ago when a foreigner angered Wen Quanyong. That foreigner even beat Wen Quanyong up. In the end, the mayor had to make an appearance and suppressed that person and paraded him down the street. He did not kill him easily. Instead, he put that person into a pot of oil and scalded him to death. At that time, this matter caused a commotion throughout the city. This matter that caused a sensation throughout the entire city was treated by the people as a topic for discussion after dinner. Everyone was curious. Wen Quanyong, who was used to being arrogant and domineering, had suffered a setback today. Once his father, the mayor, who was protecting his son, knew about it. What kind of revenge would he take? Therefore, before the people dispersed, the incident had already spread. In less than two hours, the entire city was talking about this matter. There were even some people who became private dealers and let people make bets to guess how many more days could the foreigner live! Wen Quanyong was in so much pain that he couldn’t stand up. He cared about his dignity, so he didn’t ask the onlookers to help him up. Although he didn’t ask for help, there were still many people who wanted to curry favor with him, the young master of the mayor’s mansion. “Come, come, Young Mayor. let us help you up.” If it were any other time, he would kick these lowly people far away and even spit on them if they came close to him. But now, even if Wen Quanyong wanted to kick them, he would not be able to do so. Wen Quanyong rejected their help and said directly. “One of you go to the mayor’s mansion and inform.” “Inform that I, Wen Quanyong, was beaten up!” “Heavily injured!” The few people who came forward to curry favor with him fought to do this job. Without waiting for Wen Quanyong to finish speaking, there were already people running towards the mayor’s mansion. Wen Quanyong was just waiting on the spot. In less than 15 minutes, the mayor’s mansion had already sent people over without stopping. When they came, they even brought a wheelchair and a doctor. Wen Quanyong was a little angry. “Your young master was beaten by someone, and the entire Nanwu City knows about it. How could the mayor’s mansion be the last to find out about it!” The few attendants who ran over all knelt on the ground with their heads lowered and were willing to accept the punishment. Wen Quanyong frowned and asked. “Where’s my father?” The leading attendant answered. “The mayor is currently receiving an important guest in the mansion!” Wen Quanyong nodded and said. “The few of you, find the person who injured me immediately!” “If you can’t get it done before nightfall, just wait to die together with them.” The few attendants were terrified. After receiving the order, they quickly split up. A group of people first searched the nearby area. Nanwu City’s urban area was not smaller than Yellow Clouds City. It would be difficult to find the person with only these few people before nightfall. Hence, they sent another person to go back and inform the guards of the mayor’s mansion to come out and capture the person. Wen Quanyong took a medicinal pill, and his right leg was tied up by the doctor’s leg support frame. In fact, with the degree of his injury, after taking a medicinal pill and resting for two days, he would be able to walk. After all, he was a cultivator so his self-healing ability was very fast. However, the young mayor had a distinguished identity. Although he knew that he didn’t need support, he had to do a good job on the surface. Wen Quanyong sat in the wheelchair. Then, he had the doctor push him back to the mayor’s mansion. Since he could not defeat the people, Wen Quanyong did not forget that he still had his father, who was the mayor. Jiang Ping brought the few little girls to go shopping in the city market. The two little girls would stop in their tracks if they saw anything interesting. Then, they would act coquettishly to Jiang Ping. In the end, Jiang Ping could not stand the pestering of the two little girls and bought a bunch of useless things. But Yan’er was still very sensible. Apart from those useless things, Yan’er also bought a lot of books, saying that she would read them on the way. Jiang Ping felt very gratified when he saw his second daughter like this. He also bought some fish to feed the three white cranes that had been on the road for a whole day. Jiang Ping saw that it was getting late, so he told the two little girls directly. “We should go back. Otherwise, when it becomes dark, it will be hard to find Wan’er and the others.” Yan’er and Liu’er still wanted more, but seeing the determination in Jiang Ping’s eyes, they could only nod and agree. When they parted just now, Jiang Ping had used spiritual energy to mark Wan’er’s body. Now, as long as they could sense the location of the mark, they could find Wan’er and the old Taoist priest. He had just taken two steps back. Jiang Ping saw a group of people looking for something on the street. These people were all wearing black clothes and looked very orderly. The main target of the search was a little girl. Jiang Ping was a little puzzled, but he didn’t want to meddle in other people’s business. He pulled the two little girls and was about to walk away with Li Sushang. A guard stopped Jiang Ping. The guard held a portrait in his hand. Then, he squatted down and stared at Yan’er and Liu’er. The more he looked, the more the guard’s eyebrows furrowed. The portrait in the guard’s hand was provided by the people who had gone to the mayor’s mansion to report. Those people described the appearance of Wan’er and the other two little girls. The mayor’s mansion hired an artist to draw them out as quickly as possible. They also hired more than one artist and drew more than one copy. The guards of the mayor’s mansion on the streets had a portrait in their hands and were searching everywhere. Jiang Ping saw that the guard’s expression didn’t seem right. So he stuck his head out to look at the portrait in the guard’s hands. When he saw the appearance of Wan’er and the other two appear on that piece of paper. Jiang Ping’s mind went blank. He immediately guessed that Wan’er might have caused trouble again. The guard compared the portrait to Yan’er and Liu’er. The more he looked at the two little girls, the more he felt that they were similar to the girl in the portrait. Then, he opened the portrait and pointed at Wan’er. He asked Yan’er and Liu’er. “Do you know this person?” Liu’er looked at the portrait shyly and didn’t say anything. Yan’er replied. “I don’t know.” “Hey, why does this person look so much like us? Daddy, look!” Jiang Ping bent down to look at the portrait. He nodded. “They do look a little alike.” “Little brother, anything wrong with these three people?” The guard stood up and said. “The whole city knows that these three people rammed into the young mayor today, but you don’t know?” As he spoke, he looked at Jiang Ping with a suspicious gaze. Jiang Ping smiled. “We just went out today, and we didn’t meet anyone we knew along the way. How would we know?” The guard was skeptical. Then, he rolled up the portrait, put it away, and turned around to leave. Just now, when Jiang Ping glanced at the portrait, he had already used his spiritual energy to send a voice transmission to the two little girls. He transmitted his voice to Liu’er and told her not to speak. Yan’er was smarter, so Jiang Ping told her how to answer. After the guard had left, Yan’er raised her head and asked Jiang Ping. “Daddy, did Wan’er cause trouble again?” Jiang Ping nodded and said with a deep look in his eyes. “Maybe.” After saying that, Jiang Ping felt helpless again. That little girl really couldn’t stay calm even if she was away from him for even a quarter of an hour. Then, Jiang Ping didn’t explain further and directly rushed to the old Taoist priest’s side with the two little girls and Li Sushang. Wan’er was walking in front of the old Taoist priest and He Xiangjiang happily. From time to time, she even stopped and turned around to show the punch that she had just used on Wen Quanyong. “Young Taoist priest, how was it? That punch of mine just now wasn’t it cool!” He Xiangjiang nodded his head earnestly from the bottom of his heart. “It was cool, very cool!” Wan’er asked He Xiangjiang with a smile. “Then, do you want to cultivate with me? Otherwise, look at your weak body. In the future, when I’m not around, you’ll be bullied again.” The young Taoist priest was stunned. Cultivate? Then, He Xiangjiang looked at his master. The old Taoist priest pretended not to hear. He looked elsewhere and whistled leisurely...; He Xiangjiang shook his head. “My master won’t let me cultivate yet.” Wan’er was a little surprised. “Ah!” “Why!” The last sentence was for the old Taoist priest. Zhao Tianqian laughed. “If he cultivates, his height will skyrocket. Won’t you have to jump up and hit him in the future?” Eh? He Xiangjiang was puzzled. What was his master talking about? What did he mean by hitting him? Was he still his master? Most importantly, Wan’er held her chin and thought for a moment before nodding. “That’s true. Old Senior, I think you’re right.” “Young Taoist priest, you’d better not cultivate for now. I will always protect you.” “Otherwise, when you’re much taller than me, I’ll have to beat you up like how I beat Old Uncle Lei.” He Xiangjiang sighed and complained. “Or, Wan’er, can you not beat me?” Lei Jingyun had asked Wan’er this question before. Now He Xiangjiang asked her again, and Wan’er would always be shaking her head seriously. “No.” Zhao Tianqian brought the two little fellows to the inn. After entering the inn, the old Taoist priest took out a few pieces of silver with a smile. “Shopkeeper, we will need about six or seven rooms to stay in the inn. Sorry for the trouble.” The shopkeeper, who was doing the accounts with his head lowered, heard that six or seven rooms were needed. He immediately burst into laughter. When he saw the pieces of silver handed over to him on the table, the corners of his mouth curled up. “Okay, okay!” Before he raised his head, he agreed. However, when the innkeeper raised his head to look at the old Taoist priest. He was a little stunned. He seemed to be in a daze. Zhao Tianqian picked up the silver on the table and waved it in front of the shopkeeper. “Shopkeeper? Shopkeeper!” Only then did he come back to his senses. After the innkeeper came back to his senses, he still led the three of them to pick a room with a smile on his face. However, the smile on the shopkeeper’s face seemed to be a little forced compared to before. After confirming the room, Zhao Tianqian paid the bill directly. Then, he brought the two little fellows into a room and waited for Jiang Ping and the others. Afraid that the two of them would be hungry, Zhao Tianqian even asked the waiter to bring some pastries over. The waiter had just finished delivering the pastries from that room. Then, he saw his boss winking at him and making gestures. The waiter obediently ran over and asked. “Boss, what’s wrong?” The innkeeper was holding a picture scroll in his hand. It was given to him by someone from the mayor’s mansion just now. He was told that if he saw these people in the scroll, he must report it to the people from the mayor’s mansion. At first, the shopkeeper didn’t mind since he had owned a shabby shop. So, what information could he get? With a cursory glance at the picture scroll, he directly rolled it up and threw it aside. Until just now when the old Taoist priest walked through the door. The shopkeeper suddenly felt familiar. After taking them to look at the room, the innkeeper took out the picture scroll to look carefully. Turns out these are the three people. The shopkeeper gave the waiter a sign to keep quiet. “Let’s go downstairs.” After going downstairs, the shopkeeper was still worried, so he directly pulled the waiter to the kitchen. “Boss, what’s wrong? Why are you so surprised?” The shopkeeper took out the scroll and showed it to the waiter. The waiter was also stunned when he saw it. He even began to stutter. “This...; this...;” The shopkeeper directly slapped the waiter. “Don’t do that. You stay here and keep an eye on them. I’ll go to the mayor’s mansion to report.” The waiter hesitated, but the shopkeeper said something before he left. If they were captured and sent to the mayor’s mansion, he would be rewarded. Then, he would have a share. And he nodded repeatedly. When the innkeeper walked to the streets, he did not even need to go to the mayor’s mansion. The streets were currently full of people from the mayor’s mansion. He grabbed a random person and said. “Sir, I found the wanted criminal that you’re looking for.” The guard who was stopped was shocked. “Really!” The innkeeper nodded and directly told the details of Zhao Tianqian staying in his inn. The guard saw that he didn’t seem to be lying, and also, no one would dare to joke about this matter with the mayor’s mansion. He immediately said to the shopkeeper. “You go back first. I will go and gather people, and then I will be there in a moment.” The innkeeper wanted to say something but stopped himself. His two palms rubbed against each other. “Then Sir...;” The guard understood and said in a bad mood. “Don’t worry. When the time comes, I won’t give you any less reward.” “As long as you keep an eye on them.” The innkeeper nodded repeatedly. Then, the guard directly called his brothers who were searching nearby, and after whispering a few words, the few of them dispersed. The innkeeper also obediently went back to guard the three people. No, it was the fortune tree! Jiang Ping followed his own imprint and walked into an inn. Then, he pushed open the door of the old Taoist priest’s room. The moment he entered, he saw Wan’er talking non-stop to the other two people about the exciting stories she had read in her novel. She did not notice anyone entering at all. Jiang Ping coughed twice. “Ahem, Wan’er, did you get into trouble again today?” Wan’er heard Jiang Ping’s voice and jumped down from the stool. She called Jiang Ping over to sit down. Jiang Ping said unhappily. “Daddy is asking you a question.” Actually, Jiang Ping wasn’t angry. He only pretended to be like this because he wanted his eldest daughter to restrain herself in the future. After all, he couldn’t stay by her side forever. Wan’er started to get nervous when she saw how serious Jiang Ping was. She didn’t say a word for a long time. He Xiangjiang helped her out. “Wan’er got into trouble because someone bullied us. Wan’er even protected me.” Wan’er felt like she was wronged when she heard He Xiangjiang speak up for her. Her tears almost fell. Jiang Ping couldn’t bear to see this. He quickly ran over to comfort Wan’er. Wan’er turned around and ignored Jiang Ping. “Alright, Daddy isn’t angry. Don’t cry.” Wan’er was furious. If there weren’t so many people present, Wan’er would have cried. Jiang Ping saw that comforting her was useless, so he immediately said. “Who bullied you? Daddy will go and reason with him!” Wan’er slowly opened her mouth. “There’s no need. I’ve already taught him a lesson.” Jiang Ping knew his daughter well. As long as she was willing to speak, her anger had subsided. He took out the candied haws that he had bought with her two younger sisters today from his storage space. First, he handed a candied haw skewer to He Xiangjiang. He Xiangjiang looked at his master. Seeing that his master nodded, he took it happily. Then he passed it to Wan’er. Wan’er deliberately did not take it. It was only when Liu’er took the candied haw and stuffed it into her hand that she reluctantly accepted it. Jiang Ping asked He Xiangjiang. “Xiangjiang, tell uncle what happened today.” He Xiangjiang told him everything that happened today. After hearing this, Jiang Ping was a little surprised and touched Wan’er’s head. It seemed that Wan’er became sensible. In the past, when she met such an unreasonable person, Wan’er wouldn’t even apologize. She would just beat the person up straightaway...; While they were talking, a large group of guards from the mayor’s mansion was quietly approaching the inn...; The innkeeper had already evacuated the other guests in the inn. Whether his inn would collapse if a fight broke out later, the innkeeper didn’t care at all. As long as the guards of the mayor’s mansion could catch the three people, he would be rewarded handsomely. It was enough for him to open an even bigger inn in Nanwu City! The innkeeper was at the entrance. He looked up at the second floor and looked out of the door from time to time. He looked very anxious. After a while, the guard who met him just now had arrived. “Where are those people?” The innkeeper pointed to a room on the second floor. “They are there, but a man, a woman, and two little girls entered their room just now.” “It looks like they are in cahoots!” There was no one else in the inn except for Jiang Ping and his group. Therefore, in all the guest rooms, only the room where Jiang Ping stayed had a kerosene lamp on. The guard nodded and then whispered a few words to his leader. The leader waved his hand toward the back. More than a hundred guards from the mayor’s mansion swarmed over. They directly rushed up to the second floor! Jiang Ping heard the noisy footsteps outside and realized that something was wrong. He used spiritual energy to investigate. He found that his group was surrounded by more than a hundred guards. But Jiang Ping’s expression was calm. Because the strongest among these guards was only at the origin core realm. Jiang Ping let the little girls stay in the room. He stood up and didn’t even wait for the guards to break the door open. He directly opened the door. Standing in the corridor, the guards who had already gone up to the second floor were all stunned. They originally wanted to attack him while he was unprepared. Why did someone come out directly? However, no one was afraid. Because no matter what, there were more people on their side. Therefore, some people in the crowd shouted at Jiang Ping. “Where are those two brats and that old man?” “Hand them over quickly, or else everyone in this room will be fried!” Jiang Ping tiptoed, wanting to see who was speaking in the crowd. When the person who spoke saw Jiang Ping’s actions, he lowered his head guiltily. Although he wasn’t afraid, what if that person only targeted him and chased after him when the fight started? Wouldn’t it be over for him? Jiang Ping asked calmly. “Who’s the leader here?” These guards didn’t say anything. The ones who were to betray their leader must be tired of living in Nanwu City! Jiang Ping saw that no one said anything. He directly stretched out his hand and used the force of his palm to pull a random person to him. He tightly grabbed his neck. Everyone was shocked. What technique was this! Could it be that this was an expert with unfathomable cultivation! Jiang Ping stared at the guard whose neck he had grabbed. “Who is your leader!” The guard couldn’t breathe, and his face turned purple. He tried his best to reach out his hand and point at the door of the inn. Jiang Ping directly threw him down the first floor. Then he turned around and closed the door. Before closing the door, Jiang Ping said to Zhao Tianqian. “Senior, take care of my daughters for me.” After saying that, he directly jumped down the first floor. These guards were very vigilant. After Jiang Ping jumped down the first floor, they immediately turned around and surrounded Jiang Ping. However, Jiang Ping’s aura was too strong. Therefore, these guards only dared to keep a distance from him. They didn’t dare to take even half a step forward. Jiang Ping slowly walked out of the inn. Those guards also followed him out. They were still five steps away from Jiang Ping. After Jiang Ping walked out of the inn, only then did he see the leader of these guards. The leader wore dark green clothes, which were quite different from these guards. Jiang Ping only looked at him calmly. The leader smiled instead. Because he sensed that the aura emitted from Jiang Ping’s body was at most at the late stage of the origin core realm. He was also at the origin core realm, and with the help of so many guards under him. Taking down this person in front of him was as easy as turning over a hand. Of course, Jiang Ping suppressed his cultivation at this time. Just now, Jiang Ping’s spiritual energy had detected that among the people surrounding him, the strongest was only at the origin core realm. If he had revealed his true cultivation right from the start, he would have scared them off before he could even teach them a lesson. The leader had a bewitching smile on his face. “My name is Ye Jun, I’m the Chief Protector of the mayor’s mansion!” When Ye Jun mentioned that the mayor’s mansion still had protectors, he had specially emphasized it. Jiang Ping said nonchalantly. “So?” Ye Jun only thought that this was the first time this young man had come to Nanwu City and had never heard of the mayor’s mansion in Nanwu City. That was why he didn’t know what was good for him. He called out to Jiang Ping very patiently. “Hand over the three people in the room, and I won’t make things difficult for you.” “You’re also in the origin core realm, and your cultivation isn’t easy. Perhaps we can even make friends through this matter.” Hearing these words, Jiang Ping, whose face had always been calm, laughed. He thought to himself that why were these villains so stupid? Do they really think that he was in the origin core realm? They didn’t feel that there might be a trap since he dared to walk out so calmly? “I won’t agree. How about it? Chop me!” For the first time, Jiang Ping said something provocative. Ye Jun wasn’t angry either. The smile on his face was even more obvious. It was unknown whether he thought Jiang Ping’s words were funny or he was laughing at Jiang Ping’s ignorance. At this time, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were looking for Jiang Ping in the city. They had arrived before sunset. But they didn’t know which inn their patriarch had entered. They could only wander in the streets. “Old Lei, why don’t we stop looking? I’m hungry too. Let’s find an inn to stay at. Tomorrow, we’ll wait for them to set off outside the city.” Qiu Chi said to Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun thought about it carefully and felt that it was a solution. Anyway, he didn’t know where to look now. “I think it’s fine. Let’s find an inn to stay at first.” “Darn it, why is this Nanwu City so huge?” “It’s difficult to find a person!” The two of them were just about to find an inn to stay in when they stepped through the door. The innkeeper walked out of the counter. He walked out in a hurry. Qiu Chi grabbed the shopkeeper’s arm and asked. “Hey! Shopkeeper, where are you going? We want to stay!” The innkeeper flung off Qiu Chi’s hand. “I’m in a hurry to watch the show. If you want to stay in the inn, look for our waiter. Don’t delay me. I’ve placed a bet!” With that, the shopkeeper ran out anxiously. At the same time, it was already late at night in Nanwu City, but it was still bustling with activity because there were people constantly rushing toward Jiang Ping’s inn. Some were just there to join in the fun, while others came over to watch because they had bet on how long these foreigners would live. Anyway, this matter had caused a stir. Most of the people in Nanwu City were not short of money. After they had eaten their fill, they would definitely find some entertainment to digest their food. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun looked at the shopkeeper who had left, feeling puzzled. What bet? What was he rushing for? They didn’t understand at all. Qiu Chi went up and asked the waiter who was cleaning the table. “Hey, little brother, what’s wrong with your boss? Is there something wrong with his brain?” When the waiter heard that someone was speaking ill of his boss again, he was very happy. The thought of his boss oppressing him and defaulting on his wages made the waiter angry! However, if he didn’t continue working, the waiter wouldn’t be able to get his wages back. Thus, he could only force himself to be oppressed by him. The waiter gave Qiu Chi a thumbs up. “Sir, you’re right. Our boss is indeed sick!” “This week, he defaulted on my wages, and he even oppressed me!” Qiu Chi slapped the waiter’s hand away. “I’m asking you, what did your boss say about betting?” That waiter understood. “Oh! About that, the two of you just arrived, right?” “Today, the whole city is talking about a few foreigners who rammed into the young master of the mayor’s mansion.” “Well, the mayor’s mansion has already found them. They should be surrounding them right now!” “Therefore, some of the people in the city who have nothing better to do are secretly making bets on whether these foreigners can last a day or not!” Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun heard it clearly. Foreigners? They couldn’t help but think of their own group. Qiu Chi quickly opened his mouth to ask. “Are there a few little girls among these outsiders?” The waiter recalled and said. “Yes, there is a wanted portrait on the counter. Take it and see for yourself.” Qiu Chi walked to the counter in three steps and opened the portrait. He saw the portraits of Wan’er and the others! Qiu Chi almost shouted out. “Old Lei, it’s Wan’er and the others.” “But for some reason, I don’t see Master, Yan’er, and Liu’er on the portrait.” After saying that, he handed the portrait to Lei Jingyun. After Lei Jingyun looked at it, he saw that there was only the old Taoist priest and the two little fellows in the portrait. He couldn’t help but guess. “Could it be that master is not with them?” Qiu Chi was a little anxious and worried about his eldest miss’s safety. But Lei Jingyun calmed him down. “Isn’t that senior with them? Master has always respected this senior, so this senior’s strength shouldn’t be too low.” Lei Jingyun turned around and asked the waiter. “Little brother, do you know where the mayor’s mansion and those people are now?” “There’s no other intention. We just want to watch the show.” Afraid that the waiter would be suspicious, Lei Jingyun added the last sentence. The waiter walked to the entrance of the inn and pointed the direction for the two of them. “There are two alleys over there. They had just surrounded them. If you rush over now, maybe the fight hasn’t started yet.” As soon as the waiter finished speaking, Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun dashed out of the door. They forgot to thank him. The waiter was also cursing. He told these two people so much, yet they did not even give him a single copper coin as a tip. They were the same as his boss, just that they had different names. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun quickly rushed to the inn where Jiang Ping was. The inn was completely surrounded. The outer layer was surrounded by onlookers. The inner layer was surrounded by guards of the mayor’s mansion who were all wearing black clothes. Jiang Ping was surrounded in the middle, so Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi couldn’t see him at all. Qiu Chi looked at Lei Jingyun and asked. “What should we do? Should we just barge in?” Lei Jingyun shook his head. “This is too rash. It’s not appropriate.” Then, he looked around and saw a building with three floors. Lei Jingyun pointed at that building. “We’ll go over there and observe.” Qiu Chi nodded, and the two of them did as they had said. They quickly ran to a place where there was no one around and flew up to the roof. When they reached the roof, the two of them realized the person that was being surrounded in the middle. The one wearing a green robe was their patriarch. “Patriarch is here. We can rest assured now.” Qiu Chi exhaled and said. Lei Jingyun’s face also became much less solemn. “Since the patriarch is here, let’s go down directly.” “These minions are not enough to alert the enemy.” Qiu Chi nodded. Then, the two of them jumped to Jiang Ping’s side. “Master!” Qiu Chi jumped down and shouted. Jiang Ping looked in the direction of the voice. Ye Jun, the leader of the guard, was still talking to Jiang Ping. Suddenly, two people descended from the sky. Ye Jun was also a little confused. “I didn’t expect you to bring helpers?” Jiang Ping smiled and patted the shoulders of the two people. Then, he turned his head to look at Ye Jun. “How can you say that!” After saying that, Jiang Ping looked around. The crowd was full of people from the mayor’s mansion. Ye Jun looked at the young man. “Then are you trying to say that the mayor’s mansion bullies people by outnumbering them?” Jiang Ping sneered. “No, no, no. No matter how many people you have, I don’t need any help.” “Even if the entire mayor’s mansion attacks at the same time, I’m not afraid at all.” Jiang Ping’s voice was very loud, deliberately letting the surrounding people who were watching the show hear it. Immediately, the crowd burst into an uproar. “Hey, hey, hey, did you hear that? This kid actually said that he alone is enough!” “How is this slapping the leader’s face? This is clearly looking down on the mayor’s mansion!” “A newborn calf is really not afraid of a tiger. In Nanwu City, there’s actually someone who dares to provoke the mayor’s mansion.” “I guess this time it’s definitely not as simple as frying them in hot oil.” Ye Jun listened to the noise in the surrounding crowd, especially when he heard that it was the mayor’s mansion’s reputation that was affected. Instantly, his expression changed. He had been the chief protector of the mayor’s mansion for so many years, but there had never been anyone who dared to speak so arrogantly in front of him. Where did this young man in front of him get the courage to say these words! However, Ye Jun was still cautious. He used his spiritual energy to send a voice transmission to a servant, asking him to go back and report to the mayor. If it was just a late-stage origin core realm, he had full confidence in taking him down. But now, there were two more people, and their auras were all at the origin core realm. Ye Jun was slightly worried. Even if he took him down, he would still have to lose many attendants. “Do you know where you are standing?” “This is Nanwu City!” After Ye Jun said that, he waved his hand. The attendants swarmed over. Even Ye Jun himself rushed forward. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi stepped forward. Qiu Chi said. “Master, let me do it this time. Ever since I advanced, I haven’t tested my strength!” Lei Jingyun also followed up. “I also want to exercise my muscles and bones!” Jiang Ping took a step back and watched Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi make their moves. The noise of the onlookers suddenly stopped. After all, no one wanted to miss this exciting fight...; Lei Jingyun directly went forward and entangled the leader Ye Jun. The remaining hundred or so attendants’ cultivation was not even at the origin core realm. To Qiu Chi, who was already at the initial stage of the origin core realm, this was nothing much. Amidst the waves of exclamations from the surrounding crowd, Qiu Chi knocked down those attendants with one punch after another. It took less than 15 minutes. These black-clothed attendants were falling and fleeing. Lei Jingyun, on the other hand, was having fun. However, he did not directly knock down Ye Jun swiftly. Instead, he pretended that he couldn’t defeat him. He fought back and forth with him. After Qiu Chi knocked down all the attendants, he looked at Lei Jingyun. “Old Lei, can you do it or not? If you can’t, then let me help you!” Lei Jingyun stretched out his hand and called Qiu Chi. “Come, come, come. You take over.” Qiu Chi grunted. “So be it!” Then, he rushed forward and joined the battlefield. Lei Jingyun retreated to Jiang Ping’s side. Jiang Ping looked at Lei Jingyun with a playful smile. “Old Lei, you old man, you’re quite naughty!” Lei Jingyun smiled awkwardly when his patriarch praised him like that. After Qiu Chi entered the battlefield, Lei Jingyun directly withdrew. He asked Qiu Chi, who was at the initial stage of the origin core realm, to spar with Ye Jun, who was at the middle stage of the origin core realm. The result could be imagined. Qiu Chi was repeatedly beaten back. When he really couldn’t hold on any longer, he directly opened his mouth to scold Lei Jingyun. “Darn you, Lei Jingyun, why aren’t you coming over to help?” However, Lei Jingyun pretended not to hear. “What did you say? What did you call me!” Qiu Chi’s face darkened, but he could only curry favor with him. “I said, Brother Lei, Senior Lei, help me!” Lei Jingyun said with a smile. “Your Brother Lei is here!” In the mayor’s mansion. Wen Quanyong, who was injured, and in a wheelchair, was rushing to the hall of the mansion. He had suffered such a serious injury this time, so he couldn’t take this lying down. Before he entered the hall, Wen Quanyong was about to cry out loud. “Father! Your son has been bullied!” Mayor Wen Lin had always doted on his son the most. But now, he was receiving guests. When he heard his son’s yells, his face immediately darkened. “What’s wrong! Can’t you see that I’m receiving guests?” “Your mother didn’t teach you any manners!” Then, Wen Quanyong was pushed into the hall by the doctor. Wen Lin saw his son sitting in a wheelchair. His right leg was wrapped in gauze and tied with leg support. He immediately panicked. He quickly ran up to check! “What’s going on!” “Who did it!” He completely ignored the other guests in the hall. Wen Quanyong told his father everything that had happened today. Of course, adding fuel to the fire was inevitable. “Those people even said that the mayor’s mansion is nothing. They won’t take us seriously!” Wen Lin suppressed his anger as he listened. However, when he heard the last sentence, he finally exploded! “Outrageous!” “They are too arrogant!” After saying that, he casually picked up a stool and smashed it into pieces with his palm! A burly man walked out from the side. His name was Wu Dunan, and he was just a sect master of a second-rate force around Nanwu City. Because this person was tall and liked to drink alcohol, his belly was getting fatter and fatter over the years. As a result, he was even jokingly called a big belly by others. In order to curry favor with the mayor and smoothly move his sect into Nanwu City to obtain more resources, this person could be said to have put in a lot of effort. Now that he had the opportunity to curry favor with the mayor, he would not miss it! “Mayor, how about I teach these foreigners a lesson for you?” “At least let them know the rules of our Nanwu City!” When Wu Dunan mentioned Nanwu City, he specially added the word “our”. It could be seen that this person really wanted to become a vassal force of Nanwu City. Wen Lin first turned his head, then cupped his fists at everyone. “Everyone, you’ve heard that someone is not abiding by the rules of Nanwu City!” “What do you think?” There were a total of three guests with Wu Dunan in the hall. These five people appeared at the mayor’s mansion tonight, each with their own ulterior motives. They all had their own plans in mind. However, after going around in circles, these people’s motives were more or less the same. They wanted to ask Wen Lin for help. After hearing Wen Lin’s words, these three people felt as if their own sons had been beaten up, and they were even more indignant than Wen Lin. Then, a middle-aged man dressed in a black robe said. “I feel that such people should be punished. After listening from the side, I feel that these foreigners have gone too far.” The others also nodded. Wen Lin smiled. In fact, he had thrown out the question just now to test the attitude of these three people. After hearing it, Wen Lin was very satisfied with his prestige. This proved that he was now an indispensable noble to them. Therefore, he could take this opportunity to extort them ruthlessly. “You guys are really my confidants. I also have the same intention.” “Quanyong, where are those people now!” Wen Quanyong sat on the wheelchair, shifted his butt, and sat straight. “I’ve already asked the guards in the manor to look for them.” “They should be back by now.” As soon as he finished speaking, a guard hurriedly ran in. “Mayor, we’ve already found the residence of those foreigners, but...;” Wen Lin frowned. Every time these damn servants would report back and added the word “but”, it wouldn’t be good news. “But what!” The guard recounted what Ye Jun had told him at the inn to Wen Lin. Wen Lin’s brows relaxed slightly after hearing it. “Three cultivators at the origin core realm?” Three cultivators at the origin core realm were nothing to Wen Lin. He repeated the words of the guard to the three people behind him. As expected, after the three of them heard it, the burly man, Wu Dunan, directly stood out. “It’s just a mere origin core realm. How can I trouble the mayor to take the initiative to attack?” “This time, none of you are going to snatch it from me.” “I must help the young mayor to vent his anger!” After the other two people heard it, they immediately felt regret. Why couldn’t they react faster? This was great. They gave this big belly a head start. They gave him the chance to please the mayor. Wu Dunan patted his belly and said. “Mayor, you must let me take action this time. You know that we haven’t had an opponent for a long time.” “Now I can finally exercise properly.” Wen Lin nodded with a hidden smile and turned around to speak to the other two. “After what happened just now, I’m no longer in the mood to continue with our discussion...;” After hearing Wen Lin’s words, the two of them knew very well that he was taking the opportunity to beat them up. The middle-aged man in the black robe said. “Then why don’t we move to the hiding place of those foreigners together? If we can help, we won’t refuse...;” Wen Lin smiled. “Alright, since everyone is so free, let’s go and see who are those blind people.” “How dare they injure my son!” After saying that, Wen Lin ordered the guard to lead the way and pushed his son’s wheelchair out of the hall...; After Jiang Ping and Lei Jingyun entered the battlefield, Qiu Chi finally didn’t have to endure the bitter struggle alone. He immediately had an imposing manner. The two of them beat Ye Jun until he only dared to flee. Ye Jun’s body was riddled with injuries. Facing two origin core realms, it was still too difficult for him to face them alone. Moreover, Ye Jun could feel that these two people in front of him didn’t use their full strength. It was as if they were teasing him. But the more Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi attacked him, the happier Ye Jun was feeling in his heart. He would play along with them. Ye Jun’s current strategy was to hold on until his mayor arrived. When that time came, he could toy with these two people however he wanted, and the mayor would be fine with it. Lei Jingyun shouted to Qiu Chi as he rushed towards Ye Jun. “I’m not playing anymore. Let’s get serious.” “I’m going to starve to death!” Qiu Chi grinned from behind. “Alright, then let’s compete to see who has the most injuries on his body!” Lei Jingyun didn’t say anything and directly threw a punch at Ye Jun. He directly used actions to answer Qiu Chi. This punch directly hit Ye Jun’s face. After Ye Jun dodged it, Lei Jingyun’s lips curled up, and his left hand directly gathered spiritual energy. He turned his palm into a blade and followed Ye Jun. Qiu Chi didn’t want to be outdone. He jumped from afar and planned to attack Ye Jun from the air. Ye Jun didn’t know which attack to dodge first. He didn’t react in time. These two people were quite easy to deal with just now. Why did they suddenly attack so fiercely? Lei Jingyun’s hand blade was fast, and it directly chopped toward the side of Ye Jun’s neck. Ye Jun could only stretch out his arms to block. Qiu Chi aimed his feet at Ye Jun’s head and quickly landed the kick. Only a scream could be heard. Ye Jun was already lying on the ground, unable to move. Qiu Chi stepped on his head with one foot. “How is it. Where is the prestige of your mayor’s mansion?” However, Ye Jun had no way to answer Qiu Chi’s words at this moment. That was because Ye Jun had already fainted. The surrounding commoners who were watching the show widened their eyes and mouths. This...; This outcome was different from what they had expected. Initially, they thought that these three people would at most be able to hold on for a while when facing the siege of so many people. However, they did not expect that only two people would make a move. In less than 15 minutes, the people of the mayor’s mansion had all fallen. Moreover, they didn’t show any signs of difficulty. They were even able to do it with ease! These people all exclaimed in surprise. However, even though Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi had shown how powerful they were. The people still didn’t believe that they could defeat the mayor’s mansion. Some kind-hearted people in the crowd shouted at Jiang Ping and the other two. “You guys better run quickly, or else it’ll be too late when the mayor arrives.” “That’s right, that’s right. The mayor is an immortal at the earth immortal realm.” “You won’t be able to beat him.” Some people berated. “Shut up. I placed a bet. If they ran away, are you giving me the money?” “That’s right. They can’t run away. I’ve spent all my money betting that they won’t last a day!” Jiang Ping turned his head to look at the crowd when he heard the chattering. Those who had said that they had placed their bets just now fell silent when they saw Jiang Ping looking at them. Jiang Ping didn’t care about the ignorance of these people and replied with a smile. “Don’t worry, we won’t leave. When the people from the mayor’s mansion arrive, you can tell them.” “As I said before, I alone can destroy this crappy mayor’s mansion.” After saying that, Jiang Ping gave Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun a look. He turned around and walked back to the inn. Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun didn’t pay attention to Ye Jun, who was lying on the ground and bleeding. They followed Jiang Ping into the inn. After Jiang Ping entered the inn, he looked around and saw the innkeeper and the waiter hiding behind a pillar, shivering. Seeing Jiang Ping looking at him, the shopkeeper was so scared that he peed himself. “Master, it’s none of our business.” “The people from the mayor’s mansion came here by themselves!” “How about...; how about I refund your room fee!” Jiang Ping didn’t say anything. He pointed at a table. The table was floating in the air. Then, Jiang Ping flicked his wrist. The table flew toward the two of them. Bang! It hit his head. The innkeeper immediately fainted on the ground! The waiter hurriedly knelt. He begged the master in front of him to let him go. Jiang Ping didn’t make any more moves. He directly led Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi to the second floor. Before entering, Jiang Ping adjusted his mood. The sharp gaze that he used to attack just now disappeared, replaced by a gentle smile. He pushed the door open and said loudly. “I’m back!” The three little girls’ ears stood up. When they heard Jiang Ping’s voice, they immediately turned to look. “Daddy, are you done with your reasoning?” Jiang Ping nodded. “I’m done. Those people have already told daddy.” “To convey their apology to Wan’er.” Yan’er and Liu’er nodded their heads innocently. Wan’er knew that Jiang Ping must have beaten those people up. She went forward and asked with concern. “Daddy isn’t hurt, right?” Jiang Ping smiled and shook his head. “No, if I’m hurt, Wan’er is going to climb up to the roof and cry secretly. How could I bear to let Wan’er be sad?” After saying that, Wan’er’s little face instantly turned red. Her two younger sisters didn’t know that she had climbed up to the roof and cried secretly. Now that Jiang Ping had revealed it, how was she going to save her reputation? The young Taoist priest next to her leaned out and asked. “Last time when I cried, you kept scolding me. So, Wan’er, you would cry too?” Wan’er slapped He Xiangjiang angrily. “What’s so strange about a girl like me crying? I’m not like you, a boy who cries all day long.” He Xiangjiang felt wronged. Why did she remember that she was a girl now? Why didn’t she say that she was a girl when she hit him and threatened him to stop him from crying! The others in the room held back their laughter. No one dared to laugh out loud. They were afraid that this little girl’s slap would land on their heads. Outside the inn, Wen Lin pushed Wen Quanyong and rushed over. Three people followed behind him. An attendant led the way in front. The attendant nodded and bowed. “Mayor, that’s the inn in front!” Wen Lin nodded. “Then why aren’t you opening the way!” The attendant immediately ran behind the crowd and shouted. “The mayor is here! Quickly make way!” When the citizens who were watching the show heard the word “mayor”, they didn’t even need to turn their heads. They immediately opened up a path for Wen Lin and the others to pass through. After all, Wen Lin’s name had absolute authority in Nanwu City! Wen Lin looked at the scene in front of him. His expression was a little ugly. “What...; What’s going on!” Wen Lin was so angry that his voice was trembling. Then, he looked at the crowd. “Can someone tell me what’s going on!” As he said this, Wen Li pointed at the mess on the ground where a large number of his guards fell. The manor’s protector was like a dead dog, lying motionlessly on the ground. Some of the lackeys in the crowd spoke up. “Mayor, those foreigners had helpers!” “They were the ones who beat up Protector Ye, and there’s more than one of them. They’re currently inside the inn!” “That’s right, Mayor. They even said that even if the entire mayor’s mansion came, they would still beat you until you’re convinced!” Wen Lin raised his eyebrows and raised his finger. Meanwhile, Wen Quanyong, who was injured, was even more furious. Wouldn’t the mayor’s mansion’s reputation be gone this time? Ever since Wen Lin had taken over Nanwu City, when had he ever suffered such grievances! Wen Lin turned his head and looked at the three people following behind him. Without saying a word, that burly man, Wu Dunan, directly stood out. Wu Dunan had a muscular body. As he stepped on the greenstone bricks, the ground shook slightly. “Mayor, there’s no need to say anymore. I’ll call those people out immediately!” After saying that, Wu Dunan immediately half-squatted down. Then, he took a deep breath and shouted at the inn. “You ignorant foreigners!” “Get the hell out now!” “Otherwise, I will directly fart and destroy the inn, burying all of you!” His voice was very loud, and the commoners who were watching immediately covered their ears. Luckily, they were standing behind that burly man. Otherwise, if that burly man were to shout at the crowd, everyone present would probably be bleeding from their eyes, ears, nose, and mouth, dying from the sound. Following the burly man’s voice, many tiles on the inn’s roof were blown away. If not for the fact that the foundation of the inn was deep enough, at least a few pillars would have been broken. The waiter who was guarding his boss in the inn was directly deafened by this voice and fainted. One of the rooms inside the inn was still lit up. Before Wu Dunan could say his first sentence, Jiang Ping had already sealed the room with spiritual energy. It made the room seem as if nothing had happened. Jiang Ping was a little angry. If he hadn’t reacted fast enough just now, those who hadn’t cultivated in the room, or those with low cultivations, would be covering their ears and wailing. Jiang Ping held Wan’er’s hand and said. “Wan’er, let’s go out for a while.” Yan’er immediately asked. “Daddy, what are you going out for?” Jiang Ping always had endless patience for these little fellows. He said with a smile. “The person who tried to reason with daddy just now had thought it through. He probably wants to come back and personally apologize to Wan’er.” “Daddy will bring Wan’er out to take a look.” Yan’er and Liu’er nodded their heads. Jiang Ping then led Wan’er out. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi looked at Jiang Ping with some worry. Just as they were about to speak, Zhao Tianqian waved his hand at the two of them. “No need, no need. The one outside is only in the earth immortal realm. What’s there to worry about?” “I haven’t eaten anything for a day. Which one of you has time to find food for me?” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were stunned, but neither of them moved. After all, they were Jiang Ping’s attendants. It would be inappropriate to listen to others’ orders rashly. Seeing that neither of them wanted to move, Zhao Tianqian curled his lips and said. “Tsk, blockheads!” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi smiled awkwardly. Liu’er, who was at the side, helped out. “I’m hungry too. Old Uncle Lei, why don’t you go and get some food?” Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were naturally very willing. They directly lifted their feet and walked out of the door. Seeing this, Zhao Tianqian giggled foolishly at the youngest little girl. “This little girl is really considerate. Come and give grandpa a hug!” However, Liu’er didn’t come close to Zhao Tianqian and even moved back a little. This made Zhao Tianqian’s face, which was originally full of smiles, twitch. Jiang Ping brought Wan’er out of the inn. Raising his hand, he directly transformed his spiritual energy into a palm and gave Wu Dunan a slap across the air. Wu Dunan was immediately dumbfounded. What kind of situation was this. Didn’t they say that he was only at the origin core realm? He did not suppress his strength of the nascent soul realm when he roared earlier. This person didn’t sense it? The moment he came, he slapped him? The surrounding people were also discussing animatedly in low voices. “Damn. This is a ruthless person.” “Isn’t that big belly the sect master of the Jingshi Sect? No matter what, he’s still a nascent soul realm. How could he slap him the moment he came up?” “Could that person be some unfathomable expert? So arrogant!” Wen Lin said in a deep voice behind Wu Dunan. “Wu Dunan! What are you doing!” At this time, Wu Dunan finally reacted. After he reacted, Wu Dunan used his spiritual energy to check the young man who was holding the little girl in front of him. He was indeed at the origin core realm! Wu Dunan believed that this person definitely didn’t sense his strength just now. That was why he appeared so arrogant. “Kid, are you courting death?” Wu Dunan gritted his teeth and growled at Jiang Ping. “Believe it or not, I’ll kill both of you and feed you to the dogs later!” Jiang Ping raised his hand and gave Wu Dunan another air slap. It was so fast that Wu Dunan did not even have time to dodge! Everyone was in an uproar. Oh my God! This person made Wu Dunan suffer consecutively. What a brave person! Wu Dunan immediately raged. He lowered his body, intending to display his ultimate skill, the Dragon and Lion Roar! He took a deep breath, wanting to roar. But Jiang Ping wouldn’t give him the chance and reached out his hand casually. He sucked a fist-sized rock from the roadside. He threw it into Wu Dunan’s mouth. Wu Dunan’s mouth, which was opened wide, happened to catch the rock. His expression instantly turned into panic. He hurriedly stopped inhaling and spat out the rock. Jiang Ping stared at the burly man with a cold gaze. “The first slap was because you almost scared my daughter!” “The second slap was because you said you were going to kill my daughter and feed her to the dogs!” “If you ask that person in the wheelchair to come forward and apologize to my daughter now.” “I can still let you off.” Wen Quanyong, who was at the back, was shocked when he heard this. What was this person saying! Telling him to apologize to the person who had injured him? Wen Lin’s expression was even gloomier. “The person who was injured is my son. Say that again.” “Who’s apologizing to whom!” Jiang Ping looked at Wen Quanyong and pointed at him. “Him. He shall apologize to my daughter!” Wen Lin immediately roared in anger. “So there’s no room for negotiation?” “Do you want to die on purpose!” Jiang Ping shook his head calmly. “I don’t want you to die!” Wen Lin was choked speechless for a moment. He was saying that he didn’t want them to die...; “Oh my God, did you hear what he said just now!” “I think he said he doesn’t want the mayor to die?” “This person is too arrogant.” “Exactly. Does he not know that the mayor is in the earth immortal realm?” Wen Lin’s face turned green when he heard the crowd’s voice. He shouted at Wu Dunan. “What are you waiting for? Hurry up and attack!” As soon as he said that, Wu Dunan dashed out. He clenched his fist and attacked Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping pulled Wan’er behind him. He stretched out a palm. Then, he grabbed Wu Dunan’s oncoming fist. He lifted Wu Dunan up high. And he slammed him heavily onto the ground. Bam! The greenstone bricks on the ground were shattered densely, like pieces of a jigsaw puzzle. Wen Lin was dumbstruck by what he saw! He still did not believe it. He turned his head to look at the two people behind him. And signaled for them to make a move! The other two guests behind Wen Lin had a favor to ask of him. They did not say anything either. They directly stood forward. Jiang Ping sneered. Before they could do anything, he directly did the same as before. He reached out his hand and gave each of them a tight air slap. It made the two of them dizzy and disoriented. Jiang Ping squatted down and said to Wan’er. “You wait here for daddy. Daddy will take care of the bad guys first.” Wan’er nodded obediently. After saying that, Jiang Ping directly stood up and walked toward the two people unhurriedly. Before the two men could react, Jiang Ping was already in front of them. He reached out and grabbed their necks. He put his hands together and knocked their heads together. Their heads were bleeding from the impact. Jiang Ping refused to give up and lifted them. Then, he smashed them towards Wu Dunan, who was still lying on the ground. Bam! The two men pressed onto Wu Dunan’s body. The burly man’s belly visibly shrank. Then, blood kept coming out of his mouth. Jiang Ping saw that the three of them had fainted and were convulsing on the ground. He clapped his hands and rubbed his wrists. Then, he turned around and walked toward Wen Quanyong. Wen Quanyong’s eyes were filled with fear, and his voice was trembling! “You...; You...; What are you doing!” Wen Quanyong was so flustered that he wanted to subconsciously step back, but he realized that he didn’t have any strength left in his body. He was so scared that he couldn’t muster any strength. Wen Lin saw that Jiang Ping directly ignored him and walked straight toward his son. He quickly ran in front of Wen Quanyong to protect his son. When Wen Quanyong saw his father’s figure, the fear in his heart lessened a little. “What are you doing!” Wen Lin roared at Jiang Ping like he had gone mad! Jiang Ping’s line of sight passed through Wen Lin and stared at Wen Quanyong behind him. “I want him to apologize to my daughter!” This cold gaze directly scared Wen Quanyong to the point that he wet his pants. Wen Lin’s body directly sank down and he roared at Jiang Ping! “Impossible!” As he spoke, Wen Lin’s middle stage earth immortal realm cultivation was completely released. He wanted to use this as a deterrent to Jiang Ping. However, he didn’t see Jiang Ping kneeling down and begging for mercy because of his own cultivation. Instead, he saw Jiang Ping’s footsteps didn’t stop, and there was a smile on his face. He was still neither fast nor slow, but with each step he took, the cultivation of the person in front of him increased by a step. Origin core realm...; Nascent soul realm...; Initial stage earth immortal realm...; Middle stage...; Late stage...; The cultivation of the late-stage earth immortal realm was already enough to shock Wen Lin. But when Jiang Ping took the final step and stood only a foot away from Wen Lin. The aura that Wen Lin felt from Jiang Ping actually made him want to kneel down! The heaven ascension realm! Wen Quanyong saw his father’s slightly bent knees at this moment. He couldn’t help but wonder, could it be that he had offended some big shot? Wen Lin’s body tensed up. His rapid breathing and intense heartbeat completely revealed his fear! Because Jiang Ping’s pressure was only directed at Wen Lin. Therefore, the surrounding people had no idea what had happened. They only saw their mayor’s mouth slightly open. It was as if he wanted to speak but was unable to. His body was bent as if he was going to prostrate himself in front of the foreigner in the next second. The scene looked extremely strange. However, at this moment, everyone only dared to guess in their hearts. No one would speak at this time. After all, no one knew if that foreigner was really an expert who did not reveal his abilities. Their life and death were only a matter of a blink of an eye if they were to say something wrong. Jiang Ping lowered his head and looked at Wen Lin. He asked again. “Can you let your son apologize to my daughter now!” Wen Lin turned his head with difficulty and looked at Wen Quanyong. There was a trace of sadness in his eyes as if he was blaming himself, but more than that, it was fury! Wen Lin stammered and said. “Okay...; We apologize...;” Wen Quanyong’s pupils shook...; Only then did Jiang Ping completely withdraw his cultivation. In an instant, the aura on his body returned to the origin core realm. Wen Lin hammered his head and turned around dejectedly to look at his son. Wen Quanyong gnashed his teeth. Wen Lin roared at him. “Hurry up and apologize!” This roar caused the surrounding crowd to discuss in low voices. “Looks like this person is truly an expert...;” “Then wouldn’t I be bankrupt?” “I’ve used up all my assets and even borrowed it. I bet that these people won’t be able to hold on for a day...;” Wen Quanyong could only obediently use his hand to move the wheelchair made of solid wood. He stopped five steps away from Wan’er. He didn’t even raise his head to look at Wan’er. Apologizing was simply worse than ripping his skin off. Furthermore, there were so many citizens of Nanwu City gathered around him. He was the young mayor! Wen Quanyong first shouted at the crowd. “Knock it off!” The crowd instantly quieted down. Under the moonlight, everyone could clearly see that Wen Quanyong’s body was trembling. “I’m...; Sorry!” His voice was as soft as a mosquito. Jiang Ping said impatiently. “Is this the attitude you should have when you apologize!” After hearing Jiang Ping’s words, Wen Quanyong immediately shouted. “I’m sorry!” Jiang Ping was still unsatisfied and said lightly. “Kneel down!” Wen Quanyong’s body suddenly stiffened. Just looking at him alone, it was as if time had stopped and he did not move. Jiang Ping repeated again. “Don’t you understand? Kneel.” After saying that, everyone present heard Wen Lin’s scream. “Ah!” Wen Quanyong suddenly turned his head to look. He realized that his father was holding his stomach and rolling on the ground. Wen Quanyong’s tears fell immediately. “I will kneel! I will kneel!” His body leaned forward, and Wen Quanyong directly fell from the wheelchair and knelt on the ground. There was no need for Jiang Ping to remind him. He kowtowed to Wan’er. While he was kowtowing, he shouted at her! “I’m sorry! I’m sorry!” Wan’er saw Wen Quanyong kneeling, and she quietly moved to the side to prevent him from facing her...; Wan’er looked at Jiang Ping and said. “Daddy, let’s go back.” Jiang Ping nodded and walked quickly to the little girl’s side. He took the little girl’s hand and walked directly to the second floor of the inn. Wen Lin, who was originally rolling on the ground, also stopped wailing and slowly stood up. Wen Quanyong, who was kneeling in front of the inn’s entrance, seemed to have lost his mind. He kept kowtowing and kept apologizing. No one in the crowd dared to make a sound. Only the sound of Wen Quanyong’s head hitting the bricks on the greenstone floor and his apology could be heard in the surroundings. Wen Lin slowly walked to Wen Quanyong’s side. He reached out his hand and pressed on his son’s shoulder. Wen Quanyong seemed to have no consciousness and kept kowtowing and apologizing. Every time he raised his head, Wen Lin could see that his son’s face was full of tears, and there was also blood left behind after his forehead was hurt. Wen Lin raised his hand and slapped Wen Quanyong to the ground. “Enough!” Wen Quanyong was paralyzed on the ground. His body kept twitching, and he kept mumbling those two words...; Wen Lin went forward to hug his son and said softly. “Let’s go home.” Then, Wen Lin carried Wen Quanyong up and walked towards the mayor’s mansion. The surrounding commoners made a path for the father and son to pass through. Only after the father and son had walked far away did the commoners dare to whisper. Some sighed, some were happy, and some even scolded that they deserved it. In any case, this farce had come to an end. At this time, the people who laughed the loudest were those private bookies. Because on their gambling tables, there were people who bet that these foreigners would not live for more than a day, and also, they bet that they would not live for more than two or three days. But they did not have the option of the mayor’s mansion’s apology. This time, the bookies won completely. The money in their pockets was enough to open two taverns in Nanwu City. Jiang Ping brought Wan’er back to the room. The small table in the room had been moved to the side, replaced by a big round table that Qiu Chi got from God knows where. It was enough for them to sit down. The chairs were arranged neatly, and the table was ready and filled with dishes. Zhao Tianqian called Jiang Ping to sit down. Lei Jingyun also took off his apron and let everyone taste his cooking. After sitting down, Zhao Tianqian asked. “How is it?” Jiang Ping smiled. “It’s okay now. It was originally not a big deal. After they apologized, it was fine.” Zhao Tianqian nodded and picked up the chopsticks next to him with a smile. Then, he picked up a piece of rib and put it in his hand. The old Taoist priest’s expression changed greatly after chewing it twice. He directly spat out the rib in his mouth. “Bah, what the hell is this? Why does it taste so bad!” After saying that, Zhao Tianqian picked up the teacup and started to gargle. The few little girls looked at the old Taoist priest curiously, then turned to look at Lei Jingyun. Lei Jingyun hurriedly said. “It shouldn’t be.” After saying that, he picked up a piece and put it in his mouth to chew. As he chewed, Lei Jingyun didn’t feel that anything was wrong. “There’s no problem. Senior, do you have a bad sense of taste?” Zhao Tianqian was speechless and said to everyone. “Try it yourself!” Then, the children, Jiang Ping, and the others reached out their chopsticks and picked up the dishes on the table. After eating, everyone’s reaction was the same as the old Taoist priest’s. They spat out the food and rinsed their mouths with tea. Only the young Taoist priest gulped it down after he felt that something was wrong after chewing it. Then, he drank tea. Wan’er directly cursed. “Old Man Lei, are your hands shaking because of your old age? Why did you put so much salt in it!” Lei Jingyun scratched his head, thinking that it tasted pretty good. Zhao Tianqian added. “Of course, you don’t find the dishes you cooked disgusting no matter how you eat.” Lei Jingyun pointed at He Xiangjiang when he saw He Xiangjiang didn’t spit it out. “Who said that? Didn’t Little Brother Xiangjiang eat it?” “How is it? Is it okay?” He Xiangjiang shook his head bitterly. “It’s indeed salty, but I don’t want to waste food...;” Lei Jingyun was so embarrassed that he couldn’t speak. Jiang Ping tried to help him out. “Alright, alright. Old Qiu, Old Lei, let’s throw away the dishes on this table. I’ll make new ones.” As soon as Jiang Ping opened his mouth, the girls cheered. They would have delicious food to eat again! Wan’er nudged the young Taoist priest beside her. “My daddy’s cooking is very delicious. You have to act faster later!” He Xiangjiang didn’t pay much attention to Wan’er’s words. Instead, he stared at the plates of dishes that Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun carried away on the table. With each plate carried away, the light in the young Taoist priest’s eyes dimmed. Seeing that the young Taoist priest ignored her, Wan’er slapped him skillfully. “Why aren’t you talking!” He Xiangjiang came back to his senses. He pointed at Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. “Isn’t this wasteful...;” Wan’er reached out her small hand to hold her forehead as she felt a little helpless...; Jiang Ping was busy in the kitchen while Qiu Chi and Lei Jingyun were cleaning up the mess outside the inn. They moved the fainted people to three or four alleys away from the inn, piled them up, and left them there. The onlookers were also dispersed by the two of them...; After Wen Lin carried Wen Quanyong back to the mayor’s mansion, he ordered his servants to make the bed. After placing his son on the bed, Wen Lin helped him wipe the tears and blood off his face. Wen Quanyong closed his eyes and curled his body. But he kept muttering under his breath. I’m sorry...; I’m sorry...; Wen Lin’s heart ached when he saw this. At this moment, Mrs. Wen pushed the door open and entered. She ran to Wen Quanyong’s bed. When she saw her precious son like this, Mrs. Wen immediately went crazy and roared at Wen Lin. “I told you to take care of my son, but look at what you have done. Look at how you’re taking care of him!” “Son, don’t be afraid. Your mother is here!” “Wen Lin! If my son falls ill because of this, I will definitely not let you off!” The servants at the side were also stunned. Usually, the mistress was dignified and magnanimous. No matter what, she could be considered a good wife and loving mother. Her loss of composure was somewhat unacceptable. Wen Lin also didn’t say a word. In fact, what outsiders didn’t know was that the dignified mayor of Nanwu City was also a great cultivator of the earth immortal realm. He wasn’t afraid of anything, but...; he was afraid of his wife. Although in front of outsiders, this wife of his did not embarrass him. But behind closed doors, Wen Lin couldn’t do anything to this woman in front of him. He obeyed everything she said. He didn’t even dare to take a concubine. Those who didn’t know the truth would think that it was because the mayor of Nanwu City, Wen Lin, was loyal to his wife, and that was why he didn’t take a concubine. The reason why Wen Quanyong was so out of control and not disciplined was actually because of his mother. Because this mother, Chen Yulian, was the daughter of the Cloud Mist Sect. And Nanwu City could only be considered as a subsidiary of the Cloud Mist Sect...; <i>?</i>  The sect master of the Cloud Mist Sect, Chen Chiran, was well-known. The forces that were hostile to the Cloud Mist Sect were all subdued by Chen Chiran alone and his sword. In the end, they all became the subordinate forces of the Cloud Mist Sect. And it was because of the marriage with Chen Yulian that Wen Lin climbed step by step to the position of the mayor of Nanwu City. He relied on the resources of the Cloud Mist Sect. And Chen Chiran was exactly the type to protect his children. Therefore, Wen Lin didn’t have any real power in front of Chen Yulian. Seeing that Wen Lin didn’t say anything, Chen Yulian quickly hammered Wen Lin’s chest. “Say something! Where is your usual air of a mayor!” The servant who was carrying the basin in the room tactfully put the basin on the shelf, left the room, closed the door, and waited outside. Wen Lin, who was in the earth immortal realm, did not have a trace of arrogance in front of an unarmed woman. “What can I do? That guy is in the heaven ascension realm. Do you know that both of us almost lost our lives today!” Chen Yulian scolded Wen Lin for being useless. She must be blind to have taken a fancy to this useless thing. Wen Lin lowered his head and silently agreed. After a long time, Chen Yulian had no more tears, and she had used up all her strength. She stopped hitting and scolding Wen Lin. Instead, she held her son’s hand tightly and quietly squatted by the bed, looking at her precious darling...; Wen Lin stood up, walked to the stool, and slumped down. He turned his head away and quietly used his hand to wipe his tears from the corner of his eye. Wen Quanyong, who was sleeping soundly on the bed, slowly opened his eyes. He saw his mother squatting at the head of his bed. He called out softly, “Mother”. When Chen Yulian heard him call her mother, the tears that were originally dry from crying began to flow slowly. “Quan’er, it’s all your father’s fault. He didn’t protect you well.” Wen Quanyong raised his hand and wanted to help Chen Yulian wipe away her tears. When Wen Quanyong’s hand was raised halfway, he no longer had the strength to raise it higher. Chen Yulian held Wen Quanyong’s hand and placed it on her cheek. “Mother, it’s fine. It’s not Father’s fault. It’s all my fault. I’m used to being arrogant and despotic.” Chen Yulian choked while sobbing. “Quan’er, don’t worry. Those people definitely won’t be able to escape. Mother has already sent a message to your grandfather.” “Mother will definitely help you vent your anger!” Wen Quanyong, who was lying on the bed, nodded. “Mother, I still want to sleep for a while.” Chen Yulian quickly said okay a few times. Then, she covered Wen Quanyong with the blanket. “Then father and mother won’t disturb you anymore. Quan’er, go to sleep first. Mother will come to see you later.” Wen Quanyong softly acknowledged. Chen Yulian and Wen Lin walked out of the room. “Stand guard at the young master’s door. If anything happens, come and tell me immediately.” Chen Yulian walked out of the room and said to the servant standing at the door. The servant nodded and bowed, answering that he understood clearly. Chen Yulian looked at Wen Lin and said in a cold tone. “Come with me.” Wen Lin nodded and followed his wife. “I’ve already informed my father about this. Do you know what to do next?” Chen Yulian said to her husband as she walked. Wen Lin did not feel uncomfortable at all when his wife spoke to him in such a tone. This was because many times, Wen Lin was the one who coordinated the major events in Nanwu City while his wife was the one who came up with ideas. Wen Lin nodded. “You want me to follow them first, right?” Chen Yulian nodded. “They are from a foreign land. I’m afraid they will be staying in Nanwu City for the time being.” “Nanwu City is far away from the Cloud Mist Sect. By the time my father arrives, I’m afraid that they will have already left.” “So you have to follow them and report their whereabouts to me in time.” After saying that, Chen Yulian took out a mirror from her storage space. “This mirror is my dowry.” “It’s an immortal artifact that can send messages. Moreover, it has a strong defensive ability. Using spiritual energy to activate it can avoid the aura and help you track them. Take it.” Wen Lin took the palm-sized mirror hesitantly. “But Yulian, this is your dowry. Isn’t it a little inappropriate for me to take it?” Chen Yulian’s cold expression changed. She stretched out her finger and prodded Wen Lin’s chest. “You are a blockhead. What’s mine is yours, isn’t it?” “Moreover, my father gave this to me back then. He said that I should only use it if I’m receiving unjust treatment here.” “You have treated me very well for so many years. I didn’t expect that the first time that I’ll be using it is because of Quan’er.” The more she spoke, the more Chen Yulian’s eyes dimmed. Wen Lin said dispiritedly. “It’s all my fault. I didn’t protect the two of you properly.” Chen Yulian shook her head. “You’ve done your best.” It could be seen that the two of them were actually very loving. Otherwise, Chen Yulian wouldn’t have abandoned her position as the daughter of the Cloud Mist Sect and come to Nanwu City to make things difficult for herself. Wen Lin nodded his head firmly. “Don’t worry. After this matter is over, I won’t let anyone hurt you anymore.” Chen Yulian replied softly and helped Wen Lin tidy up his clothes. “I’m going to make some soup for Quan’er. You should go now in case anything goes wrong...;” On the side of the inn, everyone had already finished their dinner and picked their own rooms. Then, they went back to their rooms to sleep. When they were picking their rooms, Wan’er shouted that she wanted to sleep in the same room as He Xiangjiang. Zhao Tianqian was happy to see that happen. He was grinning from ear to ear, but Jiang Ping rejected him righteously. Moreover, he kept reminding the three little girls that they should not easily say such things to the boys in the future. The three little girls were very confused and asked Jiang Ping why. Jiang Ping’s face turned red, and he could not speak. He just said that they cannot. No means no. Jiang Ping finally coaxed the three little girls to sleep again. After walking out of their room, he muttered to himself. “Looks like I have to find an opportunity to talk to them about matters between men and women...;” After yawning, Jiang Ping walked back to his room. After returning to his room, Jiang Ping first thought of something and called out the system interface. He hadn’t signed in today, and he couldn’t forget. [Cultivation Completion Signing System] [Name]: Jiang Ping [Cultivation Realm]: Initial Stage of the Heaven Ascension Realm [Cultivation Method]: Great Void Celestial Technique [System Version]: 1.0 [Today’s Signing Reward: Sun-Moon Universe Sword, combined with sword technique “Sword Beheading a True Immortal”.] Jiang Ping took a closer look. Today’s signing reward wasn’t a low-end spirit stone or medicinal pill! Jiang Ping stretched out both hands. A blue light flashed, and a long sword without a sheath appeared in his hand, along with a sword technique book! This sword was slender and very thin. If outsiders saw it, they would definitely complain about how this sword could cut down a true immortal? It would probably take a lot of effort to cut through bones using this sword. But Jiang Ping didn’t think so. This was a product of the system. Not to mention cutting down a true immortal, even if the system said that this sword could crack open heaven and earth, he would believe it! This time, Jiang Ping didn’t carelessly throw it into his storage space just as how he had obtained a spirit stone or medicinal pill. Instead, he placed the sword to the side. He flipped open the sword manual and began to read it carefully. After all, according to Jiang Ping’s past experience, as long as the system gave him something special. Something would be happening, so Jiang Ping had to make preparations and study this sword manual in advance. On the first page of this Sword Beheading a True Immortal sword manual, the writing was extremely arrogant. It was so arrogant that even Jiang Ping doubted the authenticity of this sword manual. This was written on it. “When this sword is unleashed, Yin and Yang rotate, and the universe is reversed. It stands in front of all living things, undefeated by Heaven and Earth!” This piqued Jiang Ping’s interest. He didn’t turn to the next page but opened the introduction of the system. He looked at the source of this sword manual. [The Source of the Sword Manual: A hundred years ago, there was no such thing as the world’s leading weapon in the way of the sword. When this sword manual came out, sword techniques became the number one killer move in the world. It came from Sword Immortal Li Shiyi a hundred years ago.] Li Shiyi? Jiang Ping had never heard of this name. A hundred years ago, that was way too long ago. Indeed, this sword manual had been lost for a long time, and people had long forgotten about it. If it wasn’t for the system, Jiang Ping might never have known about Li Shiyi and even learned his sword manual. Jiang Ping searched the system for the name Li Shiyi again. There was only a cursory line of words. [Li Shiyi: A Taoist priest who likes to travel around the Holy Land and often recites stunning poems...;] A Taoist priest? Jiang Ping silently memorized it in his heart. He planned to ask Zhao Tianqian, who was also a Taoist priest when the time came. He shall see if he knows anything. Jiang Ping turned off the system and opened the sword manual again. He sighed and muttered to himself. “Looks like I won’t be able to sleep tonight...;” It was usually foggy in the early morning in Nanwu City, and it was already autumn. The weather here was still hot and dry. He Xiangjiang was the first one to get up. He jumped off the bed and put on his shoes, then walked out of the room. He happened to see Jiang Ping, who had not slept all night, standing at the door of his room and stretching. “Uncle Jiang, good morning!” The young Taoist priest’s crisp voice greeted Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping nodded with a polite smile. “I didn’t expect you to get up so early.” He Xiangjiang said as he walked past Jiang Ping. “Poor people are used to it. How would we dare to sleep late?” Such an understatement made Jiang Ping have a good impression of the young Taoist priest in front of him. Jiang Ping reached out to rub his tired face. “I’m going to make breakfast for Wan’er and the others. Do you want to join me?” He Xiangjiang nodded with a smile. “Of course!” The adult and the child walked into the kitchen. Jiang Ping noticed that the young Taoist priest was not old, but he was familiar with the work as he was. He started the fire, washed the dishes, and cut the vegetables with unusual proficiency. On the contrary, he became the assistant. Jiang Ping could not help but think that if he let this kid and Wan’er...; Then, he shook his head violently to get rid of the strange thoughts in his mind. Wan’er was still young. It was still early! The young Taoist priest lifted the lid of the pot and fanned himself with the fragrance, revealing a satisfied smile. “Uncle Jiang, why don’t you go wake up Wan’er and the others now? I’ll look after this place. After they wash up, they can also eat breakfast.” Jiang Ping said okay, then got up and went up to the second floor. He woke up the few little girls and brought them down to the first floor. The others also woke up one after another and sat around the table. He Xiangjiang brought the large pot of porridge that he and Jiang Ping had prepared to the dining table. “Come, come, come, make way, it’s too hot.” He Xiangjiang put down the pot of meat porridge, touched his earlobes with both hands, and then distributed the bowls and chopsticks to everyone. After he was done, Wan’er waved at the young Taoist priest and asked him to sit next to her. Everyone was full of praise after they finished eating the porridge. The three little girls all thought that their daddy made it, and they shouted, “Daddy is mighty!” Jiang Ping smiled and waved his hand. “I’m just a helper. Today’s breakfast is made by Xiangjiang!” Everyone gave He Xiangjiang a thumbs up. Li Sushang kept praising He Xiangjiang’s cooking skills. If she had not seen him before and only tasted his cooking skills, she would have thought that He Xiangjiang was a girl. He Xiangjiang’s little face turned red when he heard this. Zhao Tianqian was also holding a bowl with a proud expression as if he was saying, “This is my disciple, I taught him!” The few of them had to continue their journey after having breakfast. Jiang Ping ordered everyone to pack up and get ready to set off. Then he pulled the old Taoist priest aside. “Senior, do you know Li Shiyi?” Zhao Tianqian thought Jiang Ping was going to say something important, so he said it perfunctorily. “What is Shiyi? I don’t know. I don’t know.” Jiang Ping did not feel disappointed. He treated it as gossip. Since he couldn’t get an answer, it didn’t matter anyway, and he continued to say. “Oh! He’s also a Taoist priest. I thought you knew.” “Wait!” Zhao Tianqian was stunned. “You mean Li Shiyi, the Taoist priest?” “The one from a hundred years ago?” Jiang Ping nodded. For some reason, the old Taoist priest started to get excited. “Of course, I know. I thought you were asking about someone else!” Jiang Ping approached him and asked. “Then can I trouble you to tell me?” The old Taoist priest spread out his hands, indicating that it wasn’t troublesome. He talked endlessly about Li Shiyi to Jiang Ping. To be honest, if Zhao Tianqian had not accidentally read an ancient book, he would not have been able to answer Jiang Ping’s question. Taoism was not as prosperous as it was now, a hundred years ago. It was because of the appearance of Li Shiyi that Taoism became well known today. Back then, Li Shiyi was famous not because of his swordsmanship and cultivation but because of his poems. His poems spread throughout the world. Many people had only heard of his poems, but they were all extremely respectful of him. Later, as he became more and more famous, the world finally knew that this Li Shiyi was not only a poet but also a sword immortal and a Taoist priest. Speaking of the sword immortal, one had to mention his swordsmanship that was out of the ordinary. At that time, it could be said that he was the best in the world. For an entire sixty years, no one dared to claim that one’s swordsmanship was number one. It was precisely because of Li Shiyi. He even wrote a sword manual. Back then, Sword Immortal Li had once said that as long as there were people in the future who could practice swordsmanship that caught his eye, he would give the sword manual to that person. Once these words were said, there were more than twice as many people in the world who practiced swordsmanship, but Li Shiyi took no fancy to anyone. In the end, this sword manual was burned by Li Shiyi. When the sword manual was burned that day, Sword Immortal Li only said one sentence. “The current way of the sword is disappointing.” Li Shiyi did not seek fame and glory. He only appeared briefly in this world before disappearing from this world. No one knew where he went. Some people said that he was dead and was being hunted by his enemies. Some said that he had gone into seclusion after reaching the peak of his cultivation. Everyone had their own theories. After saying that, Zhao Tianqian added. “After Sword Immortal Li disappeared, very few people in the younger generation mentioned him anymore. These young people have forgotten their roots.” The old Taoist priest sighed. “If you can’t recognize Li Shiyi when you use a sword, you would have practiced the sword for ten years for nothing!” When the old Taoist priest mentioned this person, his face was full of pride and respect. “By the way, why did you suddenly ask this?” Jiang Ping replied with a smile. “It’s nothing. I just happened to get a sword manual. It was signed by Li Shiyi, so I was curious.” Zhao Tianqian stared at Jiang Ping and picked his ears. “What did you say!” “I didn’t hear you clearly just now!” Jiang Ping shouted into the old Taoist priest’s ear. “I said!” “I happened to get a sword manual from your idol, Li Shiyi!” Zhao Tianqian pushed Jiang Ping away. “Why are you shouting so loudly!” “You want to die!” Jiang Ping glanced at the old Taoist priest and said. “Senior, you said yourself that you didn’t hear me clearly. It’s my fault.” Zhao Tianqian said in a bad mood. “You really can’t tell if I’m trying to be sarcastic.” “When I say I didn’t hear you clearly, I was referring to your boasting!” “Otherwise, do you really think I’m deaf!” Jiang Ping took out a sword manual from his storage space. “What boasting? Senior, don’t slander me.” Then, he waved the sword manual in his hand in front of the old Taoist priest. The old Taoist priest still didn’t believe it and took the sword manual with disdain. “Then I want to see if this sword manual you’re talking about is the one I’m talking about!” Without even looking at the cover, the old Taoist priest flipped open the sword manual. He saw the first sentence of the sword manual, “When the sword strikes, Yin and Yang reverse, and the universe falls. Standing in front of all living things, undefeated by Heaven and Earth!” “Yo, this fake is quite real. This tone sounds like something Sword Immortal Li would say.” The old Taoist priest continued to flip through the pages. In the first few pages, the old Taoist priest even pointed out that the sword should not be practiced like this, how the sword should not be used, and so on. Jiang Ping was looking at the old Taoist priest with a smile on his face. He did not say anything and just waited for the old Taoist priest to continue flipping through the pages. The more Zhao Tianqian flipped through the pages, the seriousness on his face increased, and he became more silent. When he was halfway through, he flipped back to look at the cover of the sword manual. Looking at the words “Sword Beheading a True Immortal” on the cover...; Zhao Tianqian stared blankly for a long while. Then, he took out a book of poetry from his storage space. It was Li Shiyi’s original poem. The old Taoist priest flipped it open and compared the handwriting of the two books. The old Taoist priest opened his mouth and didn’t say anything. Jiang Ping still looked at him with a smile on his face. He stretched out his hand and waved it in front of the old Taoist priest. “Senior! Are you okay?” Zhao Tianqian had never lost his composure like today. He stammered. “Brother Jiang is this really...;?” Jiang Ping took back the sword manual from Zhao Tianqian’s hand with a smile. “Brother Zhao, didn’t you say this was fake? Come, come, I’ll burn it.” The old Taoist priest was careless, and the sword manual in his hand was pulled away by Jiang Ping. “Don’t! Blame me, blame me for being blind!” “It’s real, don’t burn it, don’t durn It!” The old Taoist priest begged while smiling at Jiang Ping. Jiang Ping put away the sword manual and patted Zhao Tianqian’s shoulder. “Old Zhao, it’s getting late. We should set off.” Then, he leisurely walked to the first floor and shouted to the top. “Alright, let’s go!” The group walked to the city gate. Jiang Ping and Zhao Tianqian walked at the front. He Xiangjiang and Wan’er walked side by side, followed by two little girls who were following their footsteps. Li Sushang and the other two followed at the back. Looking at the two people walking in the front, He Xiangjiang noticed his master’s abnormality today. He had been sticking to Jiang Ping’s side all this time, and he was still acting bashful. From time to time, he would approach Jiang Ping and say a few words. “Brother Jiang, I don’t want that original copy. Just lend it to me for two days, and I’ll make a copy of it. What do you think!” Jiang Ping stared at Zhao Tianqian and moved to the side. “You don’t practice swordsmanship. What’s the use of copying it!” “Also, I’ll beat you up if you get close to me.” The old Taoist priest rubbed his hands together. “I don’t practice swordsmanship, but I can keep it. Besides, maybe my disciple will practice swordsmanship in the future?” “For Wan’er’s sake, you should at least let me make a copy of it.” Jiang Ping was furious. “Do you mean that my Wan’er has decided to follow your disciple?” The old Taoist priest quickly tried to explain. “No, no, I didn’t say that.” “What I mean is that my disciple and Wan’er have a good relationship, right? As elders, we should help each other, right?” “Lend me the sword manual. I’ll definitely prepare a big gift for Wan’er.” Jiang Ping squinted at the old Taoist priest who had ulterior motives. “I’ll consider it!” Then, Jiang Ping quickened his steps, intending to stay away from the old Taoist priest. Zhao Tianqian shamelessly followed Jiang Ping and tried to coax him. He Xiangjiang looked at his master and said to Wan’er, who was beside him. “Wan’er, look at your father and my master. Aren’t they acting strange?” Wan’er nodded. “Yeah, I think I heard them mention us just now!” He Xiangjiang asked curiously. “You can hear it? What did they say about us?” Wan’er shook her head. “I didn’t hear them clearly. I think they were talking about our marriage in the future.” Wan’er, who had stayed by Jiang Ping’s side since she was young, didn’t realize the importance of the word “marriage” at all. She had read it from a book. It said that if the relationship between two people was good enough, they could get married. The little girl felt that she had a very good relationship with the young Taoist priest beside her. So she just said it casually. However, He Xiangjiang had been independent since he was young and helped his family with work. His mind matured a little earlier than Wan’er’s, although he was still a little fuzzy about the feelings between men and women. However, the young Taoist priest knew the concept of getting married very clearly. When Wan’er blurted out the word “our marriage”, He Xiangjiang’s face suddenly turned red. He lowered his head and looked at his toes as he walked. His hand was tightly clutching the corner of his shirt. He stammered and could not speak. Wan’er saw that He Xiangjiang’s ears were red, and she immediately hugged He Xiangjiang’s shoulder. “What’s wrong with you, young Taoist priest? You said a few words and then stopped speaking. What’s wrong?” He Xiangjiang did not speak, but his cheeks and ears were even hotter. The group walked out of the city. Then they gathered together. Wan’er still requested to sit with He Xiangjiang. Jiang Ping couldn’t refuse, so he agreed. Then, from Wan’er’s and Yan’er’s storage bracelets, three white cranes were released. The three auspicious beasts were all stored in Liu’er’s bracelets, and they were treated well. Before they left, Wan’er raised her arms and shouted. “Daddy, are we still competing today?” Yan’er obviously didn’t want to be outdone and answered on behalf of Jiang Ping. “Do you think we’re afraid of you?” “Daddy, we must be faster than Wan’er today!” Jiang Ping patted Yan’er’s head. “Okay, Daddy will try his best!” Then, the group of people rode the white cranes and rose into the sky according to the arrangement when they came...; Outside the city gate, Wen Lin walked out from a corner and watched the white cranes rise into the sky. He took out the mirror that Chen Yulian handed to him and drew a few strokes on it. He snorted coldly and flew into the sky himself...; In the main hall of the Cloud Mist Sect, there was an old man dressed in white with a sword at his waist. Although he looked old, judging from his temperament, it was clear that this person had an imposing aura even when he was young. Chen Chiran held the sword at his waist and looked at the mirror in his hand. There was a message from his daughter in the mirror. When he saw that his eldest grandson had been beaten, Chen Chiran flew into a rage. He slapped the guard who was serving him! The guard was also at a loss. Why did he get slapped! The latest message in the mirror said that the group of people who had injured his eldest grandson was currently heading to Xianlai Island. Chen Chiran waved his hand and called the elders of the sect over. He told the elders that he was going out. They would be in charge of the matters in the sect. If they could not make a decision, they would wait for him to come back and discuss it. After giving his instructions, Chen Chiran did not wait for a moment. He flew straight into the air. His direction was not Xianlai Island as mentioned in the message. Instead, he went to Nanwu City first. On the side of Nanwu City, Wen Quanyong was still lying on the bed. However, his mental state was much better. At least he was not screaming and breaking down. Chen Yulian had been guarding the bedside the whole time. Afraid that something would happen to her son. Chen Chiran slowly landed in the mayor’s mansion. This was the first time Chen Chiran had come to the mayor’s mansion since his daughter married Wen Lin. In his own words, he already wasn’t satisfied with his son-in-law. It was already good enough that he did not come and tear down his mayor’s mansion. Why would he even think about visiting them! Chen Chiran was not familiar with the place. He circled around the mayor’s mansion, but he did not see his daughter. A servant of the mayor’s mansion saw Chen Chiran. He looked unfamiliar, and he did not have a gatekeeper with him. He was afraid that he did not enter through the main gate. That servant berated this old man whom he had never seen before. “Who are you! Why are you wandering around the mayor’s mansion? Does our master know you?” Chen Chiran, who was already in a fit of anger, saw that a servant dared to speak to him in such a manner. He pulled out his sword and placed it on the servant’s neck. The servant was so frightened that he trembled. “Where is your mistress?” The servant forced out a few words from his mouth. “In...; In the young master’s room.” The old man used his sword to pat the servant’s cheek. “Lead the way!” The servant trembled as he walked in front. The latter kept his sword on the servant’s shoulder and held it against his neck. “Sir, this is our young master’s room...;” Chen Chiran nodded and put away his sword. He held it with his backhand and used the hilt of his sword to hit the servant’s head. The servant’s head bled as he jumped to the side and wailed. If it were not for his daughter’s sake, Chen Chiran would consider killing this servant a light punishment. Now, he had only given him a small punishment. He was very magnanimous. Chen Yulian, who was in the room, heard the commotion outside the door. She, who was already upset, was even more furious. She stood up and was about to go out and teach these unruly servants a lesson. “What’s going on? Don’t you know that the young master is resting?” “Why is there such a huge commotion!” Before she even opened the door, Chen Yulian had already cursed out loud. When she opened the door and saw an old man dressed in white standing in front of her with a sword in his hand, tears welled up in Chen Yulian’s eyes and she immediately cried out. “Father!” The old man’s heart ached when he saw this. He sheathed his sword and stroked the girl’s hair just like when she was young. “It’s alright. Father is here. Let’s go in and see Quan’er first.” Chen Yulian rubbed the corner of her eyes and brought Chen Chiran into the room. Wen Quanyong was still sleeping. His head was wrapped in gauze, and his feet were tied with leg support. Chen Chiran squatted beside the bed and checked the condition of his eldest grandson’s injuries. “These are just superficial injuries. It’s not a big deal. It’s just that...;” Just as the old man was still rephrasing his words, Chen Yulian quickly asked. “Just what?” Chen Chiran withdrew the spiritual energy from Wen Quanyong’s body to check. “It’s just that his state of mind might be slightly damaged. This will hinder his future life and cultivation.” Chen Yulian’s eyes were filled with worry. “Father! What should we do!” The old man gently patted the back of the woman’s hand, telling her not to be anxious. “I will return the favor to the person by hurting his state of mind. Then, I will capture that girl and make her apologize to my grandson.” “So that they will know who doesn’t have an elder.” Chen Yulian softly acknowledged and calmed herself down. “Wen Lin is already following them now. Father, why don’t we leave now? Otherwise, we won’t be able to make it in time!” Chen Chiran nodded. “He has already told me the destination of that group of people.” “The group of people’s destination is Xianlai Island. They should be taking the ferry.” “The fastest ferry will take a week to reach the shore. We can make it in time.” “Also, you don’t have to go. You don’t like to cultivate since you were young. If your cultivation is not high, you might get hurt.” The old man patiently explained to Chen Yulian. Chen Yulian didn’t force herself and nodded. “Then I’ll stay at home and take care of Quan’er.” Chen Chiran put his hands on his knees and stood up. “I’ll rush over now. I’ll probably arrive tomorrow morning.” “Just wait at home.” After saying that, Chen Chiran frowned and grunted. He flew directly to Xianlai Island. The size of Xianlai Island was no less than a city. Moreover, the flow of people on the island was much more than that of Nanwu City and Yellow Clouds City. This was because this was an island for ferry stopovers. Originally, there was nothing on the island. It was bare and barren. After it became popular, all kinds of restaurants, inns, and auction venues were built. Many things that could not be bought in ordinary places could be found here. The island was basically full of cultivators, so the currency in circulation was only spirit stones. When Jiang Ping and his group arrived at Xianlai Island, it was already evening. The two white cranes landed on the ground. The little ones were tired from sitting, and they were so hungry that their stomachs were rumbling. Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi were still lagging behind, and Jiang Ping and the others tacitly did not mention that they had to wait for the two of them. Zhao Tianqian and Jiang Ping both turned around and patted the back of the two white cranes, using their spiritual energy to send a message. After the two white cranes received the message, they flapped their wings and returned the way they came. Then, the group stepped onto the island. They saw the bustling scene on Xianlai Island. Along the way, there were all kinds of shouting and selling, and all sorts of fancy things that they had never seen before. The three little girls were moved by the sight. But Jiang Ping had already told them before they came to the island. They could buy things, but they were only allowed to buy one item. If it was more than one, he would not help pay for it. The three little girls suddenly regretted agreeing to Jiang Ping’s request of only buying one item. Along the way, the little girls were attracted by the shouting and selling along the way. Except for He Xiangjiang, he did not seem to hear it. He was facing the front, ignoring everything else. Jiang Ping was dragged along by the three little girls. He didn’t even take a few steps before he was dragged along by force. “Why don’t you guys go and pick by yourselves? You can tell me after you are done picking.” “I don’t have that much energy to accompany you guys.” Jiang Ping stopped and turned around to look at Li Sushang, signaling her to follow the three little girls. Li Sushang understood and went forward to replace Jiang Ping. She held the hands of the three little girls and walked in front. Jiang Ping let out a sigh of relief. At last, he didn’t have to be pestered by these three mischievous little girls. Otherwise, when they call Jiang Ping “Daddy” again later, Jiang Ping wouldn’t be able to endure their coquettish manner and spend spirit stones without intending to, when he had already told them that he would only allow them to buy one item. After seeing Jiang Ping leave alone, Zhao Tianqian quickly went forward to pester Jiang Ping. It was still because of the sword manual. Jiang Ping was helpless. Seeing the extremely annoying old man, he could only agree to the old Taoist priest’s request. He casually threw the sword manual to Zhao Tianqian. After that, Zhao Tianqian even whispered to him that he didn’t know how to cherish rare items. He Xiangjiang followed closely behind his master. He just walked silently without looking at the shops and vendors on the roadside. Jiang Ping noticed the young Taoist priest and asked. “Why don’t you follow Wan’er and have a look?” He Xiangjiang didn’t feel embarrassed and grinned. “I don’t dare to look. I’m afraid I can’t afford it if I like it.” Jiang Ping replied with a smile. “It’s okay. I’ll pay for what you like. Just take it as a gift from Wan’er.” He Xiangjiang shook his head hard and quickly refused. “No need, no need. Uncle Jiang, you’re the one who gave my master and me the tickets. You’re also the one who paid for the food and drinks for the past few days.” “I can’t let you spend any more money.” Jiang Ping chuckled. “What if I say that if you don’t buy something, I’ll make Wan’er ignore you forever?” He Xiangjiang was stunned. He could only look at his master helplessly. Zhao Tianqian nodded at his disciple. He Xiangjiang followed Wan’er and the others, but he thought to himself that he must not pick too expensive items later. The cheaper the better. He couldn’t let Jiang Ping spend money on him. After Zhao Tianqian got the sword manual, he said to Jiang Ping. “Well, I’m good at bargaining, and I have sharp eyes. I’ll go up and help the little fellows!” In fact, he was afraid that Jiang Ping would go back on his words, so he immediately followed the little girls in large strides. Jiang Ping followed them unhurriedly. Looking at the group of people, each of them had their own personality. It must truly be a blessing from their previous lives to be able to become a group together. Wan’er saw that He Xiangjiang had followed her, so she directly let go of Liu’er’s hand. She deliberately slowed down her pace and waited to walk side by side with the young Taoist priest. Seeing her eldest sister’s reaction, Liu’er turned her head and laughed. “Sister Wan’er, do you like Brother Xiangjiang very much?” Wan’er patted He Xiangjiang’s shoulder. “Of course, I like him. I like you too. Why, are you unhappy?” The young Taoist priest at the side suddenly blushed again. Liu’er looked at the young Taoist priest who was blushing, as well as her eldest sister. She covered her mouth and laughed. “No!” Yan’er was focused on finding the object she wanted. She did not have time to pay attention to the conversation between her other two sisters. She had already thought about going to the bookstores more often before she landed on the island. Yan’er had finished reading Lei Jingyun’s novel and she planned to buy a new book to read in case she was bored on the way. The little girl made up her mind to buy the thickest book this time so that she could read it for a longer time. However, after shopping for a long time, she didn’t see a bookstore on the island. After taking two steps forward, Yan’er stopped. Then she turned back to look. Li Sushang saw that Yan’er didn’t move, so she asked the other little fellows to wait first. Liu’er knew her second sister very well. She looked at Yan’er and asked in puzzlement. “What’s wrong, Sister Yan’er? This isn’t a bookstore!” Hearing Liu’er’s words, everyone looked in the same direction. They found that Yan’er was staring at a blacksmith shop, and they were in disbelief! The two sisters were a little confused now. Blacksmith shop? Yan’er had been influenced by the fragrance of books since she was young. Logically speaking, she shouldn’t be interested in these things. Yan’er said softly. “I want to go over and take a look!” Although Li Sushang was also puzzled, she still led a few people over. After walking in, she noticed that Yan’er was staring at a piece of an iron bar hanging from the crossbeam of the blacksmith’s shop. The iron bar was already rusty. It was about three feet long and four inches thick. It looked no different from an ordinary iron bar. Yan’er pointed at the iron bar and asked the shopkeeper. “Can I take a look at that?” This shop specialized in forging weapons for cultivators. Judging from the size of the shop, it was obvious that they could only make one or two spiritual artifacts at most. As for immortal artifacts, they could forget about them. Every day, the shopkeeper was bare-chested. He took a hammer and hammered at the door of the shop, trying to attract customers with the sound of the hammering. Hearing Yan’er’s request, the hammer in the shopkeeper’s hand paused, and he was a little surprised. This piece of iron had been hanging in this shop for a long time. And this piece of iron was very strange. No matter how hard he hammered it, he hammered it hard. The iron was still a piece of iron, and there was no change at all. There were so many strange things in this world, and the shopkeeper did not care about them at that time. Seeing that it was so hard, he might as well hang it on the beam and use it as décor for his shop or something. After hanging it on the beam for so many years, many customers who came would take a second glance, but it was the first time a customer requested to take it down and have a look. The shopkeeper said to wait for a moment, then casually took a knife from the wall and jumped. He directly cut the hanging iron chain with his knife and caught the iron bar when it fell. Liu’er, who was watching from the side, clapped her hands and cheered. “Shopkeeper, your knife is so sharp.” The shopkeeper smiled and showed the knife to everyone. “Then do you want to consider buying it? This is a middle-grade spiritual artifact. It’s not expensive. I’ll charge you five middle-grade spirit stones!” Liu’er looked at the knife and shook her head, thinking that she only had one chance to buy things today. She couldn’t waste it like this. The shopkeeper had no choice but to hang the knife back on the wall dejectedly. Then, the shopkeeper held the iron bar with both hands and handed it to Yan’er. Yan’er pointed and asked. “Can I hold it?” The shopkeeper nodded with a smile and didn’t refuse. Yan’er held the iron bar in her hand and carefully looked at the rust on it. After touching the whole iron bar, she asked. “Shopkeeper, how much is this?” The shopkeeper put away the surprise in his heart and stretched out three fingers to the little girl. “This is the most precious treasure of our shop. How about this? You look cute.” “It was supposed to be three high-grade spirit stones. I’ll just charge you two.” After saying that, the shopkeeper took back one of his three fingers and gave the little girl a two. After thinking for a moment, Yan’er was about to agree when a hand reached out from behind her. “No, is this thing worth two spirit stones?” “I don’t even want it if you sell it to me in copper coins!” After saying this, Zhao Tianqian stood out from behind Yan’er, followed by Jiang Ping. The shopkeeper looked as if he was facing a great enemy, but he was at least a veteran who had opened a shop for more than a decade. After hearing the old Taoist priest’s words, he took back the piece of iron. “This is the treasure of my shop!” “Two spirit stones is already the lowest price. If you are not sincerely interested, there’s no need to talk anymore!” After taking back the iron bar in Yan’er’s hand, it could be seen on her face that she was panicking a little. The shopkeeper had noticed this and wanted to take the opportunity to raise the price. Zhao Tianqian was even more crafty and directly asked the shopkeeper. “Treasure of the store? Come, tell me about the effect of this treasure.” “If you can tell me, I’ll admit defeat and even buy it with five high-grade spirit stones!” The shopkeeper’s heart skipped a beat. This was an expert! However, making up stories was his strong point, so he immediately made one up. “This iron is a weapon left behind by a mighty figure in ancient times. It might even be a divine weapon!” “Moreover, this iron is invulnerable to swords and spears, invulnerable to water and fire, and incomparably hard. Do you think it’s worth this price?” Zhao Tianqian directly sneered. “Ancient times? How ancient is that?” “And it’s even a divine weapon! Have you ever seen a divine weapon? You just opened your mouth and blabbered!” The shopkeeper might have realized that this bragging was a little too much. His palms were sweating, and he felt somewhat guilty. “Then name a price, and I’ll see if we can negotiate.” Zhao Tianqian revealed a victorious smile and stretched out a palm. After thinking for a while, he put away a finger and said. “Four middle-grade spirit stones, not even one more!” The shopkeeper’s reaction also caught Zhao Tianqian by surprise. The shopkeeper handed over the iron bar with both hands and said straightforwardly. “Deal, pay up!” Zhao Tianqian, who had thought that he would have to deal with the shopkeeper for a few more rounds, suddenly felt as if he had been tricked. He even forgot to take his hand back. This...; profiteer! Yan’er couldn’t wait any longer. She was afraid that the shopkeeper would go back on his word, so she directly hugged the iron bar and turned to Jiang Ping. “Daddy, pay up!” Jiang Ping smiled as he took out five middle-grade spirit stones and handed them to the shopkeeper. He even carefully observed the shopkeeper’s expression. When the shopkeeper received the spirit stones, a smile inadvertently appeared on his face. Zhao Tianqian also happened to see the shopkeeper’s cunning smile. He immediately wanted to beat his chest and stomp his feet. Jiang Ping smiled as he patted the old Taoist priest’s shoulder. “I don’t know who said that they’re a good negotiator!” Then, he began to snicker. Five middle-grade spirit stones were nothing to him, but it was still interesting to spend five spirit stones to see Zhao Tianqian suffer. Then, the group left the shop and continued to shop. Seeing Jiang Ping and the others go far away, the shopkeeper of the blacksmith shop burst into unbridled laughter. He didn’t expect to sell a useless thing at such a high price when he opened the shop today, so he was very pleased with himself. He even thought of talking to his wife when he got home so that she wouldn’t call him useless in the future. Wan’er, Liu’er, and He Xiangjiang were still walking at the front. Yan’er, who had already bought the item she liked, obediently followed beside Jiang Ping. She held the iron bar in her arms and seemed to have a lot on her mind. Her two small eyebrows were knitted tightly together. In order to prove himself, Zhao Tianqian had been following Wan’er and the others. He thought that he had acted out of character just now. He would definitely show Jiang Ping his eloquence next time. Jiang Ping and Yan’er were walking at the back. Jiang Ping noticed Yan’er’s abnormality and reached out to gently press the little girl’s head. Yan’er raised her head and wanted to say something. But Jiang Ping told her to talk later. There were too many people and too many eyes. Then, he helped the little girl put away the iron bar that she had just bought. Jiang Ping squatted down and rubbed the space between Yan’er’s eyebrows. “No matter what, we’ll talk about it later. Daddy will accompany you.” The little girl nodded heavily. Jiang Ping held her hand and followed the crowd. Later, Wan’er and Liu’er both bought the items they liked. Wan’er chose a wooden hairpin. The hairpin was very plain and smooth, but it was a rare item. The shopkeeper who sold the hairpin said that if one were to wear the hairpin in the summer, it would bring a cool and refreshing feeling, and it was especially easy to calm one’s heart. Moreover, after the little girl wore it, although it looked like a chopstick stuck in her head from afar, it had a different charm when examined carefully. Liu’er bought a jade token. There was nothing carved on the jade token. The shopkeeper said that the token represented peace, and it was usually worn to ensure safety. Liu’er asked if there was any special effect. The pretty shopkeeper shook her head. She said that this token was made of a material that made it look nicer, and it did not have any special effect. What was special was the meaning of ensuring safety. Liu’er was very satisfied and took down the token. After taking it down, she turned around and gave it to Li Sushang. Li Sushang was a little flattered. “This is...;” Liu’er chuckled. “I think Auntie Sushang usually works very hard and has never cultivated.” “So I’m giving this token to Auntie Sushang, so that you’ll be safe.” Jiang Ping secretly gave a thumbs up to his third daughter. Liu’er also giggled in response. Li Sushang was very touched, and she almost burst into tears. She squatted down and hugged Liu’er tightly. Liu’er, who was hugged by Li Sushang, reached out to pat her back. Jiang Ping was very pleased with his third daughter. His three daughters each had their own merits. Liu’er was the only one who could please Jiang Ping the most. This was because Liu’er, who was the youngest, was the most meticulous. At last, the young Taoist priest chose the cheapest item. It was a pen. There was nothing special about the pen. It could be bought in an ordinary market. It was just that the workmanship was more exquisite, and the material was better. Moreover, it had the lowest price. It was only one low-grade spirit stone. Even Liu’er’s safety token cost three low-grade spirit stones. Zhao Tianqian looked at the pen and could not bear to bargain. He casually said something and asked the shopkeeper to gift something. The shopkeeper was also very straightforward. He gifted him two paperweights made of stones. They weren’t worth much and didn’t look good, so the shopkeeper didn’t feel bad giving them away. After shopping, Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi arrived just in time. The group found a restaurant for dinner and planned to rest. Jiang Ping brought Yan’er to his room before going to bed. Then he took out the piece of iron that Yan’er had bought during the day and placed it on the table. When she saw the piece of iron, the little girl’s heart ached a little. Jiang Ping had long discovered that this piece of iron was extraordinary. Moreover, his second daughter had the spiritual chaos sword physique. Anything that could catch her eye was definitely not an ordinary item. Jiang Ping asked Yan’er softly. “Is there anything different about this piece of iron?” Yan’er nodded with a melancholic look in her eyes. “It can talk.” Jiang Ping was also a little surprised. This was very strange. A broken piece of iron could talk? Jiang Ping asked again. Yan’er nodded firmly. “It kept talking about saving him...;” Jiang Ping began to guess in his heart. Could it be like what the shopkeeper said, it was a divine weapon? Or a high-level immortal weapon? Because above immortal artifacts, this weapon, which was originally just a tool, began to have spiritual intelligence. Since Yan’er said that this iron bar could speak, it couldn’t be ruled out that it was a divine weapon. It was using its mind to communicate with Yan’er. Jiang Ping said. “Yan’er, try communicating with it with your mind. Ask it if it can hear you!” Yan’er did as she was told. As expected, Yan’er raised her head in surprise and told Jiang Ping that she could communicate with it. This time, Jiang Ping confirmed in his heart that this was a weapon. As for the grade, he wasn’t too certain, but it was definitely above immortal artifacts. Jiang Ping asked Yan’er to ask how to save it. After a while, Yan’er said with a twisted face. “It said that it wants to come out, and it needs an excellent whetstone.” Jiang Ping frowned. The whetstone Yan’er mentioned was definitely not the kind that ordinary people used, but a special stone used on the weapons of cultivators. This kind of stone could greatly increase the power of weapons. However, due to the scarcity of this whetstone, it would be difficult to find. It was said that if a nail-sized whetstone appeared on the market, even if its grade was relatively poor, it would be able to cause many people to fight over it until they bled. Jiang Ping shook his head and said. “Daddy doesn’t have this thing for the time being. However, you can tell it that when we encounter it, we will definitely think of a way to get it and save it.” Yan’er acknowledged it and began to communicate with it with her inner voice. After a while, the little girl’s brows finally relaxed. She smiled and said to Jiang Ping. “It said yes, and it will wait for us. Then it became quiet.” Jiang Ping silently took this matter to heart. Then, he sent the little girl back to sleep. The next morning, Chen Chiran arrived at Xianlai Island. He first sat cross-legged on the ground to recover the energy he had consumed while traveling. After about 15 minutes, Chen Chiran stood up. At this time, Wen Lin appeared out of nowhere. “Father-in-law, you’re finally here!” Chen Chiran glared at him, and Wen Lin immediately called him sect master. “Sect Master, they’re now waiting for the ferry in Xianlai Island.” “I know which inn they are staying in. I will take you there.” Chen Chiran said calmly. “No need.” Then, he flew into the sky and shouted at the top of Xianlai Island. “Which one is Jiang Ping!” “Come out and face your death. Otherwise, if I go to you, I will kill your whole family!” The people on the island all raised their heads, but they were not too surprised. After all, it was an island where the ferry docked, and the people coming and going were all cultivators. It was inevitable that they would run into enemies who wanted to fight. However, there was a clear rule on the island that if they wanted to fight, they could! They could fight when they were 50 miles away from Xianlai Island. For so long, no one dared to break this rule. Because at first, a brainless cultivator attacked when he was on the island. In the end, that person and his enemies were all beaten up by all sorts of cultivators on the island. Therefore, after that, no one would be stupid enough to attack while they were on the island. Jiang Ping was still eating breakfast when he heard someone calling his name outside. He used his spiritual energy to sense it. When he sensed the aura of the person in the sky and Wen Lin’s, Jiang Ping murmured impatiently. “After hitting the young one, the old one comes. How troublesome...;” After taking a bite of the steamed bun, he told the three little girls that his friend had come, and he was going out to welcome them. The three little girls couldn’t care less. They were fighting for food with Lei Jingyun and Qiu Chi. Jiang Ping stood up and was about to go out to fight. Zhao Tianqian reminded him. “Do you need me to follow you?” The old Taoist priest and Jiang Ping released their spiritual energy almost at the same time when they heard the voice. It was precisely because the old Taoist priest sensed that the cultivation of the person in the sky was not weaker than Jiang Ping’s that he asked this question. Jiang Ping grinned and said. “No need. I’m the strongest even if we are in the same realm.” Zhao Tianqian said with a look of disdain. “Let’s see what you can do!” Because the old Taoist priest had already copied the sword manual and returned it to Jiang Ping. When he fell out with Jiang Ping, it was like flipping through a book. His pestering attitude from yesterday was nowhere to be seen. Jiang Ping rolled his eyes at Zhao Tianqian, walked out of the door, and flew into the sky. “Your grandfather, Jiang Ping, is here!” Chen Chiran saw how arrogant Jiang Ping was, but he was not angry. After all, he had met too many people who started with arrogant words and ended up kneeling and begging for mercy. The more ruthless Jiang Ping was, the happier Chen Chiran was. He thought that he would be even more excited when Jiang Ping begged for mercy later. “You can’t break the rules. Do you dare to follow me 50 miles away?” Chen Chiran shouted. Jiang Ping smiled. “Why not!” The two of them flew out of Xianlai Island under the eyes of the crowd. Chen Chiran flew in the air. When he was out of the sea area under the jurisdiction of Xianlai Island, he suddenly stopped and stood in the air. Jiang Ping also stopped. “How do you want to fight?” “I haven’t had enough breakfast. Let’s finish it quickly. I have to go back to eat.” Jiang Ping said to the old man in front of him impatiently. Chen Chiran actually laughed out loud. “You are quite straightforward. You have the same appetite like me, but your tone is a bit arrogant.” Jiang Ping couldn’t be bothered to listen to this nonsense. He yawned and urged Chen Chiran to hurry up. Chen Chiran snorted coldly. “Since you want to end this as soon as possible, then I’ll only use one strike.” “If you can withstand this strike of mine, then I’ll leave calmly.” The reason why Chen Chiran was so confident was that his own swordsmanship was unrivaled. In the past, no matter who his opponent was, he would be able to defeat him with one strike. Jiang Ping looked at the confident old man in front of him. He smiled. “Is that so? What a coincidence. I have a sword as well.” “I just don’t know who is stronger and who is weaker when compared to you.” A wicked smile hung on the corner of Chen Chiran’s mouth. “Oh? So you want to test out my strike?” As he spoke, Chen Chiran drew his sword out of its sheath and held it horizontally in his hand. The Cloud Mist Sword in Chen Chiran’s hand was a top-grade immortal artifact. Furthermore, when paired with his cloud-slicing sword technique, its destructive power was incredible! Jiang Ping also extended his hand and summoned the thin Sun Moon Yin-Yang Sword. When the sword in Jiang Ping’s hand appeared, Chen Chiran fixed his eyes on it. He could feel the sharpness of the sword, but he took a closer look. After seeing the thickness of the sword, he shook his head and said. “That sword of yours is sharp enough. However, the body of the sword is too thin. How much sword intent and spiritual energy can it hold?” Jiang Ping didn’t say anything. He just stretched out his other hand. “Let’s not talk about it anymore. Whether the sword is good or not, we’ll know once we try it!” Chen Chiran didn’t say any more nonsense. He held the sword with both hands and silently chanted the cloud mist sword technique in his heart. Then, he directly slashed at Jiang Ping. An invisible but perceptive sword intent filled the space between heaven and earth. Suddenly this space was like a turbulent river and the sea. A heatwave came. The clouds in the sky gathered above Chen Chiran’s head. Jiang Ping smiled faintly. He gently raised his sword. He gently made a horizontal movement in Chen Chiran’s direction. A sword intent that was even more intimidating than Chen Chiran’s suddenly burst forth from the tip of his sword. This caused the aura of the world that had been activated by Chen Chiran to stop churning. Instead, it became as quiet as a puppy that was prostrating under its feet. For some reason, Jiang Ping subconsciously read out the words on the first page of Sword Beheading a True Immortal. “When the sword strikes, Yin and Yang reverse, and the universe falls. Standing in front of all living things, undefeated by Heaven and Earth!” Chen Chiran watched as the sword intent attacked him. An expression of disbelief and terror appeared on his face. How could this be! It was just a light movement, but it had directly suppressed his aura. Jiang Ping looked at Chen Chiran’s terrified expression. He already knew the outcome. He put away the Sun Moon Yin-Yang Sword and turned around to fly back to Xianlai Island. The result was obvious. Chen Chiran was hit by that strange sword intent. His entire body was jolted down to the ground. He still had half of his life left, but his cultivation had been cut in half. If it was just a simple defeat, it would have been fine. If his cultivation had fallen, he could have trained back. But he had lost the sword. His entire sword heart had been shattered, and his state of mind had been damaged even more severely than Wen Quanyong’s. It would be difficult for him to return to the heaven ascension realm in this lifetime. This farce ended here. In the end, it was Wen Lin who brought his father-in-law back to Nanwu City, but nobody knew what happened in the end. After four days, Jiang Ping and the others boarded the ferry. This ferry was the roc’s incarnation, soaring in the sky. When the little ones boarded the ferry, everyone was dancing with excitement. They secretly felt that they had made the right choice by agreeing to Jiang Ping’s house moving. Otherwise, how could they have seen all this! After ten days of sailing, the ferry prepared to dock the next day for the first time. That night, the old Taoist priest knocked on Jiang Ping’s door. “My fellow friend, the ferry will dock tomorrow, and we will disembark.” Jiang Ping was a bit surprised. “So soon? I thought you were following us to Fengdu City!” Zhao Tianqian shook his head. “If it weren’t for the fact that there were some matters to be dealt with in the Taoist temple, I would have followed you to Fengdu City and then turned back.” “It would be good for Xiangjiang to travel more.” Jiang Ping couldn’t force him. After exchanging a few more pleasantries with Zhao Tianqian, the old Taoist priest left the room. After the old Taoist priest left, Jiang Ping sighed and stood up to go to the three little girls’ room. It was necessary to tell Wan’er about this matter. Although Jiang Ping knew that Wan’er would be very sad when he said it, he pushed open the door and explained the general situation. Wan’er immediately jumped out of bed after hearing it. She didn’t even put on her shoes and directly rushed out of the door. Jiang Ping had no choice but to tell Yan’er and Liu’er to sleep well, and then he followed Wan’er himself. The little girl knocked hard on He Xiangjiang’s door. After He Xiangjiang opened the door, the little girl directly grabbed his collar and asked. “Young Taoist priest, are you going to get off the ferry!” “Are you not going to Fengdu City with us?” It was obvious that He Xiangjiang was also a little dispirited. He nodded. “Yes, we won’t be able to go with you tomorrow.” Wan’er shouted at He Xiangjiang in confusion. “Why!” When Jiang Ping arrived, he saw Wan’er was about to cry, so he quickly went up and squatted beside her. “Wan’er, you will be fine. Daddy will take you to visit the young Taoist priest and the Old Senior often in the future, okay?” He Xiangjiang was also more sensible and echoed from the side. “Yes, we can also come and visit you often...;” This prevented Wan’er from crying out loud immediately. The little girl lowered her head and said with a trembling voice. “Young Taoist priest, walk with me.” He Xiangjiang readily agreed. Then the two of them walked in front while Jiang Ping followed behind them, always twenty steps away from them. Wan’er picked a relatively clean spot and sat down. He Xiangjiang also sat down next to her. The two of them raised their heads and looked at the night scene in the sky. Because the ferry was sailing in the sky, the night scene here could not be seen anywhere else. Wan’er spoke slowly. “Young Taoist priest, are we still good friends in the future?” He Xiangjiang nodded his head firmly. “Not only in the future, if you don’t hit my head so much, but I will also still be friends with you in my next life.” As soon as he finished speaking, the young Taoist priest received another slap on his head. Wan’er looked at her own palm and felt that it was not enough, so she raised her hand to He Xiangjiang’s head again. The crisp sounds of slapping rang out continuously, and she did not know how many times she had slapped him. “Aiyo!” “Enough, Wan’er. If you hit me again, I’ll faint!” At this moment, Wan’er retracted her hand and said calmly. “I’m afraid that I won’t have the chance in the future. I’ll hit your head more!” He Xiangjiang was speechless. He could not figure out the girl beside him at all. “Wan’er.” “Hmm?” “I’ll give you two things.” He Xiangjiang took out two things from his pocket. They were the things that Jiang Ping had paid for him on Xianlai Island. A writing brush and two paperweights. “Here you go!” “You can practice writing with them in the future!” Wan’er rolled her eyes at He Xiangjiang. “What do you mean!” “My writing is very ugly, isn’t it?” He Xiangjiang said no a few times. He quietly moved his body to the other side. “How can that be? I just think that you should be able to write better.” Only then did Wan’er withdraw her raised hand. “That’s more like it.” Then Wan’er seemed to remember something and immediately stood up and ran towards Jiang Ping who was behind her. He Xiangjiang was confused. He watched as the little girl ran over and ran back to sit down. What was different was that Wan’er now had a package in her hand. Wan’er handed the parcel to He Xiangjiang and said. “This is a piece of cloth. Take it back and tailor a Taoist robe with this. Don’t wear rags like a beggar.” After saying that, she stared at the patches on He Xiangjiang’s clothes and pointed at them. Wan’er had bought this piece of cloth in Shiyan Town, and it had been kept with Jiang Ping ever since...; He Xiangjiang hesitated for a moment and finally took the cloth. Then Wan’er took out the hairpin she bought on Xianlai Island from her purse and handed it to the young Taoist priest. The young Taoist priest quickly waved his hand and refused, saying that it was too expensive. In the end, the little girl forced it into his hand. After exchanging gifts, the two of them just sat there and watched the night scene. They chatted from time to time. It didn’t matter who spoke first or what they talked about. As long as the other party started talking, the two of them would never get tired of it. Jiang Ping watched from behind and felt a wave of jealousy. The old Taoist priest quietly appeared behind Jiang Ping. He raised his hand and tucked his hair behind his ear. With one hand behind his back, he muttered. “Just like a whale will swim to the sea, he will move toward the river.” At first, Jiang Ping didn’t understand. It wasn’t until one day when Jiang Ping suddenly remembered that he regretted not beating up the old Taoist priest at that time. He Xiangjiang, Jiang Wan...; Those words clearly meant that he would end up with his daughter! After parting with the old Taoist priest, Jiang Ping and his group were heading toward their final destination, Fengdu City. At this moment, Liu’er’s heart was filled with emotion. Was the secret of her constitution finally about to be revealed? What kind of connection did the origin of her constitution have with Fengdu? Now, everything would be revealed in Fengdu City! For some reason, the closer Jiang Ping got to Fengdu, the more chaotic his aura became. Jiang Ping had a hunch that there were many secrets in Fengdu City. And this secret had a great connection with himself...; Jiang Ping looked at the endless horizon in the distance and muttered. “Fengdu...;” “What kind of secret is it hiding?” Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes and clenched the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand! All the secrets would be revealed in Fengdu City. The origin of Liu’er’s mysterious constitution...; Jiang Ping had a premonition that Fengdu City might have some connection with his wife. After a long and difficult journey, the group of people finally arrived outside Fengdu City. Looking at the towering city wall in front of them, they were filled with emotions! They had gone through so much to reach Fengdu City. Was this the Fengdu City that hid all its secrets? Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes. He could vaguely feel an unusual power in the city! There was also a faint sense of familiarity, but he could not tell how familiar it was. Jiang Ping did not think too much about it. No matter what kind of monster it was, he could wipe them out with a single sword strike! At this moment, the system’s voice suddenly appeared in Jiang Ping’s mind. [Ding! The host has arrived at Fengdu City. You have unlocked a lucky draw opportunity!] [Do you want to use the lucky draw?] When Jiang Ping heard the system’s voice, the corners of his mouth curled up slightly. Lucky draw? This was a little interesting. Following that, Jiang Ping didn’t hesitate to choose the lucky draw option! A golden light bloomed, and a huge lottery panel appeared in Jiang Ping’s mind. Then, the lottery panel started to spin crazily, and the lottery rewards kept appearing in Jiang Ping’s mind! [Ding! Congratulations to the host for obtaining a divine-level reward, the one step to heaven pill!] One step to heaven pill! When Jiang Ping saw this reward, his eyes lit up! What exactly was this one step to heaven pill? The name sounded awesome! Jiang Ping could not suppress the curiosity in his heart and opened the details page of this one step to heaven pill! [One Step to Heaven Pill] [After consuming this medicinal pill and absorbing its medicinal effects, one can forcefully raise the world to the peak of the plane without any side effects!] After seeing the introduction of this medicinal pill, even with Jiang Ping’s composure, he could not help but suck in a breath of cold air! This one step to heaven pill was so frightening. It was actually able to allow him to directly raise his realm to the top! It was so terrifying! Just like the name of this medicinal pill, it was truly one step to heaven! What was even more alarming was that this medicinal pill, which was like pulling out a seedling to aid its growth, did not have any side effects! Jiang Ping’s heart trembled violently! In this way, who else in this world could be his match against his single sword strike? Jiang Ping put away the one step to heaven pill and calmed his emotions before preparing to enter the city. Just as the few of them were being interrogated by the city gate guards, the sound of horse hooves could be heard from behind them! A powerful and hoarse voice could be heard from behind Jiang Ping and the others! “Those guys in front! Get out of the way!” “My young master is entering the city. How dare you block his way!” “You’re courting death!” Jiang Ping and the others stopped and looked back. They saw nine horses with spiral horns on their heads pulling a golden carriage toward the city gate at high speed! Next to the golden carriage were a few brawny men with well-defined muscles carrying broadswords on their backs. Jiang Ping and the rest took a closer look. All the brawny men guarding the carriage were in the earth immortal realm! Jiang Ping frowned slightly. A few earth immortal realm guards! This was interesting. He wondered who was sitting on the golden carriage! When the brawny men in the earth immortal realm saw that Jiang Ping’s group didn’t dodge, their eyes were filled with killing intent! A beautiful hand stretched out from the golden carriage that was emitting golden light and lifted the curtain of the golden carriage. Then, a charming female voice was heard from inside! “The young master said.” “Kill these dogs that block the way. Why are you still in a daze?” After the woman’s voice fell, one of the brawny men with a deep scar on his face roared angrily! He pulled out the broadsword on his back, and an incomparably majestic true Qi was emitted from his body! It blotted out the sky and covered the earth! He directly waved the broadsword in his hand, and an incomparably sharp blade light slashed out, instantly tearing apart the surrounding space! This blade was enough to destroy the entire city wall! The few city gate guards were scared out of their wits when they saw this scene! Such a terrifying attack was enough to make their souls scatter! However, Jiang Ping and the others still had calm expressions. There wasn’t the slightest fluctuation on their faces. Their eyes were like a calm spring. There wasn’t the slightest ripple in them! It was as if this terrifying slash was nothing to them! When the earth immortal realm brawny man saw that Jiang Ping and the others didn’t dodge, he thought that Jiang Ping and the others were panic-stricken! He grinned and roared at Jiang Ping and the others. “Die!” Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes, and cold killing intent flashed across his eyes! Buzz! A crisp and melodious sword sound surrounded the entire city gate! Then, a dazzling sword light flashed across the whole area! That earth immortal realm brawny man was frozen in mid-air. His eyes were filled with fear, and the muscles on his face kept twitching! He only felt a chill on his neck, and then a warm feeling came from his neck! Blood gushed out from his neck like a fountain! Before his consciousness disappeared, he had thought of using the supreme secret technique to reattach his head! However, he discovered that this sword was actually rapidly devouring his life force. In other words, even if he had already used a supreme secret technique, it was already too late! It was completely impossible to save himself. The luster in his eyes was continuously dimming! His life force was almost completely absorbed by this sword! Following that, his head rolled on the ground like a stone! Everyone present was dumbfounded. This was someone in the earth immortal realm! An earth immortal realm cultivator was casually killed by this man in front of them! With just one move! That earth immortal realm expert was unable to block the man’s single move! Everyone sucked in a breath of cold air! Where did this guy come from? Jiang Ping smiled slightly and raised the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand. He pointed the sword at the golden carriage with a mocking look in his eyes! He slowly opened his mouth and said. “Oh?” “You want to kill me?” Jiang Ping’s eyes were filled with killing intent, and the dense killing intent enveloped everyone present! Everyone present only felt a bone-piercing chill sweep over, which caused their hair to stand on end! Everyone looked towards Jiang Ping, who was holding the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand, and their eyes were filled with terror! Just who was this fellow? He was able to emit such an incomparably powerful killing intent as though it was corporeal. It was so terrifying! The Cloud Mist Sword in Jiang Ping’s hand emitted waves of sword sound! The crisp and melodious sword sounds reverberated at the city gate, and the sword Qi shot straight to the clouds! Streams of sword Qi and wind blew over slowly, blowing Jiang Ping’s robe until it fluttered in the wind! The incomparably strict sword Qi enveloped the entire scene. Everyone was intimidated by Jiang Ping’s incomparably majestic aura! Even those brawny men in the earth immortal realm were stunned for a moment! They didn’t expect that this guy in front of them could kill their fellow senior who was as strong as them, with just one sword strike! Moreover, this guy didn’t even use any sword techniques. It was just an ordinary sword attack! What kind of power was this? No one dared to imagine it! The few earth immortal realm brawny men looked at Jiang Ping, who was holding the Cloud Mist Sword, with a solemn expression! This guy’s strength far surpassed them! It was very likely that he was a mighty figure in the heaven ascension realm! If this guy was really a mighty figure in the heaven ascension realm, then they would definitely not be able to stop this terrifying guy! Even the so-called young master on the golden carriage was silent for a moment. Every heaven ascension realm expert was a peerless mighty figure. Although he was not afraid, he would not offend a heaven ascension realm expert because of such a small matter! If such an expert wanted to kill him, he would definitely not be able to block his strike! Hence, it was wise for him not to clash head-on with these fellows! Jiang Ping saw that there was no movement from within the carriage for a long time. He sneered and withdrew the longsword in his hand! However, when Jiang Ping sheathed his sword, an incomparably sharp and majestic power burst forth! It slashed straight at the golden carriage! Bang! A huge magic formation lit up on the golden carriage, blocking Jiang Ping’s sword Qi! However, against Jiang Ping’s incomparably sharp sword Qi, even the magic formation could not withstand it for long! Cracks appeared on the magic formation, and it shattered with a loud bang, turning into countless fragments that scattered in the air! The magnificent golden carriage that was suffused with multicolored light also shattered! A few earth immortal realm guards hurriedly tried to protect the carriage, but it was already too late! Jiang Ping’s incomparably terrifying sword Qi had already arrived in front of the young master! The thumb ring in the young master’s hand shone with an incomparably dazzling light, forcefully blocking Jiang Ping’s sword Qi which was enough to send him to reincarnation! The sword Qi slowly dissipated, and the intense light emitted by the thumb ring also dimmed! The young master in the carriage also slowly revealed his true appearance, and a feminine-looking youth dressed in a long white robe appeared before everyone’s eyes. There were two beautiful and flirtatious women seated beside him. Even though Jiang Ping had already sheathed his sword, the dense sword Qi squall did not dissipate! The incomparably violent sword Qi wind blew towards the youth in the carriage, and tiny bloody scars appeared on the youth’s handsome face! When the few city gate guards saw the youth on the golden carriage, they were instantly dumbfounded! Their legs and stomachs were trembling! This was...; The mayor’s son, Gu Sheng! This person actually dared to injure the mayor’s son. If the mayor of Fengdu City were to settle the score, he would probably kill them all! Even if this person was a heaven ascension realm expert, he would definitely not be able to withstand the mayor’s fury! What should they do! The few city gate guards were already panicking! The few earth immortal realm guards beside Gu Sheng saw that Gu Sheng’s face had been injured! They immediately shouted at Jiang Ping and the others angrily. “How dare you!” “Who are you!” “How dare you injure our young master!” “Do you know who our young master is?” After hearing the guard’s shout, Jiang Ping’s expression was calm, but there was still a smile on his face. He couldn’t be bothered with these people! When those guards saw Jiang Ping’s calm expression, they immediately erupted with incomparably terrifying dense true Qi! The forceful true Qi was like a torrent, pouring towards Jiang Ping’s group! Jiang Ping’s eyes narrowed slightly, his killing intent overflowing. If this bunch of fellows were to make a move, he did not mind killing all of them here! Gu Sheng stretched out his hand and said to the few guards beside him. “Stop!” “Let’s take a detour!” Gu Sheng looked at Jiang Ping with a solemn expression! He could feel the intense killing intent from Jiang Ping’s body. Even he felt his scalp go numb, and his entire body turned cold! This guy would really disregard his status and kill him! If this guy made a move, the few of them would be instantly killed! Therefore, it was not appropriate to use force against this guy now! Gu Sheng’s eyes turned cold. It was not too late to find this guy to take revenge after they entered the city! Although the heaven ascension realm was powerful, a heaven ascension realm warrior could not stir up any big waves in Fengdu City! At most, it would be a slight wave! His father was an existence above the heaven ascension realm...; The few earth immortal realm guards were slightly surprised when they heard Gu Sheng’s words! Their young master actually gave in? Who exactly was this guy? Even if he was in the heaven ascension realm, this was Fengdu City! Their mayor was an existence above the heaven ascension realm! What could this puny heaven ascension realm do? The few guards were furious. They had never seen such an arrogant person in Fengdu City! But since their young lord had spoken, they had no choice but to give up! Gu Sheng turned around and glanced at Jiang Ping. The heaven ascension realm? Hmph! He would let him know what it means to have someone better than him! After a fierce look flashed across his eyes, he took a detour to another city gate to return to the city! After Gu Sheng and the others left, Wan’er looked at Jiang Ping, who was holding the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand. She blinked her big watery eyes and said. “Daddy, those guys are so overbearing!” “If Daddy didn’t make a move to intimidate them, I think we would have been chopped to death by that big guy!” Jiang Ping reached out his hand and touched Wan’er’s head, then said slowly. “Don’t worry, Daddy can send the entire city to reincarnation with one sword!” Jiang Ping definitely didn’t exaggerate these words. Now he had the one step to heaven pill! If he refined the one step to heaven pill, who else in the world would be his match? What was this little Fengdu City? It wasn’t even an ant! Jiang Ping’s expression was calm, and his eyes were filled with an invincible aura! At this moment, dark clouds suddenly covered the sky! Lightning flashed! The great Tao manifested and landed directly on Jiang Ping’s body! Everyone present was instantly dumbfounded! The great Tao manifested...; Was this a breakthrough? At this moment, the entire Fengdu City’s entrance was filled with dense spiritual Qi. The Great Tao had manifested itself! The three-foot-long blade in Jiang Ping’s hand hummed non-stop, and the sword hummed incessantly! Boundless great Tao Qi descended from the nine heavens! Rays of golden light shot out from Jiang Ping’s body as they surrounded him! The might of the great Tao continued to spread! The aura on Jiang Ping’s body also continued to rise. The might of the heavens strengthened his body! When the guards of Fengdu City saw the scene in front of them, they were all dumbfounded. Their jaws were about to fall to their feet. This lord...; could it be that he was going to breakthrough? Judging from the fact that he had just killed an earth immortal realm expert from the mayor’s mansion, this lord was at least in the heaven ascension realm! Now that he had broken through once again, wouldn’t he be at least in the soaring realm, which was above the heaven ascension realm? Hiss! The few city gate guards sucked in a breath of cold air. They had actually dared to block the path of such a mighty figure just now. They were reckless! The few guards looked at the earth immortal realm expert who had his head chopped off with a sword and instantly felt a chill run down their necks. At this moment, Jiang Ping’s body was continuously emitting an incomparably profound aura of the great Tao. Due to the change in Jiang Ping’s state of mind just now, he looked at all the enemies in the world with an invincible force! It directly resonated with the great Tao, which was why he had broken through. However, this breakthrough didn’t have much effect on Jiang Ping. He already had the one step to heaven pill. There was no point in breaking through again. In any case, he could use the one step to heaven pill in the end. One step to heaven! He would become an expert standing at the top of this plane! Boom! An incomparably vigorous power of the great Tao bloomed around Jiang Ping, and the stars in the sky instantly dimmed! The scorching heat of the blazing sun instantly dissipated! The fearful power of the great Tao bloomed around Jiang Ping! The soaring realm! Transcending everything in the world. Soaring beyond the heavens! Jiang Ping felt the change in his own aura, and the corners of his mouth curled up slightly. Putting away the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand, Jiang Ping bent down and stroked Liu’er’s head. He said to Liu’er in a gentle and affectionate voice. “Liu’er, Daddy will bring you into the city now to find the secret of your special constitution.” Liu’er looked at Jiang Ping’s determined eyes and nodded obediently. Then, Jiang Ping turned his head and asked the few city gate guards. “Now, can we enter the city?” After the few guards heard Jiang Ping’s words, they were so scared that they almost peed their pants. How could they dare to stop them? They hurriedly opened a path for Jiang Ping with trembling legs! Jiang Ping led the group of people and walked straight into Fengdu City. At this moment, a middle-aged man wearing a golden robe, white beard, and white eyebrows was sitting on a futon in the mayor’s mansion of Fengdu City, meditating. At this moment, he slowly opened his eyes, and a trace of solemnity flashed through his eyes. He sensed that an expert had entered the city, and this expert’s aura was no weaker than his! The middle-aged man’s gaze instantly became like an eagle’s, incomparably fierce! Why did such an expert come to his Fengdu City? A trace of killing intent flashed in his eyes. This was probably an ill-intentioned person! At this moment, Jiang Ping and the others had already entered Fengdu City. The entire Fengdu City was full of vitality. The streets were bustling with people, and there was heavy traffic. It was a stark contrast to its name. After Wan’er and the others entered Fengdu City, they clamored to have a big meal. They had traveled all the way to Fengdu City and were worn out from travel. Now that they had come to Fengdu City, they naturally wanted to have a good rest. Although the secret of their visit to Fengdu City was to investigate the origin of Liu’er’s constitution, they also had to pay attention to the balance of work and rest, right? Moreover, Fengdu City was here, and it would not run away, so they were not in a hurry! In the end, Jiang Ping couldn’t persuade his daughters, so he agreed to take them to a restaurant to have a good meal. Seeing Jiang Ping nod his head in agreement, Liu’er and the others cheered. After all, they were little girls. After coming to the city, they would always be curious about new things! The group soon arrived at the largest restaurant in Fengdu City, Green Lotus Restaurant. After Jiang Ping and his group arrived at the restaurant, they called the waiter over, and they were about to start ordering when a few whispers suddenly came from the next table. “Have you heard?” “The young lord of the mayor’s mansion, Gu Sheng, was beaten up by a bunch of foreigners at the south city gate!” “Really? Gu Sheng usually bullies people and has committed many murders and arson. Now, his retribution has finally arrived!” “Hey! Stop talking. Be careful that the people from the mayor’s mansion hear you. If the mayor’s mansion finds out that we are gossiping behind their backs, it will be a capital crime!” “Right, right, right! It’s better not to talk about the mayor’s mansion!” After hearing the conversation between these guys, Jiang Ping shook his head helplessly and smiled. He did not expect the news to spread so quickly. Now, it seemed that the so-called mayor’s mansion should know about this matter! This made Jiang Ping slightly worried. Things had become a little troublesome! They were searching for the origin of Liu’er’s constitution in Fengdu City, and they would definitely be met with all kinds of difficulties from the mayor’s mansion! Although his current strength was enough to overturn Fengdu City with one sword strike, at least he had to finish investigating the origin of Liu’er’s constitution! Otherwise, after a big battle, Fengdu City would be destroyed. What was there to investigate? Just as Jiang Ping was thinking about it, the waiter had already served all the delicacies. The three little gluttonous cats couldn’t wait to start eating! Along the way, the food they ate was very rough. Now that they saw the delicacies, the three little fellows became very greedy! So at this time, Liu’er and the others couldn’t care about their image any more. They picked up the pig trotters and started eating. Just as everyone was wolfing down their food, a sharp and sarcastic voice came from the side! “Yo!” “Where did these beggars come from? This is the Green Lotus Restaurant, not a place that beggars can come to!” “Just looking at you has affected my appetite!” Jiang Ping and the others looked in the direction of the voice and saw a bewitching beauty in a long green dress with a pair of fox eyes and a mole on the corner of her mouth pointing at them. Jiang Ping took a glance at the woman and continued to eat, not intending to pay any more attention to the woman. When the mean woman saw that Jiang Ping and the others were ignoring her, her two willowy eyebrows stood up, and she shouted at the waiter who was at the side. “Waiter, what are you still standing there for? Hurry up and chase these beggars out!” “They are affecting my appetite!” The waiter immediately became troubled! At this moment, Wan’er really couldn’t stand it anymore. She reached out to wipe her oily little mouth and said to the mean woman. “Where did this shrew come from? She’s barking like a dog!” “Waiter, how could you let dogs enter the Green Lotus Restaurant?” When the woman heard this, she was so angry that her chest heaved up and down violently. She stretched out her slender finger and pointed at Wan’er, but she couldn’t say a word! At this moment, a man’s voice suddenly came from not far away! “Who dares to make my wife angry?” “I shall teach you a good lesson!” Everyone looked in the direction of the voice and saw a man dressed in a white jade brocade robe appear in front of them. The man had a pair of narrow eyes, and he had a shifty look. When the mean woman saw the man enter from outside the door, she immediately acted cute and helpless and ran to the man’s side. She snuggled into the man’s arms and said coquettishly to the man. “Xu Yang, looking at these country bumpkins made me lose my appetite!” “Hurry up and chase these beggars out!” The mean woman pointed at Jiang Ping and the others with a disgusted look. At this moment, the diners at the table next to Jiang Ping’s began to whisper again. “This is the young lord of the Green Lotus Restaurant, Xu Yang!” “Looks like these foreigners are going to be unlucky. Offending Young Lord Xu Yang won’t end well for them!” “That’s right. It’s said that the reason why the Green Lotus Restaurant is able to reach this stage is that it has a great relationship with the mayor’s mansion!” “Offending the Green Lotus Restaurant is equivalent to offending the mayor’s mansion!” “Moreover, it’s said that the manager of the Green Lotus Restaurant is an expert in the heaven ascension realm!” “These foreigners are going to be finished!” Jiang Ping heard the whispers of a few customers beside him, and a hint of amusement appeared on his face. Heaven ascension realm? This was a little interesting. The heaven ascension realm to the current Jiang Ping was only so-so! At this moment, the woman was still pointing at Jiang Ping’s group, and her words were filled with ridicule! Wan’er and the others were so angry that their willow-like eyebrows were raised, and their small faces were knitted into a flower! Jiang Ping was obviously a little impatient. The true Qi on his body had completely burst out, and endless and boundless true Qi surged out of Jiang Ping’s body like a vast ocean! At this time, the aura on Jiang Ping’s body was also continuously rising! When Xu Yang saw that the aura on Jiang Ping’s body was soaring, he could not help but frown slightly. Who exactly was this fellow? The aura on this person’s body was at least in the earth immortal realm! He was afraid that he had kicked an iron plate today! He pushed the woman on his body away and was about to explain something to Jiang Ping. After all, he was an earth immortal realm expert. Even their Green Lotus Restaurant did not want to offend such an expert so easily! However, just as he was about to open his mouth to speak, the entire restaurant instantly reverberated with the clear sound of a sword! A dense sword Qi instantly filled the entire restaurant, and the entire restaurant was instantly filled with murderous intent! Everyone present felt a chill in their hearts, and their scalps went numb! Such a terrifying aura, just who was this fellow? Even Young Master Xu Yang’s expression was solemn at this moment. This fellow was definitely an expert! This was going to be difficult! Jiang Ping’s gaze calmly stared at the mean woman. When the mean woman felt Jiang Ping’s gaze, her entire face turned pale with fear! She was the first to face Jiang Ping’s murderous aura. At this moment, she felt a chill down her spine and the hairs on her body stood on end! Moreover, the fear and pressure pressed down on her chest until she felt suffocated as if she could not breathe! Everyone was stunned. This guy was probably going to kill someone! A few customers at the side felt the terrifying killing intent emanating from Jiang Ping’s body, and their bodies trembled! This was the Green Lotus Restaurant! This guy wasn’t really going to kill someone here, right? Moreover, he was going to kill the young lord’s woman of the Green Lotus Restaurant? He was courting death! Even if this guy was an earth immortal realm expert, he wouldn’t be able to cause any waves in the Green Lotus Restaurant! One had to know that the manager of the Green Lotus Restaurant was a genuine heaven ascension realm expert! The heaven ascension realm! The few customers present thought that Jiang Ping was only showing off his strength to shut that shrew up. When the mean woman saw that Jiang Ping didn’t draw his sword after releasing his killing intent, she heaved a sigh of relief in her heart. Fortunately, this fellow was afraid of the Green Lotus Restaurant’s might and didn’t make a move. If this fellow made a move, then her head would definitely be separated from her body! She had never expected herself to kick such an iron board! Unknowingly, her back was already drenched in sweat! Just as she relaxed, she saw a sword light that was as dazzling as the bright moon in the sky! In an instant, it illuminated the entire restaurant. Everyone subconsciously closed their eyes! When they opened their eyes again, the beautiful lady in Young Master Xu Yang’s arms had already turned into a headless corpse! Everyone present was dumbfounded. This fellow had actually made a move. Moreover, it was someone in Young Master Xu Yang’s arms! What a fellow! Everyone sucked in a breath of cold air. This fellow was too bold! Provoking Young Master Xu Yang was not a wise choice! They only saw Young Master Xu Yang staring blankly with his head lowered. He was completely stunned when he saw the beautiful lady who was in his arms and breathing a second ago, turning into a headless corpse in the next second! Then, a wave of anger shot straight to Xu Yang’s head. This fellow actually dared to look down on the Green Lotus Restaurant! He directly threw the woman in his arms down and roared at Jiang Ping and the others. “You scoundrel!” “Are you courting death?” “This is the Green Lotus Restaurant. It’s not a place where you can be so presumptuous!” “You...;” However, before Young Master Xu Yang could finish his sentence, his limbs were cut off by Jiang Ping’s sharp sword Qi! Young Master Xu Yang’s miserable screams reverberated throughout the entire restaurant. The few customers beside him were so frightened that they fell to the ground! This fellow actually crippled Young Master Xu Yang in front of everyone in the Green Lotus Restaurant! It’s over! The few people beside him immediately turned around and ran away. This fellow was completely a hothead! The restaurant manager, a heaven ascension realm expert, was so angry that he bled profusely! Young Master Xu Yang, whose limbs had been cut off, was continuously screaming in pain. At this moment, in the attic at the top of the Green Lotus Restaurant! A middle-aged man slowly opened his eyes. Endless fury was rising in his eyes! Who was it! Who exactly was this person! He actually dared to injure his intelligent son in his restaurant! At this moment, the fury in his heart rose, and endless fury gushed out from his eyes! Following that, his heaven ascension realm cultivation was revealed without missing a single detail! In an instant, the entire Fengdu City was filled with violent winds, and endless true Qi covered the entire city! At this moment, Gu Sheng had just arrived near the Green Lotus Restaurant. He looked at the top of the Green Lotus Restaurant, and he had a puzzled gaze. Who was it that caused the manager of the Green Lotus Restaurant to fly into a rage? It must not be a small matter for a heaven ascension realm cultivator to fly into a rage! At this moment, the manager of the Green Lotus Restaurant slowly stepped out of the pavilion. He stood in the air and hovered in mid-air. He looked at Jiang Ping and the others in the restaurant and roared at the top of his voice. “Get out here!” “Since you dared to cripple my intelligent son, I will tear you all into pieces!” After Gu Sheng heard these words, he had a doubtful expression. Who was it that dared to cripple Xu Yang? Gu Sheng was a little surprised. Someone actually dared to cripple Xu Yang in the Green Lotus Restaurant! He really wanted to see who had the guts to do so! The manager of the restaurant looked at Jiang Ping and the others, his eyes full of killing intent. A mere earth immortal realm actually dared to be presumptuous in his restaurant! He crippled his intelligent son! This was absolutely intolerable! After hearing the clamor from the restaurant manager outside, Jiang Ping picked up the Cloud Mist Sword and slowly stood up! The heaven ascension realm! This was a little interesting. It was barely enough for him to make a move. After Jiang Ping stood up, the aura all over his body continued to increase explosively! The earth immortal realm aura on Jiang Ping’s body continued to increase dramatically towards the heaven ascension realm. Although Jiang Ping was already in the soaring realm if he displayed the strength of the soaring realm and scared the enemy away, wouldn’t that be boring? Therefore, Jiang Ping had suppressed his strength to the heaven ascension realm! Outside the restaurant, the restaurant manager saw that Jiang Ping’s aura was increasing rapidly, and his eyes became a little solemn! What on earth was going on with this guy? Why was his aura increasing rapidly? Could it be that he was not only in the earth immortal realm? Could it be...; This guy was also in the heaven ascension realm? With every step Jiang Ping took, his aura increased by a notch! By the time Jiang Ping walked out of the restaurant, his aura had already soared to the heaven ascension realm! When Gu Sheng saw Jiang Ping’s figure, his eyes were filled with surprise. It was actually this guy! No wonder he dared to cripple Xu Yang in the Green Lotus Restaurant! So it was a hothead who relied on his strength and considered everyone beneath him! Gu Sheng looked at Jiang Ping, who was holding the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand. He wanted to see if this guy’s heaven ascension realm was powerful or not! The manager of the Green Lotus Restaurant was a veteran heaven ascension realm cultivator! He had cultivated in the heaven ascension realm for many years and had long reached the peak of the heaven ascension realm! Even if this guy was a heaven ascension realm cultivator, he should only have just entered the heaven ascension realm. There was no way he could be a match for the restaurant manager! At this moment, the restaurant manager looked at Jiang Ping with killing intent surging in his eyes. Endless killing intent was brewing in his eyes! He must make this fellow pay the price! Countless boundless true Qi gathered in his hand, and the winds and clouds in the world changed drastically! Following that, he directly struck out with his palm towards Jiang Ping! This palm strike was enough to destroy the heavens and earth, and it could even sink the entire Fengdu City! However, Jiang Ping’s expression was still extremely calm, as if this palm strike was nothing to him. Jiang Ping pulled out the Cloud Mist Sword with a calm expression. Then he waved it lightly towards the palm strike that the restaurant manager had sent over! An incomparably sharp sword Qi slashed out, and with this sword strike, the surrounding space was completely torn apart, and countless pieces of void shattered! The sword Qi instantly spread throughout the entire Fengdu City, traversing 30,000 miles of heaven and earth! Bang! Jiang Ping’s incomparably terrifying sword Qi directly clashed against the restaurant manager’s terrifying palm strike, and scary energy madly gushed out! A protective formation instantly lit up in the sky above Fengdu City, preventing Fengdu City from being destroyed in the battle! The restaurant manager’s terrifying palm strike was directly shattered by Jiang Ping’s light sword strike! When Gu Sheng saw this scene, his pupils contracted slightly. This fellow had actually blocked this palm so easily! He was quite something! But this wasn’t the true strength of the restaurant manager! When the restaurant manager saw that Jiang Ping had blocked his heaven-destroying palm so easily, his expression was also somewhat surprised! It seemed that this fellow’s heaven ascension realm was also somewhat advanced! But it was only so-so! “Injuring my intelligent son, dying ten thousand times isn’t enough!” After the restaurant manager roared angrily at Jiang Ping, an incomparably huge vajra dharma idol actually appeared in the sky! A dense oppressive feeling followed, and the incomparably huge dharma idol covered the sky as if a true God had descended into the world. However, Jiang Ping’s expression remained calm. There wasn’t the slightest ripple. Could it be that this guy’s trump card was only this dharma idol? Then this wouldn’t be interesting...; Or rather, it was too boring! Jiang Ping slowly raised the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand, and countless clouds and mist covered the sword, and the power of the great Tao spread around Jiang Ping’s body! Countless sharp sword Qi covered the entire Fengdu City like a vast ocean! At this moment, Jiang Ping was like a sword immortal on land! The sword Qi was abundant and surrounded his body! The sword Qi and wind surrounded Jiang Ping’s body, blowing up Jiang Ping’s robe and making it flutter! Under the sunlight, the Cloud Mist Sword shone with dazzling light! The current Jiang Ping was a great sword immortal! When the restaurant manager saw the sword immortal aura on Jiang Ping’s body, he was slightly shocked! This guy’s incomparably sharp sword Qi could not be underestimated! However, his vajra dharma idol was invincible! At this moment, the incomparably huge vajra dharma idol behind the restaurant manager finally moved. An incomparably violent gale directly attacked Jiang Ping! However, Jiang Ping was still as calm as water. His sword Qi was unperturbed! Following that, Jiang Ping gently raised his hand, and the Cloud Mist Sword emitted a series of clear sword cries, surrounding the entire Fengdu City! One could only see Jiang Ping brandishing his sword and slashing out. Countless violent sword Qi followed suit! Jiang Ping’s sword strike was enough to flatten the entire Fengdu City! The restaurant owner clearly felt the invincible power of Jiang Ping’s sword strike! His gaze was a little solemn as his entire body merged with the huge vajra dharma idol behind him! The entire vajra dharma idol immediately emitted endless light once again! After which, a punch was thrown toward Jiang Ping’s direction! Jiang Ping’s expression was indifferent as he directly slashed out. The invincible aura completely erupted at this moment! One could only see an incomparably sharp sword Qi slashing out from Jiang Ping’s Cloud Mist Sword! Boom! The sword Qi collided with the vajra dharma idol, and for a moment, the entire heaven and earth changed color! Dark clouds immediately covered the sky, and layers upon layers of dark clouds descended! Wild and violent energy bloomed in the sky above Fengdu City! Jiang Ping’s expression finally changed a little. This thing was becoming a little interesting! It was actually able to withstand his sword! He just didn’t know how much sword Qi this rough and thick-skinned dharma idol could withstand? Jiang Ping once again slashed out dozens of sword Qi! When the restaurant manager saw Jiang Ping continuously slash out dozens of sword Qi, everyone was dumbfounded! These sword Qi were actually effortlessly slashed out by this guy? The restaurant manager already knew that he was absolutely not a match for Jiang Ping, so he hurriedly withdrew and prepared to escape! The ten thousand feet dharma idol instantly turned into particles and scattered in the air. The restaurant manager’s figure had also disappeared, and the dozens of sword Qi behind Jiang Ping had missed their target! Gu Sheng, who was below, saw that the restaurant manager was actually not a match for Jiang Ping, the seriousness in his eyes became even more intense! This guy...; He was so strong! Gu Sheng looked at Jiang Ping, who was holding the Cloud Mist Sword. His eyes were solemn and carried a trace of fear! This fellow had actually defeated the restaurant manager. Could it be that this fellow’s strength was above the heaven ascension realm? Was it that legendary soaring realm expert? When he thought of this, even Gu Sheng broke out in a cold sweat from his shock. However, he quickly dismissed this thought. This fellow was definitely not in the legendary soaring realm! Which soaring realm mighty figure was not a famous person? How many soaring realms were there in the world? If this fellow was really in the soaring realm, then it was impossible for him not to have heard of this fellow’s name! Therefore, in Gu Sheng’s eyes, Jiang Ping was a heaven ascension realm! However, Jiang Ping’s heaven ascension realm should be much stronger than the ordinary heaven ascension realm! This guy was only in the half-step soaring realm at the very most! Gu Sheng raised his head and looked at Jiang Ping, who was in the sky emitting dense sword Qi! His eyes were filled with killing intent! He reached out to touch the blood scab on his face. This guy actually dared to cut his precious face! It was truly unforgivable! So what if he was half-step into the soaring realm! This was Fengdu City! This was his world! As long as this guy was in Fengdu City, he would not be able to escape from his palm! The reason why Gu Sheng had such confidence was because of his father! He was also the mayor of Fengdu City! A great cultivator in the soaring realm! Gu Lin! Gu Sheng looked at Jiang Ping with a trace of viciousness in his eyes. It seemed that in Fengdu City, the only one who could deal with this guy was his father! Gu Sheng snorted coldly in his heart, and then he led the few terrified guards by his side back to the mansion! After the few earth immortal realm guards witnessed Jiang Ping’s strength, they were completely flustered! They actually wanted to fight with such an expert outside the city gate just now! They were really a little reckless! If it weren’t for their young master stopping them, they would probably have been beheaded! Thinking of this, the few earth immortal realm guards were secretly rejoicing! Fortunately, they did not make a move back then! The few of them felt a slight chill on their necks! Jiang Ping had also noticed Gu Sheng and his people, but he did not pay too much attention to them! So what if it was the mayor’s mansion? Jiang Ping had long known that the mayor of Fengdu City was one of the few soaring realm experts in the world! However, he, Jiang Ping, was also in the soaring realm. As both of them were in the soaring realm, who was afraid of who? Jiang Ping didn’t take the mayor of Fengdu City seriously at all. In the same realm, he was basically invincible! Moreover, he also had the one step to heaven pill! There was no need to panic at all! However, the manager who escaped was troublesome. He shouldn’t have underestimated the enemy just now! He should have killed him with one slash! He did not expect the restaurant manager to have such a profound escape method! Jiang Ping shook his head slowly, but he did not think too much about it! He was just a defeated opponent! Then, Jiang Ping returned to the Green Lotus Restaurant with the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand. Yan’er immediately rushed over, hugged Jiang Ping’s thigh, and said sweetly. “Daddy!” “You’re so awesome!” Jiang Ping touched Yan’er’s head and then said to Yan’er intimately. “Alright, let’s continue eating!” Then, Jiang Ping sat down again and began to wolf down his food! His three daughters, the butler, and the others also began to eat again! The restaurant that was originally bustling with people had already been emptied! Only Jiang Ping and his group were left, along with Xu Yang, who had been whittled into a human rod! Xu Yang looked at Jiang Ping as if he was looking at a monster! This guy was actually in the heaven ascension realm! And it was very likely that he was even in the half-step soaring realm! To be able to defeat his father, who was at the peak of the heaven ascension realm, this guy was definitely not simple! At this moment, Xu Yang’s heart was filled with incomparable regret! He regretted appearing and provoked such a God! Originally, his broken limbs could still be restored. But now, even his father had been defeated by this fellow. If his limbs were broken for too long, he would be completely crippled! Xu Yang’s gaze instantly became dim. From now on, he would become a cripple! He looked at the mean beauty whose head had been beheaded by Jiang Ping, his gaze filled with incomparable hatred! This woman, how could she have provoked such a god of death! If it wasn’t for the fact that he no longer had four limbs, he might have been able to stomp that mean woman’s head to pieces! He looked at Jiang Ping and the others who were eating and he wanted to cry, but failed to shed any tears! Xu Yang thought, “Brother since you were in the heaven ascension realm, you could have said so earlier!” “If you had said so earlier, I wouldn’t have dared to provoke you!” “You are in the heaven ascension realm, but you don’t even look like one!” “Who could tell!” Xu Yang’s face was already as wrinkled as a bitter gourd! At this moment, Young Master Gu Sheng had already returned to the mayor’s mansion. The Green Lotus Restaurant’s manager, who had been beaten to the point of fleeing by Jiang Ping, was also there. It was very obvious that after the manager fled, he had fled to the mayor’s mansion! At this moment, the mayor of Fengdu City, Gu Lin, had already found out about the situation! He didn’t expect that Jiang Ping’s group would be so arrogant in his Fengdu City! Everyone in Fengdu City knew that this Green Lotus Restaurant had a close relationship with the mayor’s mansion! However, that fellow actually dared to attack the Green Lotus Restaurant! And his methods were extremely cruel! Not only did he directly cripple the young lord of the Green Lotus restaurant, he even wanted to kill the manager! Wasn’t this a blatant slap to the mayor’s mansion’s face? It was unbearable! The Green Lotus Restaurant’s manager also had a face full of anger. He didn’t expect that Jiang Ping’s strength was actually so formidable! It was even possible that he had already reached the level of half-step soaring realm! Looking at it now, it seemed that his son couldn’t be saved. Even if he could save him, he would already be a cripple! The limbs that had been cut off by the sword Qi of such an expert had no chance of being restored! Therefore, he could only leave him there to wait for death! The Green Lotus Restaurant manager’s face kept twitching. Xu Yang’s talent in cultivation was extremely good. All these years, he had spent a lot of effort nurturing his son! But now, he was crippled by that fellow! He was filled with hatred towards Jiang Ping! At this moment, the mayor of Fengdu City, Gu Lin, also noticed that Gu Sheng had returned! He asked Gu Sheng in a deep voice. “How was your training outside?” Gu Sheng hurriedly bowed to Gu Lin and then said. “Father, everything was fine when I went out to train!” “It was on the way back to the city...;” “I was almost killed by a man at the south city gate, with a long sword in his hand and three little girls by his side!” Hearing this, the pupils of Gu Lin and the restaurant manager instantly dilated! It was this guy again! Even with Gu Lin’s composure, his heart was filled with fury after hearing this news! It was this guy again! Could it be that this guy was his enemy? He actually dared to try to kill his son! Hmph! Gu Lin heavily stretched out his hand and slapped the table in front of him! The entire table instantly turned into dust! At this moment, the mayor of Fengdu City, Gu Lin’s heart was filled with anger! He had never thought that the fellow would actually dare to make a move against his son! This clearly meant that he had come to Fengdu City to find trouble! Moreover, it was very likely that he had come to seek revenge! Gu Lin’s eyes narrowed slightly. All these years, he had killed too many people. He completely did not remember that he had such an enemy! Gu Lin’s eyes were filled with killing intent. Who gave that guy the courage? A mere heaven ascension realm dared to seek revenge on him! This was probably looking down on him, Gu Lin! He was said to be in the heaven ascension realm. So what if he was truly in the half-step soaring realm? He, Gu Lin, would let that guy experience it. The strength of the soaring realm was not something that a half-step soaring realm could resist! The difference between a half-step soaring realm and a true soaring realm! There was a chasm between the two! An incomparably terrifying aura was released from Gu Lin’s body. Streams of true Qi that were as hot as the blazing sun overflowed from his body! Seeing this situation, the corners of Young Master Gu Sheng’s mouth curled into a sneer! As long as his father made a move, that fellow would absolutely not have the strength to retaliate! The soaring realm was already a mighty figure standing at the top of the world! The realms above had already been lost, and no one could cultivate anymore! Gu Lin looked at Gu Sheng, who was covered in wounds from Jiang Ping’s sword Qi, and the anger in his heart grew even more! Gu Sheng was his only son, and his cultivation talent far surpassed his own from back then. In time, Gu Sheng would definitely reach the heaven ascension realm or even the soaring realm! In addition, Gu Lin was too powerful, and the true Qi in his body was too violent, so it was impossible for him to have another son again! Therefore, Gu Sheng had always been regarded as a treasure by Gu Lin! And that guy actually dared to attack his precious son. Wasn’t this courting death? Gu Lin’s true Qi was released, and endless scarlet Yang power bloomed! Today, not to mention that guy was in the heaven ascension realm! Even if he were a true soaring realm cultivator, he would still have to pay the price! Gu Lin waved his hand, and the entire Fengdu City’s formation was activated! An overwhelming formation covered the sky above Fengdu City, and the city was immediately sealed! Countless profound formations sealed the entire Fengdu City tightly, and extremely profound runes continuously rotated in the sky above the city! An intense pressure swept over, and the entire Fengdu City seemed to be frozen in place at this moment! The ordinary citizens even thought that a great calamity was about to arrive. The intense pressure made them prostrate on the ground, not daring to raise their heads! They were afraid of desecrating the divine might! Jiang Ping, who was eating, looked at the formations that filled the sky! A hint of disdain flashed in his eyes! Fengdu City wasn’t planning to use this little bit of formation to deal with him, right? It was looking down on him a little, huh? Jiang Ping had a playful expression. If it wasn’t for the fact that he wanted to investigate the origin of Liu’er’s constitution, he wouldn’t mind killing Fengdu City with a single sword strike! Moreover, he had a feeling that there was a familiar aura in Fengdu City. He couldn’t be sure whose aura it was! Jiang Ping’s eyes narrowed slightly. What kind of secret was Fengdu City hiding? At this moment, in the mayor’s mansion, Gu Lin looked at the massive formation in the sky and slowly said. “The city protection formation has been activated!” “That guy will definitely not be able to escape!” “Let’s go. We’ll go and meet this powerful foreigner!” After Gu Lin finished speaking, he directly stepped out of the mayor’s mansion and walked towards the Green Lotus Restaurant! With every step he took, Gu Lin’s aura increased by a bit! This journey was the time Gu Lin used to adjust his breathing! After all, it had been a long time since he made a move. After he had reached the soaring realm, he had already become one of the mighty top figures in this world! No one dared to provoke him. There was simply no chance for him to make a move! With every step Gu Lin took, the spiritual Qi in Fengdu City became more abundant! An extremely dense killing intent instantly rose up in the entire Fengdu City. The dense killing intent enveloped the entire Green Lotus Restaurant! An endless and vigorous pressure was emitted from Gu Lin’s body! The commoners in the city were all intimidated by Gu Lin’s incomparably dense pressure and trembled in fear. They thought that the heavens were angry! Rolling thunder descended from the sky through the thick layer of clouds. Endless lightning illuminated the entire Fengdu City! Killing intent surged everywhere. The great battle of Fengdu City was about to begin! When two soaring realm experts fought, the energy that spread out was enough to destroy the entire Fengdu City! People in the soaring realm were already the top experts in this world! There wouldn’t be anyone else above that! At this moment, Jiang Ping, who was in the Green Lotus Restaurant, was holding a cloud in his hand. The sound of his sword could be heard continuously! The might of the great Tao brought about gusts of violent wind! The entire Green Lotus Restaurant was like a lone boat that was on the verge of collapsing under the gusts of wind! Jiang Ping slowly stood up. The sword Qi and wind around him lingered. He could already feel that the mayor of Fengdu City was rushing towards the restaurant! The corners of Jiang Ping’s mouth curled up slightly. Finally, something interesting was about to happen! He had yet to slaughter anyone in the soaring realm! The Cloud Mist Sword in Jiang Ping’s hand trembled slightly. The majestic sword Qi was continuously released. The crisp and melodious sound of sword sounds reverberated throughout the entire restaurant. It proved that the sword was also excited to finally meet a powerful opponent! Jiang Ping looked at Liu’er and the two other girls with gentle eyes and said softly. “Liu’er, Wan’er, Yan’er!” “All of you can rest here.” “Daddy will return after I’m done slaughtering a soaring realm.” “The cloud mist decapitates a soaring realm, and the sword Qi fills Fengdu!” The boundless sword Qi was emitted from Jiang Ping’s body, and Jiang Ping took a step forward! He directly arrived outside the Green Lotus Restaurant! At this moment, the mayor of Fengdu City and the others had also arrived at the Green Lotus Restaurant! Gu Lin stared at Jiang Ping with a murderous look in his eyes! Was this guy the one who wanted to end his descendant? True Qi bloomed around Gu Lin. He looked at Jiang Ping and said. “Who are you exactly?” “How dare you come to Fengdu City and behave atrociously!” “You’re courting death!” After hearing Gu Lin’s words, Jiang Ping said indifferently. “Just you?” “Humph! Who gave you the courage to be so arrogant when you’re only in the heaven ascension realm?” Gu Lin was furious! “Who told you that I’m in the heaven ascension realm?” After Jiang Ping finished speaking, the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand buzzed non-stop and continuously released sword Qi. The endless sword Qi was like a vast ocean. It covered the entire Fengdu City! Then, Jiang Ping took a step forward, and the aura on his body rose steadily! With one step, Jiang Ping’s aura skyrocketed from the heaven ascension realm to the soaring realm! When Fengdu City’s mayor Gu Lin and the others saw this scene, their expressions were grave! One step into the soaring realm! Who exactly was this guy! The soaring realm! How many people were in the soaring realm in this world! This guy was definitely disguising as someone in the soaring realm! Looking at Jiang Ping, who was holding the Cloud Mist Sword with a calm expression, Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager had terrified expressions! This guy was actually in the soaring realm! In other words, if this guy really wanted to kill them, he could kill them instantly with one sword and send them to reincarnation! Hiss! The two of them sucked in a breath of cold air. Who was this guy? He was actually so terrifying! At this moment, Gu Lin also took a step forward. Then, he pointed at Jiang Ping and asked. “Who exactly are you!” “Why have you come to my Fengdu City!” Jiang Ping looked at Gu Lin. Killing intent surged in his eyes as he asked indifferently. “You are a person who is about to die. What’s the point of knowing all this?” Jiang Ping’s words stunned everyone present! Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager broke out in cold sweat! This guy was actually targeting the entire Fengdu City! From what he said, he wanted to kill the mayor! Could it be that this guy was really here to seek revenge? Gu Sheng narrowed his eyes. When did Fengdu City offend a soaring realm big shot? The appearance of a soaring realm, this person could not have been unknown! However, they could not recognize the man in front of them who was holding a long sword! Could it be that this guy was a new soaring realm in this world? Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager looked at each other. They were both glad that they had saved their lives from the hands of a soaring realm! Meanwhile, Gu Lin was staring at Jiang Ping. It would be fine if Jiang Ping was in the heaven ascension realm! But this fellow was in the soaring realm! If they were to engage in battle, the entire Fengdu City would be destroyed! But this fellow in front of him had to die. Such a dangerous fellow who was hostile towards Fengdu City must not be spared! The mayor of Fengdu City released all of his strength! Violent gales burst out! The killing intent in the entire Fengdu City was dense! Gu Lin looked at Jiang Ping and roared furiously. “Kill me? With just a little brat like you?” Although Jiang Ping was in the soaring realm, Gu Lin still had a lot of confidence in his own strength! Moreover, it was very likely that Jiang Ping, who was in the soaring realm, had advanced recently! He had been deeply cultivating in the soaring realm for many years and had long fully developed the various mysteries of the soaring realm! Therefore, once he started a battle with Jiang Ping, his chances of winning were still very high! Jiang Ping looked at Gu Lin, whose aura had already reached the peak of the soaring realm, and traces of battle intent rose in his eyes! It was precisely such a powerful opponent that it would be interesting to fight! Jiang Ping slowly raised the long sword in his hand and pointed it at Gu Lin, the mayor of Fengdu City! “Today...;” “The sword shall slaughter the soaring realm!” An incomparably sharp sword Qi suddenly slashed out as soon as Jiang Ping’s voice fell! With this sword strike, the sky changed color, thunder rumbled in the sky, and the surrounding space was completely torn apart! The unparalleled sword light instantly slashed in front of Gu Lin! Seeing this, Gu Lin snorted coldly! The sword shall slaughter the soaring realm! That was vain! Immediately, an endless squall gathered in his fist, and violent fist energy burst out from his fist! The fist gales were like the eye of the storm above the nine heavens! The few people present were all blown by these violent fist gales until their bodies swayed, and it was difficult for them to even stand firm! Gu Lin punched out, and endless fist gales followed! They collided with Jiang Ping’s incomparably sharp sword tip! Bang! A loud sound rang out, and two waves of energy instantly dissipated! Endless violent energy raged wildly! Gu Lin hurriedly waved his large hand, and a black hole instantly appeared, completely absorbing all the violent energy! If this energy was allowed to rage wildly, it would destroy the entire Fengdu City! Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager also hurriedly activated their powerful Qis to protect their bodies! The energy emitted from the great battle between the two soaring realms was enough to take their lives! Jiang Ping directly waved his sword, sealing off the surrounding world, and all the energy could not spread out! There were still many secrets hidden in Fengdu City. Jiang Ping didn’t want to destroy the city! After sealing off the surrounding area, Jiang Ping slowly said to Gu Lin. “Come and fight!” With that said, Jiang Ping slashed out with his sword again! Gu Lin sneered when he saw Jiang Ping slashing out with his ordinary sword. Then, he punched out with his fist, dispersing Jiang Ping’s sword Qi! Gu Lin looked at Jiang Ping with disdain! “That’s it?” Jiang Ping only smiled slightly and didn’t say anything! He just slowly closed his eyes! Instantly, dark clouds appeared in the sky, thunder rolled, and gusts of wind blew! A drizzling rain followed! The drizzling gradually turned into a downpour as Jiang Ping’s aura increased! The heavy rain kept hitting Jiang Ping’s body! The raindrops slid down the tip of the sword, and Jiang Ping slowly opened his eyes! Following that, another ordinary sword Qi slashed out! This sword attack didn’t have any fancy tricks. It was just an extremely ordinary sword Qi! Seeing this, Gu Lin disdained to block it! He let Jiang Ping’s sword Qi slash at him! Because the fist energy beside Gu Lin was too fierce, Jiang Ping’s sword Qi had already dispersed before it even touched Gu Lin’s body! A trace of disdain flashed across Gu Lin’s eyes when he saw this. It seemed that this fellow was just a soaring realm empty shell! He didn’t have any ability at all! However, in the next second, he couldn’t laugh anymore! There were still dozens of streaks behind this streak of sword Qi! In a short time, there were more than a hundred streaks, and streaks of sword Qi overlapped one another! The endless sword Qi was like the torrential river water, extending endlessly! Furthermore, the power of the streaks of sword Qi was layered on top of each other! The further it went, the more powerful it became! Gu Lin clearly realized that something was wrong and hurriedly summoned a defensive formation! To block Jiang Ping’s sword Qi! However, Jiang Ping’s move was extremely difficult to block! Under the destruction of the countless sword Qi, the defensive formation that Gu Lin summoned was instantly shattered! Gu Lin’s expression changed slightly. This fellow’s sword Qi was actually so strange! It was endless! Gu Lin laughed coldly, and a great virtual sun appeared behind him! The surrounding temperature suddenly rose, and an endless amount of fist energy pounced towards him! Gu Sheng saw the great virtual sun behind Gu Lin, and his pupils instantly dilated! He had never thought that his father would actually use this move so quickly! This was the Gu family’s family technique, the Great Sun Scripture! The restaurant manager also did not expect that that fellow would be able to force Gu Lin to use his ultimate technique so quickly! This move was Gu Lin’s trump card back then! Gu Lin roared angrily at Jiang Ping! “Die!” Then, he threw a punch at Jiang Ping! The great virtual sun behind him also appeared, and an endless amount of incomparably hot mysterious Yang energy was charging toward Jiang Ping! Wherever this great sun passed by, Jiang Ping’s sword Qi metal dispersed! Jiang Ping looked at this great sun that could destroy anything, and his eyes flashed with a bright light! It was a little interesting! Jiang Ping sheathed his sword! He clenched his fists, and endless heaven and earth energy directly gathered on Jiang Ping’s fists! Rolling lightning continuously descended beside Jiang Ping, and he directly stretched out his hand to grab the lightning! Following that, Jiang Ping exerted strength with his legs, and a powerful force burst forth! He leaped up and threw a punch at the sun! The rolling lightning revolved around Jiang Ping’s fist! Bang! Jiang Ping directly threw a punch toward the virtual sun! The virtual sun instantly erupted with a terrifying temperature, turning the surroundings into a sea of fire! The lightning and sea of fire turned the surroundings into hell! After a while, the great sun that Gu Lin summoned was dispelled by Jiang Ping’s lightning! Jiang Ping looked at Gu Lin and thought that it was indeed not simple for Gu Lin to be able to reach the soaring realm! However...; It would end here! When Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager saw Jiang Ping receive the punch with his bare hands, they were stunned! This guy was not only a sword immortal, but he was also a legendary martial god? Otherwise, how could he receive the attack of the Great Sun Scripture with his bare hands? After all, it was the Great Sun Scripture displayed by a soaring realm expert! When one thought of this, one would gasp! If this fellow was really a dual cultivator of sword and martial arts, then he was simply too terrifying! Such a person was someone that Fengdu City absolutely could not afford to offend. Gu Lin looked at Jiang Ping, and his expression became somewhat solemn! If this fellow was just a sword immortal, then it would be fine. But the key point was that this fellow was also a martial god! In other words, this guy was extremely powerful in both long-range and close-range combat! Even though he was only in the beginning stages of the soaring realm, his dual cultivation was enough to fight against an experienced soaring realm like him! As a result, his chances of winning were even lower! At this moment, Jiang Ping slowly pulled out the Cloud Mist Sword from its sheath! The sword light flickered continuously, and endless sword Qi once again covered the entire city! Jiang Ping looked at Gu Lin’s extremely solemn expression and slowly said. “Fengdu City’s mayor?” “After today, Fengdu will no longer have a mayor!” After Jiang Ping finished speaking, his figure instantly disappeared from where he was! Gu Lin’s eyes focused. This fellow’s strength was unfathomable! He completely didn’t look like he had just ascended to the soaring realm! Great Sun Reincarnation Bell! Open! Boom! A burst of terrifying true Qi burst out from Gu Lin’s body, and gusts of strong wind blew! A great sun enveloped Gu Lin’s entire body! This was Gu Lin’s defensive martial technique! When he fused with the virtual great sun, he released a terrifyingly high temperature which would instantly incinerate any opponent that got close to it! Ever since Jiang Ping’s figure disappeared, Gu Lin had guessed that Jiang Ping was going to get close to him! If a martial god got close to him, even nine lives wouldn’t be enough to kill him! He would be sentenced to death if a martial god got close to him! Therefore, the moment Jiang Ping disappeared, he activated his defensive cultivation method! At this moment, Jiang Ping silently appeared behind Gu Lin! Jiang Ping directly slashed out with his sword, and the Cloud Mist Sword heavily slashed at the virtual great sun! The virtual great sun instantly trembled incessantly, and Gu Lin also seized the opportunity when Jiang Ping attacked! He punched at Jiang Ping! A violent gale, accompanied by Gu Lin’s fist, directly smashed onto Jiang Ping’s Cloud Mist Sword! Jiang Ping was instantly forced back step by step because of this enormous force! After all, Jiang Ping had just entered the soaring realm, and there was still a gap between him and Gu Lin, who had long reached the full soaring realm! Streams of sword Qi burst out from Jiang Ping’s body and deflected Gu Lin’s fist aura! Endless sword intent spread out from Jiang Ping’s body! After blocking Gu Lin’s attack, Jiang Ping wiped the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand! Then, he said to Gu Lin. “You have some strength, but it ends here!” After saying that, Jiang Ping’s figure disappeared again! Endless sword Qi burst out from Jiang Ping’s body! When Gu Lin saw Jiang Ping disappear once again, his eyes were extremely solemn! That sword attack from Jiang Ping just now had directly caused his Great Sun Reincarnation Bell to tremble non-stop! If there were a few more attacks, the Great Sun Reincarnation Bell would not be able to withstand it! Jiang Ping was the first person Gu Lin met who almost shattered his Great Sun Reincarnation Bell with one strike! Gu Lin’s expression was solemn. That terrifying fellow had actually disappeared once again! Jiang Ping’s figure instantly appeared in Gu Lin’s eyes! Jiang Ping’s sword was wrapped with endless lightning! The Cloud Mist Sword was wrapped with rolling lightning as it directly slashed onto Gu Lin’s Great Sun Reincarnation Bell! Bang! Following Jiang Ping’s terrifying slash, Gu Lin’s Great Sun Reincarnation Bell directly cracked open! Gu Lin’s expression changed drastically. This fellow was actually so terrifying! One strike! Just one strike was enough to crack his Great Sun Reincarnation Bell! However, before Gu Lin could react, Jiang Ping attacked once again! This time, behind Jiang Ping, a strange phenomenon of mountains and rivers appeared! A towering mountain sat behind Jiang Ping! On top of the mountains and rivers, there was a large river that flowed down from the top of the mountain! The river and the mountains connected directly to the Cloud Mist Sword in Jiang Ping’s hand! At this moment, the Cloud Mist Sword in Jiang Ping’s hand seemed to be surrounded by a big river! Jiang Ping directly swung his sword once again at Gu Lin, who was hiding inside the Great Sun Reincarnation Bell! This sword carried the power of a big river! It was the sword of the mountains and rivers of Heaven and earth! When Jiang Ping’s sword slashed onto Gu Lin’s Great Sun Reincarnation Bell, the entire bell instantly shattered! It turned into countless fragments and scattered between Heaven and earth! Young Master Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager were instantly stunned! Two sword strikes had broken the so-called greatest defense in the world, the Great Sun Reincarnation Bell! This was simply a monster! Gu Lin was also stunned. He also did not expect that Jiang Ping would be able to destroy his Great Sun Reincarnation Bell so easily! However, at this critical moment, he did not have the time to think too much! He immediately adjusted his true Qi and was ready to attack Jiang Ping again. However, Jiang Ping would not give him the chance to attack again! Jiang Ping directly attacked again. Jiang Ping’s sword was extremely sharp, so Gu Lin did not have time to attack at all! He could only set up a defensive formation again! Jiang Ping sneered and once again launched the endless wind and rain sword force attack! Countless sword Qis continuously slashed at Gu Lin’s body! Gu Sheng and the restaurant manager, who was standing at the side, had extremely grave expressions when they saw this scene! They did not expect that even a soaring realm expert would not be a match for that fellow. This person was simply too terrifying! The restaurant manager and Young Master Gu Sheng were burning with anxiety. If the mayor also lost, they definitely would not be able to survive. Would that fellow let them off after killing the mayor? The answer was obviously no! He was in the soaring realm. If a soaring realm expert attacked them, they would have no hope of escaping! Just as the two of them were extremely anxious, the restaurant manager seemed to have suddenly thought of something! He glanced at the restaurant, and the corner of his mouth curled up into a despicable smile! Since they could not fight him head-on, they could only use despicable methods! After the restaurant manager gave a sinister laugh, he instantly disappeared on the spot! At this moment, Jiang Ping was still immersed in killing his opponent. He didn’t notice that the restaurant manager had already disappeared! Gu Lin, who was enduring the pressure of Jiang Ping’s continuous sword Qi, was already on the verge of collapse! Jiang Ping’s sword Qi came one after another. He didn’t even give him a chance to catch his breath! Not to mention fighting back, he could only defend passively! At this moment, the restaurant manager instantly appeared in front of Yan’er, Wan’er, and Liu’er! Then, he snatched them away! Just as Gu Lin was about to crumble under Jiang Ping’s sword Qi, the restaurant manager’s voice suddenly came from the Green Lotus Restaurant! “Stop!” “If you dare to attack again, I will kill them!” When Jiang Ping saw his daughters being kidnapped by the restaurant manager, he immediately stopped the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand! Jiang Ping narrowed his eyes. This guy dared to kidnap his daughters from the restaurant! He was simply courting death! It seemed that he had to take the one step to heaven pill now and directly raise his cultivation to the top of this plane! Otherwise, with his current soaring realm strength, and Gu Lin, who was also in the soaring realm beside him, it would be very difficult for him to save his daughters from the hands of the restaurant manager! Gu Lin, who was about to collapse, saw that the restaurant manager had kidnapped Jiang Ping’s daughters, and his face immediately lit up with joy! He wanted to see if Jiang Ping dared to continue resisting! Just as Gu Lin wanted to take this opportunity to attack Jiang Ping, the city protection formation of Fengdu City suddenly began to shake violently. No one had the time to react! In the next second, the city protection formation of Fengdu City exploded! Everyone was dumbfounded. What was going on? Why did the city protection formation suddenly break? How terrifying was the person who could break the city protection formation of Fengdu City in an instant? Could it be an existence above the legendary soaring realm? In the next moment, a woman appeared in front of everyone! Just when everyone was curious about who the woman was, the head of the restaurant manager instantly exploded! The woman’s hand was covered in blood, and the restaurant manager’s corpse fell straight down! The appearance of the woman made the familiarity in Jiang Ping’s heart abnormally strong! As for Gu Lin and Gu Sheng, their minds were completely blank! To instantly kill the restaurant manager, this must at least be a soaring realm! The two of them were already dumbfounded. Was the soaring realm so common now? Moreover, judging from the fact that the city protection formation was destroyed in an instant, this woman was very likely to be the legendary existence above the soaring realm! The father and son immediately broke out in cold sweat. Just what kind of psycho was this! Jiang Ping looked at the woman who had disheveled hair in front of him. Her true appearance could not be seen, and his eyes narrowed slightly! Just who exactly was this woman? He sensed a familiar feeling from her! However, at this moment, Jiang Ping could not care too much anymore. This woman was very likely someone who was above the soaring realm! Moreover, he did not know whether she was an enemy or a friend. It was extremely dangerous for his daughters to be by her side! The illusions of the mountains and rivers behind Jiang Ping instantly changed! The stars in the sky continuously revolved around Jiang Ping’s body. The Cloud Mist Sword in Jiang Ping’s hand also instantly wrapped around the power of the stars! Following that, Jiang Ping slashed out with his sword! Sword Qi instantly swept across heaven and earth, and the power of the stars covered 30,000 miles! Jiang Ping’s sword directly tore through countless void spaces, destroying endless space. From the starry sky, he obtained the power of the stars and slashed toward Gu Lin! When Gu Lin saw this, his expression was filled with fear. He was prepared to take a defensive stance to block! However, Jiang Ping’s sword was something that even the gods could not block! Gu Lin’s entire body, as well as the surrounding space, was instantly torn apart! Even when he died, he never thought that this fellow would actually have the strength to instantly kill him with a sword! At this moment, Jiang Ping pointed his sword at the mysterious woman and slowly said. “Leave my daughters’ side!” At this moment, Jiang Ping had also noticed that Liu’er’s situation was very strange. Liu’er was completely red. It was very obvious that this was the premonition of her resurrection lily’s constitution going berserk! At this moment, Jiang Ping became even more anxious and hurriedly drew his sword toward that woman! However, that woman’s figure flashed and instantly disappeared! Before Jiang Ping could even react, that woman had already arrived in front of him! She kept attacking him! For a moment, Jiang Ping was actually unable to defend himself! Even though Jiang Ping had already mobilized the power of the galaxy, he was still not a match for the woman! The woman’s strength had obviously far exceeded the soaring realm, and she had even surpassed the soaring realm by two or three realms! Jiang Ping, who had mobilized the power of the stars, definitely had the strength to fight against cultivators above the soaring realm! But in front of this woman, he was beaten up! This was enough to explain the problem! Jiang Ping was losing ground in the battle with the woman. Moreover, Jiang Ping discovered that although the woman was strong! But her attacks were completely without rhyme or reason! It was very similar to when Liu’er was in a berserk state. Moreover, Jiang Ping could faintly feel the feeling of an old friend from the woman! During the battle, Jiang Ping directly took out the one step to heaven pill and swallowed it! The incomparably vigorous medicinal strength instantly filled Jiang Ping’s entire body! Fortunately, Jiang Ping had already reached the soaring realm and could quickly digest the medicinal strength! Otherwise, by the time Jiang Ping finished digesting the medicinal strength, he would have already been beaten to death by this mysterious woman in front of him! After Jiang Ping swallowed the one step to heaven pill, his realm continued to soar! He directly crossed over a dozen realms and reached the highest realm in this plane! Heavenly path realm! At this moment, Jiang Ping was already on the same level as the heavenly path! The mysterious woman continued to attack Jiang Ping! However, with a slight wave of Jiang Ping’s hand, the originally irrational and irritable woman instantly quieted down! The current Jiang Ping could use the laws of the great Tao with every move he made! The woman was trapped by the laws of the great Tao. It was difficult for her to even move, let alone attack! As long as Jiang Ping was willing, he could press the woman to death with his fingers! However, at this moment, Jiang Ping was very curious about the woman’s identity! The woman’s symptoms were so similar to Liu’er’s. This meant that she had the same constitution as Liu’er! Perhaps the secret of Liu’er’s constitution could be found out from this woman! Jiang Ping waved his hand again, and a gentle breeze blew over! The strands of hair that covered the woman’s entire face were blown away, revealing the woman’s true appearance! After seeing the woman’s true appearance, Jiang Ping was instantly stunned! Not only Jiang Ping, but even Liu’er, Yan’er, and Wan’er were also stunned! But then, the three little girls’ eyes turned red, and bean-sized tears rolled down from the corners of their eyes! Then, the three girls ran to the side of the woman as if they had gone crazy. They hugged the woman and started to cry loudly! Jiang Ping also walked to the side of the woman and released the restrictions on her! The woman whose restrictions had been released was stunned for a moment. She had already lost her mind. Originally, she wanted to continue attacking Jiang Ping, but when she saw the three girls hugging her tightly, she was instantly stunned! Her delicate body was constantly trembling, and her eyes gradually turned red! The woman was Jiang Ping’s wife and also the mother of the three little girls, Zhou Yi! At this moment, Zhou Yi had recovered from her berserk state. When she saw her husband and daughters, she could no longer hold it in and hugged her daughters, crying loudly! Jiang Ping’s eyes were also red. He walked to Zhou Yi’s side and asked her. “Yi’er!” “What have you been through all these years?” “We’ve been looking for you for so long!” Zhou Yi burst into tears. At this moment, she told Jiang Ping everything! It turned out that Zhou Yi was originally the saintess of the Celestial Sect from the nine heavens! Furthermore, she had the resurrection lily constitution and was regarded as a treasure by the Celestial Sect! However, when the Celestial Sect found out that Zhou Yi had given birth to her daughters with Jiang Ping in the lower realm, they chased her out of the Celestial Sect! And exiled her in this endless starry sky! Without her husband and her children by her side, Zhou Yi fell into a state of longing for them all day long! Gradually, she fell into the resurrection lily’s berserk mode. And just now, because the restaurant manager had kidnapped Liu’er and the others, she felt it in her heart and directly crossed the endless void to come to Fengdu City! That was how the scene happened! After Jiang Ping heard Zhou Yi’s words, the Cloud Mist Sword in his hand buzzed non-stop! Celestial Sect! How dare they let his wife suffer for so many years! They were courting death! At this moment, Jiang Ping was already in the legendary heavenly path realm! When Jiang Ping was angry, the sky and earth changed color immediately! Thunder roared, and lightning rolled! The sea and the clouds churned! The entire plane was affected by Jiang Ping’s anger, and a strange phenomenon appeared! Jiang Ping reached out and grabbed Zhou Yi’s hand. Then, he spoke to his three daughters. “Let’s go!” “We’re going to conquer the nine heavens!” “Our journey is this endless sea of stars!” “Celestial Sect, I, Jiang Ping, am here!” In the distant nine heavens, a family of five had quietly arrived!